 <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation In the not-so-spacious rental house, Lu Chen looked at the game pod in front of him and felt his breathing quicken. This was the year 2050, it was the year when human civilization had made a qualitative leap compared to decades ago. It was also in this year that the countries of the world joined together to develop an online game — Second World! Finally, today was the official beta testing time for this game! It was 7:59 a.m. when Lu Chen checked the time. There was still one minute before the official beta testing time. As of now, the number of people online for the Second World beta testing had already broken through four billion! The amount of people that had joined was absolutely ridiculous. The game occupied almost half of the global population right now. Moreover, the number was still on the rise, more people were still joining! The reason why Second World was so crazy was not only because players could experience a whole new world, more importantly, the gold coins in the game could be transferred with the currency of the real world! This directly overturned the operation of how the financial status in this world worked. This meant that by playing Second World, it could provide many opportunities for one to change their fate! In the real world, there were very few opportunities to change one’s fate. That was why all kinds of forces, big and small, all surged with the desire to make a change. There were also many veteran players of other games who had formed a union before the game was launched. Everyone around the world had attached great importance to Second World! The various game departments in each country were even doing their best to promote this game. It was because this was the only game in history that was like this in the entire Dragon Country. Even the gaming pods for the players were provided by the capital. The game spread like wildfire, and everyone soon realized that Second World was not as simple as a typical game. In this online game, even the major countries were ready to fight for resources. It was so real to the real world and that was why the Second World was worthy of its name. Ding! Once the time reached 8 a.m. the entire gaming pod began to light up. Let the game commence! Lu Chen did not hesitate and quickly stepped into the gaming pod. The moment he put on the helmet, everything in front of him began to slowly fade. What replaced it was a black interface. The system’s electronic voice rang in his ears. [The system is loading...;] [Commencing iris scan, confirmed as a citizen of the Dragon Country!] [Data loading...; ] [Information completion completed!] [Welcome to the Second World!] [Please enter your ID] After the system’s notification ended, a blank dialog box popped up in front of Lu Chen’s eyes. After thinking for a moment, Lu Chen filled in his ID on it. [Morning Mist] Then, the darkness in front of him began to dissipate. Lu Chen felt a hint of coolness, followed by a bustling noise. These sensations became clearer bit by bit, finally, it turned into a concrete image that appeared in front of Lu Chen’s eyes. “This...; is the Second World?!” Lu Chen opened his eyes and the image in front of him shocked him to the core. He was in a huge plaza, surrounded by beams of light that were falling from the sky. Countless players seemed to have been transported from another world! Everyone had joined the game the same as him. All of them were shocked by the game as it felt almost the same as the current world. Towards the sky, a transparent number was marked — 9205. Lu Chen, who had read the guide on the official website, knew that this was the number of this Novice Village. He gathered his thoughts and began to walk quickly towards the NPC in the middle of the plaza. In the early stages of the game, time was of the essence! There had always been such a sentence on the official website of Second World. In the middle of the plaza was a white-bearded old man with a hunched body and a rotten cane. When Lu Chen approached the old man, his voice was as old as his age. “Brave adventurer, welcome. Before you start your adventure and leave this village, I would need to assess you. “If you can catch three hares for me in the cave outside the village, then I shall acknowledge your identity as an adventurer.” [Ding! You have successfully accepted the mission. Please head to the Hares Cave and hunt three hares for the Novice Village chief.] [Mission Difficulty: Beginner] [Ding! Congratulations on obtaining a class — Adventurer! You may now equip and use simple weapons.] Lu Chen blinked his eyes and saw that the ‘Adventurer’ title had already been marked on the position of the class on his interface. This was the starter class. In the early stages of the game, all players would have this class before they obtained a class change. This class only provided the most basic life skills. For example, gathering, making a fire, switching basic weapons in his hands. After accepting the mission, Lu Chen did not stop to wander around and sightsee. He quickly rushed to the Hares Cave outside the village. He remembered that this was an extremely simple mission on the official website. Even if he stood in front of any rabbit hole, he would be able to catch at least one careless rabbit. Moreover, these rabbits did not have any lethality to them. Even a three-year-old child would be able to survive without getting injured. Around that time, many people had recovered from their shock. They quickly accepted the mission and rushed out of the village. When Lu Chen saw more people incoming, he could not help but quicken his pace. After a few minutes, he arrived at the mouth of a cave. Were one to look inside, all they would see is darkness. [Ding! An entry-level dungeon has been detected.] [Danger Level: None] [Do you wish to enter?] Without any hesitation, Lu Chen chose to enter. He chose yes as the option and went straight in. “Huh? It’s quite spacious inside.” After entering the cave, Lu Chen found that it was not as narrow as he thought. Moreover, the visibility was not low. Because it was a dungeon, he had been completely separated from the other players. Therefore, he knew that he was the only one in the cave. Lu Chen stretched out a hand. Within a second, an iron sword appeared in his palm. It was not too heavy to wield. There was a cold light on it, and it gave off a bright feeling. Clang! Lu Chen’s sword struck a stone at the side and sparks flew everywhere. Fortunately, the iron sword did not break from the impact. Instead, a crack appeared on the stone. Lu Chen’s eyes lit up. This starter equipment was not bad at all! It was enough to kill wild boars, not to mention, even a few harmless rabbits. Lu Chen held onto his sword as he ventured forward. When he looked up, he saw a few gray rabbits approaching him. He could not help but smile and shake his head. This dungeon was way too easy. A bunch of careless rabbits did not know that they were about to be murdered by the human in front of them. With that, Lu Chen took a step and rushed forward, he raised his iron sword and killed three rabbits in two or three moves. He picked up the corpse from the ground and threw it into the system backpack. The corners of his mouth curled up into a smile! Mission completed! He had expected everything to go as planned, this was because he had read the guide! However, when he quickly walked to the entrance of the cave and wanted to leave the dungeon, the system gave him a notification that made him freeze on the spot. [Warning! Due to some mysterious reason, you are temporarily unable to leave the dungeon!] What the f*ck, what the f*ck is this situation? <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen was dumbfounded! He could not leave? What was going on? He refused to believe it and started to touch the dungeon exit again. [Warning! Due to some mysterious reason, you are temporarily unable to leave the dungeon!] The system notification kept repeating itself each time Lu Chen attempted to leave. ‘What the h*ll! I don’t believe it!’ he thought in his mind. Lu Chen began to try all sorts of methods to leave! However, no matter how many times he tried, the result was still the same! He could not leave! Lu Chen could not sit still anymore, he did not know what was the meaning of any of this. Time was of the essence in the Second World. After being pulled apart in the early stages, he would have to spend countless amounts of time and energy to catch up with other players in the later stages! While the others were doing all kinds of missions and unlocking their achievements, he was going to be trapped in this lousy place to hunt rabbits? Lu Chen smiled bitterly. He quickly opened the game panel and tried to exit the game, however, it was to no avail. The result made him even more desperate for a solution! Lu Chen was on the verge of collapse. Although his body was in the game pod and there was stored nutrient fluid to supply his body’s normal functioning, this also meant that he had no way to leave this place! Who knew how long he would have to wait here? A day? Two days? Forever? Lu Chen began to pace around the cave in deep thought. As he did so, three wild rabbits appeared in the cave again. This caused Lu Chen to be stunned. The guide on the official website stated that in the same normal dungeon, the monsters inside would not respawn unless a player re-enters the place after killing the monsters! He looked at the three dead rabbits in his backpack and felt his scalp go numb. This dungeon was respawning the rabbits? Did this mean that if he was stuck here forever, he would have to keep killing rabbits? At this moment, Lu Chen had the urge to smash his head into a rock and die. The others were playing Second World by exploring everything, and he was playing Second World killing rabbits? Looking at the few rabbits that were charging at him foolishly, Lu Chen raised his hand and swung his sword! Swoosh! The rabbit’s corpse fell to the ground, and three more rabbits’ corpses appeared in Lu Chen’s backpack. Turning around, he tried to touch the dungeon exit again. [Warning! Due to some mysterious reason, you are temporarily unable to leave the dungeon!] Dang! Lu Chen was so angry that he sliced up the rocks beside him with his sword! “What the f*ck do you want me to do!” He started to get a little mad. At the same time, three more rabbits appeared in the distance. Moreover, they seemed to be even bigger than the rabbits from before. On the system interface, it showed that the attack power of these rabbits had increased a little! Does this mean that these rabbits will continue to grow stronger as they respawn? Lu Chen’s expression froze as he came to a realization. … Time began to pass quickly. Ever since that encounter with the abnormal dungeon, Lu Chen had been continuously hunting the hares in the cave. At the beginning, he used a sword, then a knife, then an axe. He even used a shield and a stone to smash them! Countless of days and nights passed, and he had been continuously killing hares. In the beginning, he was mad. Later on, he gradually became numb. Later, later on, it became his instinctive reaction to get rid of the newly spawned rabbits. He moved like a machine and formed an extremely conditioned reflex to finish the hares off. During his time in the dungeon, Lu Chen had tried countless ways to leave. He had tried all kinds of ways to commit suicide, reducing his HP to zero. However, every time it happened, he would be resurrected in the cave! He had also tried allowing the rabbits to respawn to fill the entire cave. However, when the number of rabbits reached a certain level, they would f*cking kill each other, and Lu Chen did not even need to do anything. During these years in the dungeon, Lu Chen had also learned to cook rabbits in all sorts of ways. It was even until he began to vomit when he smelled the stench of rabbit meat. Lu Chen often sat at the entrance of the cave and pondered about things, he even started to imagine what the outside world was like. The cave walls were filled with densely carved marks. Looking at these mottled marks, Lu Chen’s lips trembled slightly. He had been in this cave… For a thousand years! He has been killing hares for a thousand years! The hare’s corpse and fur in his backpack even piled up like a mountain! This dark, broken cave had caused him to have many mental breakdowns. Every time these hares respawned, they would come back stronger. Hares that had evolved for a thousand years were apparently extremely terrifying! However, to Lu Chen, they were still as fragile as a piece of white paper. In the distance, the three hares had just appeared. Then, Lu Chen subconsciously raised his hand. Woosh! A stone directly pierced through the bodies of the three hares. The corpses fell to the ground, signifying the end of the respawn this time! He just killed three birds with one stone! This was the trained skill of Lu Chen’s response. A skill that had been honed over a thousand years, he could casually throw a stone to clean up the hares that had respawned. However, the moment he killed these three hares, the cave’s exit that had been sealed for a thousand years finally lit up with a glimmer of light! Lu Chen’s eyes widened in disbelief. He was dumbfounded! Following that, the system notification sounded. [The game has ended. You may now leave the dungeon.] “F*ck this game!” Lu Chen could not help but roar. Even the corners of his eyes were a little moist from the notification. He had been locked up for a thousand years. A whole thousand years and now he could finally get out! Without any hesitation, Lu Chen directly rushed towards the exit. He did not want to stay in this place for even a moment longer. … Walking out of the dungeon, the long-lost light made Lu Chen feel a little dazzling. Although he had come out of the dungeon, he did not feel much joy in his heart. Instead, he felt a lot heavier. Second World was a popular online game all over the world. Its significance was no less than a person’s second life. The moment it was released, it meant that this online game would be closely related to the lives of the entire human race in the future. However, a thousand years had passed since the game’s public beta! He was a full thousand years behind as compared to others! What kind of cruelty was this? No matter how big the world was, no matter how many resources there were, after being explored by the entire human race for a thousand years, how many things were there left to explore? How many opportunities were left for him? He originally wanted to rely on the Second World to change his fate, and let everything else fall into place, but how much time would he need to catch up with the difference of a thousand years? Lu Chen raised his head and looked in the direction of the Novice Village plaza. That was the place where he started, but now it just seems like a place to end. Huh? Wait a moment? Why were there so many people in this f *cking Novice Village plaza? He remembered that he could not open an alternate account in Second World. Everyone only had one account that was bound to their personal information. Once they left the Novice Village, they would not be able to enter again! However… There were so many people in front of him! Even if a thousand years had passed, it would naturally make sense for this place to not have many new players. With that, Lu Chen immediately stopped a passing player. “Hey there, what year is it this year… and date?” That person looked at Lu Chen strangely and said, “September 4th, 2050.” As he said that, Lu Chen’s mind exploded with a buzz. An indescribable sense of pleasant surprise surged into his heart! ‘The f*ck, only a day has passed? In that case, I’m not too late! I can still complete everything in time!’ Lu Chen happily thought to himself. The other person looked at the smiling Lu Chen and frowned. “Dude, what’s the matter? Don’t drag me into whatever you’re doing. The game has been online for a day and I just barely got in. Don’t disturb me while I’m doing my mission.” Lu Chen nodded and immediately let go of the other player. “It’s nothing, it’s nothing.” “Well, I’m going to go then, bye.” The man quickly left and did not forget to look back at Lu Chen. He muttered, “That guy must be crazy.” Suddenly, the system’s voice sounded in Lu Chen’s mind. [Ding! Because of the increase in your proficiency, your class has changed!] [Ding! Your Axe’s proficiency has reached the Max Level — Axe God!] [Ding! Your Sword’s proficiency has reached the Max Level — Sword God!] [Ding! Your Heavy Shield’s proficiency has reached the Max Level — Shield God!] [Ding! Your weapon’s proficiency has reached the Max Level — All-rounded Master!] [Hint: Due to your proficiency exceeding the limit, and not changing classes for a long time, along with your proficiency with weapons, you may now undergo a special class change — War God!] <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The sudden notification stunned Lu Chen. A wall of golden titles appeared on his status panel. What was going on? Sword God? Axe God? War God? Those dazzling golden titles caught Lu Chen off guard ‘Could it be that I had maxed out the proficiency of all kinds of weapons in the dungeon and unlocked a special achievement?’ he thought to himself. He had seen it on the official website’s guide somewhere. If a certain hidden condition was met in the game, a special achievement would be unlocked. The rewards for these achievements were extremely generous! Sword God, Axe God, War God… These golden titles were obviously not ordinary. Moreover, this was only the second day of the game. Lu Chen had not wasted any time at all! At this moment, Lu Chen’s resentment towards the Hares Cave dissipated by a lot. “Oh right, I have to rush back to hand in the mission!” Lu Chen suddenly remembered that he had accepted the mission from the Novice Village chief to hunt the hare. However, he did not expect that an accident would occur in the dungeon and that he would be gone for a thousand years. To his luck, only one day had passed in the outside world. Moreover, one day was enough for him to widen the gap between others! ‘This won’t do, I have to hurry up!’ Thinking of this, Lu Chen quickly walked towards the Novice Village plaza. … “Very good, young man. You’ve completed your mission. I’ve acknowledged your strength. These three hares...; “Huh?!!” Before the village chief could finish his words, he saw Lu Chen directly pour out a hill-sized corpse of hares from his backpack! From the looks of it, more and more hares were overflowing out of the backpack! Almost half of the plaza was flooded with dead hares! “This...; this, this, this!” The village chief almost pulled off the hair from his beard, he had never seen so many hares in his life! All the players looked over and were extremely shocked by the scene in front of them! “What the f*ck is going on? This guy killed tens of thousands of rabbits?” “F*ck, is this guy a wild rabbit maniac?” “That’s ridiculous! How could he have killed so many rabbits in just one day!” “I’m very curious, what kind of reward can this guy get from the NPC from this?” “Oh my gosh, the entire plaza is almost full of them. There are millions of them?” “A few million? This plaza is enough for 100,000 people to stand on. Now, it’s basically full of rabbits. Think about how many there are!” “Woah!” The old village chief looked at Lu Chen, trembling. He could not help but say, “Enough, enough! Young man, you have so much rabbit meat and fur, you could make a good fortune out of this. “Although I don’t know where you’ve got so many rabbits, these things are very useful to our village. “Brave adventurer, are you willing to sell these hares to us?” [Ding! Triggered a special mission — Novice Village chief’s transaction!] [Sell all the hares to the village chief, there is a probability of obtaining gold coins, hidden items, equipment, etc…] Lu Chen’s eyes lit up. He was worried that these hares had no benefits. In the dungeon, these hares respawned about ten times a day, three at a time! He had f*cking fought for a thousand years and had a total of 10,950,000 hares! Now, not only could he deal with the hares in his backpack, but he could also exchange them for rewards. So he did not hesitate in accepting the mission at all! Lu Chen immediately said, “I’ll be very happy to sell these hares to contribute to the village.” The old village chief looked at Lu Chen with admiration and nodded repeatedly. “Good, good, good. You’re really a simple young man. “To tell you the truth, our village people have always traded with the White Fog City. The wild rabbit fur meat in the village has always been exported as a best-selling commodity. “It’s a pity that there are no more young people in the village, and wild rabbits are difficult to catch. Life in the village just gets more and more miserable every day. “Young man, wait a moment. I’ll go and find someone to count the wild rabbits. I definitely won’t let you down.” The old village chief tapped his walking stick, and a white light lit up under his feet. Under everyone’s watchful eyes, he directly teleported away! Everyone in the Novice Village was so shocked that their jaws dropped. “The f*ck, am I seeing things? Was that magic?” “Isn’t that something that only high-level elite monsters would use?” “The old village chief of the Novice Village actually has this ability?” “Oh right, I remember now. There is a hint on the official website. Don’t underestimate any NPC. They might all have hidden special missions!” “Sh*t, I never thought that a Novice Village chief would also have a special mission!” Lu Chen waited where he was, but what he did not know was that the video of him taking out tens of millions of wild rabbits had spread. The views on all the major platforms skyrocketed! A moment later, the plaza lit up again with white light. The old village chief appeared with an NPC dressed like a merchant. The chubby middle-aged man was stunned when he saw the number of hares on the ground. “Oh my gosh! Elder Xu, there are so many hares. I’m afraid the entire White Fog City will have enough for a few years! “Only our shop can afford such a large quantity! I’ll start counting now!” After saying that, he opened a scroll and threw it into the sky, enveloping the rabbits on the plaza. The wild rabbits that were like pilled into a small mountain were then kept inside. Along with that, a string of numbers appeared on it. “A total of 10,950,000 rabbits. What do you think, elder Xu?” The old village chief did not answer him but turned his gaze to Lu Chen. Lu Chen smiled slightly from that and nodded his head.?At least the merchant did not tamper with the numbers. “That’s right. There are too many of them. I won’t calculate the cost for each rabbit. Let’s just say I’m only selling you 10 million of these rabbits.” In his opinion, no matter how valuable these wild rabbits were, they were not worth much. It would be more convenient to take away a small amount to make the offer more enticing. As soon as he said that, the fat merchant’s eyes almost popped out! That was with 10,950,000 wild rabbits! Even if it was a copper coin, it was still 10,950,000 rabbits! Not to mention the fur and meat of the processed wild rabbits! He took a deep breath and looked at Lu Chen excitedly, “Really?” Lu Chen shrugged and said, “Of course. If you’re not willing, you can calculate it according to the original amount.” When the merchant heard this, he quickly said, “I like it, I’ll agree to it!” He kept rubbing his hands. After a while, he looked up at Lu Chen and said, “How about this, I’ll give you 2,000 gold coins for this batch of wild rabbits?” 2,000 gold coins!! Everyone in the plaza was going crazy! This was not worth 2,000 dollars! According to the currency in the Second World, a copper coin could be exchanged for 1 dollar in the real world! 100 copper coins could be exchanged for one silver coin! 100 silver coins could be exchanged for one gold coin! 2000 gold coins, that would cost 20 million dollars! On the second day after the server opened, this man had managed to receive 20 million! What the heck was going on! The merchant still rambled on, “Considering that you are an adventurer, in order to express my gratitude, I will personally gift you a set of silver-grade armor.” The old village chief chuckled and said, “This old man has nothing to show for it. In order to express my gratitude, I will give you three teleportation scrolls.” The old village chief spread his hands, and three scrolls lay on his palm. Everyone quickly determined the grade of the item and it was an epic-grade teleportation scroll! Instantly, the entire plaza fell silent. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation An epic-grade item! Everyone’s scalp tingled from the sight! In the Second World, equipment and item grades were divided into eight levels — bronze, silver, gold, epic, legendary, mythical, and worldly. The silver-grade armor that the fat merchant had just taken out was already shocking enough! One had to know that this was only the second day of the game! Most of the players were still carrying beginner equipment that the system had given them. Not to mention silver-grade equipment, even bronze-grade equipment was rare! As for legendary equipment, they did not even dare to think about it! “F*ck, if it wasn’t for the Novice Village’s protection mechanism, I would have tried to snatch that item away from that kid!” “This kid’s luck is way too good!” “An epic item, how much would it fetch if it was auctioned off?” Many people were extremely jealous. Each of them wanted to be Lu Chen right now. Lu Chen looked at the old village chief and the fat merchant and smiled, “No problem, these wild rabbits are yours.” The old village chief and the fat merchant looked at each other and quickly handed the equipment and scrolls to Lu Chen. “Kid, I have high hopes for you. Remember to look for me when you arrive at White Fog City.” The fat middle-aged merchant’s figure disappeared then disappeared from everyone’s sight. [Ding! You have obtained an epic-grade teleportation scroll x3.] [Ding! You have obtained brand new silver-grade armor x1.] [You have obtained the favor of the Vice Guild leader of the White Fog City’s Chamber of Commerce. You can enjoy a 20% discount when you trade with NPCs. You can also change your class at the Chamber of Commerce — Profiteer.] Lu Chen was elated when he saw the system notifications. The first one was an epic teleportation scroll. It was gray in color and only the size of a palm. The system had a further elaboration on it. [Teleportation scroll created by the old village chief. It can be teleported to any corner within a 100,000-mile radius. It can even ignore the dungeon’s barrier!] This was an extremely good item! Lu Chen was shocked. He could teleport to any place within a 100,000-mile radius whenever he wished. After becoming an adventurer, all players would have to arrive at White Fog City if they wanted to change their class. On the way, there were all kinds of dungeons and all kinds of monsters in the wild. The journey to reach the city would be extremely long. The official guide estimated that all players could only arrive at White Fog City in about half a month! According to the guide on the official website, the first player to arrive at White Fog City would receive a rare title. Moreover, as an online game that was supported by Dragon Country, the first player to do so would receive a special reward as well! Now, with this scroll, Lu Chen could instantly teleport to White Fog City! The title and reward were almost certain to be obtained by him. However, Lu Chen did not choose to use it immediately. The reason was very simple. He needed a certain amount of time to familiarize himself with this game and raise his character’s level first. On the other hand, other than him, no one else could reach White Fog City in a short period of time. So he knew he did not have to rush. Lu Chen put away the teleportation scroll and looked at the second item in his backpack. … [Silver Armor (silver)] [Level Requirement: 5] [Intelligence: +15] [Vitality: +20] [Defense: +10] [Magic Defense: +10] [Health: 60] [Special Effect: Additional Defense +10] Having silver equipment was very good, but there was always a level limit before being able to equip it. Right now, his level was only level 1, so he could not equip it directly. With a sigh, Lu Chen opened up his attribute panel. [Name: Morning Mist] [Level: 1] [Class: Hero (You may now change classes to War God)] [Titles: Sword God (hidden), Shield God (hidden), Axe God (hidden), Blade God (hidden), All-rounded master (hidden)] [Vitality: 5 (Increases 10 health points per health point)] [Strength: 5 (Increases 10 attack points per strength point)] [Agility: 5 (Increases 0.1 attack speed per agility point)] [Intelligence: 5 (Increases 10 mana points per intelligence point)] [HP: 50] [MP: 50] [Attack: 50] [Defense: 5 (Reduces 10 damage points per defense point)] [Magic Defense: 5 (Every increase in magic defense reduces damage by 10 points)] Lu Chen glanced at his attribute panel and made up his mind. His current task was to level up as quickly as possible. Moreover, he really wanted to try out the functionalities of the golden titles he received After making up his mind, Lu Chen walked out of the Novice Village. … At the same time, videos began to spread across all the major online platforms. [On the second day of the game, a rabbit-killing monster appeared in the Novice Village!] Shocking!! A young man blackmailed the old village chief and received a reward of 20 million dollars!] [Major event! The world’s first silver-grade equipment is born!] [So terrifying! The Novice Village gives out epic-grade items when the game opens!] The video with these headlines instantly became a hot topic! The forum was filled with the words f*ck as these players cursed Lu Chen to no end. “F*ck you, is this kid on drugs? How can he kill so many hares in one day?” “20 million! I only dropped 10 copper coins after fighting wild monsters all night!” “20 million is nothing. The most important thing is the equipment and that epic-grade scroll this kid received!” “Don’t you know what rewards the higher-ups have offered to encourage the players?” “The first player to enter White Fog City will receive 100 million in cash!” “This is not even counting the rewards like the title of the first player to enter White Fog City in the game!” “This is a competition to reach there first now. Don’t you know what the Second World has in store for us?” The moment the video was posted. Many fancy words — that shall not be mentioned — were shared between the commenters. At the same time, the top ten hot posts in the Second World Official Forum were all about Lu Chen. [Outside the Novice Village, number 9025, come and watch the Big Boss!] [The Night Union is willing to pay 150 million for the teleportation scroll!] [Bounty operation, target — Morning Mist, experts are welcomed!] [Outside the Novice Village on the hillside, watch the rabbit-hunting demon dispose of the loot!] [If I manage to catch that rabbit-hunting demon…] Unfortunately, Lu Chen did not know anything that was happening in the outside world.. Having already walked out of the Novice Village, he was ready to test his skills. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation In a place named Peaceful Town. A man in a neat suit was reading the Second World Official Forum on his phone with a frown. “Rabbit-hunting demon?” “Epic-grade teleportation scroll?” His slender fingers tapped on the table as he suddenly spoke. “Men!” As soon as he finished speaking, a few servants quickly entered the room. “Go and investigate the origin of this person named Morning Mist in this game called Second World. “Also, send someone over as soon as possible. If possible, buy all the three scrolls that he gained!” The servants were shocked. “Young master, all three scrolls?” One had to know that the price of the scrolls had already been raised to 200 million! Three scrolls meant that he would have to offer at least 600 million up! Even for their family, it was not an easy task to fork out 600 million in petty cash in one go. The young man in the suit nodded and said, “That’s right, there are three of them. It’s useless to take only one. “Holding these three scrolls in my hand would be equivalent to me being half a month ahead of those other players! “So I’m pretty sure you know what I mean when I saw I need all three!” The servant’s heart skipped a beat. Half a month was enough to prepare for anything! He immediately nodded and said, “Yes, I’ll do it right away!” After saying that, all of them quickly disappeared from the room. At the same time, in the real world and in the game, various forces began to pay attention to a person. Morning Mist! … Outside the Novice Village, Lu Chen felt that there was some trouble. Ever since he left the Novice Village plaza, there was a large group of people that always followed him from behind. The number just kept accumulating. Perhaps it was because the actions he did had garnered a lot of attention. It could have caused him to become the focus of everyone’s attention. If it was just a random fan crowd, Lu Chen would not think much of it. However, he could clearly feel that there were many malicious gazes in the crowd. There were whispers of them calling him a man who had a treasure that he did not deserve. Were Lu Chen to lose all his money right now, he would probably attract a lot of flies to the pile. “Morning Mist, right? Let’s get to know each other...;” Soon, another man blocked Lu Chen’s path. “Get out of the way!” Lu Chen’s voice was cold. This was already the seventh group of people he had rejected. That person’s expression showed one of hostility. It was obvious that he was very embarrassed about being rejected. Seeing Lu Chen walk past him, he said coldly, “What are you so arrogant for? You’ve received so many good things. Do you really think you will have a good ending?” Lu Chen ignored him and directly stepped into the wild monster area. His goal was to level up. In other words, to increase his strength. He knew his current situation, so leveling up was imminent to protect himself. At this moment, Lu Chen saw a grassland in front of him, and a few gray Wolves appeared above him. The information of the wild monsters appeared when he checked the attributes. [Thin and Weak Wild Wolf] [Level: 1] [HP: 100] [Attack: 55] [Defense: 4] It was obvious that this was an extremely weak wild monster. Its attack power was only 55. Even if Lu Chen took its damage head-on, the monsters would only be able to deal 5 damage to him. Lu Chen began to approach the Wild Wolf. The eyes of the people around him were burning with passion. Many people came over after hearing the news. They had heard all sorts of legends about the rabbit-killing demon for the past half day. However, they had never seen how powerful this demon was in battle. Lu Chen glanced at the people around him and a cold smile appeared on his lips. Initially, there was nothing in his hand. with a thought, a sharp iron sword appeared! [Player’s sword proficiency has been detected to be at Max level. Do you wish to switch to the title of Sword God?] Lu Chen did not hesitate at all and directly gave the order of agreeing to it. “Switch!” Clang! In an instant, the iron sword in Lu Chen’s hand suddenly burst out with a terrifying sword intent! “Holy sh*t, what’s going on?” “This doesn’t feel like he’s fighting a level 1 wild monster. Why do I feel like he’s about to slash a big boss?” “The f*ck, is this a f*cking ordinary iron sword? Why is it completely different from mine?” “Look at the golden words above his head. S-sword...; Sword God?” “The heck, how is this possible? Someone already has a golden title at level 1?” [Sword God: Your understanding of the sword has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a sword-type weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with your level!] [Sword Intent: When you use a sword-type weapon, it will burst forth with sword intent. Attack power will be increased to 500%!] [God of Swords State: A state whereby your attack would be accurate and sharp. It will cause irreversible damage. Items damaged by the God of Swords State can not be recovered. 10 MP is consumed per second in the God of Sword State.] [Godly Speed: The speed of your sword attack is now godly. The attack interval will be greatly shortened. Attack speed increased by 500%.] In an instant, the system sent out a message, letting Lu Chen know the attributes that the Sword God possesses! It was as if he had returned to the time when he was hunting rabbits in the cave. The kind of natural state where his heart was as clear as a summer’s day was born spontaneously. It was as if no matter how strong the enemy was, he could kill them with a single slash! Lu Chen’s gaze was sharp. On the system interface, the buff given by the Sword God’s title was simply too heaven-defying! With a 500% attack bonus, his current 50 attack points could be directly increased to 250 points! His attack speed of 0.5 seconds could be increased to 2.5 seconds. In other words, he could now deal over 500 damage per second! After all, he was only level 1and all his equipment was starter types of equipment. Lu Chen could not suppress the excitement in his heart and directly slashed at the Wild Wolf! Shing! The sword rippled in the air. Lu Chen seemed to turn into a ray of light and flashed past the monster. Suddenly, a red number floated in the air. “-250!” Before everyone could see clearly, the Wild Wolf’s corpse was cut in half, and it fell to the ground. On the grass, a bottomless crack was directly cut open! It extended all the way, and was at least 10 meters long! “What the f*ck just happened!” “Is this the f*cking attack level that a level 1 player should have?” “A single sword slash that could even shatter the ground?” “This is too f*cking awesome!” “May I ask if we’re playing the same game?” The spectating players were dumbfounded, and their eager gazes instantly dimmed. They now looked at Lu Chen with a hint of fear. In this world, they could freely fight with players in the wild.  However, from the current situation, if they wanted to fight Lu Chen, they would have to consider the option of death before attacking. Lu Chen clearly felt the gazes of those people. This was what he wanted, to intimidate those rascals that have been bothering him for the longest time. [Your level has risen to level 2.] [4 free attribute points can be allocated.] With a flash of golden light, Lu Chen’s level rose to level 2. In his mind, came the sound of the system’s notification. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Did he just level up so quickly? Lu Chen was slightly delighted. He did not expect the early stages of leveling up to be so simple. Killing a wild monster could increase his level so easily. He then glanced at the attributes on the interface. Due to him leveling up, he gained attribute points that could be added to his four-dimensional attributes. Lu Chen pondered for a moment and directly added all four attribute points to his strength. Having a higher number of strength points directly increased Lu Chen’s attack power to 100 points. With the help of the Sword God, his explosive power could now reach 500 points in an instant! With such combat power, he would probably be able to fight even small-scale bosses in the early stages, right? Lu Chen did not stay any longer, and continued to carry on with his journey. He directly passed through the area of level 2 wild monsters and arrived at the territory of level 5 wild monsters! One by one, black-maned Wild Boars that were as strong as an ox could be seen casually strolling at the field [Strong Wild Boar] [Level: 5] [HP: 300] [Attack: 180] [Defense: 15] [Skill: Savage Charge] [Savage Charge: Collides with the target at an extremely fast speed, dealing 300 damage and stunning the enemy for one second.] All the players who followed Lu Chen looked at the Wild Boars that were as thick as steel needles and felt their scalps go numb! This guy isn’t thinking of fighting a level 5 Wild Boar alone, is he? He’s only level 2! Among the level 5 wild monsters, Wild Boars were the most difficult to deal with. They have thick skin and high attack power. Most importantly, they have explosive and crowd control skills! Most players would take a detour when they see this group of Wild Boars. Even if they wanted to fight, they would team up and attack together. Level 5 Wild Boars were considered small bosses by the players in the early stages. However, to Lu Chen, it seemed that he was okay with fighting them head-on, alone? Was he crazy? Lu Chen looked at the Wild Boars in the distance and the corners of his mouth curled up into a smile. A level 5 Wild Boar had a defense of 150 points. If he did not activate the Sword God’s State and only relied on the attack power on his attribute points, he might not even be able to break through the Wild Boar’s defense! However, if he activated Sword God’s State, he would be able to kill it one by one. It would be as easy as eating a whole pie, for one. However, Lu Chen did not intend to do that. He stood where he was, and with a wave of his hand, a wooden bow appeared in his hand. This was the initial bow and arrow given by the system. n his title column, there was a series of golden words. Among them was — Bow God! Lu Chen’s eyes were sharp. He took out an arrow from his system backpack. He raised his hand and drew the bow into a full crescent moon shape. Two golden words appeared above his head. Bow God! When the golden words appeared, everyone was shocked! “What?! Again!?” “How many golden titles does this guy have?” “The f*ck, having Sword God is already ridiculous enough. What the h*ll is a Bow God?” Lu Chen’s gaze locked onto a Wild Boar in the distance. The analysis of the Bow God appeared in his mind. [Bow God: Your understanding of the bow has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a bow-type weapon, you will receive a special effect. This effect will grow along with your level!] [Accurate Arrow: When you use a Bow-type weapon, your attack is set to hit! ] [Armor Breaker: When you use a bow and arrow type weapon to attack, you will dispel 90% of the target’s armor!] [Seven Star Succession: You can shoot seven arrows at once, and your attack power will be increased by 300%!] Whoosh! Lu Chen directly released the arrow, and it turned into a ray of light and flew out. The terrifying force drew a white line in the air, and the sharp sound of an arrow piercing through the air made people’s scalps go numb! The arrow directly pierced through the Wild Boar’s head, nailing its enormous body to the ground… A bright red number floated out from the air! “-285!” The level 5 Wild Boar was instantly reduced to a pile of its bloody skin. The Wild Boar was still groaning and struggling on the ground, and it did not have the time to react! Whoosh! Another arrow pierced through the air and entered the Wild Boar’s body! “-285!” The Wild Boar was completely annihilated. With that Lu Chen leveled up yet again. “How is this possible!” “He killed the Wild Boar with just two arrows?” “The damage done was simply ridiculous!” “Is the Wild Boar’s high defense just for show?” “Holy sh*t, look!” While everyone was still exclaiming in surprise, Lu Chen had already pulled back his bow again. This time, the scene they saw would be etched in their minds for the rest of their lives. They saw Lu Chen holding seven arrows in one go and placing them on the bowstring! The bow bent like a crescent moon. The moment he let go, it was like the Big Dipper was converging in the sky! “-435!” The red number slowly floated up, and the seven Wild Boars in the distance were instantly killed! Lu Chen’s attack power, which had risen to level 3, increased once again. He could already kill Wild Boars in one shot! Seeing Lu Chen being enveloped by the white light, the music of leveling up sounded once again. Everyone was livid! They had seen too many miracles today! Everything before their eyes was like a dream, truly unbelievable. They could only watch as the man who was like an ancient god, draw his bow and shoot arrows. Not only that, but he did it effortlessly as he slaughtered the wild monsters that even they could not kill. A moment later, Lu Chen’s level rose to level 5. He also could now be seen with silver-grade armor. When he equipped it, the stats on his interface instantly soared! [Name: Morning Mist] [Level: 5] [Class: Hero (You may now change classes to War God)] [Titles: Sword God (hidden), Shield God (hidden), Axe God (hidden), Blade God (hidden), All-rounded master (hidden)] [Vitality: 10 +20] [Strength: 30] [Agility: 10] [Intelligence: 10 +15] [HP: 360] [MP: 350] [Attack: 300] [Defense: 5 +10] [Magic Defense: 5 +10] Lu Chen was very satisfied with the increased stats on his interface. After putting on the silver-grade armor, even if he did not activate anything, he would be able to take on the Wild Boar alone. However, these two waves of attacks were quite disgraceful. Other than some common materials, nothing else dropped. Lu Chen looked at the surrounding players and thought for a moment before choosing to log out. He did not like to be surrounded by people all the time. He felt quite oppressed with them following him around. Moreover, he had already achieved his goal of testing his strength and intimidating those little rascals. There was no need for him to stay any longer. Another reason was that he felt like he had been trapped in the game for a thousand years. So much so that he had almost forgotten what the real world was like! Thinking of this, Lu Chen’s figure slowly disappeared in the game. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Did he just go offline? When Lu Chen’s figure disappeared in front of everyone’s eyes, everyone was stunned. What was going on? Did he just leave after acting so cooly? Many players looked at the crack that Lu Chen had cut on the grass, deep in thought. Normally, after the terrain in the game was destroyed, it would automatically be repaired after a short period of time. However, this crack had not disappeared yet! Even though the monsters in front had respawned several times, this ravine did not seem to be disappearing at all. Everyone was terrified of the powers that Lu Chen had. Could it be that the damage caused by Morning Mist’s God Sword’s State was irreversible? If that was the case, what if he killed someone in the game? Could it be that this person would never be able to revive again? Many people thought about it in horror and listed Lu Chen as a dangerous player to encounter! Even if he could not completely kill the player, he could directly stab the equipment on his opponent’s body. If his opponent could not repair it, it would be enough for him them suffer for a long time. At the same time, the video about Lu Chen once again rose to the top of many popular video platforms! [I can’t believe that the real identity of the rabbit-killing demon is…] [Two level increase by killing Wild Boars, a god from the Novice Village!] [Seven arrows in a row!? Sword God and Bow God coexist?] Almost all of these videos were recorded when Lu Chen was fighting the monsters. Whether it was his sharp sword that transformed into Sword God, or the awakening of the skill Bow God, the scene of seven arrows killing the seven Wild Boars in a row made countless people gasp in admiration! This video even spread from the Dragon country to the outer places! It caused a huge uproar in the entire world! “Oh sh*t, why didn’t such a powerful person appear in the Western region!” “Impossible, how could someone be able to instantly kill a level five monster at level two!” “That’s right, I have reason to suspect that this video was deliberately forged by the Easterners!” “No, no, no, this is real. I’ve asked my friend that’s from the east, he watched that scene with his own two eyes.” “Oh my gosh, if such a person is allowed to continue playing, it would be a nightmare for us in the Western region!” In the capitals of the Western countries, many high-ranking officials had gloomy expressions as they watched the video. Suddenly, a solemn voice came from the office. “When did such a person appear in the Eastern region!” Many subordinates lowered their heads, not daring to answer the official. They had already done their best to investigate the major guilds in the east. They knew the movements of the people they had put on the list. However, they did not know where this so-called Morning Mist came from. It was as if he had appeared out of thin air! “Quickly find out where this Morning Mist player came from! “And from today onwards, put him on the priority list! “The Second World is not a simple game! “He is now related to the growth and structure of this world! “Do each and every one of you understand?!” Bang! The leader of the Western countries landed a loud punch on their desks. Everyone was shocked and immediately replied, “We will do it right away, sir!” … In the Dragon Country, the unions and families were also in a mess. In Golden City, an old man in a tunic suit with white hair and beard said slowly. “Where did this kid come from? I know the kids from the east, but I don’t know where this kid came from.” The young man next to him said, “Sir, do you wish to get in touch with him?” The old man thought for a while, then nodded and said, “We can try to get in touch with him in the game, and observe his character first. If possible, let him join our Xu family.” Then, he looked at a graceful woman not far away. “Zi Yuan, I’ll leave this matter to you. “Remember, even if you can’t win him over, don’t make him an enemy. “It’s impossible for the higher-ups to not take such a talent seriously, do you understand?” The woman nodded and said, “Yes, I understand.” In the South City, countless unions were gathered. The presidents of the major unions all had gloomy expressions on their faces. “Investigate! You must find out who this person is! “The first teleportation scroll is extremely valuable! “What Sword God and Bow God was it? Get those no matter what! He can’t fight us all!” In Peaceful Town. The young man looked at the butler in front of him and said in disbelief. “What do you mean you have no idea who he is?” The middle-aged butler in a suit sighed and said, “Young Master, the higher-ups have made a move.” The young man immediately sat down on the chair back again. He then said absent-mindedly, “This quick?” “It seems that everything is going to change.” After a moment, he came back to his senses and pondered for a moment, as if he had made up his mind. He then said, “In that case, pass on the notice to sell 80% of the family’s real estate! Sell it as quickly as you can! “In three days, I need to see all the people in my family in the Second World!” The butler was shocked and could not help but say, “Young master, this-” The young man stared at him and said in an indomitable tone, “Do as I say! Remember, this is a big gamble that we’re participating in!” In the Dragon Country building, 99 stories high. It was filled with the most elite forces of the Eastern region, everyone present was amazing in their own way, whether it was in terms of strength or intelligence. At this moment, in the conference room on the 99th floor, the big screen was flashing with a video clip. It was the scene where Lu Chen turned into his God Sword’s State and slashed out a ravine with his weapon. About ten minutes later, the entire conference room fell silent. A square-faced middle-aged man walked to the front. “How is it? You’ve all seen this young man. “His strength is without a doubt amazing. “The higher-ups have already classified his file as an S-rank secret. “Do any of you have an idea of who this kid is?” A woman with a strong figure stood up. “The player’s real name is Lu Chen. “Male, 20 years old. “Height, 184 cm, weight, 70 kg! “His parents died when he was young, and he’s relied on his own hard work to get into Shang Hee University’s Sports Major. “He has no romantic experience, but there are many women around that chase after him. “He currently lives in Shang Hee’s Beish District, 301. “According to the information, this is a precocious boy with a strong physique. “In fact, he is a playboy. He has a certain degree of control over his charms and is quite ruthless towards women. “If he is recruited into the Eastern formation, should I go through the assessment?” The woman looked at the people in the room and asked. The middle-aged man on the stage nodded and said, “I agree.” “From the looks of it, this Lu Chen does have a lot of potential in store for us. “But his character is unknown… “Hmm… We need to fully understand this person online and offline. “Let’s try and find out his background a little further before the big battle.” After saying that, everyone in the room nodded in agreement. “I agree!” “I agree!” “I agree!” The square-faced man raised his hand and said, “Alright, since that’s the case, 0927 you shall keep close contact with this boy.” As soon as he finished speaking, the woman with the strong figure pouted and said, “Why should it be me?” The square-faced man smiled and said, “Because you’re about the same age as him.” “Moreover, you’re from Shang Hee too, so you’ll be more familiar with him in all aspects. “Moreover, he can be considered as your junior if you think about it. “And as a senior that happened to move next door to your junior, there will definitely be a lot of topics to talk about, right?” The woman sighed and said, “Alright.” The square-face man immediately became serious and said, “0927, this mission is to find out the details of Morning Mist. It will last for six months. Are you confident in your capabilities?” The woman immediately stood up and said loudly, “Reporting as 0927, I promise to carry out the mission faithfully!” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation While everything was in shambles, Lu Chen casually walked out of the game pod. Everything in his rented room was the same as it had been a thousand years ago. Nothing had changed at all. It made him feel as though a lifetime had passed for him. He checked the game pod and found that the nutrient fluid that maintained the player’s bodily functions had not been consumed at all. It seemed that he had really stayed in the game world for only a day… Lu Chen frowned slightly, but the thousand years he had spent in the cave felt surreal. It could not be fake. Those dark traumatic days were deeply engraved in his mind. Lu Chen shook his head and did not want to relive those memories any further. After returning to the real world, he needed a good night’s rest. He picked up his phone from the coffee table to check the time. It was two in the afternoon on September 4th. It had been less than a day since he left the game. He opened the Second World coin exchange system on his phone. To his satisfaction, it showed that he now has a gold coin balance of 2000! That was a total of 20 million that could be converted into real money! As a college student who had dropped out of school, Lu Chen did not have much money on him. Moreover, he was two months behind on his rent. The 20 million he had earned in the game was a huge sum of money for him to save himself. In the game, it might not have been very realistic, but now that he saw the redeemable value on his phone, he got a little excited. Lu Chen thought for a while and decided to ask for 10 million to be cashed out from the game. Due to the exchange of gold coins being only one-way, he could not ask for a refund. There was no channel for real money to be exchanged for gold coins. Lu Chen clicked a few times on his phone. A few minutes later, he received a text message. [Dear User: A transaction has occurred with the ending number 0868. The transaction amount is 100,000,000.00.] It was done! A hint of a smile appeared on the corner of Lu Chen’s mouth. He changed into a clean shirt and prepared to go out shopping. After getting out of the rented house, the shops were only a few steps away from the bustling street. Lu Chen directly hailed a taxi and directly arrived at Business Street. Lu Chen, who was 1.84 meters tall and had handsome features attracted a lot of attention as he walked down the street. In just a few minutes, a few girls even had the courage to ask for his number. However, Lu Chen waved his hand and refused. Before he went out, he had already seen videos of himself on various major online platforms. Under such circumstances, he decided that it was better for him to keep a low profile in real life. After shopping in the mall for about half an hour, he bought a few sets of clothes and changed to a decent fit for himself. He spent more than 300,000 dollars in total. In the past, Lu Chen would not have dared to imagine it, but now he had 10 million dollars in his hand. He did not care about frivolously spending his money. The pleasure of spending money came naturally now. After walking out of the mall, Lu Chen directly hired a car and threw all the items that he had bought into the backseat of the car. There were a lot of daily necessities inside. Lu Chen had already planned to live in the Second World for a long time, so these preparations were necessary. The Business Street was not far from Lu Chen’s rented house. When he moved the things upstairs, he found that the room 302 opposite him had been rented out. The door was slightly open as if someone was cleaning inside and airing the space. He did not think too much about it and shrugged his shoulders. When he unlocked his own door with his keys, Lu Chen saw a woman sitting near his kitchen area with her legs crossed. She had a key ring on her finger, and her expression was relaxed. When she saw Lu Chen return, she was about to complain, but she was attracted by the watch on Lu Chen’s hand. She was not a fan of luxury goods, but her eyes were sharp. Lu Chen’s watch was similar to her father’s. It was worth at least 100,000 dollars! When did this kid become rich? Lu Chen put down his things and said in surprise, “Lin, why are you here? Where’s the landlady?” The girl in his room was the landlady’s daughter. There were dozens of apartments in the building to collect rent. She was a fair, rich, and beautiful girl. The girl blinked her eyes before she came back to her senses and said, “Oh, my mother is not free today, so I’m here to collect the rent. By the way, Lu Chen, have you made a fortune recently?” She gestured at Lu Chen’s wrist. Lu Chen smiled slightly and said, “You sure have sharp eyes. In fact, you’re right, I’ve earned some good money recently. You’re here to collect the rent, right? I’ll transfer it to you now.” Lu Chen picked up his phone and transferred the money over. ding! The young girl picked up her phone and was shocked when she saw it. “100,000 dollars? Bro, you didn’t transfer the wrong amount, right?” The place that Lu Chen rented was a small apartment that was well-decorated. The location was not bad either. In Shang Hee, the monthly rent was about 6,000 dollars a month. However, transferring 100,000 dollars in one go was too much. Lu Chen waved his hand as Lin watched him with wide eyes. “It’s for the rent that I owed you guys from way before, plus the rent for next year’s water and electricity, are all in there. “100,000 should be enough. The extra money could be considered as a bonus for your hospitality. It’s all thanks to you and your family for taking care of me during this period of time.” The young girl smiled and said, “Well, when you put it that way. How can I not accept such a generous offer?” “At least you have a conscience.” “Oh right, there’s a beautiful woman moving in next door. When you’re free, you should get to know her more. Don’t stay at home every day and live like a neet.” She walked out of the room and turned her head to say, “Don’t bully her either!” Lu Chen smiled helplessly and said, “Got it.” After Lin left, Lu Chen closed the door. His expression was a little solemn. At first, he did not feel anything. However, after he went to the mall and came back with all kinds of heavy daily necessities, this feeling was very obvious! First, he seemed to have endless strength. In the past, big and small grocery bags used to be very strenuous for him to pick up. However, now, it was as if there was no weight in his hands. Secondly, his body felt exceptionally light, and his five senses were terrifyingly sharp now. He could hear everything clearly. Even the girls on the street — who were more than ten meters away — could be caught by him when they praised his good looks. This was completely out of the realm of reality he had ever experienced! Lu Chen looked at the gaming pod and suddenly had a bold idea. He quickly walked to the kitchen and took out a fruit knife from the kitchen utensils. He thought silently. “God Sword State!” In the next moment, something magical happened. The fruit knife, which was only a few centimeters long, was suddenly covered in a layer of white cold light! Lu Chen’s pupils suddenly expanded. The feeling of being able to cut through anything and everything once again filled his body! He held the fruit knife and lightly slashed at the three-centimeter-thick chopping board on the stove. Then, a cold light streaked across! The chopping board and the stove were directly cut into two halves. The cut was so smooth, it was no different from cutting a piece of white paper. To Lu Chen’s horror, his heart pounded from what had happened. It seemed as though the powers learned from Second World could affect reality! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Knock knock knock. While Lu Chen stood in his place horrified, there was a knock on the door. Lu Chen took a look at the mess in the kitchen that he had destroyed and rapidly blinked. He shook his head, walked out, and closed the kitchen door. He quickly suppressed the shock in his heart and calmly said, “Wait a moment, I’ll be right there.” The door opened and a tall woman appeared. She wore a fitting suit and her white shirt was tightly taut. Her slender legs were wrapped in black leggings as she stood confidently with her high heels on. A pair of lively eyes were looking at her curiously. “You are?” Lu Chen was a little unfamiliar with this face. If it was a woman he had come into contact with before, he would definitely have an impression of this beauty. The woman was clearly stunned for a moment. She had not expected Lu Chen to be so good-looking. “Hello, my name is Liu Yuan. I just moved into the apartment opposite you today. I hope that we could be friendly neighbors.” Lu Chen sized up the woman. Her figure was hot, but she did not have a vulgar look. Instead, there was an air of confidence that surrounded her. This kind of temperament and beauty was really rare to find. “Hello, I’m Lu Chen.” He reached out a hand and shook the woman’s hand. “Oh, aren’t you going to invite me in?” Liu Yuan asked with a smile. Lu Chen scratched his head and thought of the mess he created in the kitchen. He then said a little awkwardly, “I’m sorry, it might be a little inconvenient for you to come in.” A hint of surprise flashed across Liu Yuan’s pretty face. How was that possible? Had she been rejected? ‘What’s wrong with this guy? In order to get close to him, I even especially changed into tight-fitting clothes. Is it because I’m not charming enough?’ she thought to herself. She forced out a smile and said, “No...; It’s okay. I’m hoping to come in next time then? I won’t bother you anymore.” After saying that, she turned around and went back into her apartment. After the door closed, Liu Yuan’s face instantly darkened. Then, the voice of the leader came through the earpiece. “How’s the mission going for you, 0927?” Liu Yuan kicked one of her high heels away and threw her outerwear against the sofa. She then spoke in distress, “0927 here to report. The mission isn’t going well. I just talked to him, and he doesn’t seem to be interested in me. “According to the information gathered, this kid should be a promiscuous person, but he didn’t even give me a chance to enter the house.” There was a moment of silence on the other end of the phone. “0927, did you use the wrong method?” Liu Yuan kicked away another high-heeled shoe and said, “I don’t know how to interact with boys in the first place! Leader, you’re making things difficult for me! “I’ve never been in a relationship in my entire life! How would I know how to get closer to boys?” There was no answer on the other end of the phone, only a peal of faint stifled laughter could be heard. From that, Liu Yuan’s face turned even darker. “Ahem, Yuan Yuan…” “Uncle, we’re currently on duty. Please call me by my code number!” Liu Yuan said angrily. “Okay, okay, okay. 0927, you’re already at the age of 23 or 24, I don’t know. The organization agrees that it’s okay for you to use this opportunity to fall in love. I’m just saying… if that kid’s a reliable person…” “Go to h*ll!” Liu Yuan’s face flushed red, and she immediately cut off the connection. Then, she turned over and looked at the tightly shut door angrily. ‘Isn’t he just a 20-year-old kid? We’ll see about that!’ she thought to herself. “Hmph!” … On the opposite side of the apartment, Lu Chen could be seen cleaning up all the items that had been destroyed in the kitchen. His face looked a little solemn. He held the fruit knife in his hand, and it kept flashing. He was almost 100% sure now, the power provided in Second World could definitely affect reality. Although it was not as exaggerated as in the game, it was still ridiculous enough to happen in real life! If this fruit knife could cut the chopping board and the stove in half, what kind of concept could be gained from that? What if it was a different weapon? It was no wonder that the whole world was promoting this game! It was no wonder that all the major official forces paid so much attention to the game! He was sure that the higher-ups must be keeping high-ranked secrets about this game! Second World was definitely not an ordinary game after all… At this moment, Lu Chen thought of many things. Perhaps in the future, the structure of the world could change because of special events in the game! The possibilities of things changed caused a fire to burn passionately in Lu Chen’s heart. In that case, he decided that it was of the utmost importance for him to train and become the most powerful in the game! Lu Chen looked at the game pod and his eyes bore no hesitation. He directly stepped into it! Right now, he had countless golden titles, a large number of game funds in his hands, and three epic-grade teleportation scrolls! His starting point as a starter player was probably the highest in the game right now! As the light covered Lu Chen’s line of sight, he once again returned to Second World. At this time, most of the people outside the Novice Village had already left. Lu Chen crossed the Wild Boar grassland in front of him and directly walked towards Stone Mountain. This was the place that the game map had specially marked for him. The entire Stone Mountain was red, indicating that it was an extremely dangerous location. There was also a boss marked on the small map. This was the Wild Boar King’s territory! A level 10 elite boss! Lu Chen, who had made up his mind to quickly increase his strength, did not want to blindly farm those ordinary wild monsters. Fighting a boss could gain a huge amount of EXP, gold coins, and various items. It was undoubtedly the best choice for him! Lu Chen quickly walked towards Stone Mountain. The players along the way decreased as he got closer to the mountain. Obviously, no one dared to approach this place. In less than 10 minutes, Lu Chen saw a hill-sized mountain of meat lying at the foot of Stone Mountain. The two fangs gave off a chilling aura, and the mane of the creature looked like steel needles. The entire body was pitch-black, and it emitted a terrifying pressure! [Mutated Wild Boar King] [Level: 10 (bronze)] [HP: 3,000] [Attack: 750] [Defense: 50] [Skills: Earth Stomp, Death Slam] [Earth Stomp: The Wild Boar King would stomp on the enemies within a 500-meter radius with brute force, causes 1,000 damage, and stun them for 3 seconds!] [Death Slam: The Wild Boar King’s slam will lock onto a target, causing 2,000 damage!] Lu Chen looked at the Wild Boar King in front of him and felt his scalp tingle! With 3,000 HP and 50 defense points, it was no wonder that no one dared to contend with it. Its attributes were too strong. Coupled with the area of effect skill — Earth Stomp, it could basically kill as many players as it could! There was also a full 3 seconds of stun that came after, it was not enough time to save someone. There was also the Death Slam, when locked onto the target, the attack would definitely be too overwhelming for a player to handle. That was why, on the second day of the game, no one still dared to contend with the Wild Boar King! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen looked at the boss in front of him and pondered. According to his current stats, he would not even be able to break the Wild Boar King’s defenses. If his 360 HP was depleted, he would be finished! Generally speaking, the boss in the game could never be killed by just one person. At least five or six people, or even hundreds of thousands of people, would be needed to work together to kill the boss! In the early stages of the game, monsters like these were existences that should not be carelessly provoked! No matter how beneficial it was to be stronger in number, one could not make up for the difference in attributes! However, was Lu Chen going to give up? That was clearly not Lu Chen’s style! It was not like Lu Chen had never faced such a monster before. In the Hares Cave, he had faced countless of ferocious rabbits for a thousand years! Those wild rabbits that were constantly getting stronger as they respawned had also turned into huge monsters. He had enough battle experience! “Bow God!” Lu Chen waved his hand, and an initial wooden bow appeared in his hand. Then, two large golden words flashed above his head. The arrow was locked and loaded, ready to fire. Then, it was aimed at the Wild Boar King. Whoosh! The arrow directly entered the Wild Boar King’s huge body! A red number floated up! “-250!” The Bow God’s skill, Armor Breaker, dispelled 90% of the armor. Now, Lu Chen could deal direct damage to the Wild Boar King. Roar! The Wild Boar King, which was the size of a tiny mountain, was obviously enraged by this arrow attack. The intense pain made it go crazy as it quickly locked onto the intruder! With ferocious intent, it crashed towards Lu Chen like a madman! The huge Wild Boar King’s pace kept building as it charged at Lu Chen. It did not give Lu Chen a chance to draw his bow and shoot a second arrow. At this moment, Lu Chen instantly changed his form! Suddenly, a shadow above enveloped him! In an instant, his body was swallowed into the void! “Dark Shura!” This was the title that appeared after the mastery of hidden weapons was perfected. In the thousand years he spent in the cave, other than using knives, swords, bows, and other weapons, Lu Chen was also good at using hidden weapons such as stones! The Wild Boar King brashly hit nothing, and Lu Chen’s body disappeared into thin air. The system’s notification came into his mind. [Dark Shura: Your understanding of darkness has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a hidden weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with your level!] [Shadow State: When you transform into a shadow, your body will be hidden into the void.?Ordinary attacks can not deal any damage to you. When you encounter special damage, you will be immune to it.] [Shadow Kill: When you use a long-range hidden weapon, your attack can surpass the opponent’s armor. This attack will not deactivate the Shadow State!] [One Hit Kill: When you use a close-range hidden weapon, Shadow State will be deactivated. Attacks will surpass the opponent’s armor. Critical strikes, dodges, and shield blocks from opponents will be ignored. Deals 300% true damage!] Lu Chen’s entire body was hidden in the void. His entire body was covered in black fog, and only his eyes were emitting a terrifying killing intent! When he disappeared, the Wild Boar King was in a furious state outside. This was because the Wild Boar King thought that it was about to kill Lu Chen, but it was unsuccesful! “Shadow Kill!” Lu Chen directly shot out a flying knife from his hand. The attack accurately pierced into the Wild Boar King’s eyeball! “-330!” A red number floated up! Roar! The Wild Boar King’s eyeball had been shattered instantly and it let out an explosive roar. With a stomp, it shattered the ground beneath it. It then tried to frantically search for the enemy that had ambushed it! Under the fruitless search, the enraged Wild Boar King’s aura began to surge wildly. Suddenly, some sort of terrifying power converged beneath its feet. This was definitely not a good sign. Lu Chen was shocked. He had guessed that the Wild Boar King was going to use a skill to force him out of the void. His Shadow State was immune to normal attacks. However, being immune to a single attack might mean he would be immune to the effects of this skill! If he was touched by the Wild Boar King’s Earth Stomp at a close distance, he would be stunned for three seconds, which was enough for him to die several times over at the hands of the Boar King! With that thought, Lu Chen hurriedly retreated further away. However, he was still one step too late! The Wild Boar King’s two front limbs stomped onto the ground. The air currents surged, and a terrifying shock wave directly spread towards Lu Chen. The intense dizziness instantly caused Lu Chen to lose consciousness. With that, his figure was instantly exposed more than 400 meters away from the Wild Boar King! Lu Chen felt that his body could not move at all. He could only look at the Wild Boar King as it slowly turned around to seek the opponent. Finally, the Wild Boar King locked its gaze onto Lu Chen not too far away! The gaze it held was filled with endless anger. It wanted to crush this despicable human into a speck of dust! Its sharp fangs began to gather some kind of energy. Under the earthquake, Lu Chen could only watch as the Wild Boar King charged towards him! The Wild Boar King was about to use Death Slam, locking onto Lu Chen as the victim! Lu Chen’s scalp went numb. If he was hit by this, his HP would definitely return to zero. He was extremely nervous. ‘I can make it, I can make it, I can make it!’ he repeated in his mind. As Lu Chen had appeared from the void, the Wild Boar King had spent a long time searching for him, and he had also put enough distance between himself and the Wild Boar King for that search to last longer. After three seconds, he might have a chance to make it! Even if he was locked on, he had to think of a way to take this attack head-on! The Wild Boar King was getting closer and closer, and just as its sharp fangs were about to reach Lu Chen’s face. The feeling of being stuck finally dissipated! “Shield God!” A dazzling white light enveloped Lu Chen. Then, a small white shield appeared on Lu Chen’s arm. In that instant, it expanded around his body to protect him! [Shield God: Your understanding of the shield has reached an unfathomable level. When you use any shield, you will receive a special effect. This effect will grow along with your level!] [Indestructible: When you receive damage, you will be immune to 90% of the damage.] [Shield Backlash: Return 90% of the damage you received back to the enemy.] Bang! The Wild Boar King slammed into the light shield in front of Lu Chen. The huge backlash almost made Lu Chen spit out a mouthful of blood. It was as if his internal organs had shifted from the impact. A line of red numbers floated above his head. “-200!” His health bar was almost depleted. At the same time, a red number also floated above the Wild Boar King’s head. “-1,800!” Lu Chen’s eyes narrowed. The boss’s health bar was on the verge of death! Without any time to rest, Lu Chen once again went into the void and directly disappeared into the darkness! The weapon in his hand also transformed into a dagger! After losing its target, the Wild Boar King was at a loss for a moment. At this moment, Lu Chen’s figure charged out from the darkness! The dagger directly slashed across the Wild Boar King’s head! “One Hit Kill!” A red number floated up… “-900!” Bang! The Wild Boar King’s HP bar was bottomed out, and it finally fell! On the ground, equipment and gold coins were shimmering on the ground. At the same time, a huge banner appeared on the broadcast of Second World! [Congratulations to player Morning Mist for killing an elite-level boss.. This player has now obtained the title — First Kill Boss. The player has been rewarded 1,000 reputation points!] <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation With the appearance of the broadcast, all the players in Second World were shocked. “What the f*ck, it’s only the second day, and a boss has already been killed? How??” “The sh*t, who’s the monster that did that?” “A single person can take on boss alone, is this a private server?” “I’m so envious. A boss can drop so many good things. A guild’s share of the loot would not be given to him alone.” “Reputation? What’s the use of this?” Countless players were stupefied. It was common knowledge that the bosses in Second World were extremely dangerous. In the past two days, countless first-rate guilds have been wiped out. However, now, the boss they tried so hard to defeat had actually been single-handedly killed by Morning Mist? All of the guild leaders had solemn expressions on their faces. As the leaders of a guild, they knew how terrifying the bosses in this world were. According to the intelligence report, this Morning Mist player was only level 5. How did he manage to kill a boss all on his own? At the foot of Stone Mountain, Lu Chen was surrounded by white light. The music of leveling up sounded three times in a row! Killing a boss this time had given him a huge amount of EXP. He had leveled up three times in a row! [Your level has been raised to level 8!] [12 free attribute points can now be allocated.] Lu Chen did not hesitate. As usual, he allocated all his attribute points to strength. Looking at the items on the ground, Lu Chen’s face lit up with joy. He immediately put them all into his backpack. [You have received 10 gold coins.] [You have received a Decaying Ring bronze-grade.] [You have received a Broadsword.] [You have received a Tusk Necklace.] [You have obtained a Wild Boar King’s leather.] [You have obtained a skill scroll — Earth Stomp.] Looking at the dazzling array of items, Lu Chen was extremely pleased. This was a great harvest! A bronze boss had dropped 10 gold coins for him. That was 100,000 dollars! That was only the early stages of the boss. There were even three pieces of equipment. One had to know that right now, other than the silver-grade armor on Lu Chen’s body, the other equipment columns were all empty! In the online game world, the attributes of equipment were beneficial to players! [Decaying Ring (bronze)] [Level Requirement: 3] [Vitality: +10] [Strength: +8] [Agility: +8] [Intelligence: +10] [All attributes: +5] Lu Chen took a look at its attributes. A piece of bronze equipment was not that good. It seemed that special effects could only be obtained from silver-grade equipment. However, it was still not bad for a single piece of equipment to be able to match the increase in his attributes by several levels. Lu Chen continued to check the other items. [Broadsword (bronze)] [Level Requirement: 3] [Vitality: +5] [Strength: +10] [Agility: +3] [Intelligence: +3] [Attack Power: +150] … [Tusk Necklace (bronze)] [Level Requirement: 3] [Vitality: +8] [Strength: +6] [Agility: +3] [Intelligence: +10] [HP: +100] [MP: +100] Lu Chen did not hesitate to equip these three items. With that, his attributes immediately received a huge increase. Then, he looked at the skill scroll in his backpack. This was the second time he had received a scroll. The first time was in the Novice Village. The old village chief had given him three teleportation scrolls. They were all epic-grade items, but they were one-time consumables. However, this time was different. This scroll was actually a skill-type! In the early stages of the game, it was basically impossible for players to obtain skills before they arrived at White Fog City to change their class. Only bosses would drop such skill scrolls. Lu Chen took a look at the description of this skill scroll. [Earth Stomp (bronze-grade skill): Uses violent brute force to stomp on enemies within a 500-meter radius, dealing 500 damage and stunning them for one second! Consumes 100 MP per use.] [Cooldown: 60 minutes] [Player can use reputation points to level up the skill!] Obviously, this was the Wild Boar King’s skill. Such an AOE control skill was practically a monster clearing skill, and it even allowed players to have control over it! As for reputation points, it could be used to level up his skills! Moreover, he had a feeling that this thing might have other uses in the future. Therefore, Lu Chen did not hesitate and directly chose to learn the skill. In an instant, a trample mark appeared on the skill pane. On his own panel, there was another silver title. [First Kill Boss] [Title: Unique] [You are the first person in the entire server to kill the boss alone, the system will grant you this honor.] [The title’s attributes will take effect under any state.] [Vitality: +50] [Strength: +50] [Agility: +50] [Intelligence: +50] [Passive: Your damage to elite bosses will be permanently increased by 50%!] F*ck! Lu Chen was shocked. He had never thought that being the first to kill a boss would have so many attribute bonuses! It directly gave him 50 points to four of his attributes! What kind of concept was this! With the bonus from this title alone, he would be able to increase his attributes by more than 10 to 20 levels! More importantly, there was a passive effect of this title that could deal 50% more damage to elite monsters. This additional passive bonus was a big deal! In the future, the difficulty of Lu Chen’s solo battle with bosses would become much lower. He could not wait any longer and opened his own attribute panel! This time, killing a boss had given him a qualitative improvement! [Name: Morning Mist] [Level: 8] [Class: Hero (You may now change classes to War God)] [Titles: Sword God (hidden), Shield God (hidden), Axe God (hidden), Blade God (hidden), All-rounded Master (hidden)] [Vitality: 111] [Strength: 124] [Agility: 82] [Intelligence: 106] [HP: 1,210] [MP: 1,160] [Attack: 1,390] [Defense: 15] [Magic Defense: 15] [Reputation: 1,000] [Skill: Earth Stomp] [Attack Speed: 8.4] The luxurious stats on his interface blinded Lu Chen’s eyes! Under such improvements, Lu Chen was sure that if he were to encounter the Wild Boar King again, his opponent would have died in one single attack! His current attributes were equivalent to other people’s attribute panels if they were level 20! Lu Chen looked at the items in his backpack, and his heart was filled with joy. It seemed that fighting bosses were the fastest way to increase his strength! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The Second World set out from the Novice Village, passing through a grassland for beginners to level up. After that, there would be countless paths that were all shrouded in white fog, and all of them headed towards White Fog City. However, after two days of exploration, countless players announced the information of these paths. The left-most path was the Wolf Valley. The most common wild monsters were all mostly level 8. These types of wild monsters had high attack speed and high damage. If one was not careful, they could be instantly killed. Meanwhile, in the depths of the Wolf Valley was a silver boss — the White Wolf King. After passing through the Wolf Valley, one could reach the outskirts of White Fog City. However, the prerequisite was to kill the White Wolf King of the Wolf Valley. It was only then could one pass through. The second path was to Bear Ridge. It was also full of level 8 monsters. However, this type of wild monster had high HP and defense, making it extremely difficult to deal with. Similarly, deep within Bear Ridge, there was a silver Black Bear King. After that, there were other paths that had the Snake Pond, Bat Cave, Mass Grave, and Tiger Mountain. There was a silver-tier boss camped in each path. This caused countless players to complain endlessly. Without their class advancement, how could they possibly defeat such a terrifying silver-tier boss? It was absolutely impossible for one player to pass these monsters and arrive at White Fog City safely. No matter how big the guild was, they were destined to be stuck here with these monsters. According to the information released on the official website, the class advancement requirement was level 10. However, there was no way that someone who was only level 10 could wipe out all the monsters along the way and arrive at White Fog City safely! The information on the official website showed that after arriving in White Fog City, the strength of the players would undergo a qualitative change. In regards to that information, the three scrolls in Lu Chen’s hands became even more precious. At this moment, outside of Wolf Valley, countless players had gathered. This was because there was news that the number one guild in South City, White Alliance, was going to surround and kill Morning Mist here! Moreover, someone had seen with his own eyes that Morning Mist had already stepped into Wolf Valley and was walking towards the White Fog City. “Damn, there’s finally a major power group making a move on that dude. This time, I think this so-called Sword God skill is going to be overturned.” “Hehe, you’re dreaming bro. We’re talking about the rabbit-killing demon here. He has the title of Sword God and Bow Sword on him. Even just now, he single-handedly challenged the first boss in the entire server. Do you think he’s that weak?” “You have to know that this is the largest guild in the south, the White Alliance. Plus, they have countless experts!” “They were the ones who killed the second bronze boss in the entire server. They were just a few minutes slower than Morning Mist!” “What a joke. How many people in their guild were fighting one boss? Morning Mist fought the boss one-on-one!” “Hehe, so what if the White Alliance Guild needed more people to win? This time, there are more than 1,000 players. If they fight him with this amount, I bet that Morning Mist will definitely not survive!” Countless players were looking forward to Lu Chen’s appearance. After all, such a good show could not be seen every day. Meanwhile, around the Wolf Valley, the major forces of the Dragon Country were lurking in the dark. There were even quite a number of people who were familiar with each other and recognized each other. “I didn’t expect the Xu family to come either. Why are you interested in this Morning Mist dude?” A handsome young man holding a slender white sword said to the group of people in front of him. The group of people in front of him was mainly comprised of tall and slender women with an aura of a delicate flower. They were surrounded by a few people. One woman took a glance at the young man and was secretly shocked. This person actually had a silver-grade weapon in his hands. He only had been in the game for two days. Other than the one that Lu Chen had obtained, this was only the second silver-grade equipment to be seen. “Morning Mist seems to have endless potential. Even you, the eldest young master of Peaceful Town, have come. How can my Xu family not join in on the fun?” The young master of Peaceful Town smiled but did not say anything. On the other side, at the White Alliance Guild’s ambush, a man dressed in a black robe said with a serious gaze. “Xiao Chuan, is your White Alliance Guild really going to make a move?” In front of that man stood a young man dressed in white. His face was filled with arrogance. “I don’t see Morning Mist in my sight at all. The Night Union plans on protecting him, you know that?” The man in black shook his head and said, “I just think that Morning Mist is a force to not be reckoned with. It’s much better to not be his enemy if he joins the Union.” Xiao Chuan, the leader of the White Alliance Guild, simply waved his hand and said, “I admit that this Morning Mist is strong. “Of course, I will give him the chance to join our White Alliance Guild. “But the premise is that he must bow down to us and know his place. “I don’t want there to be a wild horse that can’t be tamed here.” The man in black shook his head and said, “Your personality is much too strong. One day, you will suffer a great loss.” Xiao Chuan smiled coldly and said, “In this world, the strong are always respected, right? Even if he has a golden title, do you think I’ll be afraid of him?” As soon as Xiao Chuan finished speaking, two golden words appeared above his head — Overlord! A terrifying aura circulated above his head. This very action from Xiao Chuan made the black-clothed man stock in his tracks. After a long while, he said deeply, “I only hope that you know your limits and take care of yourself.” As he finished speaking, the black-clothed man’s figure strangely disappeared in front of him. … Not too far away in the forest, a woman with a strong figure was sitting on a tall tree branch. Her voluptuous curves pressed against the branches, making her extremely alluring. She was wearing emerald-green leather armor, giving off a solemn killing intent. At the same time, on the surrounding tree trunks, there were four other people wearing the same leather armor as well. “Liu Yuan, is this kid really not afraid of death? If he dies once in this world, the consequences will be very serious.” A man’s voice traveled through the dense forest and reached the woman’s ears. “Shut up. Call me by my number when you’re on a mission.” The woman was Liu Yuan. She had been feeling resentful ever since she was rejected by Lu Chen. However, when she heard that Lu Chen was in danger, she still gathered the members of the Dragon Country team for backup. After all, Lu Chen was someone that the higher-ups paid special attention to. If Lu Chen was in danger, they would help him out. “Alright, alright, alright, 0927. By the way, the boss wanted you to investigate the situation, right? Did you get any information?” The man’s voice sounded again. Liu Yuan’s face turned black from the question. She was angry whenever this matter was brought up. “Shut up! Since you’re so concerned, how about you teach me how to conduct the mission?” The voice smiled embarrassedly and said, “I’m not as charming as you are.” “Shut up! The next time I see laughing at work, I’ll make sure you’ll never get to be a father ever again!” After she said that, the man zipped his mouth shut. Liu Yuan finally had a smile on her face, satisfied with the response. This man really deserved to be taught a lesson! Suddenly, her eyes focused and she saw the figure of a man in the distance. She immediately sent a message to her people, [Attention all departments, the target has appeared!] <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen’s footsteps were light. He had practically forced his way into Wolf Valley. These level 8 monsters simply could not withstand even two slashes from Lu Chen. With his current attack speed, his maximum attack speed was eight slashes per second. With close to 1,400 attack power, he could deal close to 10,000 damage per second. However, with his maximum attack speed, he would consume a certain amount of HP and MP. In Second World, even if it was just a game, his body would still experience the fatigued of constantly exerting energy. At the same time, his equipment would also experience wear and tear were he to use it for too long. After a character reaches level 10, their attack speed would change, and they would no longer receive such a high increase in points. At this moment, Lu Chen had walked from the outskirts of the Wolf Valley to the depths of the Wolf Valley. His level had already risen to level 10 after encountering so many monsters. In the valley, Lu Chen frowned slightly as he looked at the scene before him. It seemed like countless players had gathered here. It seemed like they were waiting for someone? “Morning Mist, right? I’ve been waiting for you for a long time.” Suddenly, a man dressed in white walked out from the forest. His appearance looked strange to Lu Chen, and his entire body exuded a certain unruly aura. At the same time, a large group of people surged out from the forest and surrounded Lu Chen. Lu Chen was displeased by the gaze of the man in front of him. He was even more displeased when he realized that he was surrounded and the people around him were looking at him with malicious eyes. The man in white spoke up. “Let me introduce myself. I am Xiao Chuan. The leader of the White Alliance Guild, I believe that my reputation precedes me.” White Alliance Guild? Lu Chen did know of this guild at all. This guild was established twenty years ago. Whether in-game or in the real world, the White Alliance had a huge influence in the east. In Dragon Country, there was a saying, it said that the south was White, and the north was Gu. The White referred to the White Alliance in the south, and Gu was referred to the legendary Gu family of the Dragon Country. It was said that when the White Alliance was at its peak, there were a million members in the guild! This number only accounted for the core members of the guild! It did not count for the external forces that were connected to it. It could be said that the White Alliance was the most powerful guild and had a great influence on the country. Moreover, the members of the White Alliance had always been overbearing and tyrannical. Everyone knew that those who followed their orders would prosper and those who went against them would perish. Lu Chen glanced at Xiao Chuan and could roughly guess the other party’s plan. After all, he was currently in the limelight. The leader of the White Alliance had personally gone out and brought so many people to meet him. Lu Chen concluded that this meetup may not necessarily be a good thing for him. As expected, Xiao Chuan spoke indifferently in a condescending tone. “I’ll give you two choices now. “The first one is to join our White Alliance. “I’ll give you the position of becoming the second in command. “The annual income would be no less than this amount.” Xiao Chuan then showed Lu Chen the amount on his fingers. “Ten million?” Lu Chen smiled and replied. Xiao Chuan shook his head, “No, it’s 100 million.” Lu Chen said calmly, “You’re being really generous with your offer, sir. An income of 100 million, and getting to be the second in command? It sure does sound enticing. Although, nothing really is free in life, isn’t it? So what’s the catch?” Xiao Chuan said, “It seems as though you carry a little bit of intelligence, boy. You are indeed right that nothing is free in life.” He paused for a moment and continued, “I want the three scrolls in your hands. I’ll pay you whatever amount you wish for.” The man in white pointed his finger to his head before speaking again. “Think it over carefully. Our White Alliance’s sincerity is not one to disregard. Up until now, no one has been able to deserve this much respect from us. We are being kind here, know this.” Lu Chen looked at the White Alliance players who were getting closer and he sneered in response. “I’m, not sure if I can see the sincerity that you’re talking about, nor can I disregard the malicious intent coming out from your people. “Have you ever seen a group of subordinates surround the other party when they’re discussing important matters?” Xiao Chuan frowned and said, “It seems as though you have decided to go with the second choice?” Lu Chen raised his eyebrows and said, “Oh, what’s the second choice?” Xiao Chuan’s face was filled with anger as he spoke. “The second choice is to become the enemy of the White Alliance starting today. “You should know that whatever the White Alliance wants, they will by any means get. “No matter where you resurrect, there will definitely be people from the White Alliance guarding the spot. “I’ll kill you time and time again. “Think carefully, boy. Option one would give you unlimited glory and to be second in command in the greatest guild, and the other option is to be pursued by the White Alliance indefinitely.” Lu Chen smiled, looked at Xiao Chuan and said, “I think we should choose the third option.” Xiao Chuan was stunned and said, “The third option?” A broadsword suddenly appeared in Lu Chen’s hand. He laughed sinisterly and said, “That is to send all of you back to the Resurrection Point!” After he said that, everyone was shocked. “You-” Xiao Chuan wanted to call Lu Chen an arrogant jerk. However, before the words came out of his mouth, Lu Chen’s broadsword had already arrived in front of him. “Guild leader!” No one in the entire White Alliance had expected that Lu Chen would be so bold as to directly attack Xiao Chuan. Two large golden words appeared above Lu Chen’s head — Blade God! The group was shocked! Was this guy going to f*cking kill everyone here? Was having the Sword God and Bow God not enough? How did he manage to obtain the title Blade God too? Just how many titles did this guy have? Lu Chen raised his broadsword and slashed down. His one strike caused everyone around to tremble in fear! The Blade God’s analysis popped up as a system notification for Lu Chen. [Blade God: your understanding of the blade has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a blade-type weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with your level!]  [Frenzied Blade: When you transform into the Blade God, your attack will definitely be a critical hit. You will have a critical hit immunity effect and receive a 400% critical hit damage bonus!] [Bloodbath Blade God: When your enemies exceed 100 amount, your attack will become an area-of-effect damage of 100 meters. 50% of the damage will be converted into your HP.] Everyone present felt the terror of Lu Chen’s attack. Even Xiao Chuan could not help but turn pale. The pressure exuded from Lu Chen made him feel suffocated! Finally, the broadsword directly slashed into Xiao Chuan’s body. A bright red critical hit number appeared above the man in white. “-5,560!” Holy sh*t, everyone was shocked! A damage of over 5,000 from a single slash!? Was this guy not only level 8? Even if all of his attribute points were focused on strength, he would not have such a high attack, right? Everyone thought that the number was too ridiculous to even comprehend. Moreover, what was even more shocking was that Lu Chen had actually dared to make an enemy out of White Alliance. He did not hesitate to draw his sword towards Xiao Chuan, sending him back to the Resurrection Point. Many people who were hiding in the shadows had looks of approval in their eyes. The young miss of the Xu family, who was dressed in an ocean blue dress, nodded slightly and analyzed Lu Chen. “His strength is formidable, and he is decisive with his decisions. The old man’s judgment is indeed commendable. “If such a person enters our Xu family, he will definitely be a great help in the future.” The eyes of the rich and the noble young master of Peaceful Town were filled with shock. “This kid is much too bold. He even dared to kill Xiao Chuan. “With such great strength, I’m afraid that the Dragon Country won’t be able to live in peace in the future.” Liu Yuan, who was hiding in the dark, could not help but praise her neighbor, “He is indeed worthy of being regarded highly by the higher-ups. “I have long disliked Xiao Chuan. Well done to Lu Chen!” On the battlefield, Xiao Chuan’s figure slowly disappeared. He reappeared less than 200 meters away from Lu Chen. With a gloomy face filled with anger, he said, “It seems to me that you are courting death!” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Xiao Chuan’s figure appeared once again, and his body was unscathed. It was obvious that he had used some sort of method to dodge Lu Chen’s attack. “Huh, if I’m not mistaken, did Xiao Chuan just use a substitution scroll just now?” “He did. In fact, he used a gold-grade scroll. It’s said that the White Alliance paid a huge price to kill a boss to obtain it.” “I didn’t expect it to be consumed this quickly. This item should be worth at least 20 million dollars on the market, right?” In Second World, the function of a substitute scroll was to duplicate a clone with the same attributes as oneself. The duration of its existence would vary according to the quality of the scroll. To powerful players, this scroll was undoubtedly a powerful combat power. It could also be equivalent to one having a second life! Now, Xiao Chuan’s clone was killed by Lu Chen without any hesitation. Therefore, Xiao Chuan was extremely furious. He looked at Lu Chen and said fiercely, “You will regret it!” After saying that, he took a step back and countless White Alliance players swarmed towards Lu Chen. “Hehe, I’m afraid you’ll be the one regretting it.” Lu Chen held the broadsword in his hand and turned around to face the sea of enemies. Under the buff of the Blade God’s effect, he slashed out with his blade. The area within 100 meters was instantly affected by his attack! Red numbers floated up one by one! “-5,560!” The Saber God’s AOE’s lethality shocked everyone. “This...; This is a skill?” “Impossible, there’s was no indication that he used a skill. That was just a f*ccking normal attack!” “The f*ck, wasn’t that too ridiculous?” “A normal attack can cover such a large area?” “Sh*t, not only is the AOE large, but the damage is also high!” “Who the f*ck can withstand this overpowering attack?” The scene fell into a strange silence. After Lu Chen killed a group of people from White Alliance with a single slash, the subsequent players were already cowering in fear. He had killed everyone with one slash. What was the point of fighting anymore? At this moment, a golden light flashed in the crowd. Xiao Chuan did not expect Lu Chen’s strength to be so terrifying. The players of the White Alliance knew that they could not deal any damage to him at all. Knowing this, Xiao Chuan took matters into his own hands and took out his weapon. He was ready for another attack. After Lu Chen’s one strike, his current level had reached level 12. Moreover, he had also obtained a new special title! Overlord! He had gained a piece of new equipment — the Sword of the Overlord. Lu Chen also quickly noticed the abnormality of this new equipment and wondered what it could do. [You have the All-rounded Master title, you may see the hidden effects of the player.] The system notification sounded, and Xiao Chuan’s attributes immediately entered his sight. [Name: Xiao Chuan] [Level: 12] [Class: Hero] [Title: Overlord] [Vitality: 80] [Strength: 37] [Agility: 37] [Intelligence: 37] [HP: 1,000] [MP: 500] [Attack: 2,471] [Defense: 40] [Magic Defense: 30] [Reputation: 500] [Overlord: This player is born with an overbearing fate and was born to be a leader. When this player leads a faction, they will receive a special effect. This effect will change with the level of the faction.] [Conqueror’s Domination: All attributes of the Overlord will be buffed to the strength attribute, receiving a bonus to attack power!] [Equipment: Sword of the Overlord (exclusive to the Overlord)] [Grade: Unknown] [Attack Power: +600] [Special Effect: When the Overlord uses the Sword of the Overlord to attack, the damage it causes will be converted into their own shield. This effect has no limit of use!] When Xiao Chuan’s information entered Lu Chen’s mind, even he could not help but gasp in admiration. This Overlord title’s effect was really heaven-defying! Although the other four-dimensional attributes were not that high, the attack power had actually reached over 2,000 points! The most ridiculous thing was that the weapon could actually stack shields indefinitely! It was no wonder that this guy was so crazy! At this moment, Xiao Chuan did not hide his attribute panel, so everyone saw this shocking attribute. One player after another cried out in shock. “F*ck! What the f*ck am I looking at?” “Over 2,000 attack power from his attribute panel. Is he even human?” “He has a golden title. Why are there so many monsters that have golden titles everywhere?” “I don’t think it’s the title that’s abnormal. It’s that weapon!” “Endless damage and a f*cking shield buff! He would be practically invisible!” “Look, the shield bar on Xiao Chuan’s head, its a 100,000 point shield??” “Morning Mist is dead for sure!” The hearts of the people hiding in the dark tightened. Although they did not like Xiao Chuan’s title, they had to admit one thing! This guy’s strength was indeed terrifying! Moreover, his influence in Dragon Country was not ordinary. He was arrogant, but he sure did have the status and strength to back up his arrogance! With a shield value of 100,000, even if he stood where he was and let Morning Mist hack at him,?it would cause no damage! This time, Morning Mist was dead for sure! The young lady in the ocean blue dress of the Xu family revealed a worried expression. She clenched her fists and was already prepared to make a move. Moreover, the noble young master of Peaceful Town had a solemn expression. This was also the first time he saw Xiao Chuan’s attribute panel. Such stats should indeed put pressure on Lu Chen. Among the people in the forest, Liu Yuan prepared herself to rush out and save Lu Chen. However, a woman with a strong figure pulled her back. “Don’t be anxious, let’s see how this plays out.” Everyone’s gaze was focused on the battlefield at this moment. Lu Chen looked at the shield number above Xiao Chuan’s head and smiled. A shield? The thing he was least afraid of was the shield! His Dark Shura skill had a bonus, which was to directly ignore all the shield and armor of his opponents! As Xiao Chuan approached, Lu Chen’s figure instantly disappeared into the darkness! Title change — Dark Shura! Xiao Chuan’s sword cut through the air, and he could not help but feel aggravated. “Stop playing tricks! “Do you think you can escape the pursuit of our White Alliance Guild with baby tricks?! “I advise you to come out obediently and hand over the scroll in your hand! “Otherwise, the White Alliance will pursue you to the death. We will let you know what it means to live a life worse than experiencing death!” To Xiao Chuan, accumulating 100,000 shield points would give him an invincible upper position. He was not afraid of any tricks from Morning Mist at all! No matter how strong that kid was, it would be absolutely useless to his high shield points! However, just as Xiao Chuan’s voice fell...; Lu Chen’s voice rang in his ears. “Hehe, you really won’t stop until one of us dies? Would you like to see how it ends when one of us dies?” That voice sounded like an evil spirit from Hell, causing Xiao Chuan’s hair to instantly shiver from the sound. A cold chill ran from the soles of his feet to the top of his head. Before he could react, a dagger that emitted a cold light directly pierced through his neck! A bright red number floated in the air! “-4,170!” Xiao Chuan’s HP was instantly reduced to zero! Before he could say a single word, he dropped to the ground. The scene quickly fell into a strange silence as everyone was dumbfounded. A one-hit kill! What...; What was going on? A shield of 100,000 was nothing in Lu Chen’s eyes? Moreover, his form seemed to be different! How many trump cards did this guy still have? Lu Chen looked at the White Alliance players who were extremely terrified and said, “Since your guild leader has spoken, it would be disrespectful if I didn’t reply, was it not? “He did say that the White Alliance would fight to the death. “Alright, I, Morning Mist, shall take up on that challenge.” The dagger in his hand instantly turned into a broadsword. He grinned, revealing his ghastly white teeth. His voice was filled with killing intent as he continued speaking, “From today onwards, all the White Alliance players shall become my mortal enemies! I shall kill every single one of you!” As he finished speaking, he took a step forward and directly charged into the crowd! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen stepped into the crowd with his broadsword in hand. He looked like a tiger entering preying on a flock of sheep! The players of the White Alliance did not even have the strength to fight back. In just a few minutes, almost all of them were sent back to the Resurrection Point outside the Novice Village! The players around Wolf Valley who witnessed the battle unfold were amazed by Lu Chen’s boldness. This was the first person who dared to publicly declare the White Alliance as an enemy. However, based on the strength that Lu Chen had displayed, it really was an extremely exciting battle! Countless White Alliance players complained incessantly as they were sent back to the Resurrection Point almost in a flash. In Second World, every time they died, they would lose a large amount of experience points! Moreover, they would be under a 24-hour period of weakness. During this period, they had almost no ability to clear monsters. They needed to wait for their status to slowly recover. By being unconsentedly held back, their levels would lag far behind the others! At the Resurrection Point outside the Novice Village, a white light flashed. Xiao Chuan’s figure appeared! His face was gloomy, and his expression was slightly distorted. As the leader of the White Alliance, he felt humiliated! The number one person in the south was actually killed in one slash? He did not even know how Lu Chen did it! He realized that his shield was completely ineffective in front of Lu Chen! At the same time, rays of white light flashed around Xiao Chuan! Then, the members of the White Alliance appeared one by one! Xiao Chuan was shocked and furious at the same time when all his men appeared here. This meant that they had all died once! “Who did this!” His voice was low and deep as he tried his best to suppress his anger. “It’s...; It’s Morning Mist. “All the remaining guild members in Wolf Valley have been killed by him. Not a single one of them was spared. “He also said...;” The player stuttered as he spoke. Xiao Chuan snorted and asked, “What else did he say? Quickly spit it out now!” That person’s body trembled and he immediately said, “He declared that since you would not rest until he was dead, he would not show mercy to the people of the White Alliance in the future as well…” Xiao Chuan clenched his fists and almost gritted his teeth when he heard this news. After a while, he spoke, word by word “Good, very good! “He is the first person who dares to openly oppose the White Alliance! “Inform everyone that from today onwards, the entire White Alliance will go all out to kill Morning Mist! “No matter the price, those who can kill him will have the chance to be the second in command. The monetary reward will be 200 million!” As soon as these words were said, everyone’s eyes flashed with a fiery light. That was 200 million dollars in the bag were they to succeed! They might not even succeed even if they worked hard for ten lifetimes. For a moment, all the members of the White Alliance burned with greed. … At this moment, in Wolf Valley. Within a 200-meter radius of Lu Chen, no one dared to come any closer. The young lady in the ocean blue dress from the Xu family looked at the figure of the man in the distance and nodded her head in praise. Not many people in the Xu family had Lu Chen’s strength and boldness. The seniors had said that if he was outstanding enough, he would have to be scouted into the family at all costs. However, what did this guy like? She frowned slightly. For a moment, she could not think of any condition that could persuade Lu Chen. On the other hand, the President of the Night Union in the real world — who was hiding in the dark — had a shocked expression. The Dark Night Guild was an iconic union. Unlike other guilds, it only recruited talents that met certain specific requirements. In the Second World, the Dark Night Guild only wanted assassins! There were even rumors that the leader of the Dark Night Guild, Hei Yu, was a top-tier assassin in real life! “If we can get Lu Chen to join our union, he will definitely be a great help! “That method he carried out just now, I can’t get it out of my mind! “That’s the method of an assassin!” His heart was surging with excitement. On the other side, there was an old man beside the noble young master of Peaceful Town. “Chen, what do you think of this Morning Mist?” The old man clasped his hands behind his back and said, “He’s a very energetic young man. His strength is… not bad, but his future is hard to predict. “If I’m not wrong, there must be a lot of people watching him now. “If we want to befriend him, we should do it now.” The noble young master nodded and walked out directly. In the depths of the forest. Liu Yuan let out a sigh of relief and said, “He gave me a fright. I thought this kid was dead for sure.” The woman at the side smiled and said, “Don’t worry. If he did not have the capabilities, the higher-ups wouldn’t have taken him so seriously.” Liu Yuan nodded and looked at Lu Chen in the distance. She said seriously, “From the looks of it, this Lu Chen is someone who will take revenge for everything. He won’t hesitate in losses. “Moreover, he has a strong personality. If he is recruited into a team, it’ll be easy for him to lose control. Therefore, he must have someone who can contain his excessiveness.” “Alright, let’s continue to observe this kid further. I have a feeling that he will give us another surprise soon enough.” … In the Wolf Valley, Lu Chen had just put away the broadsword in his hand. Right then, a noble-looking young man walked out from the forest in front of him. Lu Chen’s expression turned solemn, and he became alert again. “Don’t be nervous. I’m not here to cause trouble.” The young man smiled and quickly explained himself. Lu Chen frowned. Today was really baffling. Strange people kept approaching him, one after another. “Let me introduce myself. I’m Gu Yiming of Peaceful Town.” As soon as he said this, all the players present turned pale with fright! “The Gu family of Peaceful Town?” “Could it be he’s THAT Gu… from the Gu family? The current leader of the Gu family, Gu Yiming?” “Nonsense, who else could it be?” In the entire Dragon Country, the Gu family had businesses all over the place! Everyone’s clothing, food, shelter, and transportation were all inextricably linked to the Gu family! In fact, the Gu family was the one who single-handedly pushed the development of this gaming pod for the people! This was a colossal figure that stood before Lu Chen! A truly important figure! Lu Chen naturally knew of the existence of the Gu family. Although this great aristocratic family with a thousand-year history kept a low profile, their influence was extremely huge! “Mr. Gu, what business do you have with me?” Lu Chen was still somewhat on guard. Gu Yiming smiled and said, “Don’t worry Mr. Morning Mist. I don’t have any ill intentions. I just want to befriend you. I saw what happened just now. The White Alliance Guild seemed domineering. Mr. Morning Mist, you might be in trouble in the future.” Lu Chen waved his hand and said, “I don’t think so. They’re just a bunch of pests. I’ll kill them all no matter how many come.” Gu Yiming nodded and said, “I naturally believe that you have the ability after what you have shown to us. “However, no matter how strong you are, there will always be times when you feel troubled. “As a sign of sincerity, my Gu family is willing to become Mr. Morning Mist’s ally. “Although the White Alliance is domineering, no matter how arrogant they are, they are no match for my Gu family when it comes to status.” [Ding! Thousand Miles requests to be added as a friend!] “As long as Mr. Morning Mist says the word, our Gu family will definitely make a move.” Gu Yiming chuckled. At this moment, the entire Wolf Valley was in chaos! Gu Yiming’s words represented the Gu family’s whole attitude! This family that dominated the north actually chose to side with Morning Mist and did not hesitate to offend the White Alliance in the south! From what he said, it seemed that as long as the White Alliance and Morning Mist were enemies, by extension White Alliance would be enemies with the Gu family! When the two forces of the north and south clashed, it would not be a small matter! What power did Morning Mist possess for such a big issue to occur? <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Right when Gu Yiming finished speaking, another group of people walked out from the dark. The leader was a young girl that wore an ocean blue long dress. She was fair and beautiful, full of gentle and virtuous temperament. “My Xu family also has the same idea.” The young girl walked toward Lu Chen and spoke up. As soon as she finished speaking, everyone present was even more shocked. Even the Xu family was here? In Dragon Country, there were quite a number of large families, but only the ten great families had high-status rankings. Among the ten, the Xu family was an existence that could be placed in the top five. Moreover, it was said that the Xu family seemed to only have one direct descendant female. She was incomparably beautiful, and all the large families wanted to use her to form a marriage alliance. Could it be that she was the one in front of Lu Chen? Lu Chen looked at the young girl walking over and was somewhat stunned. It seemed that what happened in Wolf Valley today was not a coincidence. Ever since he showed his talent in the Novice Village, all the higher forces had probably noticed him. “I’m Xu Ziyuan, a direct descendant of the Xu family.” “Mr. Morning Mist, you may refer to me as Ziyuan in the game as well.” Xu Ziyuan walked to Gu Yiming’s side politely and smiled sweetly at Lu Chen. [Ding! Ziyuan requests to be added as a friend!]] The system notification appeared again. Lu Chen looked around and shook his head slightly. “How many more people are there? Come out wherever you are.” Lu Chen spoke in a jokingly matter. However, as soon as he said that, a large group of people came out from the forest of Wolf Valley. “Ahem, Mr. Morning Mist, you really are a charming person. I’m Liu Changchong of the Liu family. I wish to befriend you too.” “White Alliance has been a nuisance for much too long, but fret not Mr. Morning Mist. As long as you are willing to cooperate with the Zhou family, I guarantee that White Alliance won’t dare touch so much so as a hair on you!” “Mr. Morning Mist, do you want to consider our Mobei Union? Out benefits are definitely not lower than White Alliance’s!” For a moment, Lu Chen was surrounded. The system was filled with all kinds of friend requests. Xu Ziyuan and Gu Yiming looked at each other and smiled bitterly. It seemed as though Morning Mist had really become a hot commodity and countless forces were fighting for it. However, they had already achieved their goal. It would be much more convenient for them to leave a good impression in front of Lu Chen and interact with him should an opportunity arise in the future. This world was so big, there would always be a suitable opportunity. There was no need to rush. The entire Wolf Valley was noisy, and the surrounding players who were ordinary were so shocked that they could not speak. It took a long time for someone to react. “My gosh, what the h*ll is going on?” “Are all the major forces of the Dragon Country gathered in the Wolf Valley?” “Is this Morning Mist dude really so popular?” “Hehe, if you have the titles of Sword God, Bow God, and so on, you would definitely be popular!” “I dare say that as long as these forces offer enticing conditions, he will definitely agree to any of them.” “Money, beautiful women, properties, he would have whatever he wishes for!” “F*ck, I’m so envious, why didn’t I receive this fate!” Lu Chen looked at the people around him and felt a headache coming on. He only heard bits and pieces of everyone’s offer and introductions. These people were all high and mighty. Usually, in the real world, with a snap of their fingers, they could easily move mountains. However, now, they were all carefully introducing themselves to him. There was even a hint of flattery involved. If it was an ordinary person, they would already be in a daze from all the offers thrown their way. However, Lu Chen was a very clear-headed man. These people only respected him because of his strength! It was because he had that value! At this moment, for the first time, Lu Chen felt the change brought about by becoming stronger! Amidst the noise, a man squeezed in. When the crowd saw him, they immediately fell silent. Everyone’s eyes then gathered over to the man. It was a middle-aged man dressed in black. “I’m Hei Yu from the Dark Night Guild. “It’s our first time meeting, and I have nothing to offer you right now. “When I saw your techniques just now, the dagger in your hand seemed to be a piece of starter equipment. “Take this short dagger as a token of my goodwill.” As he spoke, he took out a dagger from his waist and handed it over. On the bright silver scabbard, there were a few gems embellished. “This...; could this be a gold-grade equipment?” “Bullsh*t, how can that be a gold-grade equipment?” “F*ck, this attribute, isn’t this too f*cking overpowering?” “This value, it’s not something that can be measured with money!” “Guild leader Hei Yu sure is a generous man!” When Hei Yu took out that dagger, everyone was shocked! When Lu Chen saw the attributes of that dagger, he too could not help but gasp. [Blade of Darkness (exclusive to assassins)] [Grade: Unknown] [Attack: +500] [Special Effect: When you successfully assassinate an enemy, you will permanently gain 10% of the enemy’s attributes! This effect will grow with the growth of the wearer!] Another exclusive weapon! Moreover, the grade was unknown. Putting aside that heaven-defying special effect, just the 500 attack bonus in the early stage was already extremely terrifying! Such a valuable treasure could no longer be measured with money! Moreover, those who knew about the Dark Night guild knew that Hei Yu was an assassin himself! To him, such a piece of equipment was simply a divine weapon! How could he so easily give it away? Lu Chen naturally knew this as well. Therefore, he glanced at the middle-aged man in front of him and shook his head, “I’m sorry, this item is too valuable. I can’t accept it. There is no reward without merit.” Hei Yu?shook his head and said, “Mr. Morning Mist, I have no ill will. I only represent the Dark Night Guild and wish to befriend you. This equipment to you is to show my sincerity.” Among the many polite people, Hei Yu garnered the attention of everyone by taking out a piece of equipment. Compared to those who only knew how to talk, this gesture was indeed full of sincerity. Lu Chen was also somewhat tempted by this dagger. After all, growth-level equipment was something that could only be found by chance. It was a perfect match for his Dark Shura! He pondered for a moment and said, “If that’s the case, I’ll accept it.” As soon as he said that, Hei Yu’s face lit up. What he wanted was for Lu Chen to accept it. If he could gain Lu Chen’s favor, it would be worth it to give the equipment away! However, before he could say anything, Lu Chen’s voice sounded again. “However… I don’t like to owe others favors either.” After saying that, a scroll appeared in his hand as he spoke. “This is a teleportation scroll. Consider it my return gift.” Lu Chen’s action made everyone feel suffocated. Even Hei Yu was stunned on the spot! ‘I’m giving you a gift, not asking you to give me an even more f*cking valuable one! Do you know the f*cking value of this thing?’ Hei Yu thought to himself. The scroll itself was still fine, but the most important thing was that he now had the opportunity to be the first to enter White Fog City! Even the higher-ups around had expressed their disdain. The first person to enter White Fog City would most likely receive the full benefits of the higher-ups! Hei Yu hurriedly waved his hand and said, “Mr. Morning Mist, I hope you’re not pulling a prank on me! This item is much too valuable, I can’t take it!” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Everyone’s eyes were burning! If not for the fact that they were all big shots, they would have expressed themselves differently. Everyone was trying to hold themselves back in order not to start a fight. Even Gu Yiming and Xu Ziyuan did not expect him to do that! How could the teleportation scroll be given away that easily? At this moment, everyone regretted that they did not prepare a gift that could move Lu Chen. Lu Chen looked at Hei Yu, and he could feel this guy’s sincerity. In fact, the teleportation scroll did not mean that much to him. The first to enter White Fog City? Getting the resources of the higher-ups? A 100 million reward? Did this mean anything to him? That would only place him in the limelight of the storm! Today’s even had made Lu Chen realize something. Sometimes, it was not a good thing to be too dazzling. He did not believe that there would be no price for the higher-ups to provide benefits to the first player that enters the White Fog City. There would definitely be many restrictions, and the more he thought about that possibility, the more he did not like it. Therefore, he might as well give the first scroll to someone else. In exchange, he would get this dagger that was equally as rare! Lu Chen waved his hand and said to Hei Yu, “You don’t have to say anything else anymore. If I give it to you, it means that you can keep it. “How you want to deal with it is up to you. “I’m only exchanging it for this dagger that you’ve given me.” Deep in the forest, Liu Yuan was so angry that she cried out. “This b*stard, does he know what he’s giving away! “Liu, let go of me! “I must go out and smash his tiny head!” Behind Liu Yuan, an older woman hugged her tightly and said with a helpless and bitter smile, “Calm down. Hei Yu has a clean record. He can more or less guess the value of this thing.” She did not expect Lu Chen to be so reckless. How could such a thing be given away casually? This could change the game structure of the early stages of Dragon Country! She looked at Hei Yu with worry in her eyes. This guy was a top-notch assassin trained by the organization. Due to some internal conflicts, he fell out with the higher-ups. Now, Lu Chen had given him an extremely good opportunity. If he were to seize it, he might really get into big trouble! Meanwhile, Hei Yu’s breathing had quickened. This teleportation scroll had an extraordinary significance. With it, he would have the opportunity to do something big! This was the opportunity he had been waiting for for decades! Initially, he only befriended Lu Chen so that when the time came, he would seek Lu Chen’s help. However, now there was a brand new choice! The question standing would be if he was going to seize the opportunity that has befallen him. Lu Chen looked at the silent crowd with some displeasure. He then threw the scroll directly into Hei Yu’s hand. “You people are just dawdling. I’ll give you the scroll. “You and I are even. I don’t owe you any favors. “Goodbye.” After saying that, he walked straight into the depths of Wolf Valley. Only the petrified people were left behind. This...; Such a valuable thing was given away just like that? Also, this guy was still walking into the depths of the Wolf Valley? Could it be that he was going to challenge the silver-level Wolf King Boss? Was this guy crazy? Bronze bosses and silver bosses were completely different levels! Was this guy seeking for a death bed? Lu Chen ignored the gazes of others and resolutely stepped into the depths of the Wolf Valley. … In the Wolf Valley, all the people left exchanged a look of suspicion towards each other. Then, they began to quickly disperse. Hei Yu held the scroll in his hand, not knowing what to do. After a long time, almost all the people around him left. Only a few people came out from the depths of the forest. “Hei Yu, long time no see.” There was a thin and weak man, but his eyes were sharp and his eyes were even twinkling. Hei Yu raised his head and looked at the man. “Hey, why are you here?” Then, Liu Yuan and Liu Yu also walked out. “I didn’t expect this scroll to be in your hands.” Liu Yu looked at Hei Yu and shook her head. Hei Yu was silent. He used to be the top soldier king in the organization. However, because of a certain mission, his daughter died in the west. What he wanted to do was to take revenge. His personal grudges were suppressed under the consideration of the overall situation of the Dragon Country. From then on, he had left the organization. This scroll was very likely an opportunity for him to achieve his goal. It was a bargaining chip, a bargaining chip that could give him a chance to kill his enemy! Hei Yu’s voice was a little hoarse. He looked at his former teammates and said, “What are you guys doing here? You want me to give you this thing?” Liu Yu shook her head and said, “There’s no need for that. It’s a gift for you. You can use it however you want. The higher-ups didn’t say that this thing must be used by Morning Mist.” Liu Yuan was shocked and said, “Sister, this...;” Liu Yu raised her hand to interrupt her and said to Hei Yu, “But, old friend, think carefully about what you wish to do with it. “You can be the first to enter White Fog City. The higher-ups might even agree to give you this opportunity to attack. “But, can you really kill everything that stands in your path? “I hope you will think about it carefully and not do anything stupid.” After saying that, she turned around and left. Liu Yuan also left with Liu Yu. Only the old man, who was originally not in a proper shape, was left. He walked over and patted Hei Yu’s shoulder with a solemn expression. “Don’t worry, Liu Yu has a sharp tongue but a soft heart. She just doesn’t want anything bad to happen to you. “If the higher-ups really agree to give you a chance to make a move, I, Long Er, will be the first to go with you.” Hei Yu was silent for a moment, then nodded and said, “Thank you.” Long Er stood up and sighed. “Take care of yourself. It’s good to get closer to that kid, Morning Mist. The higher-ups are paying attention to this kid after all.” Long Er quickly left after he finished speaking. Hei Yu looked at the scroll in his hand and fell into deep thought. A moment later, countless players from the Dark Night Guild gathered in Wolf Valley. “Hei Yu, is it true that the teleportation scroll is really in your hands?” “Does that mean we have a chance?” “Yes, as long as the higher-ups agree, we will be the first to follow you!” “That’s right, kill those sons of b*tches!” “That b*tard’s luck was off the roof in the past. He won’t be so lucky this time!” Hei Yu was silent. Suddenly, he said sternly, “Enough!” Everyone fell silent. “I’ve decided. I won’t be the first to use this thing.” Everyone was stunned. “Why?” “Hei Yu, this is your only chance!” “Didn’t you dream of taking revenge every since it happened?” Hei Yu sighed and said, “I want to take revenge, but have any of you thought about it thoroughly? “Even if the higher-ups give me this chance, how confident are we if we go to the west? “If I take this chance, the higher-ups will get into trouble, and so will all of you. “When the time comes, if the higher-ups really force me to go back… Will I have a choice? “I’m from the Dragon Country. Should my country need me, I won’t sit idly by!” The players of the Dark Night Guild all lowered their heads and remained silent. Hei Yu held the scroll and slowly said, “Apart from that, I have another thing to consider, Morning Mist has already been noticed by the higher-ups. “I think no one else should be the first to arrive at White Fog City. “Give him this opportunity to be the first. I’ll go only after he arrives. “This is a favor. Although he won’t say it out loud, he will remember it in his heart. “I believe in my own judgment. He is a person who values friendship. “I also believe in this kid’s potential.” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The Internet was once again in an uproar! All the hot searches were all about Lu Chen! [Breaking news, White Alliance’s Guild Leader Declared War on Player Morning Mist, and would not rest until one of them was dead!] [The Overlord with over 100,000 Shield Points Was Killed With a Single Slash, and Guild Leader Xiao Chuan Flew Into a Rage Out of Humiliation] [Miss Xu Threw Herself Into the Arms of the Gu Family’s Young Master to Support Morning Mist] [Player Morning Mist Said That He Would Not Let Any White Alliance Player Off the Hook] [The Epic Level Scroll Has Finally Appeared. The Dark Night Guild May Become the Biggest Winner!] The comments section from all the major videos blew up. The entire Dragon Country players were all attracted by this wold valley incident. “F*ck, even the Gu family from the north and the White Alliance from the south were there. Not only that, the Xu family and Chen family that are low-key major forces were there too. Is this Morning Mist person really that awesome?” “Hehe, brother, I’m afraid you don’t know the value of the Sword God and Bow God!” “This video is too awesomely ridiculous. I feel like it’s a f*cking joke. With a single slash, he killed the guild leader Xiao Chuan. He completely ignored the shield!” “Tsk tsk, this is definitely an assassin’s trick. I’m sure that Morning Mist has a hidden title.” “That’s right. Otherwise, why would Hei Yu give that dagger to Morning Mist?” At the same time, the various major powers on the market all revealed their high prices in order to snatch the teleportation scroll from Hei Yu. “Our Chen family is willing to pay 300 million for this epic-grade scroll!” “Hei Yu, our guild knows about your past. As long as you give us the scroll, I can send you to the Western Region easily!” “Hei Yu, you know the strength of our Gu family. As long as you can give us the scroll, you ask for any conditions. Our Gu family won’t even bargain with you!” Right when countless people were fighting over this scroll, Hei Yu finally spoke up. “I, Hei Yu, hereby declare that I will not use this scroll casually. “Nor will I sell it. This is a gift from Mr. Morning Mist. “I hope everyone understands.” After making this statement, Hei Yu disappeared. This made everyone confused. What did Hei Yu mean? Instead of taking this huge benefit, he was being pretentious? He would not wait until Morning Mist was the first to arrive at White Fog City before using it, right? This action of his was too despicable! When the outside world was exploding, Lu Chen had already walked into the depths of Wolf Valley. Wolf Valley was very large. From the outside, it looked like an open valley. After passing through the open valley in the middle, the path became narrow and long. On both sides stood tall mountains and dense forests. Wild Monsters had also been leveled up from a level 8 to level 10. Lu Chen had been walking for a long time. He had a faint feeling that Wolf Valley might not be an ordinary place. The structure of Second World was completely different from other games. For an online game, this place was filled with unreasonable existences. Apart from the guide for the first mission in Novice Village, there were no other guides for future missions. Everything depended on the players to figure it out themselves! Meanwhile, outside of White Fog City, everyone was complaining. There were wild monsters everywhere that were extremely difficult to kill! The difficulty of the new location felt like a living Hell! During this period of time, there were no class upgrades and no business transactions! There were even no equipment purchases allowed either! This place was all based on the players killing monsters and leveling up by themselves, exploring step by step. There were no quests, and especially no guidance whatsoever! The road leading to White Fog City was divided into six paths, and each path had a silver-grade boss! To ordinary players, this was simply an insurmountable mountain to overcome! No game would allow players to be trapped outside of the Novice Village forever! If it were not for the fact that the whole world was pushing it, and that the currency was bound, such a game would have long persuaded the players to leave. Lu Chen’s eyes were solemn. The monster in front of him had already been raised to level 15! The very sturdy Giant Wolf’s eyes were filled with a cold demeanor. White mist was spewing out of its nose, and the soles of its feet were enough to cover a person’s face. Its body was the same size as an ordinary car! [Sturdy Wolf King Guard] [Level: 15] [HP: 2,000] [Attack: 700] [Defense: 30] [Characteristics: Extremely fast, has a high attack and high critical hit rate] [Skills: Squall, Swift Claw] [Squal: Spits out a strong storm, dealing 50% maximum HP damage to the enemy in front of you. Those caught will be restrained for 2 seconds!] [Swift Claw: Enhances the agility of one’s body, grants 100% critical hit probability, lasts for 10 seconds!] Lu Chen had a total of 2,000 HP two skills, and an attack power of up to 700 points combined! This was almost comparable to a bronze-tier boss! Elite monsters were everywhere in the depths of the valley, this was not something that an ordinary person could defeat! Lu Chen then activated his Sword God status. His attack power instantly received a 500% bonus! The attack power on the system interface was now 1390 points! After receiving the bonus from God Sword’s State, it directly became 6950 points! Lu Chen then took a step forward and instantly killed the wild monster in front of him with a single slash! A bright red number floated above the head! In the valley, the sound of corpses falling to the ground alarmed the wolf pack and many pairs of green eyes looked towards the sound! Due to the synchronization of time in the Second World and the real world, the Wolf Valley had already fallen into darkness. In the dark night, the wolf pack started to surround Lu Chen. It was densely packed, and there were more than a thousand of them. Such a sight could make anyone cower in fear! Lu Chen pondered for a moment and directly switched to the form of the Blade God. Although the Sword God had strong combat strength, he could not win in such a large-scale battle! “Awooo!” With a wolf howl, the wolf pack charged at Lu Chen! He held the dagger in his hand and waved it. Therefore, within a radius of 100 meters, the cries of wolves could be heard! The dagger in Lu Chen’s hand, due to the enhancement of the Blade God, burst out with a sharp aura, covering the surrounding 100 meters. Even so, there were still wolves that broke into the defensive circle. They managed to dodge the attack and caused a lot of damage to Lu Chen. Lu Chen even saw the existence of a level 20 Giant Wolf! If not for the terrifying recovery effect of the Blade God, he would have died several times over! Finally, after half an hour, Lu Chen stopped. Although his HP was still more than 50%, his mind was indescribably tired. At this moment, there were no more wolves around him, however! Lu Chen heaved a sigh of relief. His level had also risen to level 10! He did not even have the time to pick up the various gold coins and equipment on the ground when on the hill in front of him, a huge black shadow appeared! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation On the hill, the bright moonlight illuminated the area. With the help of the moonlight, Lu Chen gradually saw the appearance of a swift-moving black shadow! It was the Wolf King clad in snow-white fur. Under the breeze of the strong wind, its eyes were filled with compassion. The sound of falling leaves around it was like a hymn, filling its appearance with a holy feeling. Lu Chen seemed to feel human-like emotions in its eyes. Was it odd to learn that a wild monster could be filled with complex emotions? “Awooo!” As the Wolf King howled, the valley echoed itself back. The silver moonlight gathered on the Wolf King’s body as specks of dust flittered around its body. The information about the Wolf King appeared in Lu Chen’s mind. [Ancient Wolf King] [Level: 20 (silver)] [HP: 100,000] [Attack: 8,000] [Defense: 100] [Magic Defense: 100] [Skill: Howling Moon] [Howling Moon: An exclusive skill of the ancient wolves. There will be different effects depending on the awakening of the bloodline. ] [The Wolf King howls at the moon. It now deals 1,000 magic damage per second to enemies under the moonlight. Lasts for 20 seconds!] [The Wolf King howls at the moon. It has strengthened its body, giving it a chance to awaken the bloodline in its body and complete its transformation! Cooldown time is 3 months] Lu Chen was shocked. This was the first time he had seen such a skill that lasted for this long. Ever since the appearance of the exclusive equipment, this so-called exclusive skill had also appeared. As for the Ancient Wolf King, there was no information about it on the official website of the Second World at all! Moreover, how could such an early boss have 100,000 HP? Plus, its attack power was as high as 8,000 points! Was this really a level 20 boss? How could a bunch of players who have never gone through a class change defeat such a monster? Apart from that, even the Howling Moon skill was just as ridiculous as the whole situation. This skill deals 1,000 magic damage per second to the enemies under the moonlight and even lasts for a full 20 seconds! How in the world was Lu Chen going to defeat such a beast? The most absurd thing was that the opponent had an unknown strengthening effect! Right when Lu Chen was thinking about ways to defeat the boss, the Ancient Wolf King pounced towards him! Its speed was so quick that it moved like a flash of lightning! Fortunately, Lu Chen immediately switched to his Dark Shura form and disappeared into the void! The Ancient Wolf King pounced into the air, letting out a furious roar in the valley as it barely missed its opponent. In the shadows, one could see Lu Chen gripping tightly on a blade, ready to attack. His attack power rose, directly breaking through to 2,000 points! “One Hit Kill!” Lu Chen’s body appeared behind the Ancient Wolf King like a ghost, and his dagger directly pierced into its fur! “-6,000!” A bright red number floated up! The Wolf King felt the pain and let out a loud roar. Its sharp claws brushed past the tip of Lu Chen’s nose in retaliation. One Hit Kill did not manage to kill the beast, so Lu Chen once again entered the darkness! His heart sank slightly. This Wolf King’s health bar was too high. Having 100,000 HP, and 6,000 damage in one attack, it was simply impossible to kill him! According to this rate of progress, he would have to make at least 16 moves! For each time he exposes himself from the shadows, he would be vulnerable to the Wolf King’s attack! That strike just now could have almost taken his life right there and then! The stakes were high, but he had no other choice but to carry out with this plan! Lu Chen could only brace himself and hide patiently in the dark. Finally, a moment later, he found another opportunity to strike. The Wolf King’s HP was reduced by 6000 points again. However, only 10% of the total HP was reduced. This made Lu Chen very nervous. If he had not switched to his Shield God form at the critical moment, he would have been instantly killed. Even so, he still received 800 damage points. His HP was only left with less than 500 points now! During this period of time, he would not be able to withstand a single strike from the Ancient Wolf King! Lu Chen hid in the darkness, waiting for his HP to recover while he waited for an opportunity to strike yet again. Finally, half an hour later. Lu Chen attacked with all his might, and the dagger slashed across the Wolf King’s neck! It took away another 6,000 HP! In the valley, the giant Ancient Wolf King turned extremely furious! It was an extremely powerful beast, that was why the humans that invaded the Wolf Valley refused to fight it head-on! Fortunately, the sneak attacks Lu Chen did were going well! As long there was an opportunity, he would appear like a poisonous snake! He would give his opponent a vicious blow! He had no choice but to focus 200% of his attention on his surroundings at all times. Thus, the man and the wolf were stuck in a stalemate. Ten hours had passed! Lu Chen’s mind was on the verge of collapsing. During these ten hours, he had only found seven opportunities to attack! After his HP was fully recovered, he had taken another blow from the Wolf King! Thankfully, he relied on the Shield God to absorb some of the damage, causing him to only have a decrease in HP. On the other hand, the other party still had 40,000 HP left! As for the Ancient Wolf King, its originally agile eyes were no longer as agile as before! Its consciousness started to become somewhat scattered. Both parties were now spent! At this moment, dawn was on its way. The darkness around them was beginning to fade away. Swoosh! Another slash. In the darkness, a wolf could be heard letting out a pained cry towards the valley! Anger and humiliation surged into the Wolf King’s heart. This was the Wolf Valley that they have guarded for generations. The Wolf King would absolutely not let outsiders in! Thus, the Wolf King raised its head to let out a howl that pierced through the cloud! Immediately, the dark clouds dissipated, and a huge, pure white moon appeared in the night sky. Everything in the valley could now be seen much more clearly. The strong wind blew across the grass, and the fur of the Ancient Wolf King swayed with the wind! The Ancient Wolf King howled at the Moon! Lu Chen’s scalp went numb! He wanted to hide, but the moonlight covered the entire world. There was no way he could hide from this. Beams of moonlight shed the ground, as though they were limelight. However, each beam was like a sword, and it directly pierced through Lu Chen’s body. “-1,000!” The moment he saw the bright red number, he knew that he was done for. Lu Chen’s mouth was filled with bitterness. This silver-level boss was too much of a challenge to be picked on now. After enduring for more than ten hours, it was all in vain. Right as he was about to give up, the system notification sounded again. [Your death proficiency has increased to the highest level. You have obtained the title — Undead.] [Undead: Your understanding of death has reached an unfathomable level. When you die in battle, there is a 50% chance of resurrection. You can be resurrected up to three times in a row. Your skills will increase as the player’s level increases!] A white light enveloped Lu Chen. Due to his low HP, he was resurrected at full condition! In his ecstasy, Lu Chen did not have time to do anything unnecessary and immediately activated his Shield God form! With that, he used it to block the damage from the moonlight! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The beams of moonlight landed on the light shield, causing ripples. After being reduced by 90% of the damage, it could only deal 85 damage to Lu Chen per second — due to the existence of Indestructible. However, the duration of the Howling Moon skill was as long as 20 seconds. Even if the Moonlight’s damage was reduced to 85 points, Lu Chen’s HP would still not last until the end of the opponent’s casting! Moreover, the probability of resurrecting was only at 50%. Lu Chen did not dare to take on the gamble of death! Therefore, he had to think of another way. Lu Chen directly raised his shield and approached the Wolf King with great difficulty. Meanwhile, on the hill, the Wolf King was bathed in pure moonlight. It even looked particularly sacred! A mysterious and ancient feeling rose up! Countless specks of starlight danced around the Wolf King and it looked to be ancient. The howls of the Wolf King were also becoming more and more ancient-sounding! With one howl, the entire Wolf Valley emitted a distant and mysterious aura! Lu Chen felt that the Ancient Wolf King seemed to be undergoing some sort of change. Under the cover of the moonlight, its huge body slowly rose into the air. He suddenly remembered the description of the Ancient Wolf King’s skill! Under the state of the Ancient Wolf King’s Howling Moon skill, the Ancient Wolf King would undergo some sort of strange change! For Lu Chen, a change at this time was not necessarily a good thing! It was not easy for him to beat the Ancient Wolf King’s HP down to 40,000. He did not want his efforts to go to waste! Lu Chen raised his shield and approached the Ancient Wolf King. He even saw the numerous wounds on the Ancient Wolf King’s body. The moonlight seemed to gather on the hill, like a silver light pillar. The Wolf King that was floating in the air started to lose its fur! Everything started to turn into a snowstorm! Its original beast-like form turned into a human shape in the dense mist! Lu Chen was shocked. Was this the power f a silver-level boss, to be able to turn into a human? Lu Chen raised his shield and arrived under the bright pillar of moonlight. Gritting his teeth, he raised his shield and rushed towards the human shape. “Shield Backlash!” Bang! The attack landed on the silhouette, but it did not cause any damage! Was it immune to attacks? Lu Chen’s scalp tingled. At this moment, his opponent’s magic effect had finally passed. Lu Chen finally let out a sigh of relief. He then switched to the Sword God State! His attack power increased fivefold as he slashed towards the evolving Wolf King! However, the attack was to no avail! The Wolf King did not receive any damage! This time, Lu Chen really felt a headache oncoming. Even the Sword God’s State could not deal any damage? This was unbelievable! He got angry and switched forms again! Every switch he did, he just cascaded attack after attack down onto the Ancient Wolf King! Ten minutes later...; Lu Chen stood at the side as he panted tirelessly. This time, he really had no other choice! He had tried every form from the Sword God to the Blade God! However, there was no other way! The pillar of light in front of him was still tightly wrapped around the Ancient Wolf King! It was like a turtle shell, no matter how hard he tried, he could not open it! This was the first time Lu Chen had seen such a bizarre transformation of a wild monster. Would a silver-level boss evolve into a gold-level boss? Lu Chen was afraid of this happening. If a silver-level boss was so difficult to deal with, it would mean he would have no chance of defeating a gold-level boss! Should he leave? However, deep down in his heart, he wanted to prevail! He had clearly reached the final step, yet his final challenge seemed impossible. Lu Chen looked at the light and paced slowly on the hill. At this moment, his mental state had been weakened! He had fought for more than ten hours in the tensest state. Before this, he had even fought a few battles in the valley. He had almost squeezed his mental state to the utmost limit! He could faint at any time! However, Lu Chen forced himself to maintain a vague consciousness. He was weak, but the Wolf King was also weakened! It would be a pity if he gave up just like that. There must be a way to break this light screen! He looked at the moonlight falling from the sky and fell into deep thought. The outline of the beast inside had completely disappeared and was replaced by a human figure. The strong silver-white light seemed to be holding something. Lu Chen turned his gaze to his interface. After searching for a moment, he finally found a title that he had never used before in the title interface! [Taming God] In the thousand years he spent in the Hares Cave, Lu Chen had done almost everything that he could do! Including capturing and taming rabbits! He had even turned the newly spawned wild rabbit into his battle helper! This was not the first time he had done such a thing! “Switch!” Lu Chen was looking forward to the effects of the Taming God! [Taming God: Your understanding of taming and calling has reached an unfathomable level. When you try to capture and tame a target, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with the level of the target!] [Top-tier Capture: You can capture a target regardless of the level. Forcefully changing the target will take up a pet limit. Current slot — 0/3] [Top-tier Domestication: When you communicate with your pet and feed it, there is a high probability of increasing intimacy and favorability.] [Dominator: Your pet will not be able to resist your orders.] Lu Chen looked at the Wolf King with determination in his eyes. Regarding the 100,000 HP, it was still a wild monster! “Capture!” Lu Chen immediately activated the special effect of the Taming God. He raised his hand and a huge capture net shot out from his palm. The net directly enveloped the human figure under the light pillar! A message immediately appeared in his mind. [Ancient Wolf King] [Level: 20 (evolving)] [Attack: ???] [HP: ???] [Defense: ???] [Magic Defense: ???] [Skills: ???] [Status: Captured] [Player: Morning Mist] Lu Chen was delighted. It was a success! At this moment, the moonlight dissipated and everything around him dimmed. The pitch-black darkness made Lu Chen feel a little dizzy. He had really reached his limit. Above him, the silhouette of the human figure smashed down and landed on Lu Chen! Exhaustion struck. The system issued a warning. [The game has detected that the player is in a state of extreme fatigue. You will now be forced offline in three seconds.] Three! Two! One! The scene in front of him quickly disappeared, and Lu Chen was forced to log off. Meanwhile, in Lu Chen’s rented room. The brightly lit game pod was shining with a ray of light. A human figure could be seen sleeping on Lu Chen’s chest. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The first ray of sunlight shined upon Lu Chen, causing him to open his eyes. His mind was still in a daze. He felt as though there was a huge rock pressing down on his chest. “Why do I feel so heavy?” Lu Chen opened his eyes with difficulty. Then, to his sight, he was stunned. There was a silver-haired girl lying on his chest. Her skin was snow-white, and her long hair covered her body. What the f*ck was going on? He looked at himself. His clothes were neat, and nothing seemed to have happened. According to his memory, he did not recall that this girl had anything to do with him! Moreover, he had been in the game during this period of time. He had fought with the Ancient White Wolf in Wolf Valley. In the end, he was too exhausted and was forced to go offline. Where did this girl come from? Lu Chen pushed the young girl away. “Hey, wake up.” The young girl’s beautiful eyebrows moved, and she woke up with difficulty. The beautiful face that was so close to him made Lu Chen somewhat absent-minded. She had a pair of sapphire blue eyes, similar to the sea. There was a pure aura her, and a trace of doubt. A moment later, a crisp voice sounded in the room. “Master?” Holy sh*t! Lu Chen’s scalp tingled. What the h*ll was going on? “Wait, wait, wait! Don’t scream!” Lu Chen hurriedly got up and casually pulled a shirt from the side and put it on her. “Who the h*ll are you? How did you get in?” The young girl was covered by the white shirt, yet it still revealed her long and slender legs. Looking at Lu Chen, she looked a little silly and cute. She shook her head and said, “I don’t know. I don’t remember.” Lu Chen rubbed the sides of his head. He felt that this would cause quite a problem. Should he report this case? What would he say if someone questioned him though? When that time came, what would he say! “Then, what’s your name?” Lu Chen tried to ask. The girl continued to shake her head. “I don’t know.” “Then why did you call me Master?” Lu Chen asked. The young girl thought for a moment, then looked at Lu Chen and said, “I just remembered that I fell from the sky, and master caught me.” Lu Chen’s heart trembled. Fell from the sky? Caught her? He seemed to vaguely remember something. Looking at the girl, his eyes gradually filled with disbelief. This can not be? In Wolf Valley, he almost killed himself. In the end, it was this fellow who had smashed his head into unconsciousness? Was this the freaking wolf boss of Wolf Valley? What kind of joke was this? Besides, how did this thing come to this world? Second World was getting more ridiculous the more he played! Lu Chen’s scalp went numb. He had to confirm his assumptions. He directly entered the game pod, picked up the girl, and put on the helmet. He then started the game. After a burst of light, Lu Chen joined Second World again. At this moment, he was holding a girl in his arms. Her silver-white long hair even fell to her waist. Her eyes were filled with doubt as she blinked at Lu Chen. “Master?” Lu Chen sucked in a breath of cold air and immediately opened the interface. He immediately saw the pet column! [Ancient Ash Wolf] [Owner: Morning Mist ] [Name: Unnamed] [Intimacy: 70] [Level: 20 (human form)] [Attack: 1,000] [HP: 40,000] [Defense: 100] [Magic Defense: 100] [Skills: Frost Domain, True Form Transformation] [Frost domain: The Ancient Ash Wolf is proficient in magic. It can deal 1,000 magic damage to enemies within a 1,000-meter radius. It can also stun the opponents for 3 seconds, dealing 500 damage every second.] [True Form Transformation: The Ancient Ash Wolf’s bloodline is awakening. This skill will revive the ancient Ash Wolf’s true form, obtaining a huge attribute bonus.] Lu Chen staggered. This girl really was the wolf that he tamed! How did he successfully capture it? Moreover, from the looks of it, she seems to have lost her memory? It seems as though she could not recall anything/ ‘She only knows that I’m her Master?’ Lu Chen thought. The luxurious attributes of the interface shocked Lu Chen to the core. Such a pet could greatly increase his combat power! He looked at the girl in his arms and patted her head. “It’s okay. Do you have any recollection of this place?” The girl looked in the direction of his finger. There was a trace of fluctuation in her blue eyes. “It’s so familiar, but...; I can’t remember.” The girl seemed to hesitate when asked. Lu Chen nodded. It seemed that she had lost quite a lot of memories after being interrupted by him during the evolution process. However, this was also good. If she really remembered it, he would need to spend a lot of time explaining everything. That would be quite troublesome. “If you can’t remember it, don’t think about it anymore. If you’ve forgotten your name, I’ll give you one.” Lu Chen said to the young girl. The young girl immediately revealed a look of anticipation. “Okay, how about I call you Lan Weiwei?” [Ding! You have named your pet Lan Weiwei!] [due to the Taming God’s effect, your pet’s intimacy with you has increased by 10 points.] Lu Chen saw that the number on the interface had increased. At the bottom, there was a line of small words. [Every time the pet’s intimacy with the host increases, there will be a special bonus received.] Currently, the intimacy was at 80 points! [Obtained title — Life and Death Together.] [Life and Death Together: The host and the pet will share HP. When the pet’s HP gets reduced to zero, the host will die along with it.] Lu Chen was delighted. If this skill was used on other pets, it might not be of much use. However, if it was used on Lan Weiwei, it would be different. After all, she had40,000 HP! Sharing HP meant that Lu Chen could be immune to a lot of dangers! If he had that much HP previously, the battle in Wolf Valley would not have been so difficult. “Lan Weiwei?” The girl in front of Lu Chen repeated the name a few times. She seemed to be very satisfied and revealed a sweet smile. In the game, the girl was wearing white leather armor, similar to the white fur on her body. She was about 1.65 meters tall. Her figure was quite stunning too. Lu Chen looked at Lan Weiwei and pondered for a moment. Then, he chose to go offline again. After a flash of light. He opened his eyes in the game pod again. On his chest, Lan Weiwei was wearing his shirt with a sweet smile. Although Lu Chen did not know why he could bring his pet from the game into the real world, he was still prepared to fulfill his obligation as the owner. Moreover, his pet looked like a real human being, so he could not bring himself to treat her like an animal! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation When she came out of the game pod, Lan Weiwei looked at him eagerly. She pulled at the corner of her clothes with her fingers and said, “Master, I’m hungry!” Lu Chen looked at the girl and had a strange feeling. It seemed quite ridiculous to bring a girl out of the game. So he said to Lan Weiwei, “Wait here, I’ll get you something to eat.” After a while, the dining table was filled with all kinds of empty lunch boxes. There were even empty snack packets. “Woah…” Lan Weiwei inhaled the last mouthful of instant noodles into her mouth. Touching her stomach, she looked at Lu Chen again and said, “Master, I’m Hungry!” Lu Chen looked at the mess, and his head was filled with worry. Was this kid a monster? She just ate his one month’s worth of food. Was this little girl’s stomach a bottomless pit? Lu Chen looked at Lan Weiwei’s eager expression, and could not bear to stop her. After all, he now had a huge amount of money, so spending money on more food would be nothing. Thus, he planned to take Lan Weiwei out to eat. He wanted to make sure she was filled to the brim. Were he to order in, who knows how many orders would he need to prepare before she was filled. Plus, he had to buy Lan Weiwei clothes as there were no girl clothes in his room. He could not let her wear her own shirt and run around the room barefooted, could he? Lu Chen stood up and said, “Wait here. I’ll take you out to eat.” Lan Weiwei’s eyes lit up. Ever since she came to the real world, she had been very, very hungry. No matter how hard she tried, she could not get enough to eat. Now, whenever her master mentioned food, she felt like it was the most meaningful thing in the world! Moreover, in her memory, she had never eaten such good food before. She felt that her master was being really good to her! “But, you have to remember. Don’t run around outside, understand?” “Yes!” Lan Weiwei nodded vigorously. “Also, don’t call me master outside.” Lan Weiwei tilted her head and said, “Then what should I call you?” Lu Chen said, “Just call me brother.” Lan Weiwei blinked and said, “Master...; brother?” Lu Chen laughed angrily and said, “It’s brother, don’t call me master brother either! If you can’t do it, I won’t let you eat!” As soon as he said this, Lan Weiwei immediately panicked. “Brother, brother!” Lu chen nodded and said, “It’s good that you know. Remember what I said okay. Wait for me for a bit.” He patted the little girl’s head and walked out of the door. Right now, Lan Weiwei did not have a single piece of clothing that she could wear. He could not bring her out shopping like this, right? So, he needed to find someone to borrow a set of clothes. Thus, Lu Chen knocked on Liu Yuan’s door. Knock, knock, knock. “Who is it?” “It’s me, Lu Chen. We met yesterday. I live opposite you.” “Wait a minute!” Suddenly, there was a series of rummaging sounds from inside, as if there was some panic. “Okay.” “Wait a moment, I’ll be right there.” A few minutes later, Liu Yuan opened the door. Lu Chen could tell that this woman had simply tidied herself up. The lip glaze on her lips was the best proof. Also, her eyebrows were hurriedly drawn, and she looked rough. It was obvious that she did not know how to put on makeup. “You...; Hey… what’s up?” Liu Yuan was puzzled. This kid had just caused such a big trouble in Wolf Valley, and he had even given the teleportation scroll out. So why did he come to find her today? Could it be that he had discovered his neighbor’s secret existence? The sooner he found out about her background, the sooner she could complete the mission. Lu Chen scratched his head and said, “That...; can you lend me a set of clothes?” Liu Yuan was shocked and her eyes widened. She looked up and down at Lu Chen and said in fear, “You...; What do you mean by that?” She knew that Lu Chen was not some innocent young man. Could this guy have a certain desire for her? Lu Chen saw Liu Yuan’s reaction and said with a bitter smile, “It looks like you misunderstood my intentions. “I have a cousin from afar who came to my place. She was in a hurry and did not bring a change of clothes.” “That child was careless and washed all her clothes. She can’t change into them now. “So, can you lend her a set of clothes? “Don’t worry, I’ll return it right away. I’m going to take her out to buy more clothing now.” Liu Yuan looked at the room opposite her suspiciously. “I guess I can...;” She was a little embarrassed. After all, she was about to give her clothes to an unfamiliar boy. She was more or less shy, and she was more or less suspicious! After all, the information she gathered showed that Lu Chen was an orphan! He had no parents and no relatives! Where did his cousin come from? This so-called cousin was very likely a woman that this guy had brought back! “Why don’t you call your cousin over? That way, I can give her a suitable pair of clothing that would fit her.” Liu Yuan probed. Lu Chen thought for a moment and nodded. “That’s fine too. Wait a moment, I’ll go call her.” Lu Chen turned around and returned to his room. Not long after, he walked out with a young girl. Although she was wearing jeans and a white shirt that did not match her, her peerlessly beautiful appearance and her slightly cold temperament had truly stunned Liu Yuan. It was especially more so with her silver hair and blue gemstone-like pupils. She was simply not an ordinary woman. She looked just like an elf from a fairy tale. “Lu Chen’s cousin, right? You’re really pretty. What’s your name?” The young girl looked at Lu Chen and realized that Lu Chen did not say much before she spoke to Liu Yuan. “Lan Weiwei.” Liu Yuan said with a smile, “Weiwei, what a good name. Come in.” As she said that, she brought Lan Weiwei in and closed the door behind her. Looking at this young but beautiful girl, Liu Yuan could not help but get angry. This Lu Chen was simply a beast. According to what she knew, he could be considered a sc*m! How dare he bring back such a young girl! She looked so innocent and cute. When he asked her name just now, she had to take a look at Lu Chen. It was obvious that she was afraid of that guy. Liu Yuan patted Lan Weiwei’s shoulder and said softly, “Weiwei, don’t be afraid. You can tell me anything, just like an older sister.” “Is that guy outside your boyfriend?” Lan Weiwei was stunned. “What’s a boyfriend?” Liu Yuan was stunned and her face darkened. Lu Chen, this sc*m, he even lied to such a young girl! She did not even know the concept of a boyfriend! He even dared to ask a girl to borrow clothes from her early in the morning. This went without saying what other things he might have done! Her heart ached as she soothed Lan Weiwei’s head and said, “Don’t worry, I’ll be your older sister from now on, I definitely won’t let others bully you.” Although Lan Weiwei did not understand what Liu Yuan was saying, she still nodded her head with a vague understanding. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation A moment later, Liu Yuan walked out with Lan Weiwei. A set of white one-piece dress fully displayed the young girl’s youthful aura. Even Lu Chen could not help but exclaim in admiration. Lan Weiwei’s human form was indeed pleasing t the eye. It was no wonder that in so many stories, beautiful women were transformed by demons. However, for some reason, the way Liu Yuan looked at him was strange. There was also a hint of hostility. “Well, do you want to go shopping with us?” Seeing that Liu Yuan had no intention of leaving, Lu Chen asked directly. Liu Yuan glared at Lu Chen and said, “Of course, you might not know what to shop for after all. As a man, do you know how to choose clothes for a girl? You need me there.” Lu Chen thought about it and agreed. He might as well bring Liu Yuan along since she knew what she was doing. Thus, the three of them set off together. After walking down from their residence, they arrived at the main street in a flash. On the busy street, there were three people, and all three of them looked stunning. Everyone’s eyes were attracted to them. Lu Chen’s height of 1.8 meters could be said to be very eye-catching. Moreover, the two beauties beside him were beautiful in their own aspects. The taller one had a hot figure and exuded a heroic and valiant beauty. The shorter one looked pure and cute, especially with her silver-white long hair and gem-like eyes, which were full of mystery. All kinds of photos taken from afar made Lu Chen speechless. He hurriedly hailed a taxi and rushed into the shopping mall. However, he did not expect that the crowded shopping mall would cause a stir as well. There were all kinds of people who came up to ask for a group photo and their contact details. During this period, there were also some random talent scouts and managers from different agencies. Even from a glance, one could tell that they did not look like good people. In the end, Liu Yuan flew into a rage, which shocked the group of people. After that, the three of them went to buy masks and sunglasses at the convenience store and continue shopping. As everyone knew, it was the most troublesome for women when it came to shopping. Especially more so for Lan Weiwei. She had just arrived in this world and everything she saw was new. She was simply a curious baby who wanted to ask about everything. It took a full three hours before they were satisfied. The two beauties, one tall and one short, happily looked at the items they bought. “Hello sir, it would be a total of 168,000 dollars.” The cashier looked at Lu Chen with lovey-dovey eyes. He looked like such a good-looking older brother, and he was especially rich. If it were not for the two beauties by his side, she would have already gone up to ask for his number. Lu Chen swiped his card without batting an eyelid. Liu Yuan said from the side, “I didn’t expect you to be so rich.” Lu Chen scratched his head and said, “I’ve earned some money recently.” Liu Yuan covered her mouth and laughed, “Then why don’t you treat us to a meal?” During the three-hour exchange, Liu Yuan has shared a bit about herself, whether intentionally or not. Therefore, Lu Chen already knew that the two of them had once studied at the same university. During this period of time, Liu Yuan also had a rough estimation of Lu Chen’s character. His character was a little strong, but he still respected people. When it was time to keep a low profile, he would be low-key in everything that he did. Unlike many people who acted like a typical A-class d*uche when they had money. It was extremely rare for such people to exist. At this moment, Lan Weiwei tugged at Lu Chen’s sleeve and said, “Brother, I’m hungry!” She had endured it for a long time. The main purpose of going out was to eat! In the end, the outside world was too interesting. If Liu Yuan had not mentioned it, she too would have forgotten about the main reason for her going out. Lu Chen looked at them and said, “Alright, I’ll bring you guys to eat something delicious.” Soon, Lu Chen brought the two of them out of the shopping mall. There were many expensive restaurants outside the shopping mall. However, Lu Chen did not plan to bring Lan Weiwei to such a place. It was not because of the price, but because such high-end restaurants usually tasted average. Not only was the price ridiculous, but the quantity was also not much. For a good-for-nothing eater like Lan Weiwei, the speed at which the dishes in those restaurants were served was definitely not as fast as the speed at which she ate. On the other hand, the environment of these restaurants was rather elegant. For a good-for-nothing eater like Lan Weiwei, it would be indeed a little embarrassing for her to gobble up the food. Therefore, Lu Chen chose a more fast-food type of restaurant. He even asked for a private sitting when they arrived. “Sir, are you sure you want to order this much food?” The waiter looked at the options on the tablet and almost thought that the system had made a mistake. How was this the weight of three people? This amount should be enough for thirty people! Liu Yuan did not know whether to laugh or cry as she said, “Bro, I asked you to treat me to a meal. I didn’t ask you to treat me like a starving stranded islander. You ordered too many dishes. We won’t be able to finish them until tomorrow.” Lu Chen coughed dryly and said, “It doesn’t matter. Eat first. If there’s not enough, order more.” He waved his hand to dismiss the waiter. Liu Yuan did not know why, but her opinion of Lu Chen had changed. It was true that he did not want to show off his wealth when buying things, but she did not expect it to be reflected here as well. However, when the dishes came, she realized why he had ordered so much. When the waiter served the first dish, Lan Weiwei, that little girl, directly dug into the meal. The entire serving was several times bigger than her face. However, the little girl wolfed down the food without waiting for anyone else to get a bite. Liu Yuan’s face was full of confusion as she looked at Lu Chen. Lu Chen also had a helpless and bitter smile as he shouted towards the outside, “Waiter, can I have another serving of this dish please!” … Two hours later, the restaurant manager was drenched in cold sweat and finally sent the three people away. Looking at the backs of the three people leaving, he still had some lingering fear. It was the first time in his life that he had seen such a small group of people who could eat so much. In the end, only a cucumber was left in the entire restaurant as stock! Just like that, everything that was cooked went into the little girl’s belly. On the way, Liu Yuan looked at Lan Weiwei who was still chewing on the cucumber and said softly to Lu Chen, “Your cousin won’t be too full after eating so much, right?” Lu Chen said a little awkwardly, “Don’t worry, I know she ate quite a bit just now. Nothing will happen, don’t worry.” Liu Yuan nodded and said, “That’s good.” A few minutes later, Liu Yuan returned to her room. She turned on the communication system. “Report, this is 0927!” A voice soon came from the other side. “This is the Dragon Group building. Please go ahead.” “I have an update.” “A girl has appeared beside the target. She claims to be his cousin, but according to our information, the target is an orphan. So, I need to see this Lan Weiwei’s information as soon as possible.” “Okay, please wait a moment.” An hour later. A message came from the other side. “I’m sorry, 0927, we’ve used all our connections and resources in the Dragon Country building, but we still can’t find the background of this little girl. The fingerprints you provided were not matched to anyone in our database.” How could it be? Liu Yuan turned pale with fright. The whole of Dragon Country’s database was supposed to be completed with everyone and anyone! Moreover, they had the authority to gain any information here! She even gave them the young girl’s fingerprints and a photo of her. However, there was no one in the world that matched her information! Unless… this person had suddenly appeared out of thin air! That would be impossible… or was it? <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation In the apartment, Lu Chen brought Lan Weiwei into the game. After a day of torment, the sky had finally gone down. The landing point he logged into was still Wolf Valley. At this time, many giant wolves had spawned in the valley. Perhaps because Lan Weiwei was there, no wolf dared to approach. Lu Chen looked at the hill in front of him. This bulge of rock blocked off the rest of the scenery. Yesterday, Lan Weiwei had appeared from there. Lu Chen suddenly had the urge to go over and take a look. He wanted to know what was in the depths of the Wolf Valley. Would this direction lead him to White Fog City directly, or was there another test? Lu Chen led Lan Weiwei forward and soon reached the hill. Looking forward from the hill, there was actually a huge lake! It was as wide as the sea! Surrounded by mountains, it looked like a mirror being embedded into the ground, reflecting the night sky! The wind blew, and the waves rocked. It was a very beautiful sight to behold. Lan Weiwei looked at the lake and felt a special sense of familiarity. It was as if she had been here before. “Master, I want to go to the lake.” She pulled on Lu Chen’s sleeve. Then, Lu Chen nodded and brought Lan Weiwei to the lake. When Lu Chen reached out a hand and touched it, he felt the coldness of the lake. “Awoo!” Suddenly, many wolves howled in all directions. Four huge white wolves appeared around the valley! These wolves had extremely fierce expressions as they pounced directly at Lu Chen! However, at this moment, Lan Weiwei stood forward and snorted coldly. The huge wolves that were originally as tall as a truck suddenly became dispirited. They even trembled at her sight! This was the suppression from the bloodline that Weiwei had! These subordinates had just offended the ancient Wolf King! Lu Chen looked at the four giant wolves, To his surprise, his system notification popped up. [Mutated White Wolf King (silver)] [Level: 20] [HP: 10,000] [Attack: 2,000] [Defense: 40] [Magic Defense: 40] [Skill: Frostflame] This Wolf Valley had spawned another silver-rank boss? Lu Chen was a little surprised. However, he quickly reacted. The original boss of Wolf Valley had already been taken away by him, so it was normal for them to respawn another boss. Moreover, the attributes displayed by the silver-rank boss now made Lu Chen feel that it was no big feat. After all, Lan Weiwei’s attributes were much more powerful than this. The four giant wolves kneeled down when they saw Lan Weiwei. Lan Weiwei pointed at the giant wolf that was kneeling on the ground and spoke, “Master, I want to sit on it!” Lu Chen found it interesting when he saw the obedience of these giant wolves. He immediately pulled Lan Weiwei into his arms and mounted the wolf. A subtle blush flashed across the girl’s face. The wolves let Lu Chen carry her and they rode on a giant wolf together. The giant wolf dragged Lu Chen and stepped on the surface of the lake. When in contact, the blue water of the lake suddenly gave off a mysterious aura. Lu Chen was a little surprised. He did not see from the system analysis that the giant wolf had such a skill. The surface of the lake started to glow a beautiful shade of blue. [Ding! Gold-tier dungeon detected.] [Danger level: Dangerous] [Do you wish to enter the dungeon?] Suddenly, a notification sounded in front of Lu Chen. There was a dungeon in Wolf Valley? Lu Chen was pleasantly surprised. Moreover, it was a gold-rank dungeon. Although it was marked as dangerous, Lu Chen did not panic at all. With his current attributes and skills, together with Lan Weiwei, even if there was danger, it would not sum much for the both of them. Moreover, he still had two teleportation scrolls in his hands. If he really could not handle the dungeon, he could just teleport away. [Enter!] Lu Chen immediately chose to enter the dungeon. Then, the huge wolf dragged Lu Chen into the light screen. The surrounding scene dimmed. The lake water glimmered in the night. He could even see his own reflection clearly through the water. Through the reflection, he could even see the hills under the night sky. In the dense forest, there was a wolf pack that shuttled back and forth. There were over 10,000 pairs of densely packed, green, and terrifying eyes! The further they traveled in, he could see a huge wolf howling at the full moon on every mountain peak. These wolf packs seemed to be carrying out some kind of mysterious ritual. The wolf howls that came one after another began to gather toward the surface of the lake. Golden patterns suddenly appeared on the calm surface of the lake. Splash! The water rose into the air, and the lake seemed to be connected to the bright moon in the sky. Right then, a huge ash wolf jumped out of the water! Its blue gem-like pupils looked up at the moon as if it had some kind of resentment! The figures of Lu Chen and the others turned from an illusion to reality. The moment they appeared on the lake, they were immediately noticed by the ash wolf. Once they were noticed, the giant Ash Wolf — which was as big as a small hill — charged towards the two of them without saying a word! The way it moved exuded killing intent! Lu Chen did not have the time to dodge the attack as he panicked from the sudden movement. Lan Weiwei’s expression was solemn. She directly jumped up and stepped on the surface of the water. A punch landed on the giant wolf’s limb! Bang! The giant wolf was sent flying, sliding far away on the surface of the water, creating countless waves. At this moment, Lan Weiwei seemed to have changed her appearance. She no longer looked as cute as before. Instead, she carried herself like a queen! It was domineering! ‘This kid’s powerful?’ Lu Chen thought to himself, shocked. The giant wolf in the distance was sent flying by a single punch. It was obviously furious from the counterattack. It got up from the surface of the water, opened its bloody mouth, and directly spat out blue flames! The high temperature created a mist that floated above the lake water. The powerful destructive power shocked Lu Chen to the core. He was about to bring Lan Weiwei to dodge the attack too, but he did not expect this little girl to react like a different person when in danger. He raised his hand, and a wave-like light screen appeared, blocking all the flames. Lu Chen quickly checked Lan Weiwei’s status. [Ancient Ash Wolf ] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Lan Weiwei] [Intimacy: 99] [Level: 20(human form, evolving)] [Attack: 1,000 (evolving)] [HP: 40,000 (evolving)] [Defense: 100 (evolving)] [Nagic Defense: 100 (evolving)] [Skills: Frost Domain, Ture Form Transformation, Ash Wolf’s Fury...; (can be activated)] [Status: Pet Dungeon Challenge] What’s going on? Pet Dungeon Challenge? What does that mean? Could this be a special dungeon for Lan Weiwei? Moreover, on the interface, this little girl’s attributes were crazily increasing! What in the world was happening right now? [Ding! Special mission triggered!] [Please defeat the Ancient Ash Wolf King together with your pet.] [Mission Reward: The treasure of the Ash Wolf bloodline, a large amount of EXP, special equipment, and a special title will be obtained.] The system notification sounded. Lu Chen looked at the giant wolf in front of him and muttered, “No way, we have to kill this gigantic thing together?” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen looked at the gigantic wolf in front of him and shuddered. Its gigantic body covered almost half of the surface of the lake. The attributes of this gigantic wolf appeared on Lu Chen’s interface. [Ancient Ash Wolf King (gold)] [Level: 35] [HP: 200,000] [Attack: 10,000] [Defense: 500] [Magic Defense: 200] [Skills: Heaven-piercing Demonic Flame, Wrath of the Wolf King] [Heaven-piercing Demonic Flame: The Ancient Wolf King will spit out terrifying demonic flames, causing 3,000 physical and magic damage per second to the enemies in range. It will also create a frost domain, this reduces the opponent’s attack speed and casting speed by 50%.] [Wrath of the Wolf King: The ancient Wolf King awakens the sleeping bloodline in its body, greatly increasing its own attributes. It also has a chance to obtain an additional skill!] Lu Chen looked at the attributes of the ancient Ash Wolf King on his interface, and his scalp went numb as he thought to himself. ‘A freaking 200,000 HP buff? ‘A full 10,000 attack power? ‘How do I fight this thing?’ Meanwhile, Lan Weiwei, who stood at the side, only stared coldly at the giant wolf. Suddenly, she stretched out her hand toward the surface of the lake. Specks of light flitted out from her snow-white palm when doing so. Then, a whirlpool appeared on the surface of the lake. It was as if something was rising up. A moment later, amidst the chaos, Lu Chen could see that a sword was appearing. It was lifted up by the whirlpool and showed only the hilt of the sword. With a wave of Lan Weiwei’s hand, the water-blue longsword flew towards Lu Chen! Two words came out thereafter. “Help me.” Although her voice was slightly soft, there was a hint of begging and trust in her tone. [Ding! Your intimacy with your pet has increased to 100 points.] [Your skills can now be attached to your pet.] [Ding! You have obtained an exclusive weapon from a sword class. Your level has reached level 10. The title of Sword God has been upgraded and strengthened.] Lu Chen saw the blue longsword fly over and he raised his hand to grab it. The sword felt cold, yet filled with boundless power! [Ash Wolf King’s Sword (exclusive to Swordsmen)] [Grade: Unknown] [Attack: +1,000] [Exclusive Effect: The Sword of the Ash Wolf King from past generations. Only the Wolf King is qualified to use it. It contains boundless power and has absorbed the power of moonlight for billions of years. It is the ultimate treasure of the Ash Wolf King’s bloodline.] [When you use this sword, you can borrow the power of the moonlight to increase your attack power and receive the attack bonus from the Ash Wolf bloodline!] [This effect will change as your level increases! Currently, the moonlight power increases defense by 100 points and attack by 1,000 points!] [Blue Wolf Bloodline Bonus: All attributes are now increased by 100 points!] [Special Effect: When you attack an enemy, there will be an additional frost effect. It will slow down the opponent’s movement speed and attack speed by 50%. Surpasses 50% of their armor.] Lu Chen was overjoyed. This was a freaking godly weapon! All this while, he had been using the system’s iron sword. This time, he finally had a sword-type weapon that was worthy of his skills! Moreover, the Sword God’s State had now been improved too! [Sword God: Your understanding of the sword has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a sword-type weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with the level of the weapon!] [Sword Intent: When you use a sword-type weapon, it will burst forth with sword intent. Your attack power will increase to 700%!] [Sword God’s State: Your attack swiftness has achieved great heights. It will cause irreversible damage to items. Items damaged by the Sword God State will not be able to recover.] [Godly Speed: The speed of your sword attack is too godly. The attack interval will be greatly shortened. Attack speed increased by 500%. 20 MP is consumed per second in the Sword God’s State.] [Void Sword: Your attack speed is too quick. There is a 1% chance to trigger this effect, causing 20% of the target’s maximum HP to be damaged. When this skill is triggered, your target will be in a concussive state.] Lu Chen’s eyes almost popped out of his eye sockets. Although the Sword God skill had only undergone a change in his Sword Intent skill this time, it managed to increase his attack power by sevenfold. However, the scariest part was that his Sword God had achieved Void Sword, which could deal the maximum amount of damage to the target’s HP! This way, if he were to encounter bosses with high HP in the future, this skill would be extremely useful! Moreover, with the bonus from his equipment, Lu Chen’s stats on his interface had also been upgraded. [Name: Morning Mist] [Level: 10] [Class: Hero (now able to change class to War God)] [Titles: Sword God (hidden), Shield God (hidden), Axe God (hidden), Blade God (hidden), All-rounded master (hidden)] [Vitality: 111 +100] [Strength: 124 +100] [Agility: 82 +100] [Intelligence: 106 +100] [HP: 2,210] [MP: 2,160] [Attack: 4,400] [Defense: 115] [Magic Defense: 15] [Reputation: 1,000] [Skill: Earth Stomp] [Attack Speed: 18.4] All of a sudden, Lu Chen’s Attributes soard! His attack power alone has exceeded 4,000 points! In addition to the sevenfold bonus from the Sword God, one move could deal 30,800 damage points! Looking at it now, with the stats he had, the opponent’s 200,000 HP was not considered too high! Moreover, his current attack speed had reached 18.4! This meant that he could carry out 18 slashes per second! He did not even need to break through the defense of his opponent to even deal such high damage! Lu Chen stood on the surface of the lake with his reflection reflected below him. The word Sword God slowly appeared above his head. Due to him not having much MP, the Sword God’s State could only last for 10 seconds! Therefore, he had to finish the battle within these 10 seconds! Perhaps sensing Lu Chen’s change, the Ash Wolf King turned its gaze to Lu Chen. The aura that this human now emitted made the King tremble from the possibility of death! “Roar!” The Ash Wolf suddenly roared in rage. At the same time, the huge wolves on the surrounding nine mountain peaks also let out a wolf howl at the same time! The frequency of the howls caused the moonlight to flicker. The power of the countless huge wolves seemed to be pulling the bright moon in the sky. The moonlight poured into the body of the giant wolf one after another! [Ash Wolf’s Fury!] Lu Chen did not expect the giant wolves to use their ultimate skill right from the start. The originally snow-white fur that the wolves had was now shrouded in the moonlight, and faint specks of gold appeared around them! The wolf’s body did not grow in size. Instead, it slowly shrank! Lu Chen looked at the interface and saw that the attributes of the Ash Wolf were increasing rapidly! [Ancient Ash Wolf King (awakened)] [Level: 35] [HP: 1,000,000] [Attack Power: 50,000] [Defense: 2,000] [Magic Defense: 1,000] [Skills: Heaven-piercing Demonic Flame, Wrath of the Wolf King, Moonlight’s Pet] [Heaven-piercing Demonic Flame: The Ancient Wolf King will spit out terrifying demonic flames, causing 3,000 physical and magic damage per second to the enemies in range. It will also create a frost domain, this reduces the opponent’s attack speed and casting speed by 50%.] [Wrath of the Wolf King: The ancient Wolf King awakens the sleeping bloodline in its body, greatly increasing its own attributes. It also has a chance to obtain an additional skill!] [Moonlight’s Pet: When the Ash Wolf is in the awakened state, it will receive a bonus from the moonlight. Every second, it will recover 1% of its HP. Every time it loses 1% of its HP, it will receive a bonus of 0.5% in attack speed! Moreover, any damage received will be reduced by 50%!] After reading the attributes, it was at that moment that Lu Chen wanted to strangle the moon above to death with his very bare hands. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Not only did the Ash Wolf King’s defense increase to a terrifying 10,000 points, but it also now recovers 10,000 HP every second! Moreover, the damage it received would also be reduced by 50%! Was this the power of a f*cking gold rank boss? What was the point of all of this to go against one player? Right at this moment, the Ancient Ash Wolf King spat out a cloud of blue flames, almost covering the entire surface of the lake. [Shield God] Lu Chen activated his Shield God form without hesitation. With a 90% damage reduction, he protected Lan Weiwei behind him. The total damage of 6,000 points per second was now reduced to only 600 points! Ten seconds later, fortunately, Lu Chen’s HP had not depleted to zero and it was all thanks to Lan Weiwei’s HP! At that moment, the surface of the lake had turned into a snowy domain. Lu Chen’s attack speed, which was originally 18.4 points, had now been reduced to 9.2 points! “You attack, I’ll hold him off!” In this form, Lan Weiwei was like an empress. Her voice was icy-cold as she stepped forward. With that, a punch was thrown out, and a strong wind blew! The Ash Wolf King and Lan Weiwei began to exchange vicious blows. The two seemed to be competing on the icy plains for victory! The two were in a stalemate. Both of them seemed to be holding on to the edges of a mountain, barely hanging on! Lu Chen had no time to see how much Lan Weiwei’s attributes had increased. He immediately activated the Sword God State! With that, he began his attacks as well. With a swoosh, he had his first strike towards the Ancient Ash Wolf King. “-10,800!” Lu Chen’s eyes narrowed. He had surpassed half of the damage dealt by the Wolf King’s armor! The 30,000 attack power could now only deal 10,000 damage to the Wolf King! With such a small amount of HP reduction, the Wolf King could recover to full HP in a quick second! Meanwhile, Lu Chen’s Sword God only had a duration of 10 seconds! He could not care less about that anymore as the Sword God’s attack speed had increased by fivefold! It could allow him to slash 46 times in one second! However, in the Second World, overloading the maximum attack speed would cause indelible damage to the weapon and the player’s body! This number was usually one-tenth of the agility skill needed. In other words, Lu Chen’s original attack speed on his interface was now his maximum attack speed! Any increase above this would have different degrees of side effects! However… 18 slashes per second would be enough for now! Lu Chen’s eyes narrowed, and the blue longsword in his hand directly slashed towards his opponent! The floating red numbers continued to stack on top of the Ash Wolf King’s head 18 times! “-10,800!” “-10,800!” “-10,800!” … This was 194,400 damage per second! It directly cut off a fifth of the Ash Wolf King’s HP! However, in the next second, the moonlight in the sky gathered, and a green value appeared above the Ash Wolf King’s just as quick as the health of lost! “+100,000!” “The f*ck!” Lu Chen cursed on the spot. This was too f*cking ridiculous! This moonlight’s bonus directly restored the Ash Wolf King’s HP by 100,000! The more it lost, the more it recovered its HP! If he could not finish off this boss within 10 seconds, once the God Sword’s State disappeared, it would be very difficult to have other means to kill it! Moreover, he had just slashed out 18 times quickly, and his arm now felt sore and numb. He could clearly feel that his body’s functions had been stretched to the limit! If he exceeded this value, it would definitely become a big problem! Lu Chen looked at the icy surface where Lan Weiwei was fighting another wolf. At this moment, a faint shadow had appeared behind Lan Weiwei. It was a huge wolf with a cold expression on it. Its white fur had a tinge of blue specks around it. “Roar!” Both of them roared and collided against each other! Countless pieces of ice were shattered! The surrounding mountains trembled from the impact the both of them exuded! The surrounding wolves looked over with reverence! This was the battle between the Wolf King, the Ancient Wolf King, and the future Wolf King! Lan Weiwei had been to this dungeon countless times! Each time, she was defeated! Each time, she could not pass! Each time, she could not obtain the recognition of the Ash Wolf’s bloodline in her body to be activated! Woosh! Lan Weiwei was sent flying, and she seemed to be on the verge of unconsciousness. Lu Chen held his sword, knowing that he could not wait any longer. This time, he had to take the risk and attack! Slash! He took a step forward, and the power of the Sword God’s State started to heat up again! His Sword intent was buzzing, ready to be unleashed. Lu Chen almost turned into a streak of light as he dashed around the Ash Wolf King! [Warning! Your body has exceeded its physical limit!] [Agility had been permanently reduced by 20 points.] [Attack speed has been permanently reduced by 3 points.] Lu Chen’s body shook. The after-effect of this skill was too high of a price to pay! In the game, every attribute point was extremely precious! This time, Lu Chen slashed out a total of 40 times! It directly reduced the Ash Wolf King’s HP to less than half! The next second, a green number appeared above the Ash Wolf King’s head, yet again! “+260,000!” “F*ck!” Lu Chen could not help but swear out loud! His attack was to no avail as this attack only directly restored more than 200,000 HP back! Meanwhile, Lan Weiwei’s body — which had just been sent flying — was now embedded into the glacier. Boom! With a loud sound, the glacier shattered! A gigantic beast that did not belong to the Ash Wolf King suddenly appeared! Lan Weiwei had transformed into her true form! With that, her bloody mouth opened up and bit down on the other party’s neck. The frosty flames in her mouth continued to burn the other party! “-100,000!” While her jaw was locked, the Ash Wolf King’s HP was directly reduced by 100,000! “Hurry up and do it!” The two gigantic beasts were entangled together. At this moment, Lan Weiwei’s voice sounded in Lu Chen’s mind! Lu Chen knew that this was a great opportunity to attack! If they missed this opportunity, they would never have the chance to win against their opponents! He took a deep breath and ignored the system’s warning! He pushed his attack speed to its maximum! Since his attack speed had been reduced, he could only make 31 slashes at most! Among the 31 slashes, two golden lights that lit up the sky appeared! Void Sword! A 1% chance appeared twice in his 31 slashes! It directly took away 40% of the Ash Wolf King’s HP! Together with Lu Chen’s attack, the Ash Wolf King’s HP managed to reach zero! With a loud bang, the giant wolf fell to the ground, defeated! “Awoo…” Wails could be heard coming from all directions. The howls sounded like the wolves were grieving for the loss of the old king, as well as a welcome for the new king! Meanwhile, Lan Weiwei had also transformed back into a young girl’s appearance as she slowly descended from the sky. Lu Chen supported his exhausted body with his sword as he caught her. At this moment, the gigantic surface of the lake split open, and a palace appeared at the bottom of the lake. [The palace of the Ash Wolf Clan has been opened. ] [Do you wish to enter?] Lu Chen did not have time to look at the spoils of war on the ground. He only immediately kept the items that had dropped in front of him into his backpack. Then, he brought Lan Weiwei into the palace. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The palace was as transparent as crystal. Lu Chen carried the unconscious Lan Weiwei and pushed open the door to enter. At this moment, Lu Chen’s negative drawbacks from overexerting his body had become more serious, and his body was becoming indescribably weak. He suspected that these states would directly affect the real world were he to leave the game now. After all, if he could bring Lan Weiwei into the real world, who knows what else could be brought over. At this point, Lu Chen had already completely treated the Second World as another real world. [Ding! Due to the overuse of your body, you will be in a weakened state for a month. All attributes will continue to decrease as time passes.] The system displayed a red warning. It had only been a short while, but Lu Chen’s four-dimensional attributes had dropped by 10 points and were still dropping. Lu Chen cursed silently in his heart. If this palace did not give him any compensation, he would burn it to the ground! Lu Chen stepped into the main hall. The temperature inside was very low, and there were all kinds of reliefs on both sides. It was as though they were expecting something grand to happen. The moment he stepped into the palace, Lan Weiwei’s body lit up with fluorescent light, and her body floated up automatically. Suddenly, as though she was being attracted towards something, her floating body moved in a certain direction. Lu Chen clicked his tongue in wonder and followed closely behind Lan Weiwei. He looked at the relief sculptures on both sides along the way and roughly understood some of the content it was trying to express. It seemed to be showing the history of the Ash Wolves. A long time ago, a pack of wolves lived in this valley. They resided around this very lake. One night, the Wolf King who was resting by the lake, saw a woman fall from the Moon Palace. The woman fell from the sky down to the lake. When she fell, the Wolf King was awakened by the sounds of water splashing He quickly pulled the woman out of the water. She looked to be a very weak human. So, many wolves suggested eating the woman. Only the Wolf King hesitated in doing so. On the third day, the woman finally woke up. She was terrified when she saw the huge wolves that overpowered her. The wolves opened their bloody mouths and were ready to bite the woman. At this time, the Wolf King appeared. He ordered his people to retreat and saved this woman’s life. As the Wolf King, he said that he had the right to deal with his prey. So, the others had to back off. The woman survived! She stayed with the wolf pack by the lake. The sun and the moon alternated with time. The woman taught the wolf pack how to absorb moonlight. Many wolves were baptized by the moonlight and turned into human forms. After an unknown amount of time, the Wolf King saw the woman in the very lake she fell in one night and slowly rose into the sky. She rose like a bright moon and flew straight to the sky. That night, the woman left, leaving the wolf pack that she had lived in for many years. From that day onwards, the Wolf King’s howl turned desolate and distant. At the highest point of the lake, it always howled towards the bright moon! At first, the wolves did not notice anything different. It was not until later when one of the wolves was looking up at the moon and absorbing the moonlight, they could vaguely see a faint shadow in the bright moon. It seemed to be the silhouette of a woman. From then on, every lone wolf that howled at the moon would be bathed in the moonlight and gain power from it. These lone wolves were also known as the Ash Moon Wolf clan! After Lu Chen finished the story, his heart was filled with shock! He seemed to have seen a corner of this world from the story of the Ash Moon Wolf clan! He would have missed out on such an opportunity if he had not met Lan Weiwei! Lu Chen’s mind returned to reality and saw that Lan Weiwei was still floating somewhere. After taking a few turns, Lu Chen could no longer remember the way out from this maze-like hall. There were wolf heads everywhere, and symbols of the moon. There were all kinds of murals everywhere. As well as countless sculptures of wolf heads and human bodies. Finally, after half an hour, Lu Chen followed Lan Weiwei to a golden palace. Inside, there were four huge ivory-white stone pillars, and they were as thick as ten people hugging each other. In the middle of the palace was an altar. Above it, there was a silvery-white ball of light that looked like the moon. Lan Weiwei floated directly to the altar, and then she stood there blankly as if she had lost her soul. Lu Chen stood further away from the altar. Oddly enough, he felt that this place was extremely mysterious. Right about when he decided to move towards the altar, the bright moon shone with the outline of a woman. “I really didn’t expect that after tens of thousands of years, the Wolf King of the Ash Moon Wolf clan would actually submit to a human.” The voice came from the female apparition. Lu Chen asked warily, “Who are you?” The woman said, “You don’t have to ask. Now is not the time for you to know. This place has been asleep for so long. It’s time for everyone to wake up. “Since you’ve passed the test here, according to the rules, you can obtain the treasures from the Ash Moon Wolf Clan.” The woman’s figure flew over, and a slender index finger that was as white as snow extended out from the void. It directly pointed at the center of Lu Chen’s brows. He did not have time to resist as he felt a cool sensation enter his mind. [Warning! Your mental state is on the verge of collapse.] [You will be forced to log off in three seconds.] Lu Chen’s meaning began to blur. Before he lost his sight in the game, he saw a ball of light get absorbed into Lan Weiwei’s body. … After a long time, Lu Chen slowly woke up. When he opened his eyes, he saw Lan Weiwei blinking her eyes at him. She no longer had the cold and aloof air of a royal sister. Her big watery eyes had been staring at him this whole time. She opened her mouth and shouted, “Master, I’m hungry!” The strong contrast in behavior surprised Lu Chen. “Okay, okay, okay. I’ll make you something to eat now.” He had just stood up when he gasped in a breath of cold air! His whole body was in pain as if it had experienced the effects of war. Even standing up was a little difficult! Lu Chen’s mouth was full of bitterness. He had guessed correctly! Everything in the game would really affect his reality! Right now, it had turned dark. A corner of the curtain in Lu Chen’s room was exposed. The moonlight outside was able to shine through between the gaps. The moonlight just so happened to shine on Lu Chen’s body. As it did, a cool feeling came over him, and Lu Chen instantly felt much more comfortable. He quickly pulled open the curtains further apart. There was a huge silver moon hanging in the sky. As the moonlight fell onto him, Lu Chen felt indescribably comfortable. After a moment, the pain all over Lu Chen’s body eased up by a lot. After a while, only then did he stand up from the recovery. When he looked at himself in the mirror. On his forehead, there was a strange symbol, like a vertical, curved crack. Lu Chen reached out and touched it, but it soon faded away, disappearing into his skin. What in the world was that? Was it the woman in the palace that did this to him? Lu Chen smiled bitterly. Did he just become a member of the Ash Moon Wolf Clan? <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation In the living room, Lan Weiwei was inhaling whatever food Lu Chen brought out. While she ate, Lu Chen faced the windowsill to bathe in the moonlight. The pain in his body slowly dissipated the more he basked in it. He was more and more certain that the game Second World was definitely hiding some important secrets. It was far from being as simple as it looked on the surface. Moreover, the entire world was promoting this game and even started currency trading. The leaders and core members of the various countries would definitely know something fishy was lurking around! In the near future, this world would definitely undergo huge changes! He could not help but think of the teleportation scroll in his hand that all the various powers were paying attention to! White Fog City might really have something that could change the game and even the world’s structure! Otherwise, the hype to get the first-ever class change for players to switch classes would not be so arduous! From the boss that Lu Chen had encountered in Wolf Valley, it was obvious that they were all exaggeratedly strong! A silver-tier boss would definitely not be so terrifying! If the other paths were the same, that would be enough to prove that something fishy was going on! Also, recently, various forces were even coming into contact with him! All of this explained the root issue of something bubbling! For the first time, Lu Chen felt a strong sense of crisis! He needed to become stronger and continuously increase his strength to protect himself! There were too many unknowns ahead, and this world was no longer as simple as it used to be! He had too many questions that he could not answer! He wanted to survive in this world and the other! In this unknown game, the only way to survive was to increase his strength! Lu Chen let out a deep breath. The mark on his forehead slowly disappeared as he stood up. He looked at Lan Weiwei at the dining table and asked, “Are you done eating? If you are, we should go back.” Lan Weiwei puffed her cheeks and nodded obediently. Then, she quickly walked to Lu Chen’s side and hugged him. Lu Chen was slightly stunned and could not help but laugh. Lan Weiwei’s current behavior was like a silly child. It seemed as though she thought that she would be able to enter the Second World by hugging him. Lu Chen looked at the game pod. He was considering whether he should get one for Lan Weiwei as well? If she could enter the game with him, what would happen if she entered alone? Lu Chen let go of Lan Weiwei and said, “Wait a moment.” With that, he picked up his phone and ordered a new game pod online. A game pod could be provided by the country, or it could be ordered through various channels. A moment later, Lu Chen put down his phone and entered the game with Lan Weiwei in his arms. … After entering the game, several notifications kept ringing. [Ding! Congratulations on leveling up!] [Ding! Your negative status has been cleared!] [Ding! You have received the blessing of the Moon God!] [Ding! You have received the power of the Ash Wolf!] [Ding! Your pet has leveled up!] … The series of notifications overwhelmed Lu Chen. The first was the leveling up. This time, Lu Chen had leveled up by five levels in one go! However, due to the negative status, his attributes had been reduced by a huge chunk! He took a look at his four-dimensional attributes. [Vitality: 125] [Strength: 120] [Agility: 100] [Intelligence: 100] If not for the Ash Wolf King’s Sword, his attributes would have almost been wiped out! Do the side effects of overexerting one’s physical state bring about such heavy losses? Lu Chen’s heart ached so much that he could not help but grin. If he could not make it to the palace to meet the mysterious lady, then he would have suffered a huge loss! Lu Chen then shifted his gaze to the other notification that mentioned he received blessings from the moon god. [Moon God’s Blessing — a gift from the gods. After using it, it would be directly activated.] [Type: Permanent Halo (indestructible)] [Vitality: +200] [Strength: +200] [Agility: +200] [Intelligence: +200] [Special Effect: You have been blessed by the Moon God. You can use moonlight to recover your status and remove negative attributes.] [When you fight under the Moonlight, you will receive a combat strength buff. The specific buff will increase with the user’s affinity with the moonlight] [Current Affinity: 65. You will receive a 50% attack bonus in battle! Light Attribute Magic Resistance +50%] [Note: When the affinity points reach a certain value, an additional special effect will be unlocked. You can now store moonlight 0/100,000!] Lu Chen was pleasantly surprised. Almost dying was totally worth it! In terms of attributes alone, this buff had directly surpassed everything he had dreamed of! It also had a 50% attack bonus! This was a huge upgrade for him! As for the so-called affinity, Lu Chen had not figured it out yet. If it was for pets, this affinity could be slowly cultivated. How could this affinity be improved though? Lu Chen shook his head. Without thinking too much, he directly activated the halo. In an instant, a gentle light enveloped Lu Chen’s body. The feeling of powerlessness on Lu Chen’s body was completely eliminated! His attributes were also back to their original state! Lu Chen continued reading the system notification in excitement. [Power of the Ash Wolf!] You have passed the test left behind by the Ancient Ash Wolf King. After using it, it shall be directly activated. [Type: Halo (blessing)] [Vitality: 300] [Strength: +300] [Agility: +300] [Intelligence: +300] [Special Effect: You have obtained the power of the Ancient Ash Wolf King. When you are in battle, you may use moonlight to activate the power of the Ancient Ash Wolf!] [Every time you use the moonlight that you have stored, you can increase your attack power by a little! The increased attributes will not be retained forever. It will disappear after the battle ends.] [Special Effect: You can now transform into an Ancient Ash Wolf. You can also use the Ash Wolf’s howl towards the moon to summon a full moon regardless of the terrain and climate. It will also deal 500 light attribute magic damage per second to enemies under the moonlight. It will cost 50 MP per second to use.] When Lu Chen saw this halo, he did not know how to react. It seemed that he really had really joined the clan and became one of them! However, this bonus was still very beneficial. Especially more so with the Blessing of the Moon God, he could now directly summon moonlight without waiting for nightfall. This could pose a huge increase in his combat strength! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen looked at his own stats soar, and finally expressed a huge smile on his face. This event had turned into a huge profit for him! Leveled-up pet? Lan Weiwei’s interface appeared before Lu Chen’s eyes. [Ancient Wolf Spirit] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Lan Weiwei] [Intimacy: 100] [Level: 25 (human)] [Attack: 2,500] [HP: 70,000] [Defense: 150] [Magic Defense: 150] [Skills: Frost Domain, True Form Transformation, Wrath of… Lu Chen looked at Lan Weiwei’s attributes and pondered. This time, Lan Weiwei’s advancement did not seem to have received a huge upgrade. Her level had increased by five, she was now ten levels higher than him. Other than her name becoming an ancient wolf spirit now, the other changes were not too big. Her HP had increased by 30,000 points, her attack power had increased by 1,500 points, and her magic and physical defense had increased by 50 points each. Other than that, there were basically no other changes. However, this was considered a good start. His HP was connected to Lan Weiwei’s, and his 70,000 HP could now be considered as a further guarantee of his safety. Other than these gains, Lu Chen quickly shifted his gaze to his backpack. Previously, when he had killed the Ask Wolf King, many good items had dropped. However, he did not have time to look at them. To be honest, this was the most difficult boss he had ever fought. Opening his backpack, Lu Chen was dazzled by a pile of shiny equipment. [Ash Wolf Helmet (gold)] [Level Requirement: 15] [Vitality: +70] [Strength: +50] [Agility: +30] [Intelligence: +20] [HP: +5,000] [Defense: +70] [Special Effect: When receiving damage, 10% of the damage received can be converted into HP!] It was a gold-tier equipment! Lu Chen’s eyes burned with excitement. This was an absolutely good item! Not only were the attributes high, but the special effect was also extremely useful! He quickly moved on to the next item. [Moonlight Cloak (gold)] [Level Requirement: 15] [Vitality: +40] [Strength: +30] [Agility: +50] [Intelligence: +25] [Defense: +100] [Magic Defense: +100] [Special Effect: Immune to 30% magic damage! Another piece of gold equipment! [Wolf’s Belt (gold)] [Level Requirement: 15] [Vitality: +70] [Strength: +35] [Agility: +35] [Intelligence: +30] [HP: +5,000] [Defense: +100] [Magic Defense: +100] Three pieces of gold-tier equipment! Lu Chen roughly tapped on them. Other than the belt that did not have any special effects, the other two pieces of equipment showed special effects. It seemed that there were many differences between equipment of the same level. As for the other items he picked up, they were not as worthy as these three, so he put them away. Then, he swept his gaze over something in his backpack. “Huh?” He looked at a scroll in his backpack. It was emitting a golden glow. “What is this?” Lu Chen took it out and took a look. [Test — The Will of the Sword] A special item! [Congratulations, brave one. You have passed the test of the Wolf Valley. This proves that you have the strength and will to become a top-tier swordsman.] [This is the proof that you have passed the test. If you meet a sword saint that haunts the world, please give this to them. You will receive a class change for a special class.] Lu Chen was shocked. This thing was actually a class change scroll for a special class. Getting a class change was the most important thing for a player in any game. It represented a transformation and a surge in strength! Similar to the title Lu Chen had, although the strength bonus was terrifying, it had not been officially included in the class. It was mentioned on the official website of Second World that each title corresponded to a corresponding class! In other words, when he changed classes to become a Sword God, only his combat power would increase! Lu Chen looked at this scroll, and his eyes turned hungry. It was related to swordsmanship, one that he wanted. If he followed this clue, he might really be able to find this Sword God’s class change mission. Lu Chen solemnly kept the scroll. He opened his interface again. [Name: Morning Mist] [Level: 15] [Class: Hero (now able to change class to War God)] [Titles: Sword God (hidden), Shield God (hidden), Axe God (hidden), Blade God (hidden), All-rounded master (hidden)] [Vitality: 765] [Strength: 725] [Agility: 705] [Intelligence: 700] [HP: 17,650] [MP: 8,000] [Attack: 9,250] [Defense: 385] [Magic Defense: 355] [Reputation: 1,000] [Skill: Earth Stomp] [Attack Speed: 16.5 (when a character reaches level 10 and has more than 100 agility, each agility point will provide 0.01 attack speed)] His attack power had reached 9,000 points! With such combat power, he would have enough confidence to fight the Wolf King again. Moreover, his HP had reached nearly 20,000 points. Adding on this double resistance that was comparable to a bronze-tier boss, Lu Chen could say that he could now walk unhindered! He looked at the lake in Wolf Valley and felt a little excited. There was nothing more enjoyable than increasing one’s strength. On the other side of the lake, there was a small path. If he guessed correctly, this should be the path leading to White Fog City. He just did not know if he could reach White Fog City directly by following this path, or if there were other dangers ahead that he should prepare for? Lu Chen thought for a moment and decided that there was only one way to figure it out — to walk to the path given. Soon, he reached the other side of the lake. The path looked to be full of twists and turns. Without hesitating, Lu Chen ventured in. There were many strange flowers and plants growing on both sides. He could not name them, but he could smell many strange scents that were being emitted from them. The path was only one meter wide at the beginning, and there were deep cliffs on both sides. After walking for a while, his field of vision gradually saw more things, and the mountains on both sides shield themselves away. In front of Lu Chen, there was a white fog. It covered everything. The visibility was very low. He walked for a long time, but he did not see any wild monsters or buildings. Was this really the way to White Fog City? Lu Chen frowned. There was no direction, and the surroundings were empty. How could he reach White Fog City with no indication? Lu Chen continued to walk forward. He did not know how much time had passed. He walked till he saw the path between the mountains again. He had turned back. Lu Chen could not help but frown. He felt a little strange. This fog seemed to have been deliberately released by someone to prevent the players from reaching White Fog City. Moreover, he felt a little uneasy. There seemed to be something terrifying in this white fog. Lu Chen thought for a moment and did not plan to continue forward. Instead, he chose to return to the valley. In the valley, Lu Chen thought for a long time. The situation in the white fog was suspicious. Although he was very strong, there was no need for him to take the risk to investigate further. To him, he had two choices. The first was to teleport himself directly to White Fog City. He wanted to see what the situation in White Fog City was like. The second was to continue improving his strength. Apart from Wolf Valley, there are several other silver-ranked bosses territories. These are all necessary routes to White Fog City.. Moreover, fighting bosses would be the fastest way to improve one’s strength. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation In the end, Lu Chen still chose the path of increasing his strength first! He knew nothing about the Wolf Valley and the White Fog City behind the Wolf Valley. The best way to deal with the unknown was to increase his strength to not be afraid. Apart from the Wolf Valley, there was also Bear Ridge, Snake Pond, Bat Cave, MassGrave, and Tiger Mountain. There were five other places where a high-level boss could be found. Therefore, Lu Chen prepared to go to Bear Ridge first. At this time, the entire internet was in an uproar! On the Second World official forum, all kinds of news were being passed around everywhere. [Bear Ridge silver boss damage is off the charts, with an attack of 30,000, that’s ridiculous!?] [Wolf Valley boss disappeared, silver boss appearances are seriously inconsistent.] [After the Wolf Valley released a mysterious white fog, many players were attacked by unknown wild monsters.] The video about the Second World instantly became a hot topic. When many players saw the various silver bosses, they called them freaks! It was simply impossible to kill the boss! Take Bear Ridge’s boss for example, its attack power was 30,000! Even the middle-sized guild with over 1,000 members was instantly killed! There was no chance for them to react or escape! “Isn’t this freaking game too difficult?” “Without a class change and a quest guide, how are we supposed to survive?” “I suspect that the developers are pranking us on purpose. They don’t want us to go to White Fog City.” “But did you guys hear that the boss from Wolf Valley seems to have been killed?” “Yeah, yeah, yeah, I know about that too.” “The boss over there seems to be on a completely different level from these bosses.” “A few guilds have already gone over to check it out actually.” “LMAO, what do you guys know? That boss has long been eliminated. That boss was even crazier than these bosses!” “Really?” “Hehe, why would I lie to you guys? Watch the video for yourself!” In the various forums, a video was released. It was the beast form of Lan Weiwei from before. “The f*ck, it has 100,000 HP?” After countless players saw Lan Weiwei’s HP bar, they all trembled in their spots! This was completely different from the other bosses the guilds have experienced! “This is a video from a few days ago. It was taken by an expert from the White Alliance. They were originally going to surround and kill Morning Mist. In the end, someone was curious and went to the depths of Wolf Valley to explore, only to be met with this scary boss.” “It’s only been a few days. Where did this boss go?” “I heard from others that the boss was wiped out.” “That’s impossible. If it was a certain guild, how could they fight such a scary boss?” Suddenly, there was a comment below that made everyone’s goosebumps appear. “I think there’s one person who can...;” “Who?” “Two days ago, that big shot who single-handedly wiped out the entire White Alliance!” “F*ck, could it be Morning Mist?” When someone mentioned Lu Chen’s name, countless people immediately started gossiping. After Lu Chen wiped out the White Alliance guild, he seemed to have walked straight into Wolf Valley. Less than two days had passed, and Wolf Valley’s boss had disappeared. Everyone felt their scalps go numb! How could there be such a perverse person in the world? That was a boss with 100,000 HP! Not to mention the other attributes, how did he have the chance to single-handedly challenge that crazy boss?! In the face of doubt, only one person stood up and said. “Have you forgotten that the leader of the White Alliance had 100,000 shield points but was still defeated?” At this moment, everyone’s voices fell silent! That’s right, Xiao Chuan of the White Alliance had his 100,000 shield points destroyed by Morning Mist! This video has reached over 10,000,000 views on all the major websites! It shocked countless players! At this moment, the name Morning Mist was branded into the hearts of all the players. … Early the next morning, Lu Chen, who had rested well, took Lan Weiwei and set off. A white light flashed, and they arrived at the Second World. This time, Lu Chen’s destination was Bear Ridge. He had just brought Lan Weiwei to Bear Ridge’s entrance when he was discovered by many players. “F*ck, the mighty God has appeared. Quickly come and watch!” “Is he the ruthless person who single-handedly defeated the Wolf King boss?” “Morning Mist has appeared. Quickly inform the White Alliance Leader!” “This is 0927. The target has appeared and is heading towards Bear Ridge.” “Brothers, let’s tail him. Let’s go up and take a look at what he’s up to. It’s good to gain some knowledge and learn some skills.” Lu Chen felt somewhat helpless. These people’s eyes were burning with desire. It was as though they had discovered a dragon. There were those who worshiped him, those who were jealous, those who were afraid, and those who were hateful and vigilant. However, these people did not dare to get close to him. They only looked at him from afar. Lu Chen could not make a move either. He could only let them do as they wished. “F*ck, Morning Mist has entered Bear Ridge!” “Good heavens, could it be that he’s going to challenge that boss alone?” “The f*ck, that’s possible. We sure are in for a treat, let’s see how he handles it alone!!” “Woah, the girl next to Morning Mist is so beautiful. Is she his girlfriend?” “I don’t think so. Is she his sister?” Many people noticed Lan Weiwei’s existence. The appearance of this world was fine-tuned according to the real world. The better-looking the real world was, the better-looking it would be in this world. Looking at Lan Weiwei’s appearance, such a beauty that could topple nations and cities, definitely stole many people’s attention. Lan Weiwei could not help but frown when she saw the people around her gossiping. “Master, these people’s eyes are so strange. Do you want me to kill them?” Lan Weiwei’s voice was not loud, but it was clearly heard by everyone. “The heck, did I just hear her say, master?” “This...; The plot has indeed thickened!” “The relationship between these two people, she is definitely not his sister anymore, that I can assure you!” “Morning Mist, that beast!” “Sc*m, he’s a sc*m!” The surrounding players all looked at him strangely. Lu Chen had a headache from their words. The meaning of the word master had changed in this era. When some gentlemen heard this, they would immediately have bad associations with the word. Thus, causing them to side-eye Lu Chen with disgust. He looked at Lan Weiwei who was about to charge out and said, “Be quiet, don’t bother about them.” With that, two of them walked into Bear Ridge. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The two entered Bear Ridge and were followed closely by a group of people behind. Everyone wanted to see what this legendary player — Morning Mist — was up to. On the outskirts of Bear Ridge, there were a few huge grayish-white bears. Their levels were not high, they were around level 8. However, their defense was high, their HP was abundant, and their attack power was powerful. All in all, they were not easy to deal with. As soon as the two entered Bear Ridge, they attracted the attention of countless wild monsters. Many big bears rushed towards Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei. Before Lu Chen could make a move, Lan Weiwei made the first move! She raised her hand and waved it around, instantly killing the three big bears in front of her! “-2,000!” The group of people was stunned by her action as they looked at the red number floating in the air. “The f*ck, where did this beauty come from?” “She could easily deal over a thousand damage and instantly kill these monsters?” “Oh my gosh, I thought she was just a pretty face, but she turned out to be an expert in the field as well!” “You guys, this is what it means to be able to fight on the battlefield.” Many people could not help but praise Lu Chen, and they became even more jealous of him. However, Lu Chen did not feel much. He only brought Lan Weiwei and walked forward after they destroyed the bears. After crossing a hill, there was another mountain in front of them. The forest was deep and dense, and there were many big black bears that roamed around. Their eyes were emitting a cold light as they stared at the two people who just entered. At this moment, Lan Weiwei’s status panel started to change. The human form on the status panel started to change into a battle form. The attack power of 2,500 on the status panel started to increase rapidly. The girl lightly stomped on the ground and shot forward like a streak of light. Her delicate arm turned into a claw as it drew streaks of cold light in the air! Swoosh! Almost no one could see her figure. By the time all the players reacted, Lan Weiwei was already a few hundred meters away. The sound of things dropping could be heard continuously. Thud! Countless huge black bears instantly fell to the ground! “Woah!” The surrounding players sucked in a breath of cold air as they expressed their shock. It would have been considered normal if this woman had only insta-killed the normal grizzly bears outside. However, the defense and HP of the elite black bears inside were much higher than those outside. Each of them had over 2,000 HP, and their defense was ridiculously high. They were insta-killed? Or was it an AOE skill that killed them all? This was really unbelievable! Many people looked at Lu Chen, who had been strolling leisurely in the courtyard and had not made a single attack from the beginning to the end. They could not help but think to themselves. Could this kid be a sugar daddy? Meanwhile, Liu Yuan, who had noticed this, also slightly narrowed her eyes. This young girl seemed to look extremely familiar, as though she has seen her somewhere before. Such strength should not be unknown in this game. In the entire Dragon Country, all the powerful people were supposed to be in their database. She could vaguely remember each and every one of them. Liu Yuan immediately sent out a message to her base, [This is 0927. Check the information of the little girl beside Lu Chen.] [Got it.] A message was soon sent from the other side of the communication. After a moment, Liu Yuan received a reply from the other side, [Sorry, we can’t find this person in our database.] [Can’t find her?] Liu Yuan frowned as she replied. Their database covered all the experts in this world. If they could not find her, then there was basically no other way to find out the background of this girl. She rubbed her temples. The recent events were getting more and more troublesome. Many major families were appearing quite frequently, and more and more strangers kept appearing beside Lu Chen. The most mysterious one yet was Lan Weiwei… Hmm? Wait a minute, Lan Weiwei? Liu Yuan was startled and suddenly looked towards the two. That girl had a lovely appearance, and she followed closely beside Lu Chen. That gaze, that expression… She looked extremely familiar to her now! Could this be THE Lan Weiwei? Liu Yuan felt that something was wrong. Before this, she had always thought that Lan Weiwei was an ignorant girl who had been deceived by Lu Chen. However, if this ruthless and decisive girl was really Lan Weiwei...; Then their relationship would need to be redefined! Liu Yuan’s heart sank slightly, and she quickly followed after them from behind. At this moment, Lu Chen and Liu Yuan had already reached the depths of Bear Ridge. There were level 15 elite monsters everywhere. Each of them had more than 4,000 HP! Many players had no choice but to stick together and follow closely behind Lu Chen and Wei Wei to not get attacked as well. Many players could only smile helplessly as they looked at the elite giant bears around them. They could not retreat even if they wanted to at this point, they have gone too far deep. Many players who just wanted to watch the show had also noticed something that made them even sadder. They did not have the strength that Lu Chen had. They could not easily enter this place. Right now, they only prayed that Lu Chen could successfully defeat the boss. Then, they would follow him out of this place as well. If Lu Chen failed, none of them would make it out alive. At this moment, Lan Weiwei’s attack power had already exceeded 10,000 points! Her body also showed signs of turning into a beast. These level 15 elite monsters were terrifying existences that ordinary people did not dare to provoke. However, in Lan Weiwei’s eyes, they were just a bunch of trash. Whenever the two went, all the monsters were still insta-killed! This caused many players to tremble as they watched! “This is too f*cking ridiculous!” “10,000 damage with a single slash, am I f*cking seeing things?” “Are you f*cking kidding me? I can only deal around 600 damage at most!” “Hehe, who isn’t surprised? A few days ago, when I saw the attack power of the Guild Leader from White Alliance, I’ve already felt that it was ridiculous. Now, there’s an even more ridiculous one to look at!” “Hurry up and send a message, let’s have more of our people come and see what’s up. Tell them that there’s an expert by Lu Chen’s side.” “Go and report to the eldest young master that another expert has appeared here.” At this moment, countless players had their interest peaked. After a few hours, Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei finally crossed the mountain. The players following behind were overjoyed. “What the heck, is this the big boss?” “He didn’t even look at the bronze equipment that dropped all over the ground?” “Hehe, do you think everyone is like you? He’s wearing a full set of god-tier equipment, why would he need to look at your trash equipment?” “F*ck you, if you have the guts, go and pick it up!” “Who are you looking down at me and my equipment?” At this moment, the various parties had also rushed to the front of Bear Ridge. “Long time no see, Mr. Morning Mist.” Gu Yiming, who had rushed over after hearing the news, appeared with a kind smile. He had also brought many Gu family experts with him. Lu Chen glanced at him and said, “Young Master Gu, you are here for...;” Gu Yiming glanced at the people behind him and spoke to Lu Chen with a smile. “Mr. Morning Mist, please don’t misunderstand. I’m not looking for trouble. I heard that the people from the White Alliance were coming to make things difficult for you, so I specially brought some people here. I also wanted to get to know this young lady by your side. “Our Gu family would always be willing to meet great talents. By the way, may I ask, is this your girlfriend?” Gu Yiming was very polite when he spoke. Lu Chen smiled and rubbed Lan Weiwei’s head. He winked and said, “No, she is my distant cousin.” The surrounding people were ecstatic. As long as she was not his girlfriend, the other ladies would still have a chance! Many people shouted at the top of their lungs trying to clamor for his attention. One person even shouted, “Brother-in-law!” However, as soon as they finished speaking, Lan Weiwei’s figure shot out. She instantly slit that person’s neck. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen crossed his arms across his chest and said calmly, “I’m sorry, my cousin has a bad temper. Everyone, I hope you don’t mind that.” When everyone saw Lan Weiwei’s cold expression, they immediately shrunk their bodies to make themselves look weak. They dared not to say anything else. This little beauty really dared to kill people just like that! None of them wanted to go back to the Ressurection Point, so they all immediately shut their mouths. However, at this moment, Gu Yiming only smiled with courtesy. Lu Chen did not really treat Lan Weiwei as his cousin. Sometimes between men and women, there would always be some tension. Even if she was a distant cousin, it was not impossible to get married. It was best to treat her as Lu Chen’s woman for now. “Mr. Morning Mist’s cousin really has some interesting personality.” Gu Yiming smiled. “But I suggest that you don’t go into the depths of Bear Ridge. That boss can’t be defeated, at least not from the looks of it.” Lu Chen naturally knew Gu Yiming’s good intentions. If he had not fought the Wolf Valley boss before, he would have retreated after seeing such terrifying attributes. Now, with his attributes and having Lan Weiwei. One boss would be nothing to worry about. Just as Lu Chen was about to speak, a few cold voices sounded from behind them. “I, too, advise Mr. Morning Mist not to barge in.” A man led a group of White Alliance players from afar. The power they exuded was overbearing! The players following behind were violently pushed aside. Everyone was angry but did not dare to speak. The people of the White Alliance were usually extremely overbearing and would not stand for complaints. Many players had been bullied before. It was just that they did not have the strength and did not dare to go against the White Alliance Guild. “Hehe, a bunch of people who use their power to bully others has arrived!” “That’s right. The last time, Morning Mist killed their guild leader in one strike. It was really satisfying to watch.” “However, Morning Mist got into trouble because of that. The White Alliance is just a bunch of mad dogs that like to p*ss on people to exert power.” “Look at this situation. It seems like they really want to kill Morning Mist here…” The number of people from the White Alliance increased, and soon, the entire mountain range was filled with them. This time, the White Alliance had mobilized nearly ten thousand people! They were all elite players as well! The six vice-presidents were even present! Xiao Chuan, who was dressed in white, walked out from the crowd with a cold gaze. He glared at Lu Chen and said through gritted teeth, “Morning Mist, long time no see.” Lu Chen did not have a good impression of Xiao Chuan after all that he had done. He only replied coldly, “President Xiao, is it?” “Why are you here, have you not died enough? You came here today because you want me to kill you again?” He glanced at the people of the White Alliance and said, “Didn’t I say that from now on, as long as the people of the White Alliance appear in front of me, they will all die?” Xiao Chuan laughed coldly and said, “What big words for a small man. Last time, I was much too careless with your capabilities. This time, however, you’ll be dead for sure! I believe that all the elites of the White Alliance would be able to kill you!” Lu Chen sneered and took a step forward. “How about you and take that chance right now!” The atmosphere was filled with tense air. At this time, Gu Yiming stood up and stood shoulder to shoulder with Lu Chen. “Xiao Chuan, I advise you to restrain yourself. Mr. Morning Mist is a friend of the Gu family.” Gu Yiming said calmly. Xiao Chuan looked at Gu Yiming and said, “Gu Yiming, I know what you said the last time. What? Do you really represent the entire Gu Family? Do you really have the confidence to go against the Xiao family of the White Alliance?” Xiao Chuan laughed after he spoke, knowing what is to come before speaking up again, “Those old men of the Gu family are all dead. I think you know about the current situation of the Gu family. Why? Are you planning to bet your treasure on this kid? Do you think he can help you and your family? Stop dreaming! Even my family can’t help you. How sure are you that this kid can do it?” Gu Yiming’s expression was extremely ugly. The Gu family was indeed in a grave crisis. Many of the older generation had passed away. A family conflict happened all of a sudden causing many things to crumble. Were that not to happen, he would not have been in charge of such a large family. Before he took over, the entire Gu family had already been massacred! He had killed countless people to secure his position! It could be said that the current Gu family could not afford to be messed around with! The other forces were afraid of the Gu family only because they were afraid that they would crumble even after they’ve been murdered. If they provoked this family, they knew that they would have to fight to their deaths. “Xiao Chuan, you’re trying to persuade me with nothing. If you really want to attack my Gu family, then I, Gu Yiming, will not sit still and wait for death to come.” Xiao Chuan’s eyelids twitched. The killing intent that this young man with a trace of gentleness displayed at this moment shocked him. He had also heard of the bloody process of the Gu family rising to power. This Gu Yiming was not someone to be trifled with. However, as the youngest leader of the Xiao family, he himself was also not one to be trifled with. “Hehe, since that’s the case, you can give it a try! With your current Gu family, I’m afraid that you’re not powerful enough to fight against the White Alliance!” The conversation between the two lowered the atmosphere to the freezing point around. Causing everyone to shiver from the cold. Countless spectating players were shocked beyond words. Were the great families from the north and south about to fight each other? This was a huge deal! If this really started a war, it could be said to be a fight between immortals! The ones who would suffer would be the collateral mortals like them! The scene fell into a deathly silence! No one dared to speak! Right at this moment, a woman’s voice appeared. “Since one Gu family isn’t enough, what about our Xu Family?” The graceful Xu Ziyuan walked out from the crowd. Behind her was a group of Xu family members that walked with solemn expressions. This group of people walked directly to Lu Chen’s side. They immediately made their stance clear! The Xu Family chose Lu Chen! Many people felt their scalps go numb! This was going to be a colossus war! They were one of the top five aristocratic families in the Dragon Country! It was said that during the glorious period, they once overpowered all the aristocratic families and became the best in the Dragon Country! Xu Ziyuan’s appearance completely tipped the scale in Lu Chen’s favor. This made Xiao Chuan very angry. At the same time, there was also a trace of fear! Those people from the Xu family were all ruthless people. Xiao Chuan was arrogant and had strength. However, he was rational and knew when to advance and retreat. Those people from the Xu family were different! They were complete lunatics who would not give up until one of them died, regardless of the cost. Especially for Xu Ziyuan, that was considered someone to not be reckoned with. Whoever offended Xu Ziyuan would offend the entire Xu Family! Xiao Chuan took a deep breath and said, “Xu Ziyuan, is this the attitude of your Xu Family?” Xu Ziyuan said with a smile, “This is what the old master wants. If you are not satisfied, you may go and find him yourself.” Xiao Chuan was silent for a moment, then he suddenly raised his head and stared at Lu Chen, “No matter how many people protect you. You must die today!” At this point, he and Lu Chen no longer had a simple personal grudge. This involved the conflict between the various major powers and the Xiao family of the White Alliance. If he kneeled to them, it would mean that the entire Xiao family would have kneeled to them as well! Xiao Chuan could not let his family name crumble like this, he had to stand strong! As soon as he finished speaking, a shadow appeared in the darkness. His voice was hoarse from the vicissitudes of life. He said, “If the two of them are not enough, what about my Dark Night Union?” As soon as he finished speaking, many people felt their blood run cold! The President of the Dark Night Union — Hei Yu, has arrived! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation A middle-aged man dressed in black appeared from the shadows. The moment he appeared, the entire mountain range seemed to have turned a few degrees colder! Hei Yu, this name that terrified all players! The most terrifying assassin in the online gaming world! As long as the final payment was sufficient, the target would definitely die! He was powerful and had a mysterious background. Some people said that the Dark Night Guild was an assassin organization that actually was real in the real world! Xiao Chuan looked at the slowly appearing black shadows and his expression finally changed. He could still keep an eye on the Gu and Xu families, but with the Dark Night Union backing Lu Chen up, he really had to consider carefully before attacking Lu Chen now. Although the Dark Night Guild was not as powerful as the Gu and Xu families. However, their methods were cruel and their desire for revenge was extremely serious! As long as someone provoked them, it was basically impossible for the other party to survive! He had interacted with Hei Yu in the real world and knew his true colors. They were a group of outlaws raised by the organization! Xiao Chuan slowly said, “No, are you really going to stand on the opposite side of the Xiao family? You have to know who protected you back then! Without the old master of the Xiao family, would you be able to live until now?” Hei Yu looked at Xiao Chuan and said, “I will remember the favor of the Xiao family dearly. Therefore, I’ve killed all the people you wanted me to kill. That favor has been settled. “It’s true that I value friendship, and I don’t like owing favors. On account of our friendship, I won’t attack you, but your people must leave.” After saying this, many members of the White Alliance dropped to their knees. At some point in time, a group of black-clothed men appeared. They came from the shadows, and after appearing in an instant, they only left a pile of corpses! Then, they disappeared again! Xiao Chuan’s expression was extremely unsightly. Whatever choice that man decides on, it could never be changed! The person who had killed most of his man was giving him a warning! The scariest thing was that this group of people had nothing to lose! They did not have any worries, nor did they have the shackles of the various big families holding them back! There was simply no way negotiating terms with a group of desperate people. The only ones who could restrain them were those big shots from the Dragon Country! Xiao Chuan clenched his fists tightly as he struggled to think of something quick. Even someone as proud as him could feel the immense pressure from these groups of people. With the three forces joining hands, the value of Morning Mist had now become very high! As Xiao Chuan was about to leave, Lu Chen finally spoke. “I appreciate your kind intentions, everyone. “It’s just that I don’t like accepting help for nothing. I’m not a person who likes to owe favors either. “Since the White Alliance and I have conflict, then let me and the White Alliance resolve it between ourselves. “None of you have to interfere. “Of course, I’ll remember every single one of your good intentions today.” In Lu Chen’s opinion, the Xu family, the Gu family, and the Dark Night Union were all extremely sincere. That day, so many forces had befriended him but he was suspicious if they would actually help. However, when the White Alliance really came knocking on his door, these three really did step up. In the future, if he needed to find people to cooperate with, these three would naturally be the first few that will come to Lu Chen’s mind now. However, there’s no need for these people to get involved in the current mess. After all, the current White Alliance was hardly a threat! Thereupon, Lu Chen pushed the crowd to walk out, and Gu Yiming and the others face slightly changed. “Mr. Morning Mist, don’t be rash...;” “You don’t know how powerful these people could be.” Lu Chen raised his hand and interrupted them. His intentions were very clear! This was a matter between him and the Xiao family of the White Alliance. No one else needed to interfere. This scene made many players surprised and worried. What surprised them was Lu Chen’s courage. He was showing an imposing manner where he dared stand alone and look down on everyone. What worried them was if such a person could really provoke the Xiao family of the White Alliance? As players, they knew how terrifying the Xiao family of the White Alliance was! Xiao Chuan, who was beside them, was ecstatic. He said, “Hehe, did you see that? This is a conflict between me and Morning Mist. You guys should just watch the show.” Gu Yiming and the others were silent. Since Lu Chen had spoken, they could not interfere anymore. However, they were still worried. This Morning Mist dude was too impulsive. According to their latest information, the six vice-presidents of the White Alliance all had golden titles! They had also seen Xiao Chuan’s attributes. The attributes of earning a golden title were extremely terrifying! Now, Lu Chen had to face seven experts with golden titles alone. How could he resist them all in one go? Once Lu Chen died in battle, they needed to immediately send people to guard the Resurrection Point. The people of the White Alliance would torture his corpse. They would constantly kill him and when resurrects, they would kill him again! This would completely make him lose all his EXP in the game. Lu Chen stood motionlessly with a faint smile on his face. “Xiao Chuan, shouldn’t your people make their first move? I still have something to do. Please hurry up while you’re choosing to throw your lives away.” Xiao Chuan’s face darkened as he spoke. “What an arrogant *ss, you don’t know the immense power that we have over you right now! Charge!” As soon as he finished speaking, countless White Alliance players had already swarmed over. They were attacking Lu Chen from all directions! After they were defeated, many White Alliance players had obtained all sorts of skills and even unlocked many special achievements as revenge. All of a sudden, all sorts of skills flew towards Lu Chen! However, at the next moment, Lan Weiwei made her move! The beautiful girl rushed out like a leopard. She entered the crowd as her hands turned into claws that were as sharp as steel blades! She moved as quick as lighting through the sea of people. Countless White Alliance players had yet to react before their necks were all slit! Looking at the red numbers above the players’ heads, Xiao Chuan’s eyes widened open! When did such an expert appear beside Xiao Chuan? Which powerful family was this kid from? Lan Weiwei barged into the crowd of White Alliance players and defeated them easily! None of them had the chance to even touch her before dying! Lu Chen sneered. Lan Weiwei’s combat attributes were extremely terrifying. After all, she was a silver-tier boss! She was no ordinary player! Xiao Chuan gritted his teeth as he glared at Lu Chen and said, “If you’re a man, don’t hide behind a woman!” Lu Chen spread his hands and said, “I’m not hiding. I’m standing right here. If you want to kill me, just come over.” At this moment, everyone realized that Lu Chen had just been standing there as Lan Weiwei attacked the others, he had not moved from his spot at all. Xiao Chuan felt humiliated and immediately said with a gloomy face, “Send a group of people to keep that woman busy. The rest of the vice-leaders, follow me to kill Morning Mist!” After saying that, the six vice-leaders lit up their golden titles and directly charged towards Lu Chen! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation There were seven golden titles! As soon as the golden light appeared above the heads of the members of the White Alliance, everyone cried out in surprise! They had already seen how terrifying Lu Chen and Xiao Chuan’s golden titles were! Now, seven of them appeared at once? What the f*ck! In an instant, everyone felt like they were from two completely different worlds! When Lu Chen saw Xiao Chuan and the others charging towards him, he did not panic at all. He stood rooted to the ground and did not move an inch! He was not afraid of his opponents attacking him at all. They would need at least 4,000 damage points to deal any damage to him. Meanwhile, his HP and Lan Weiwei’s combined had almost reached 100,000 points! Even Xiao Chuan, who had the highest attack power in the arena, only had around 2,000 damage points! Against Lu Chen, he probably would not even be able to break through his defense! Right then, seven opponents attacked from different directions! All sorts of special effects buffs lit up one after another! “Why isn’t Morning Mist dodging these people?” “F*ck, could he have been scared silly so now he’s rooted in that spot?” “It’s probably Morning Mist’s first time seeing so many golden titles!” “What a pity, I thought Morning Mist would be able to suppress them.” “Don’t even think about it. It’s not like no one has ever provoked the White Alliance before this.” “Those people who provoked them are nowhere to be found. The White Alliance always wins!” Many players fell silent. The White Alliance’s foundation in the south was simply too deep and terrifying. Just as everyone thought that Lu Chen was done for...; Suddenly, a scream broke the silence. “How can this be possible!” This scream came from Xiao Chuan. The remaining six vice-leaders of the White Alliance were also in disbelief! “F*ck, what happened?” “I saw the members of the White Alliance attack Morning Mist. What happened?” “Is he immune to damage?” “That’s impossible, right?” Lu Chen looked at them indifferently and waved his hand. “Do you guys want to try again?” Xiao Chuan looked at Lu Chen’s indifferent and mocking expression and could not contain his anger. “I don’t believe it! Go again!” He could not believe that his people’s attacks could not cause any damage to Lu Chen! The golden titles above the seven people’s heads lit up again. This time, they all used their trump cards! All kinds of attacks attacked Lu Chen! Bang! One after the another, the attacks piled upon each other towards Lu Chen. However, when the attacks landed on Lu Chen’s body, there was not much damage! After a long while, a red number slowly appeared above his head. “-1!” How was this possible! Everyone’s jaws dropped in shock. A bunch of big shots from the White Alliance could only deal a single drop of damage to Morning Mist? How high were Morning Mist’s attributes? Everyone present could not sit still anymore! “Isn’t this too f*cking awesome?” “So many experts had attacked him, but they couldn’t even break through Morning Mist’s defense?” “F*ck, does that mean that Morning Mist only gave the White Alliance players a sneak peek of his powers in the Wolf Valley?” “It’s embarrassing, it’s too embarrassing to watch!” “If I was Xiao Chuan of the White Alliance, I would find a hole to hide in right now!” Xu Ziyuan and Gu Yiming looked at each other and saw the shock in each other’s eyes! The members of the Xiao family of the White Alliance attacked with all their might, but they could not hurt Morning Mist at all! How terrifying was this? Could it be that Morning Mist had not shown his true strength the last time they fought? How strong was this guy? Both of their hearts were in turmoil. They were also glad that they had made the right decision today! In the future, they had to seize the opportunity of Morning Mist to deepen their relationship! “Impossible, absolutely impossible!” “What in the world did you just do?” Xiao Chuan simply could not accept this fact. He had brought a large group of people with him. In the end, the other party stood there and allowed them to attack, but did not receive any damage! Lu Chen spread his hands and said, “What did I do? As you can see, I haven’t done anything. It’s just that your strengths are too low. You can’t even break through my defense. What’s there to say? Oh, wait no, you did break through a bit of my defenses I suppose.” Facing Lu Chen’s ridicule, Xiao Chuan felt so powerless for the first time! In the past, he should be the one saying these words! “Morning Mist, you’re making an enemy out of the entire Xiao family.” Lu Chen said indifferently, “Didn’t I make an enemy out of your Xiao family a long time ago? What, you only know about it now? Since you didn’t get it the first time, then I’ll say it again.” Lu Chen rolled his eyes and took in a deep breath before speaking again. “I, Morning Mist, will fight to the death with the White Alliance. I’ll kill every single one of you every time I see you! “Now, was that clear enough for you?” Xiao Chuan was so angry that he laughed and said, “Good, very good! Since you want to make an enemy out of my Xiao family, then you’re just courting death! “Don’t think that just because you hid your identity in the game, I can’t find you in the real world! “The power of the Xiao family is beyond your understanding. “I gave you a chance back then, but I can clearly see that you didn’t comply to it. When I find you in the real world, you’ll regret it!” Lu Chen’s expression froze. Online, it did not matter how much this Xiao Chuan provoked him. He would just end up killing that brat! However, this guy wanted to try and use the power of reality to threaten him. This was a completely despicable act! He did not want his real life to be disturbed by this brat at all! At the same time, he did not like to be threatened this way at all! “You’re threatening me?” Lu Chen’s expression had turned ugly. “Threatening? You can think that way!” Xiao Chuan sneered, “Why, are you afraid? I can give you a chance. All you’ll need to do is kneel to me and admit your mistakes. I’ll let you off, or not, depends. “I’ll even give you a chance to join my White Alliance. How would that sound?” Just as he finished speaking, Lu Chen drew his sword! His voice was as cold as steel. “Sorry, I don’t like living with dogs like you. That’ll be too disgusting!” Xiao Chuan was both shocked and angry. However, before he could refute, the scene in front of him had completely disappeared! He knew that he had died again! With him was the group of vice-leaders from the White Alliance standing next to him, and the White Alliance players that had followed him! In Bear Ridge, another massacre has happened again! Everyone could see that Lu Chen was really angry this time! Nearly 10,000 White Alliance players were killed by Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei as if they were just mowing the grass. This time, he did not turn around and leave the depths of Bear Ridge. Instead, he held his knife and headed straight for the Ressurection Point outside the Novice Village! “Sh*t, what’s he planning to do?” “He’s not going to go there and murder them again, is he?” “No way, this is too exciting!” “Usually, it’s the people from the White Alliance standing point at the Ressurection Point. I didn’t expect that they would be at the shorter end of the stick this time!” “Karma’s a b*tch. This is really satisfying to watch!” The news that Lu Chen was going to look for the people from the White Alliance at the Ressurection Point instantly spread throughout the entire game. Countless players were making their way there as well to see what was going to happen! “I know where he respawned. White Alliance’s Xiao Chuan has resurrected in Novice Village No. 16. Let’s go there quickly!” “There are three Vice Guild leaders outside Novice Village No. 130!” “Okay, come and follow me, I know where the other three are!” At this moment, countless players were clamoring their way to those locations to sneak a peek of Lu Chen’s powers! Xiao Chuan, who had just resurrected, did not have time to react. He respawned and to his sight, was Lu Chen. His eyes were filled with fear as he said, “You...; What are you trying to do?” Lu Chen said coldly, “I hate it when people threaten me.” With that, he killed him again with a single slash! Xiao Chuan’s gaze fell into darkness once again! At the same time, Gu Yiming was a little worried. He was worried that Lu Chen had gone too far. After all, the Xiao family was very powerful. Xiao Chuan’s words of finding Lu Chen in real life and ruining his life were not a joke. “Should we go up and persuade him?” Right when he said this, Hei Yu, who was beside him said, “There’s no need. It’ll be good to let that brat Xiao Chuan humble down and learn a lesson. If the Xiao family dares to make a move, I’ll be lurking in the shadows ready to attack. “No one is more professional than us when it comes to stopping, protecting, and assassinating our targets.” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation On that day, Lu Chen had killed Xiao Chuan a hundred times! Now, his level had reached level 1! Everyone knew what this meant! Xiao Chuan was now completely crippled! In the early stages of the game, the gap between him and others, especially high-end players, was an insurmountable gap! Moreover, it was impossible for Second World to have a sub-account! In other words, Xiao Chuan was completely crippled in Second World! This news spread like wildfire, and it immediately became a trending topic! [It was so satisfying to see the leader of the White Alliance provoke Morning Mist and get crippled from it!] [This would be the downfall of the White Alliance!] [They deserved it, even I laughed watching them fall!] [Morning Mist, you are the best!] [Morning Mist looked so handsome when he counterattacked!] Under the message boards of all the major websites, there were all kinds of news that spread. “Dang, this is awesome, I couldn’t stand the White Alliance for a long time, finally someone came out to punish them!” “I announce, from today onwards, Morning Mist shall be my number one bae!” “Stop being shameless, he’s mine!” “That’s too awesome! He didn’t even lose any HP when the members of the White Alliance were trying hard!” “Hahaha, no, no, no, the most outrageous thing was that he did in fact lose HP… but it was just a drop in the ocean. That was extremely humiliating for the other party!” “Hahaha, this year’s clown should be the leader of the White Alliance, Xiao Chuan!!” “You’re right, the way he acted really reminded me of a clown!” “Shh, shut up. Be careful, if he finds your location in the real world, he would kill you hehe.” The internet was filled with a cheerful atmosphere as they mocked Xiao Chuan. Meanwhile, at the Xiao family in the south. In a luxurious villa, the sound of porcelain being smashed could be heard. A handsome young man was venting the anger he had stored. The room was in a mess, and everything was thrown to the ground. Even the game pod was destroyed. That very man was Xiao Chuan! The direct descendant of the Xiao family, the next head of the family! However, at this moment, he was just an angry little boy, he had almost lost his mind from what had happened! That Morning Mist had actually killed him a hundred times! A hundred times! This meant that he was completely behind in the Second World! Those words that humiliated him in public had hurt his self-esteem! “Morning Mist, I’ll definitely make you pay!” Xiao Chuan’s eyes were bloodshot and filled with anger! At this moment, a servant walked in from outside. “Young Master, the Old Master has invited you over.” Hearing this, Xiao Chuan immediately tried to calm himself down. He suppressed his anger and said, “I understand. I’ll be there right away.” A moment later, Xiao Chuan came to a room. The room was filled with the smell of books. An old man was wearing an old formal suit. Although his hair was white, he was full of energy. “Grandpa, I heard that you’re looking for me?” Xiao Chuan said respectfully. In front of him was the true leader of the Xiao family — Xiao Bai. Usually, everyone referred to him as Grandpa Xiao. The old man nodded and said, “Sit, I know what happened.” Xiao Chuan lowered his head and said, “I’m sorry. I’ve embarrassed the family.” The old man glared at him and said, “It’s good that you know. This time, you’ve done things too rashly.” The old man shook his head and said, “You should know that the Second World is not just a game. Right now, there’s a storm brewing. All the families are trying to gain an upper hand from it. “This is not fun and games. “This is a real war that is happening! “This is something that would change the structure of the world! “You should restrain yourself in this game, you should have known this long ago! Xiao Chuan said, “What you said was right. I know I’m wrong.” “That Morning Mist…” The old man looked at Xiao Chuan and smiled. “What do you want to do about it?” Xiao Chuan looked up with burning eyes. “Do you want to know the truth? Or should I lie?” The old man laughed and said, “Of course, it’d like the truth.” Xiao Chuan clenched his fist before he spoke again. “Of course, it’s to eradicate the root of my problem! “This person has formed a grudge with our Xiao Family! “Moreover, people like him are extremely vengeful. It’s almost impossible for him to let go of the grudge and work together with us every again! “Even if I’m willing to knell, that man will never forgive me! “This is something that can never change! “Moreover, by doing kneeling, the status of the Xiao family will be ruined!” The old man nodded and said, “Continue.” A trace of ruthlessness flashed across Xiao Chuan’s eyes as he said, “Since such a person can not be used by our Xiao family, then we should just get rid of him! “I want to find this person in real life. “Send someone to directly make him disappear from the face of the earth! “This way, we can get rid of this bump! “This would show the power of our Xiao family, to show that we are not a force to be reckoned with! “Let everyone know that whoever messes with the Xiao family will be ruined! “We shall ruin their lives and ruin everything they love. This way no one would dare mess with us!” The old man nodded and said, “Good! “You are a ruthless person. You are arrogant but not stupid! “It’s good that you know how to eradicate the root of the problem! “How about this, you go to Uncle Lin and he will tell you what to do.” Xiao Chuan nodded and said, “Yes. I will be taking my leave now.” After saying that, Xiao Chuan turned around and left. The moment he closed the door, his eyes were full of ruthlessness! … In the Second World, Lu Chen returned to Bear Ridge. Xu Ziyuan and Gu Yiming were beside Lu Chen. “Mr. Morning Mist, I don’t think you’re in a safe situation right now. I think it’s better for you to hide as soon as possible.” Gu Yiming said. Xu Ziyuan said, “That’s what I mean to say too. The Xiao family is very capable. It’s very possible for them to find your location and ruin your life.” Lu Chen shook his head and said, “There’s no rush, they can wait.” In his heart, it did not matter how strong the other party was. He had already felt many changes in his reality. Based on his current attributes, ordinary humans would definitely be unable to deal with him. Moreover, he still had Lan Weiwei! It was best for him to seize the moment to become stronger! After saying that, he waved his hand at everyone and stepped into the depths of Bear Ridge. In the real world, the Dragon Country building was in chaos! In a conference hall, a square-faced man had a gloomy expression. “What are the Xiao family plans, I need to know!” “How did they find out about Lu Chen?” The man below stammered, “We don’t know.” “According to the informant’s report, the Xiao family is already gathering their forces. Lu Chen’s current situation has turned dire!” The middle-aged man was furious and immediately said, “He is the best hope for our Dragon Country!” “You are right!” “If Lu Chen loses even a hair, I will destroy the Xiao Family!” “Quickly, send a message to 0927 and tell her that the situation has changed! She must bring Lu Chen to a safe hiding spot as soon as possible!” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation In Bear Ridge, Lu Chen led Lan Weiwei into a deep valley. After crossing the last hill, they arrived at what should have been a coastal plain. However, at this moment, a gigantic black bear could be seen lying on the ground! Lu Chen took a look at the bear’s attributes. [Ancient Bear King] [Level: 25 (silver)] [HP: 160,000] [Attack: 10,000] [Defense: 400] [Magic Defense: 400] [Skill: Thunder God’s Punishment] [Thunder God’s Punishment: The Ancient Bear King will create a thunder dome to seal the target. Deals 3,000 lightning attribute magic damage per second for 40 seconds!] Although the Bear King only had one skill, its attack seemed to be extremely ridiculous! Having a 3,000 point magic damage per second, that would have a 120,000 point magic damage for 40 seconds! Moreover, with such high defense and HP, how would any player beat this boss? If Lu Chen had seen this Bear King before, he would have turned around and run. Now? Lu Chen’s lips only curled into a smile. A cold light flashed in his palm, and the Ash Wolf King’s Sword appeared in his hand! The large golden words above his head flashed. “Sword God!” The attack power of 9,250 damage points from Lu Chen’s attribute panel soared up to 64,750 points! There was no way the boss was going to be able to tank that much damage! Now, all he needed to do was get one strike in and that would take away about 60,000 points of his opponent’s HP! Lu Chen’s sudden noise alarmed the sleeping bear. The Bear King jumped up from the ground and glared at Lu Chen, annoyed that it was woken up. Right then, Lan Weiwei let out a delicate cry and charged out directly. Her petite body contained endless power. As she rushed forwards, a pale blue wolf phantom appeared behind her! Lu Chen slashed out with his sword while Lan Weiwei clashed with the Bear King! He did 10 slashes in a second! Fortunately, all of them landed on the Bear King’s body! “-6,075!” “-6,075!” “-6,075!” In an instant, the Bear King let out a mournful howl, its 160,000 points health bar then steadily depleted to zero. This was an easy kill! Lu Chen would have never expected him to reach this point in the past, but here he was in all his glory. On the ground, a pile of equipment suddenly dropped. It shined with gold specks, and there were also strange items that garnered his attention. It was an emerald green bamboo stick, and there were two verdant bamboo leaves on it. [10,000-year-old Jade Bamboo] [With this item, one could enter the Bear Ridge Dungeon.] [Danger Level: Dangerous] ‘There is a dungeon here?’ Lu Chen was pleasantly surprised as he thought to himself. He did not gain much from the Wolf Valley. If he had not entered the secret palace of the Ash Wolves, he would not have improved by so much. Lu Chen looked at the Jade Bamboo with anticipation. However, he decided not to rush in at this moment. He recalled what Gu Yiming and Xu Ziyuan had said to him and was a little reluctant in going in. He did not doubt one bit that the Xiao family would come looking for him. Therefore, he needed to return to the real world to make some preparations. He needed to test the extent of his strength in the real world as well. “Let’s go back.” Lu Chen nudged on Lan Weiwei’s shoulder as he spoke. He went offline immediately after that. When he came out of the game pod, the sky had just turned dark. Lan Weiwei tugged at a corner of Lu Chen and pointed at her mouth. “Master, I’m hungry!” Lu Chen slapped his head and almost forgot that he had to now house a bottomless pit at home. Thus, he immediately went to the kitchen to prepare the ingredients for dinner. Lu Chen walked into the kitchen. Right when he was about to pick up the kitchen knife, an idea suddenly popped up into his mind. The last time when he was in the kitchen, he was able to use the Sword God skill. Then, would that mean he could also summon the Ash Wolf King’s Sword in this world? He decided that it was best to give it a try. So with that thought, he tried to summon the sword in the game. In the next moment, a glistening light lit up in his palm. An ocean-blue sword appeared! It was slightly cold to the touch when he held it in his hand. It had the exact same features as it did in-game as well. Woosh! The sword was unsheathed, and the temperature of the entire room immediately dropped by a few degrees. Such power! With a simple thought, Lu Chen felt his entire body get filled with this extreme power. He held the sword in his hand, as long as he wished so, he could casually slash out the sword aura and destroy the world! Lu Chen looked at the paper cup on the countertop. He then tried to carefully control the inexplicable power in his body. He gently waved the long sword in his hand and the sound of humming could be heard. A thin and undetectable white sword aura flew towards the paper cup! In less than half a second, the paper cup was instantly cut in half! It really could be done! Lu Chen was pleasantly surprised by this action! Since he could turn into the Sword God, he wondered if the other titles could also appear in the real world? Lu Chen’s heart jumped from that thought. He silently chanted again! “Shield God!” A golden light flashed, and a small silver shield appeared on Lu Chen’s arm! This was the equipment that was dropped after killing the Bear King. At this moment, with the Shield God’s effect, this small shield suddenly expanded. It released a transparent barrier of light around him, directly protecting Lu Chen! “Weiwei, come here!” Lan Weiwei, who was devouring noodles in the living room, ran over with her cheeks puffed up. “Master, is there a problem?” The little girl mumbled. Lu Chen said, “Come, give this shield a punch with all your strength.” Lan Weiwei blinked her eyes, looked at the house, then turned to Lu Chen with a serious expression. She took a deep breath, clenched her fists, and bent her legs into a fighting stance. Her gaze was locked onto the light shield in front of Lu Chen. She held her breath and focused, then let out a soft shout “Ha!” She threw out a punch! This punch brought with it the sound of air being torn apart, and it seemed to have the shadow of a gray wolf that rode along with the punk! The huge impact created a terrifying shockwave! Bang! Everything in the kitchen was destroyed from the impact! The entire house was shaking violently! All sorts of furniture in the house were destroyed, including the walls. The result of this attack was like an earthquake that occurred at a magnitude of 8.9! Almost everything in the room was destroyed! However, the shield in Lu Chen’s hand was safe and sound! Even Lu Chen himself did not feel any pain from the punch! At this moment, a figure broke through the door. “Lu Chen, are you okay!” A woman with a strong figure wearing a green suit directly barged in. She held a pistol in her hand with a nervous expression. Her heart even sank when she saw the entire room being destroyed. It was over. The Xiao family must have found his identity and barged in! While she was in despair, Lu Chen’s confused voice came from the side. “Liu Yuan?” Liu Yuan was stunned. She looked at the most definitely safe Lu Chen and asked, “Are...; are you okay?” Lu Chen looked at Liu Yuan and the pistol in her hand. With his keen eyesight, he could tell from one look that it was not a fake. So he said in a deep voice, “Liu Yuan, I think I need an explanation for that.” Liu Yuan looked at Lu Chen’s serious expression and knew that she had been exposed. She simply could not hide it anymore. She sighed and said, “In that case, I can only tell the truth. I am a member of the Dragon Country’s team, the Dragon Team.. I was specially sent to protect you.” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation “The Dragon Team?” Lu Chen frowned. He had only heard of this name in various rumors. Everyone thought that it was made up, but who would have thought that it really existed? Liu Yuan nodded and said, “That’s right, I’m from the Dragon Team.” “But why are you protecting me?” Lu Chen asked. Liu Yuan sighed and said, “I think you would have noticed some changes recently. The so-called Second World is completely different from any ordinary game. It has more or less affected reality.” While speaking, she looked at the messy house. Liu Yuan’s pupils constricted from the sight in front of her. It seemed that Lu Chen had figured it out too. If Liu Yuan was really someone from a secret team of the country, then she must have picked up that something was strange with how his apartment was right now! “In order to ensure the safety of the Dragon Country, we must make sure that the situation in the game is within our control. Therefore, we pay special attention to those who have great potential in the Second World.” Liu Yuan continued with her explanation carefully. “So, I’ve been targeted as a great potential?” Lu Chen asked. Liu Yuan nodded and confirmed Lu Chen’s thoughts. “Yes, your appearance has made the higher-ups pay special attention to you. Some of them even want you to join our special organization. “But because your personal information is too little, they don’t know how you may be. “That’s why the higher-ups specially sent me to get to know you and gain more information about who you are. “However, based on my observation over this period of time, not only have you surpassed my expectations, but you have also impressed the higher-ups.” Lu Chen scratched his head and said, “Then, would I have to thank you for that?” Liu Yuan said, “It would not be a problem for you to do so, I’m sure. What you need to do now, however, is to quickly get out of here as soon as possible.” Lu Chen asked with a confused tone, “Get out of here?” Liu Yuan said, “We have to move. That’s an order from the higher-ups. The people from the Xiao family will arrive soon. This time, they would come here to end your life forever.” Lu Chen’s expression turned cold. He had thought that the Xiao family’s revenge would come, but he did not expect it to come so quickly. Moreover, it was not a threat, nor was it a provocation that the Xiao family had said. It was a promise to take his life. This had struck a chord in Lu Chen’s heart. It was clear that the Xiao family member had provoked him first, so he just gave that kid a taste of his own medicine. Little did he know, this one silly action was going to cost him his life! In their eyes, a single person was no different from a vermin! Such a deformed existence was meant to perish. “I’m not leaving,” Lu Chen said indifferently. “Since they dare come, then let’s give it a try.” Liu Yuan said angrily, “Why didn’t you listen to my advice? The Xiao family’s strength is terrifying. The people they sent are definitely beyond the scope of a common person’s understanding. I’m not here to persuade you, it’s an order! You have to move!” As she said this, she took out her identification card. “Citizen of the Dragon Country, Lu Chen, you have the obligation to cooperate with my order right now!” Lu Chen directly ignored her and said, “I’m sorry, I don’t wish to cooperate.” Liu Yuan was so angry that her whole body trembled. “Lu Chen! I’m saving your life! We need to hurry up and leave!” Lu Chen stretched out his hand and waved, and a sword directly appeared in his hand as blue specks of light glinted the hilt. The sword shone, and a stream of sword aura flew out from the sword! It directly cut open the wall in front of them. “I think, with my strength, I won’t need to go.” Liu Yuan looked at the wall in front of her that had collapsed with a loud thud. She was dumbstruck, just a single slash had caused that whole thing to crumble! When did this guy become so terrifying? … On the Shang Hee Highway, a bunch of vehicles could be seen driving forward in a group. In a black car, Xiao Chuan was sitting in the front passenger seat. Behind him sat a spirited old man. “Uncle Lin, is it necessary to bring so many people for such a job?” Xiao Chuan, who was in the front, asked the old man. The old man nodded and said, “It’ll be easier to handle things with so many people. Just because it’s a small matter, we shouldn’t under expect anything. It may be just one person, but we should not take any chances. “Our Xiao family is able to be so powerful today because of this level of cautiousness. “No matter how small the matter is, we definitely make sure that we always have enough manpower. “We have over a hundred experts here. Even those guys in the building won’t be able to stop us from barging in.” Xiao Chuan nodded. Uncle Lin is technically part of the Xiao family. He was in charge of the preparations when it came to murder. The expert fighters of the Xiao family were basically all under his command. This time, Xiao Chuan had requested this Morning Mist person to perish on this earth! Xiao Chuan held a document in his hand. On it was a young man with a handsome face. That very person was Lu Chen! The convoy was driving across the bridge. It would not be long before they reached Lu Chen’s residence. However, at this moment, a group of men dressed in black appeared at the end of the bridge. There were heavy weapons on their shoulders. These said weapons were aimed at the oncoming convoy. Bang! The rocket launchers flew out towards the cars! Lin, who was sitting in one of the cars, felt his heart skip a beat. He instantly grabbed Xiao Chuan for cover. He teleported out of the car. Boom! Dozens of black cars were directly destroyed. The sound of the explosion caused flames to shoot up into the sky. Under the thick smoke, Lin walked out with Xiao Chuan. He looked at the group of black-clothed people with a gloomy expression. “Hei Yu, what do you mean by all of this? You want to make a move on my Xiao Family?” A burly middle-aged man with a scar on his face walked out from behind the group of black-clothed people. His voice was low and hoarse. There was also a hint of coldness, and his entire body emitted a heart-palpitating pressure. It was Hei Yu from the Second World, also known as Hei Yu in the real world! “It’s not that I want to make a move on your Xiao family, but that your Xiao family has come to my territory. You even wish to kill the people on my territory. Lin sneered, “Hei Yu, when did Shang Hee become your territory? On account of the friendship between you and me, I’d suggest you get out of the way. Otherwise, I’ll have to deal with you as well.” After saying that, a group of people walked out from the billowing smoke. Each of them had a menacing aura and looked to be agile. They were all expert fighters of the Xiao family. So many vehicles were bombarded and exploded by heavy weapons, but not a single person seemed to be injured. It was enough to tell that they were not ordinary people. Hei Yu was unfazed by the threat. He said indifferently, “If you can go your way, I’ll close a blind eye and not end any of you here. Lu Chen is the person I want to protect., or rather, I need this person. If you wish to reach him, you’ll have to go through us first.” After saying this, a few black figures suddenly appeared from the thick smoke. The Xiao family experts did not have the time to react. Their heads were directly wiped off. The three black figures carried the heads and turned around, returning to Hei Yu’s side. “How is it, sir? My craftsmanship hasn’t dropped, right?” A skinny man asked with a sharp glint in his eyes. He held up a head as if showing off for Hei Yu to see. Lin’s face turned extremely ugly in the distance. This was the first time the people of the Xiao family had been looked down upon like this. They had not even made a move on their target yet, but their heads had already been chopped off. “Hei Yu, you’re courting death!” Lin said. Hei Yu only looked at Lin and said, “It’s not me who’s courting death, it’s all of you. Do you really think that you can do as you please in Dragon Country? Won’t the higher-ups pay attention to you if you dare mobilize this many people? “As a big family from the south, don’t you know the importance of the Second World to the Dragon Country? “This Lu Chen is much more valuable than you think!” “If you really kill him, think about the price the Xiao family will have to pay.” Lin looked at Hei Yu and said, “Since we have chosen this path, we have already thought about the price we have to pay. “This time, even with the people from your side, we would still take action!” Hei Yu coldly snorted and said, “So there’s nothing left to talk about, right?” His eyes emitted a creepy look. At this point, he could tell that there was no way that he could convince them to turn around. A bloody battle was inevitable! Right when both sides were about to make their move and fight to the death...; A voice sounded in Hei Yu’s earpiece! “Hei Yu, make way for them. Let them pass.” Hei Yu was stunned. His eyes were filled with disbelief as he asked in hushed tones, “I say, sir, is there an issue? This is my first mission after returning to the organization. “Furthermore, with so many people being sent over, aren’t you afraid that the target might die?” On the other end, someone spoke up, “I think you are just itching for a fight, boy! I am now ordering you as a superior! “Number 0114, step aside! The organization has a new plan!” Hei Yu sighed and said, “Yes sir, 0114 reporting for duty, I accept your command.” He waved his hand at his members regretfully. “Everyone, let’s call it a day! “The higher-ups said we don’t need to care about them anymore!” “Damn it, this is my first battle after coming back.” The group of black-clothed men all dispersed and complained. Only the people from the Xiao family were left confused. A moment ago, these people from the assassin organization wanted to fight with him. Why did they suddenly change their attitude? What in the world was happening? <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lin looked at the path in front of them clear and could not tell if it was a trap. The other party came with murderous intent and suddenly decided to make way for him. Although he did not know the reason, he still led his men and walked over. When the Xiao members made their way, Lin spoke up to Hei Yu. “My Xiao family will remember this. No one can be safe and sound after killing a member of the Xiao family, they shall perish from it.” Hei Yu shrugged his shoulders in disdain. “Give it a try. No matter how big the Xiao family is, can their power be bigger than the Dragon Country? “I don’t believe you have the guts to fight with my people, we never hesitate to pull the trigger on others or ourselves.” Hei Yu’s eyes suddenly flashed with a hint of menace. He was a person who had nothing to begin with. He had never been afraid of risking his life. Lin’s gaze froze, and he no longer wanted to pay attention to that mad man. He quickly brought his people out of that mad man’s sight. A moment later, the sound of helicopters flying could be heard in the sky above the Shang Hee bridge. A group of warriors donned in metal armor jumped down from a height of dozens of meters. Bang! A group of warriors have landed! One of the leaders who wore black and red battle armor lifted up his mask to speak. A mature and experienced face was revealed. “Hey you, long time no see.” He looked at the supposed ‘mad man’ and said a quick greeting. Hei Yu’s original name was Du Hei, and he used to protect the king of the Dragon Country. His personal ability was very outstanding, and he was extremely good at killing and assassinating people. Later, he was trained to be a specialized assassin. Usually, he would carry out his missions outside of the country. “Yo, what’s the commotion this time? Even someone like you was summoned? What’s the old man’s plan this time?” Hei Yu looked at the middle-aged man in the black and red armor and asked. The man in front of him was called Li Zhen. He was a special warrior that the Dragon Country had nurtured. He was equivalent to a mutant warrior that had been enhanced by biochemical technology in a sci-fi movie. He could not be compared to an ordinary person. This very man belonged to a member of the psionic group. Li Zhen smiled and said, “You’ll know when the time comes. Right, just letting you know, the old man took a huge risk on something, watch this.” As he said that, he took out an order from his pocket and began reading it. His voice turned solemn as he said, “Members of the Dark Night Union and the leader Du Hei listen up! Number 0114, you shall now fully obey my command! A special mission must be carried out immediately!” Hei Yu’s calm expression immediately disappeared. All the men in black stood up straight and said, “Yes!” “All members of the Dark Night Union, all present, listen to the command of the organization!” After saying that, Li Zhen revealed a smile and extended a hand, “Old friend, welcome back to the team.” Their two hands immediately clasped together forcefully. “I never thought that I would be commanded by you one day. Speaking, what’s this mission about?” Li Zhen’s eyes revealed a trace of murderous intent as he spoke, “Find an opportunity to take down all the members of the Xiao family.” … At this moment, in Lu Chen’s rented apartment, Liu Yuan said nervously. “Are you sure? This is too risky.” About 15 minutes ago, Liu Yuan took the communication device in her hand and contacted her superior. After some discussion, the superior actually agreed to Lu Chen’s plan. According to Lu Chen’s plan, since the Xiao family intended on killing him, it was obvious that they had to defend themselves. According to their understanding of the Second World, they knew that Lu Chen was no longer an ordinary person. He was an expert in almost everything now! However, what they did not know was that Lu Chen’s strength was far more terrifying than they thought! Lu Chen did not bother explaining to this group of people anyway. Moreover, Lan Weiwei was on his side, so he had no fear whatsoever. Apart from that, Lu Chen also understood the whole situation. It was not just him, but the higher-ups of the Dragon Country were extremely furious at the Xiao family’s actions too! They had long intended to make a move against the Xiao family. However, they had never had an excuse or reason. This time, the Xiao family had forcefully taken Lu Chen’s information from the database and they were planning to kill him! This was a reason to retaliate! This was the Dragon Country! They could not afford to be messed around! Thus, Lu Chen and Liu Yuan’s superiors came to an agreement. They would be allowed to fight with the Xiao family! They would try their best to stall them, and the organization would send people over to support them as soon as possible. When those people arrive, they would capture all the people from the Xiao family in one fell swoop. The first reason for agreeing was so that they could have the upper hand on the Xiao family. The other was to test Lu Chen’s strength. Participating in an actual combat setting was always a test of a person’s strength! In the face of Liu Yuan’s worry, Lu Chen waved his hand and said, “It doesn’t matter. Just take it as my resume to enter the Dragon Team.” Liu Yuan’s eyes lit up and said, “Good. With this courage, with your strength, you can definitely enter the Dragon Team easily.” As the two were talking, Lu Chen’s expression changed. He said in a low voice, “They’re here!” As soon as he finished speaking, Lin and the members of the Xiao family had appeared at the door. Xiao Chuan, who was beside Lin, looked at Lu Chen and sneered, “I’ve finally found him! Should I address you as Morning Mist? Or Lu Chen?” Lu Chen looked at Xiao Chuan. It was the president of the White Alliance who looked 70% similar to the one he had met in the game. However, that uncomfortable aura was exactly the same. “Call me whatever you want. Is there a difference?” Xiao Chuan laughed and said, “Of course there is. If we address you by Lu Chen, then it means that we are here to discuss whether you are willing to join our Xiao family.” Lu Chen laughed coldly and said, “What if you address me as Morning Mist?” Xiao Chuan’s smile froze and revealed a fierce expression. “Then we are here to settle the score with you. I’ve said before that I can find you in the real world and make you kneel and beg for mercy, Morning Mist!” He gritted his teeth and said the last sentence word by word. He had been killed a hundred times in the Second World! This caused his real body to be extremely weak when he finally logged off! If it was not for Lin’s protection, he might have died in the car! A direct descendant of the Xiao family had been brought to such a state by an unknown person. This was a great humiliation to the Xiao reputation! Lu Chen looked at this group of people and was extremely calm as he spoke. “I say, President Xiao Chuan… or Chuan… or whatever. You really don’t have a good memory, do you? “Every time you bring a large group of people to deal with me you end up running with your tail between your skimpy legs, do you not recall? “Any smart person can’t fall for the same tricks the third time, right? “And to be honest, from the beginning till the end, I never once provoked you, it was you who did it to me. “But you just had to be a prick and exert your non-existent ego on everyone including me. Which honestly, is what got you in this mess in the first place. “Say, do you enjoy losing? Is that why you’re here today? Are all the people from the Xiao family like this too?” As soon as these words were said, Xiao Chuan felt his heart burn with anger and wanted to spit on Lu Chen’s face. His lips trembled and until they turned white. Who would dare to insult him like this? As long as the direct descendant of the Xiao family shows his status, no one would dare to disrespect him. However, now, Lu Chen not only had humiliated him but also tarnished his family’s name! Lin, who stood behind Xiao Chuan, appeared much more indifferent. He patted Xiao Chuan’s shoulder before speaking to Lu Chen, “Young people these days sure have a sharp tongue. I hope that when you get destroyed later, your ability to speak will be crippled.” Lu Chen smiled coldly and said, “Old man, didn’t see you there.. It seems like you’re part of this Xiao family too. Are you perhaps the dog of the family? Is that why you’re here, to help your owner?” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The Xiao family’s dog? This sentence made all the expert fighters of the Xiao family break out in cold sweat! Although Lin was an outsider, he was deeply trusted by the head of the Xiao family. The two of them could be said to be closer than blood brothers. Many of the expert fighters of the Xiao family were personally taught by Lin. In the past, there was once a middle-sized family that was directly exterminated because of a silly sentence they said. How dare he say that Lin was the dog of the Xiao family! It could be seen how much this sentence had greatly angered the old man. This white-haired old man stared fiercely at Lu Chen and said, “This is the second time this old man has heard this sentence. The person who said this last time has already been smashed to pieces. “That’s good for me. Today really was a great sign to end your life. “You’ve successfully angered this old man to not feel regretful for your death.” After saying this, Lin took a step and rushed towards Lu Chen. A dented footprint appeared on the floor! The strong wind whistled as Lin fiercely punched out. Everyone was looking forward to the moment when Lu Chen’s brain exploded! Liu Yuan was also extremely nervous, she knew how strong Lin’s strength was. If they were divided according to the strength of an ant, a human, an ape, and a god. Lin would be ranked to be someone as strong as the gods! In the entire Dragon Country, only the top figures who guarded a region in every family had this strength! A single strike from a god-rank expert fighter could even destroy an entire building! When Lu Chen saw Lin’s punch, he was not flustered. Instead, he slightly raised his hand, and a small shield appeared on his right arm! As soon as the shield appeared, it directly turned into a dome that protected him! The sound of a heavy punch could be heard. Elder Lin’s punch fiercely smashed onto the screen of light and it stirred up many ripples! The entire house shook violently from the impact! Countless cracks appeared on the walls of the house again! This apartment was basically on the verge of collapsing! However, Lu Chen, who blocked Lin’s punch, looked to be unscathed. He looked at the old man in front of him and finally confirmed his current strength. It was a piece of cake to fight with these ordinary people! “Say, old man, I feel that your strength in that punch wasn’t that great. Did you even put in any effort at all?” Lu Chen sneered “How is that possible!” The Xiao family members were extremely shocked. Lin’s strength was supposed to be extremely terrifying. With his one punch, how could the other party not be harmed? One had to know that that was a heaven-grade expert punch. With just a single move, he should have been able to destroy his opponent! Lin’s eyes also widened as he looked at the young man in front of him in disbelief. He was sure that he had not held back when he was furious just now! However, how did he block it? With this small shield in his hand? What kind of material was it made out of? “Again!” Lin roared and took a step back, turning his body around. Then, he started to mobilize the strength and aura he accumulated in his body. His closed fist suddenly expanded from the rushing blood and even turned a little green. “Try this for size!” He shouted and swung his fist toward Lu Chen again! This was his heaven-grade martial art technique — the Green Mountain Fist! With one punch, even the mountains would collapse! The power exuded was very terrifying! The power of this punch caused the entire building to tremble. Countless amounts of dust rustled down! Boom! The punch landed on Lu Chen’s light shield! The terrifying recoil caused Lin to feel his entire body go numb, and he directly lost consciousness! The building collapsed from the insurmountable impact of the two! Lin and Lu Chen’s figures were drowned in a layer of dust and rubble. The people of the Xiao family, Liu Yuan, and Lan Weiwei all withdrew from the scene. Their original residence had turned into ruins. Everyone stared at the smoke in front of them. The people of the Xiao family looked at the smoke and were worried as to who won. Lin’s punch was extremely fierce. Even other experts dared not to face his attack head-on. Such a young kid definitely would not be able to block such a terrifying powerful punch. He would probably be turned into dust by now! Liu Yuan, who was at the side, was filled with worry. Although Lu Chen’s plan was proposed by him. However, as the mission holder, if Lu Chen were to die, she would be responsible for his death! Liu Yuan was just about to rush into the ruins to look for Lu Chen. However, in the corner of her eyes, she could see that Lan Weiwei was exceptionally calm. She stopped in her tracks when the young girl grabbed the older woman’s elbow. “Don’t worry, master is fine.” Master? Liu Yuan sharply remembered this word. This silver-haired girl with blue eyes gave off a very mysterious feeling. On the ruins in front of them, the dust and smoke finally cleared out. Everyone finally saw the scene in front of them clearly. An old man stretched out with a long arm. His fist landed on the small silver shield on the young man’s right arm. At this moment, a small dent appeared on the shield. However, the young man was calm and did not seem to be hurt at all. On the other hand, the old man’s face looked deathly pale. His fist was drenched in blood, and his thumb had split open. His body stood like a statue. Finally, his body gave out. With a defeated sigh, he spat out a mouthful of blood. His voice was hoarse as he looked at Lu Chen in disbelief, “Impossible, this is absolutely impossible!” It was not only him, but the other people from the Xiao family expressed their shock. “He...; He’s supposed to be a heaven-ranked fighter that could contend even with the gods!” “It should’ve been impossible to hurt someone like him!” “Who the f*ck is that kid?” Lin roared as he wallowed in his defeat. Lu Chen laughed coldly, “What… heaven ranked power? He’s just an old dog that only knows how to follow orders and bully others!” As he finished speaking, a light flashed on his arm. The shield that protected him disappeared instantly. He raised his hand and swung it towards the old man. Elder Lin was sent flying from that one punch and landed not too far away. “Uncle Lin!” “Sir!” Countless people from the Xiao family rushed up to help the old man! They quickly checked his condition. After checking that he was okay, another expert fighter looked up at Lu Chen with fear in his eyes. He said to Xiao Chuan, “Young master, Sir Lin’s veins are all broken! The bones in his right arm are fractured too. I’m afraid to tell you this but...; He’s been crippled!” These words struck Xiao Chuan like a bolt of lightning! How was that possible! How could the strongest fighter Lin lose! In his impression, Lin was the guardian of the Xiao family! He was powerful and omnipotent! He was also the reason why the Xiao family was so arrogant in their ways! However, now he had been beaten to such a state by a 20-year-old young man! He looked at Lu Chen with a hint of fear in his eyes! What was this guy’s history?! Everything he learned about this guy was absolutely wrong! An ordinary person definitely did not have such strength! “Who exactly are you?!” This was the first time Xiao Chuan felt fear! Lu Chen chuckled a little before he stared at Xiao Chuan with menacing eyes. “Don’t you know? “I’m Morning Mist, the one who has killed you a hundred times. “I’m also Lu Chen, the target that you wanted to kill.” He clenched his fist and let out a cracking sound. “I say, President Xiao… young master Xiao… Xiao whatever… “I’m used to living a mundane life. I didn’t expect that there would be such an exciting day for me to experience. “I too wish to give it a try actually. I wonder, how does it feel to kill someone?” As Lu Chen approached step by step. The Xiao family members were petrified! This fellow had beaten Lin into a pulp with one single move. He was definitely not something the rest could withstand! “Young master, quickly, run!” Many of the Xiao family experts shouted angrily. However, just as they finished speaking, a middle-aged man’s voice sounded from behind. “Now you want to leave? Isn’t that a little too late for you?” Bang! Dozens of warriors donned in battle armor landed on the battlefield! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen was shocked, and he looked wary. Liu Yuan immediately ran over and said, “Don’t do anything, they’re on our side!” Lu Chen looked at these few warriors who were dressed like machines, and he could not believe his eyes. The technology of the Dragon Country had already developed to this extent? Then, he saw dozens of mecha warriors fighting with the people of the Xiao family. At the same time, countless black-clothed men charged out from the darkness. “You are being arrested. If you resist, we can kill you at any time!” After taking down more than a dozen experts of the Xiao family, the leading mecha man said these words. As soon as these words were said, everyone from the Xiao family had become obedient. They dared not to resist anymore. Lin, who was the strongest among them, had already fallen. They had no other choice but to comply. Plus, there was Lu Chen who stood menacingly beside them. They did not have the slightest chance of winning. If they stubbornly resisted, they would only be met with death! If they were captured, with the Xiao family’s power, they might be able to save their lives. Therefore, the group obediently surrendered. They were very cooperative and dared not to drag things out. A moment later, after the group of people finished dealing with the Xiao family, they came to Lu Chen’s side. A black-red mecha warrior took out his helmet and stretched out a hand. “Spirit Team’s Li Zhen, the higher-ups sent us to pick them up, and you too.” Lu Chen smiled and shook hands. “Lu Chen.” Li Zhen smiled and said, “I’ve heard of you. Even the top leader was alarmed. You’re really something, kid.” After saying that, he looked at the half-crippled Lin not far away. “As expected, he’s someone that the Dragon Team has taken a fancy to as well. His strength is indeed terrifying. If you have the chance, you’re welcome to join our Spirit Team and have a chat.” Liu Yuan immediately interjected from the side, “Go, go, go. Don’t try to get close to him. He’s a member of our Dragon Team.” Li Zhen said, “You little ray, why can’t I get closer to my future colleagues?” Liu Yuan rolled her eyes. Behind Li Zhen, a man in black walked out. He was silent, he moved like an assassin in the shadows. If he had not opened his mouth, Lu Chen would not have noticed him. “I’m the leader of the Dark Night Union, Du Hei, number 0114. Of course, you can also call me Hei Yu.” Du Hei extended a hand. Lu Chen was a little surprised this time. The famous leader of the Dark Night Guild in-game was actually the leader of the Dark Night Union in real life? It was really as the outside world had said, Hei Yu was really an assassin. Moreover, this guy had given him a piece of top-tier equipment in the game. “So it’s you!” Lu Chen stretched out his finger and said, “I didn’t expect you to be a member of the organization.” Du Hei laughed dryly and said, “I made a mistake and left the organization. If it weren’t for you, I would’ve still been a floater.” Lu Chen said, “So… you’re like a hero or something?” The few of them looked at each other and burst into laughter. … At eight in the evening. Lu Chen followed Liu Yuan and the others to Peaceful Town. They arrived at the Dragon Country building. They met all the members of the Dragon Team in a room. “I’m Liu Changping, welcome to the Dragon Team.” A square-faced middle-aged man extended a hand. Lu Chen extended his hand and said politely, “Mr. Liu, nice to meet you. I’m actually a little curious. Why did you choose me?” Liu Changping looked around the room. There were a total of ten seats. However, besides Liu Changping, there were only five people including Lu Chen. One of them was Liu Yuan and the other was Liu Yu. Long Er had a pointy mouth and monkey-like cheeks. There was also a mysterious man who wore sunglasses, wore long black clothes, and had long hair. Everyone called him Dicer. This was obviously a code name. No one had ever said his real name. Liu Changping smiled at Lu Chen and said, “Do you want to know why?” He gestured for Lu Chen to sit down. Then, he slowly said, “Actually, it’s all because of the opening of the Second World. I think you should have noticed the changes in your body already. “To be able to casually defeat a heaven-ranked expert fighter here, with such terrifying strength, others might need to spend their entire lives chasing after. “As for you, you only used less than half a month in the game to get to this point. “This change is already terrifying enough to be scouted after.” Lu Chen nodded, he knew that the game could affect reality. He had already confirmed this point with his stunt in the kitchen. What he wanted to know was what this Second World actually was! Liu Changping looked at Lu Chen and said, “I know what you want to know. “As for the Second World, we don’t know much about it. “One day, we connected to the capitals of various countries and there was some information being transmitted at a special frequency. “After deciphering the code, we finally understood what it meant. “The Second World was going to descend into this world one day! “At the beginning, we were panicking, we did not know what the Second World was. “Whether the things in the Second World were going to descend or invade our reality, we still don’t know. “After countless meetings, we’ve concluded that the Second World could connect to this world in a certain way. That would be through the Spirit Entry. “The so-called Second World was actually created and tested by various countries. “During the test, they were horrified to find that the improvements obtained in that world could affect this world. “In fact, when we unlock an achievement in the game, we will gain more resources in the real world. “The preciousness of these resources would be enough to change the structure of the world. “According to the information we obtained, the first precious resource is in White Fog City. “Any force in the world that becomes the first to enter a class-change in that city will obtain an extremely precious resource. “Now you know why so many people want the scroll in your hand, right? “The resources gained could be something that could tip the scale in any person’s favor!” After hearing it, Lu Chen was shocked. Everything made more sense to him now. The Second World was not a game, but an oncoming real-world! Liu Changping looked at Lu Chen with a burning gaze and said, “So, we need you. “Or rather, the entire Dragon Country needs you! “Not only do you have the opportunity to be the first to enter White Fog City! “You are also extremely powerful! “We can foresee that in the later stage of the game, it will be a contest between the people in the east and the people in the west! “When that day comes, you will be the one who will carry the flag of the east!” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen looked at Liu Changping. He began to understand the reason for the organization taking a fancy to his potential value. That was why they had paid such a huge price to get him here. After much consideration, he decided to cooperate with what Liu Changping had requested for, or rather, to cooperate with the entire Dragon Country! He could foresee that in the future, he would definitely not be fighting against an individual opponent, but against various forces, or even countries! Under such circumstances, with the Dragon Country backing him up, it would be much more convenient for him to do anything as he pleases to. Lu Chen looked at Liu Changping and nodded. “Okay, I will join your forces.” When Liu Changping heard this, he heaved a sigh of relief out loud and smiled. He had been worried that with Lu Chen’s strong characteristics and solo personality, he was more or less an unpredictable candidate. It would not have been so easy to convince him in joining the Dragon Team. To his surprise, everything went unexpectedly well. He quickly reached out a hand and said, “On behalf of the organization, I shall wholeheartedly welcome you! From now on, you are one of the members of our Dragon Tea. 9875, this shall be your number. After shaking hands with Lu Chen, Liu Changping took out a gold card from his pocket with a smile. On it was the logo of a dragon and a series of unique numbers. “This card can be used to withdraw 100 million dollars from the bank, and it has access to certain hidden places. Ordinary institutions will give you clearance once you show them this card. “Don’t worry. Although we’re an organization of the Dragon Country, it wouldn’t feel too restrictive in terms of your own personal freedom.” Lu Chen nodded and took the card. He knew that this card was a symbol of identifying oneself as a Dragon Team member. Most issues in Dragon Country could be solved with one look at this card. After all, the status of this long-standing organization was not unknown. After Liu Changping gave some simple instructions, Lu Chen was arranged to live in a residence in the Dragon Country building. Once he reached the room, Lu Chen’s eyes widened as he looked at Liu Yuan who was in front of him. “Liu Yuan, didn’t we agree that there won’t be any restrictions on freedom?” On the other bed, a fair-skinned and beautiful woman could be seen sitting comfortably on it. “Do you think I want you to stay here either?” “Isn’t it to ensure my safety?” “It’s not like you don’t know that the Xiao family has sent people to kill you, you need to be protected and you know that.” Liu Yuan quickly retorted. Protecting Lu Chen was actually one of the missions. The higher-ups had also instructed that Lu Chen must join the Dragon Team, even so, he would still have a probation period being on the team. Therefore, her mission had not ended here in protecting him! Lu Chen smiled helplessly and said, “Liu Yuan, there are differences between men and women when it comes to lifestyles. Can’t you just stay next door? Also, I can’t stay here forever, right? When the time comes, I’ll definitely move to other places. Would that mean that you’ll be coming with me too?” When Liu Yuan heard this, she pointed at Lan Weiwei and said, “If there are differences between men and women, then what is she? Don’t worry. The organization will arrange a place for you to stay, or you can find one yourself. It’s up to you honestly. “But from now on, I will be your personal bodyguard and shall be responsible for your safety. This is not restricting your freedom in doing as you please, understand?” Lu Chen felt an oncoming headache. Behind him, Lan Weiwei was lying on the bed, hiding behind his shoulder, revealing half of her face. “Weiwei is my sister, how can this be the same as what I mentioned? As for protection, you saw the battle with the Xiao family. I’m pretty sure when it came to protecting it was the other way around! “So you’ll be following me wherever I go. If this isn’t a surveillance restriction to freedom, what is it? “If that’s the case, I’d rather not join the Dragon Team. There are so many experts in Dragon Country anyway. They don’t necessarily need me. The scroll is in my hands. It’s not that I don’t want the people of the Dragon Country to lose. If you want to go to the White Fog City, I can hand over the scroll to you guys.” Lu Chen spread his hands and said. Liu Yuan was a little flustered by what he said. She knew Lu Chen’s situation clearly. It basically felt like a death order being given to him by the higher-ups. The entry of the Dragon Team was actually very strict, prim, and proper. However, this time, it was an exception for Lu Chen! Therefore, it was very important to understand Lu Chen’s characteristics and personality in all aspects. However, if Lu Chen was forced to leave just like that, it would be even more unacceptable for the organization. She knew very well how much the Dragon Country valued this matter! Lu Chen was now a national treasure and even a glimmer of hope for the Dragon Country’s future! She gritted her teeth and said, “Don’t think that I don’t know what’s actually going on. “You’re an orphan, to begin with, we all know this. Where did your ‘sister’ actually come from! “I’ve wanted to ask you for a long time. What’s her background and history? “If it weren’t for them giving you an exception in many things, she would’ve never been allowed to enter the Dragon Country building at all. “Also, I...; I just need to keep an eye on you, not that I want to follow you around.” Lu Chen had already expected that the Dragon Team would investigate his background, so he was not surprised by Liu Yuan’s words. As for Lan Weiwei’s identity, there was no trace of her in this world, to begin with. Even if he said that he randomly picked her up, they would be able to at least find out a little bit about the younger girl. However, the young girl was basically a Jane Doe to them and he had no plans on letting them know who she was. Moreover, he really did not want someone to follow him around every day. Hence, he looked at Liu Yuan coldly and spoke harshly. “Alright, I knew that that would’ve happened anyways. Whatever freedom I was given was basically a lie. “All aspects of the investigation, surveillance, and restricting my daily life would’ve happened sooner or later. “You’re right. I’m an orphan, and Weiwei isn’t my biological sister. She was picked up by the roadside. Dear neighbor, are you satisfied now?” As he spoke, he threw his number gold card directly to Liu Yuan. “Take this card back and tell your boss that I’m not staying here anymore. “You’ve been following me all this while, and yet you still say that you’re not spying on me. “Weiwei, let’s go!” As he spoke, he was about to take his leave. This time, Liu Yuan turned completely anxious. She immediately said, “You...; You can’t leave! I...; I’m really not spying on you per se.” Her mind was blank and she could not find any other excuses. If she let Lu Chen leave now, then she would be a sinner. All sorts of thoughts flashed through Liu Yuan’s mind. In her flustered state, she actually blurted out. “I followed you because I like you!” The moment she said that she was stunned and her face flushed red! She was shocked, how could she say something like that. Her words, coupled with Liu Yuan’s anxious and red face, were really quite believable. Lu Chen was slightly stunned and then shook his head. “Stop joking, you’re just lying as a cover-up. Aren’t you just trying to...;” Seeing that he did not believe her, Liu Yuan was so anxious that she was about to pull the hair out of her head, so she simply prepared her heart for something that she would be doing next. She directly took a step towards Lu Chen. In the end, she lost her footing and directly pressed onto Lu Chen’s body. Her lips lightly touched. The two people’s minds went blank when they collided. Lu Chen had not expected this at all. As for Liu Yuan, that was her first kiss! She suppressed the shyness in her heart and fiercely hung on to Lu Chen. She pretended to be calm and stood up. “How is it? Did this reassure your thoughts?” Lu Chen looked at the bright red beauty in front of him and nodded blankly. “Here, I’ll return the gold card back to you. I...; I need to go out and get some fresh air.” After saying that, she walked out, dazed. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen looked at Liu Yuan who had escaped in a panicked state and shook his head with a chuckle. This woman looked mature, but she turned out to actually be very innocent. He did not know why the organization had recruited her. At least, Lu Chen could not find anything special about Liu Yuan… for now. Suddenly, Lu Chen’s face heated up from what had happened, and Lan Weiwei gave him a bite. “Master, is this fun?” Lan Weiwei looked at Lu Chen innocently. Lu Chen’s scalp tingled, and he rubbed the space between his brows. “You can’t just go around doing what just we just did, understand?” As he spoke, he ran to the other side of the bed and pointed at the other person in the room. “You can sleep over there at night, and I’ll sleep over here. You’re not allowed to come over here. Do you understand?” Lan Weiwei was a little unhappy about the sleeping placements. She liked to hug her master and sleep. Even so, she still nodded her head. “Okay!” Lu Chen was very satisfied with Lan Weiwei’s answer. She was obedient, strong, and loyal. Most importantly, it was not troublesome at all when he asked her to follow orders. He turned off the lights and did not say anything else for the whole night. In the morning, the sunlight fell into the mortal world. Lu Chen got up as early as the sun rose. Perhaps it was because of what happened yesterday, Liu Yuan had not come back for the whole night. After washing up, she opened the door with Lan Weiwei and found Liu Yuan standing at the door. He said in surprise, “Damn, you didn’t stand at the door for the whole night, did you?” Liu Yuan glared at him and said, “I’m not that st*pid!” “Where are you going?” She followed closely behind Lu Chen. Lu Chen glanced at her and said, “I’m going to buy a house. My place has collapsed. If I don’t buy a house, where am I going to live? I can’t stay here forever now, can I?” Liu Yuan replied with a simple nod and did not say anything more. Her cheeks were still blushed red throughout the whole conversation. Lu Chen roughly knew the reason, but he did not pay any attention to it. The two walked down the stairs. Lu Chen already had a special parking spot in the parking lot. A car from the Dragon Country was parked on his spot. This brand of car was not for sale to outsiders. Only insiders could use it. Therefore, most people would be in awe if they saw someone driving such a car. Lu Chen thought for a moment and walked over. After all, he did not have a car right now. It was better to use what was provided first. Hence, he directly sat in the driver’s seat while Lan Weiwei obediently sat in the back seat. Lu Chen drove the car out and realized that Liu Yuan was still in a daze. He shouted, “What are you doing? Why aren’t you getting in the car?” Liu Yuan was stunned for a moment before she came back to her senses and said, “Didn’t you say that you didn’t want me to follow you?” Her mind was a complete mess yesterday. She could not believe that she had actually done such a thing in a moment of desperation. She did not know how to face Lu Chen at all. She felt a little uncomfortable. Lu Chen rolled his eyes at her and said, “I’m not familiar with Peaceful Town. I’m going to buy a house or something. Someone has to lead the way, right? Hurry up and get in.” Liu Yuan had no choice but to nod as she got on the passenger seat. The car got on the road and drove out of the building. When it entered the street, it immediately attracted a crowd of onlookers. “Damn, which big shot came out from this place?” “The Flood Dragon Car. Only the head of a big family is qualified to ride in it!” “Woah, it’s rare to see it even in Peaceful Town, which is full of distinguished people might I add!” The pedestrians on both sides of the road took out their mobile phones one after another to take photos. Lu Chen was also a little confused. Why did it cause such a big stir when he drove this car? Moreover, those people only dared to take photos from afar and did bit dare to act rashly. They did not even dare to say a bad word about this whole situation. This was because, in Dragon Country, it could be seen as courting death to anger the people who drove a Flood Dragon Car. After the two of them drove for a while, Lu Chen finally could not help but ask out loud to break the silence. “Say, we have to go somewhere to buy a house, don’t we? You can’t ask me to look up guides on the internet while I drive, can you?” Ever since they got on the car, Liu Yuan had been in a daze and her mind had wandered off. It was only after Lu Chen had said a few words that she came back to her senses. “No...; you’re right, I’m sorry, I didn’t sleep well last night. If you want to buy a house, the price of a house in Peaceful Town is very expensive. “But I guess you like remote and quiet places, don’t you? “With your status, it’s too easy to get a small villa in a quiet suburb. You might not even need the 100 million dollars in your card to cover the cost. “I’ll show you the way.” Liu Yuan quickly averted her mind in finding the right place rather than ruminating about what had happened last night. … A moment later, a Flood Dragon Car could be seen turning into the sales department of Cloudy Homestead. Its unique style of the car attracted the attention of all the employees. Everyone immediately called out for the manager. His surname was Zhang, and he had been working at Cloudy Homestead for five years. He had always been known as the reliable person to go to. However, at this moment, beads of sweat appeared on his forehead. He had not heard that a certain big shot was coming today? Could it be a surprise inspection? That was impossible, right? The boss would have known about this, so it was impossible for him to not know anything. Manager Zhang called the boss as he walked out. He kept praying to whoever would listen to his pleas. As he walked downstairs, countless employees were tense. He quickly ran to the car door and waited. He bowed his head, but he did not expect that when the back seat door opened, a beautiful black leather boot landed. A little girl? Manager Zhang’s head was full of questions. Most big shots usually sat in the backseat. The driver seat would have the chauffeur and the co-driver was usually the assistant or something. Looking at the small leather boot, manager Zhang was puzzled. Could it be that the big shot had switched seats today? He turned around and saw the hot figure of Liu Yuan walking down. Her temperament was imposing, and Manager Zhang was instantly sure that this must be the owner of the famous car. As for the young man who got down from the driver’s seat, he completely ignored him. Although he was tall and handsome, he was still a driver. How high of status could he be at such a young age? As for women, they were clearly different in terms of composure! Their own families, their spouses, they could all be her helpers! Therefore, manager Zhang went over and said. “Miss, may I help you...;” Before she could finish, Liu Yuan glanced at Lu Chen and said, “Don’t ask me, ask him.” Manager Zhang was stunned. What was going on? He saw Lu Chen lifting his hand up as a greeting. Suddenly, he felt like he had created an awkward situation. Could this young man be the sugar baby raised by this miss? It was not impossible! However… What was the situation with this little girl that was sat behind? Manager Zhang’s forehead broke out in cold sweat. At a loss, he could only politely say to Lu Chen, “How may I help you today, sir? Would you like to know more about the available homes?” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen looked at the man in front of him. He was only in his early thirties and was wearing a?fitting suit and tie. It was obvious that he was the person in charge here. Therefore, he nodded. He followed manager Zhang into the hall step by step. As they walked, the manager spoke up. “Sir, the Cloudy Homestead is the best of the best in Peaceful Town. “No matter where you want to live, we will definitely find a place that will meet your requirements. “You must know that our background is backed up by the famous Gu family.” “Huh?” Lu Chen stopped in his tracks. He heard a familiar name. Gu Family? He looked at Liu Yuan with a questioning look in his eyes. Liu Yuan said, “I forgot to tell you that Cloudy Homestead properties are provided by the Gu family. “The Gu family has a big business and lives in Peaceful Town. They own almost everything here, you can’t avoid it.” Lu Chen raised his eyebrows and said, “Gu Yiming?” Liu Yuan chuckled and said, “Who else could it be? This young master of the Gu family massacred the family last year and took over all the properties. “Safe to say that it’s not in pretty good hands.” Listening to the conversation between the two, manager Zhang broke out in a cold sweat. Who were these two? How did they dare call the name of the owner so casually? From what he heard, both parties seem to know him? Looking at Lu Chen’s handsome face, he felt that he had misjudged him. Could it be that this young man was a big shot as well? … In a large villa, Gu Yiming was sitting on an office chair. His brows were deeply furrowed. The sound of knocking could be heard outside his door. “Come in!” As soon as he finished speaking, a well-dressed and spirited old man entered the house. “Young Master!” Gu Yiming raised his head. It was Butler Bai. “What’s the matter?” Butler Bai said, “The Xiao family has made a move. They have found information about Morning Mist’s location. The expert fighters of the Xiao family have all been mobilized.” Gu Yiming’s eyes sharpened and he said in a serious voice, “What happened after?” He was considering the value of this Morning Mist player. The Xiao family was not a crazy family. They would rather wait and plan out before acting rashly! Then the price they would have to pay afterward would not be as huge! He knew that the Dragon Country would definitely not sit idly by! This also proved the value of this Morning Mist if they had done something to protect him! If Morning Mist was already dead, then there was no need for him to make a move! If he was not dead, however, it may change the whole game! Then, he had to consider whether or not he should intervene! He had to protect Morning Mist and give him a favor! Therefore, he directly asked for the result. The butler pondered for a moment and said, “The Xiao family, All of them have been wiped out!” “Lin is heavily injured. We don’t know if he’s dead or alive!” Gu Yiming frowned and said, “All of them have been wiped out? Even Lin is heavily injured? What did the higher-ups do?” Butler Bai shook his head and said, “No, according to our intelligence, the higher-ups did not do anything. The Spirit Team and Dragon Team have both made a move. Most of them were there to finish the job. That Lu Chen, or known as Morning Mist, took down Lin alone.” Gu Yiming was shocked! Lin was a heaven rank expert in fighting, he was once just a step away from reaching the spiritual realm! Countless families viewed him as a thorn in their side, they dared not throw hands so carelessly at him! However, now, he was actually beaten by Lu Chen to the point where they did not even know if he was dead or alive?! The Xiao family even suffered a huge setback from the fight?! What kind of background did this Lu Chen possess to finish them off! The Dragon Team and the Spirit Team had specially made their way there too! Gu Yiming could not sit idle any longer, he stood up and slowly paced around the room. He was considering the value of this Lu Chen! He may be considering on a huge gamble! After walking for a moment, he turned to Bai and asked, “Where is this Lu Chen person now?” Elder Bai shook his head and said, “He should be in Peaceful Town looking for a place to stay.” “What do you plan to do?” Gu Yiming replied, “The entire world is in a tense situation right now. The world is about to undergo a huge change. Under such circumstances, even our Gu family might be in shambles. “We must seize the opportunity! “We must befriend this Lu Chen person!” The other man frowned and said, “Since this Lu Chen has interacted with the Dragon Team, it’s very likely that he has been taken in by the organization. It would not be easy to see him now.” It was very important for the Gu family to find Lu Chen first before anyone else. The first to gain his loyalty would obviously benefit the most from it. At this moment, a message was sent to Bai. He picked up his phone and took a look. A look of joy appeared on his face. “Young master, I think we have a lead. “Just now, the Cloudy Homestead people have sent a message saying that a young man had just arrived at the sales department. He drove a Flood Dragon Car. “According to the description, it is very likely that young master is looking for the person we just mentioned.” Gu Yiming’s heart trembled as he said, “Let’s go over right now!” After saying that, he raised his hand and said, “No, it’s better for me to go over personally.” After saying that, he stopped pacing around and left to the same location. … In the Cloudy Homestead sales department, Lu Chen looked at a few places and was not very satisfied with many things. “Well, Mr. Lu, the number of people who are staying in the current room is really quite low. “However, the environment doesn’t meet your requirements. “Why don’t you give me a few more minutes and I’ll look around for a better place for you?” Manager Zhang broke out in a cold sweat. This gentleman’s requirements were quite unique. He wanted to be able to immediately move in. He also wanted a remote and not too small-sized villa. At this moment, there was a commotion outside. Under manager Zhang’s shocked gaze, Gu Yiming walked in. He was walking towards Lu Chen. He had been in the job for five years! This was the first time he had seen the legendary behind-the-scenes boss. Usually, he could only get in touch with the person in charge when it came to important matters! He would probably never see a family leader like Gu Yiming in his entire life. Where did he come from? “Mr. Morning Mist, no, I should address you as Mr. Lu Chen. “Long time no see. “I’m Gu Yiming. We’ve met in the game.” Gu Yiming was very polite. He extended a hand to Lu Chen in a friendly manner. There was an old man standing behind him. He had a mature aura. One look and one could tell that he was an expert in many things. Lu Chen was a little surprised. He did not expect Gu Yiming to come here personally to greet him. He smiled slightly and said, “I didn’t expect to see you here.” Gu Yiming said, “Cloudy Homestead is the property of our Gu family. Looking at Mr. Lu’s situation, I assume you wish for a place to stay? “Are you planning on living in Peaceful Town permanently in the future?” Lu Chen nodded and said, “That’s right. I’ve changed my job careers recently, so I’m going to live in Peaceful Town for a while.” As he said that, he took a look at the flood Dragon Car outside. Gu Yiming recognized it well. When he came, he had already seen the car outside. Lu Chen was definitely from the Dragon organization. However, he was not discouraged. Regardless of whether that man was from the organization or not, there was no harm in building a good relationship. “If you don’t mind, Mr. Lu, you can tell me about what you wish for in a house. “When it comes to real estate, my Gu family could pull some strings to get you what you desire.” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen had expected this. If he wanted to settle down here, he would have to deal with the Gu family. Moreover, he felt that this Gu Yiming was not a bad person. It would not be a bad idea to have a good relationship with him. Therefore, he casually told Gu Yiming about what he was looking for. After Gu Yiming heard it, he thought for a moment and said, “I do have one of Mr. Lu’s requests. “It’s remote and comfortable, but it’s a little bit big. You might like it. “Why don’t you come with me so I can host you?” Gu Yiming briefly introduced the situation of the house. It was originally a suburban villa built by a direct descendant of the family. After the renovation, it was cleaned by Gu Yiming before it could be used. Therefore, everything was brand new. Gu Yiming did not really care whether such a good-for-nothing house from his family should be utilized or not. It was just that the person was a direct descendant of the family. Therefore, he had to die. So now that place was empty. However, Gu Yiming only selectively told his way of the story as he pleased. Lu Chen glanced at Liu Yuan. The other party said unhappily, “Why are you looking at me? If you want to go, then go.” Her heart was in a mess now. Ever since she kissed Lu Chen yesterday, she felt strange. As long as she saw Lu Chen’s face, her heart would beat faster, and the scenes from yesterday would resurface. Gu Yiming also felt that there was a subtle tense atmosphere between the two of them. He said, “Mr. Lu, forgive me for being presumptuous, but who is this?” He needed to find out the relationship between this woman and Lu Chen. If he wanted to be friends with someone, he would also want to gain the favor of the people around the said person. Gu Yiming asked, but Lu Chen had no intentions of hiding it. He directly said, “Liu Yuan, a member of the Dragon Team. She is now my colleague.” Then he pointed at Lan Weiwei who was hiding behind him and said, “Lan Weiwei, my… Oh, a distant cousin.” Lu Chen casually removed her identity. He believed that a big family like the Gu family would definitely investigate his identity, including Lan Weiwei. However, even if they knew, the other party would not dare say it out loud. Moreover, whatever relationship he said was just a relationship anyways. No one would take the time to expose him. Gu Yiming merely nodded. He roughly understood who they were. Liu Yuan was a member of the Dragon Team. That was a piece of top-secret information. He only knew of it, but that was as much as he knew. However, he had been in Peaceful Town for so many years. Those who were able to enter the Dragon Team were not ordinary people. It was very likely that they were part of a larger force and could not be underestimated. From the looks of her relationship with Lu Chen, it was possible for them to develop into something more in the future. First, he thought that Lu Chen was that woman’s confidante. As for the shy little girl behind Lu Chen, she was breathtakingly beautiful. Her eyes were like blue crystals. Even though he had seen countless beauties, he was still stunned by her beauty. This girl was obviously Lu Chen’s woman. Gu Yiming silently noted it down. He greeted Liu Yuan, handed her a business card, and gave Lan Weiwei a small pendant. The blue agate matched Lan Weiwei perfectly. It accentuated this little beauty’s temperament even more. The manager and employees at the side were almost dumbfounded. Did the young master of the Gu family really easily give out things just like that so kindly? Last year, when Peaceful Town was massacred, the whole world was in an uproar. Why was he being so amiable now? As for the necklace pendant that Gu Yiming gave her, they could not recognize it. However, they could recognize the blue gemstone that was the size of a pigeon egg! This thing was worth at least a million. It could be over ten million! Therefore, when Lu Chen and the others walked out of the sales department, the employees were still in a daze. The world of the rich was different from what they would ever know. … In the suburbs of Peaceful Town. In front of Lu Chen was a villa that looked like an ancient castle. In front of him was a huge garden. In the middle of the garden was a sculpture of a person. There was also a fountain. The environment seemed very elegant. It was a beautiful palace, but it was much too big for him. The cost of building such a huge villa could be estimated to be one billion! Moreover, he had brought Lan Weiwei to live in such a huge villa. It felt a little too empty. However, Lan Weiwei, who had never spoken, ran straight into the castle-like garden villa when she saw it. Her little leather boots stepped on the stone path and chased after a butterfly. After a while, she disappeared. Lu Chen said a little awkwardly, “I’m sorry. My relative is a little mischievous.” Gu Yiming laughed and said, “I can see that she likes this place very much.” Lu Chen nodded and followed Gu Yiming inside. Compared to the bustling downtown area, this place was more elegant and the air that surrounded this place was peaceful. The entire garden was privatized. In front of it was a huge castle, and behind it was a huge courtyard. Lu Chen felt that even if there were a few thousand people living here, it would not be a problem. What was that son of the Gu family doing with this thing? If it was to be used for his own residence, it would not seem very reasonable. Moreover, a capital of more than one billion was not a small amount for the Gu family. It was impossible for a good-for-nothing profligate to not get so much money through the family. Lu Chen followed Gu Yiming’s introduction into the garden, but slowly, he realized that something was not right. A strange power slowly flowed into his body. The mark on his forehead seemed to be showing itself! The moonlight in his body seemed to be seeping out? Lu Chen was shocked! There was definitely a big secret hidden in this garden! Liu Yuan and Gu Yiming did not seem to notice it at all. At this moment, Lan Weiwei appeared out of nowhere. Her pair of blue eyes were extremely bright. She looked at Lu Chen and quickly walked up to him. She pulled a corner and pulled him to the side. She said in a low voice, “Master, can we stay here? This place seems really great for me.” Lu Chen’s heart skipped a beat. This place apparently could even affect Lan Weiwei. He glanced at Gu Yiming walking in the distance. He was sure that Gu Yiming definitely did not know that this garden had a special effect. He just did not know whether this effect would only work for the Ash Wolf clan members or for everyone else. If Gu Yiming knew that this garden had some special function, he definitely would not have brought him here. This meant that only members of the clan could feel it! Lu Chen pondered for a moment and walked over. He said to Gu Yiming, “Gu Yiming, we like this place very much. Name your price.” He had made up his mind to buy this place. No matter how much Gu Yuming offered, he could at most inform the higher-ups about the price. No matter what, the value of the gold card in his hand was not low either! When Gu Yiming heard this, he smiled and said, “Since we’ve met before, I can’t just name my price as I wish. “You’re new here, so I should be sincere about it, shouldn’t I? “I’ll only take 100 million for this garden, how about that?” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation 100 million? Liu Yuan was stunned. This garden villa would cost at least 1 billion, and that was the estimated cost. If it was sold for a price, it would be much more than that! This 100 million was no different from giving it away for free! Moreover, Gu Yiming was really smart. If he gave it away for free, it would more or less seem impolite for both parties. No matter how one looked at it, this was a display of his financial strength. Not only that, he even offered a price that was far lower than the market price… It would seem that he had a sense of propriety. Lu Chen was not stupid. Naturally, he could see Gu Yiming’s intentions. The other party’s sincerity could be said to be hidden with underlying intentions. However, if he still did not accept it, it would be a little impolite. Hence, Lu Chen nodded and said. “Alright, 100 million then. I, Lu Chen, will remember this favor.” At this point, the corner of Gu Yiming’s mouth finally had a comfortable smile. He had put in so much effort just to ask for a favor from Lu Chen. He did not want to underestimate this favor. Sometimes, the effect of not cashing in the favor was much greater than using it. Gu Yiming was also very happy. He directly ordered Butler Bai to bring the papers. A few of them completed the formalities in the main hall of the villa. In the hall, Gu Yiming stood up and shook hands with Lu Chen. He nodded and said, “Alright, Lu Chen, this whole villa officially now belongs to you. “If you need anything from the Gu family in the future, just say the word. “My Gu family has great influence in Peaceful Town, we will do what we can with your requests.” After saying that, he left with Bai, feeling satisfied. Lu Chen looked at Gu Yiming’s departing figure and pondered for a moment. He said to Liu Yuan beside him, “Do all members of the aristocratic families have this kind of contact with the people in the organization?” Liu Yuan shook her head and said, “You’re thinking too much into such things. From what I’ve known, you are the only exception. It’s not like you don’t know that an ordinary person doesn’t deserve to be treated like this by the head of a family. “You owe the Gu family a favor now. How are you going to repay it?” Lu Chen shook his head and said, “I haven’t thought about it yet.” Then, he looked around the hall and said to Liu Yuan, “I’m hungry. I’m going to make some food.” When Liu Yuan heard this, she could not help but widen her eyes. “I’m your teammate, not your nanny, or the chef!” Lu Chen blinked and said, “Look at this huge villa. There are only the three of us. Weiwei and I don’t know how to cook. Wouldn’t we have to trouble you to do it for us?” Liu Yuan was so angry that she grinded her teeth. She turned around and replied in a bad mood, “Order your own takeout!” Lu Chen was not interested in pestering her further. He placed an order on his phone and went upstairs. This building had a total of twenty floors. Lu Chen directly chose the biggest bedroom on the top floor. Lan Weiwei was making a fuss about staying with him. Lu Chen thought about it and decided to let her be. However, he still arranged a room for her next door. All of Lan Weiwei’s supplies were in another room. At this moment, Lu Chen was the only one in the room. He sat on the bed and rubbed the space between his eyebrows. A lot of things had happened in the past two days. He came to Peaceful Town from Shang Hee all of a sudden and even settled down here. He went from a commoner to a core member of the Dragon Team. He became an existence that ordinary people could not come into contact with so easily. He even had a friendship with one of the largest families in the Dragon Country. Lu Chen felt that since the release of Second World, he had changed in many ways. However, speaking of Second World, he had not been online for two days, right? The gaming pod arranged by the organization had not arrived yet. At least, he had to wait until nightfall. Therefore, during this period of time, he could not enter the game. It was rare for him to be this free. He pulled open the curtains, and with a glance, he could see the scenery of the garden outside. Looking at the colorful scenery, Lu Chen had some doubts in his heart. What exactly was hidden in this garden? How did it directly affect him and Lan Weiwei? Was it a specific influence on the Ash Wolf bloodline? Or was it something else? He was sure that the second generation of the rich and profligate Gu family had a secret hidden in the garden. Even Gu Yiming did not know about this secret. If Gu Yiming knew that there was something going on with the garden, then why did he give it to him? Did he have other motives? Also, the Xiao family had brazenly come to his previous home and had been taken away by the Dragon Group and the Spirit Team. He could not just ignore the Xiao family’s matter either. After all, they had come knocking on his door seeking his death. Those who did now would only be courting for death. Everything that had happened was troubling Lu Chen. He simply closed the curtains, closed his eyes, and stopped thinking about it. After a moment, he felt that his surroundings had become quiet. There seemed to be a sound echoing in his ears. The darkness in front of him slowly dissipated, and an attribute panel appeared in front of him. He raised his hand, and a backpack popped out. Inside it was a dazzling array of equipment. Lu Chen, who was sleeping, was suddenly shocked! This… was this his backpack in the game? How did it appear in front of him? He looked around, and the moonlight was filled with nothingness. In front of him was a huge black hole. It was very similar to the game log-in interface! He could log into the game without using the game pod? Lu Chen was shocked, then he remembered something. Liu Changping had once said. The Second World was not a game! It was a direct real world! So, would that mean that he could directly enter that world? However, what would this all mean? Transmigrating with his soul? If he died in that world, would he be unable to revive? Or would he be the same as an ordinary player and go back to the Ressurection Point? Lu Chen looked at the black hole in front of him and hesitated. After a moment, he gritted his teeth. No matter what, he had to go in and take a look! If he was afraid, what would he do in the future? This was a world built on war! He could not afford to relax for even a moment! With that thought, he directly stepped into the black hole. His figure quickly disappeared into the black hole. A burst of azure blue light flashed past came thereafter. Lu Chen opened his eyes, and the fragrance of the soil invaded his olfactory nerves. In front of him was a mountain range, covered by huge rocks. He was standing under the mountain range, and the sun at noon was so hot that even wild monsters were unwilling to come out. This was… Bear Ridge? Lu Chen recognized it at a first glance. This was the place where he went offline, Bear Ridge! He had really entered the Second World! Backpack! With a thought from Lu Chen, the backpack automatically popped out. All kinds of items were still there. It was just that there was an indescribable feeling. This time, there was no system notification, only a certain will silently guiding him. Following the guidance of this will, Lu Chen sat down cross-legged on the spot. Everything in front of him fell into darkness once again. After a moment, he opened his eyes again. He had returned to reality! Lu Chen was suddenly startled awake. He straightened up like a wooden plank and flipped over. He looked at everything around him in disbelief. He could now shuttle back and forth between two worlds? <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen could not believe what was happening. What did exactly happen that allowed him to travel back and forth between the two worlds? Lu Chen calmed himself by slowly exhaling his caught breath. Closing his eyes, the blue light screen appeared again. After repeating it a few times, Lu Chen was finally certain about what had just happened! He was sure that he could directly travel to the Second World. It was basically no different from using the game pod now. According to Liu Changping, the players in this world could send their spirit to the Second World through the game pod. In a way, the game pod was just a medium to go to Second World. However, now, Lu Chen would not need this medium to directly enter the Second World anymore. This would be a quicker method compared to the game pod, because the game pod might have some kind of defense mechanism, protecting everyone’s spirit and soul. It would allow these players to revive after they died in Second World. However, Lu Chen’s descent was different. If he died in the Second World, his soul would be scattered and destroyed! He could feel the will of the Second World. This world seemed to be… Asking for help? Lu Chen paced back and forth in the room he was in. The situation was getting more and more serious. It was just as Liu Changping had said about this whole situation. The Second World would arrive on this continent sooner or later and become one with this world. Therefore, it was extremely important to constantly improve his strength! According to the test just now, Lu Chen found that he could only enter the Second World mentally. The other things that he brought with him in this world could not enter the Second World just yet. Lu Chen had another hypothesis in his mind. He stood up and walked quickly to the room next door. “Weiwei?” He knocked on the door. The door was opened very quickly. Lan Weiwei blinked her eyes and looked at Lu Chen. She said quickly, “Master?” Lu Chen nodded to her greeting. When there were only two people, Lu Chen allowed her to use this title. He walked in and closed the door. He said to Lan Weiwei, “Weiwei, try to close your eyes. Oh, just like how you normally visualize the moonlight.” Lan Weiwei nodded her head even if she did not understand. Although she did not know what Lu Chen was going to do, she still loyally listened to Lu Chen’s request. She sat on the bed and crossed her legs. Then, she slowly closed her eyes. Lu Chen also tried to sit beside Lan Weiwei and fell into silence. A moment later, Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei entered the Second World together! Outside Bear Ridge, Lu Chen’s eyes were filled with surprise. Lan Weiwei’s mouth was wide open and full of surprise. “Master, this feeling is so wonderful.” Lan Weiwei said. Lu Chen asked, “Do you have any special feelings you feel right now?” Lan Weiwei tilted her head and thought for a long time. “It’s like I broke something. In the past, I always felt like I was in a daze, but now it seems like my mind had become much clearer. Also, I feel that the energy in my body is increasing at a much faster speed now.” When Lu Chen heard this, he immediately looked at the interface. No matter how many times he looked at it, the scene on it still gave him a fright. The experience bar on his interface was slowly increasing! Although the speed was not fast, it was really increasing! This was something that he had never encountered before. It seemed that there was some sort of bonus to descending without the game pod! Lu Chen quickly came to this conclusion. He thought for a while and decided to give it a try in this situation! If this was the case, what effect would killing wild monsters have? With a thought, a blue longsword appeared in Lu Chen’s hand. The blade of the sword was sharp and exuded a bone-piercing chill. He did not know if it was because it had descended directly. Lu Chen felt that the temperature of this sword felt chillier than usual! It was the Ash Wolf King’s Sword! Lu Chen brought Lan Weiwei step by step and walked towards the depths of Bear Ridge. Soon, countless huge black bears were alarmed by their presence. The huge monsters were like a pitch-black small mountain. With one step, the earth and mountains shook. They directly rushed towards Lu Chen! The corners of Lu Chen’s mouth curled up into a cold smile. He raised his hand and swung his sword! The sword clashing with the monsters could be heard. The sword aura clanged and directly cut the black bear into two halves! The giant bear’s corpse fell to the ground, and its internal organs scattered all over the ground. The stench of blood rushed up to the sky, and fresh blood splattered everywhere. Lu Chen frowned slightly. The realness of killing had increased by several times! Previously in Second World, although the feeling of killing was already realistic enough,. That feeling could not be compared to how he felt right now. Perhaps it was because of the system’s reminder, but it always made people feel like they were in a game. However, this time, Lu Chen had killed this black bear and the feeling was completely different! Lan Weiwei looked at the stunned Lu Chen in confusion. “Master?” Lu Chen shook his head and said, “It’s fine.” Then, he put away the sword in his hand and walked forward quickly. The moment he killed the black bear, Lu Chen’s questions were answered. This bear could no longer respawn. He had killed it for real. If he died in this world, then that would mean that he would never wake up again. Lu Chen continued to walk towards Bear Ridge. There was still an item in his backpack. It was an emerald green bamboo stick that was emitting a faint light. [10,000-year-old Jade Bamboo ] That was the certificate to enter Bear Ridge, similar to Wolf Valley. Lu Chen guessed that after these bosses were defeated, there would be a special dungeon. The rewards were rich and filled with danger. Lu Chen walked very quickly and arrived at the depths of Bear Ridge in a few minutes. The Bear King that was originally standing there had been killed. A new bear King had appeared in the Second World. However, his attributes were on a completely different level from the previous Bear King. With two slashes it died. After the Bear King was killed, Lu Chen took out the Jade Bamboo from his backpack. After taking out this item, the surroundings began to emit a golden light. It was as if a lake had been awakened, and it was surging. Lu Chen walked towards the golden light in front of him. After a moment, he entered the dungeon. This was a gloomy bamboo forest. The surroundings were filled with tall and straight bamboo. The atmosphere was very quiet, only the rustling sound of the wind blowing through the bamboo forest could be heard. Lu Chen wanted to stay vigilant. After all, the quieter it was, the more dangerous it could be. He held the sword in his hand, his gaze sharp. He carefully walked forward after he prepared himself. The bamboo forest went on for miles and miles, but it gave off a comfortable and serene feeling. The sun shone down from above. It made people drop their guard and their vigilance. Lu Chen swallowed a mouthful of saliva. He knew that this place was absolutely dangerous. The system had warned him before, so there should not be any mistakes. It was just like the Wolf Valley. He almost died there and the dangers of that time were still vivid in Lu Chen’s mind, he did not want it to happen again. However, after Lu Chen walked for a few minutes, he saw a round, chubby… panda? <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation A panda? What in the world was going on? Lu Chen looked at the panda in front of him and was confused. Does this thing have great lethality? He did not know how to react in this given situation at all. The panda in front of him was obviously still a cub as it lay under the bamboo forest and ate bamboo shoots. Seeing Lu Chen come over, the baby panda was so scared that it immediately hugged the bamboo in its hand. It was as though it was afraid that Lu Chen would snatch it away. The information of the panda in front of him had already appeared in Lu Chen’s mind. [Ancient Panda] [Level: 1] [HP: 1,600] [Attack: 100] [Defense: 800] [Magic Defense: 800] [Skill: Luck Bonus] Lu Chen took a glance at it and was shocked. Was this a f*cking attribute that a level 1 player should have? Not only did the panda have a high attack and HP, but what the h*ll was this 800 defense points? Moreover, to have such double resistance at Level 1, was this not too f*cking ridiculous for anyone to have? And that skill, Luck Bonus? Was this thing supposed to be really really dangerous? All sorts of thoughts flashed through Lu Chen’s mind. He was considering whether or not he should use the taming skill to put this under his care. However, when he used the skill, he realized that the skill could not be used on the said target! Lu Chen was confused, what exactly was the origin of this thing? Lu Chen tried to get closer to the giant panda, but the panda seemed to be very alert about what was going on. As soon as Lu Chen got close, it retreated. Its eyes were aggrieved, and it did not forget to hug the bamboo when it ran further back. It was clearly a gluttonous creature. When he managed to get much closer, the panda was so scared that it threw away the bamboo. With a whoosh, it directly jumped onto the tree. Lu Chen smiled bitterly. What an agile creature. Lu Chen thought for a long time, but he could not think of any other way to approach it. Even the taming skill was useless. Maybe he could just go up to it and grab it, right? Suddenly, his eyes lit up. Did he not have a 10,000-year-old Jade Bamboo in his backpack? As the proof for this dungeon opening, it had always been in his backpack. After entering the dungeon, maybe the bamboo could be related to the panda that just ran away… With the thought of giving it a try, Lu Chen took out the 10,000-year-old Jade Bamboo from his backpack. Sure enough, as soon as this 10,000-year-old Jade Bamboo was taken out, it gave off an indescribable fragrance. The panda that was hiding behind one of the trees sniffled. It was obviously attracted by the smell. It looked eagerly at the bamboo in Lu Chen’s hand. It wanted it, but it was afraid. Lu Chen smiled. He waved at the panda with the bamboo. “If you want it, come down and I’ll give it to you.” The panda seemed to understand Lu Chen’s words easily. The panda immediately made up its mind and slipped down from the tree. However, it still stopped two meters in front of Lu Chen. It could be seen that the panda was very afraid of strangers. Fortunately, the Jade Bamboo in Lu Chen’s hand was attractive enough for it to go closer. The baby panda stared at it with saliva dripping out from its mouth. The temptation of the Jade Bamboo overcame the fear of strangers. Finally, it came towards Lu Chen Bit by bit. “Here you go.” Lu Chen handed over one end of the Jade Bamboo. The panda held one end with eyes full of joy. After a moment, it opened its mouth and bit down. Once it bit down, sparks almost appeared on the Jade Bamboo. The baby panda covered its mouth and fell to the ground. It made noises as though it was hurt from biting onto the 10,000-year-old Jade Bamboo. It was obvious that the Jade Bamboo was very hard and could not be bitten through. Lu Chen smiled. This fellow was quite interesting. He approached and placed his hand on the baby panda’s head. It was fluffy. The baby panda felt wronged and stood up, stretching out a hand. Lu Chen was stunned by this gesture. “What?” It waved its arm once more towards Lu Chen. Only then did Lu Chen realize that this fellow wanted the Jade Bamboo in his hand. Lu Chen smiled and said, “You want this so badly? Here.” Lu Chen stuffed the 10,000-year-old Jade Bamboo into the baby panda’s arms. He looked at him from the side as the panda hugged the bamboo with sparkling eyes. It then rolled onto the ground happily. A pair of fat hands held the bamboo tightly as it gnawed on it for a long time. However, no matter what, the Jade Bamboo did not leave a trace of a dent or whatnot. This made the baby panda feel very helpless. The panda walked to Lu Chen’s side angrily and handed the Jade Bamboo back to him. It was as if the panda was throwing a small tantrum. It also seemed like it wanted to ask Lu Chen why it was so hard to eat the bamboo. Lu Chen shook his head. This little thing must have gained sentience. It was obviously much smarter than an average wild beast. He took the Jade Bamboo back and to his surprise, the baby panda was clinging onto his leg! Lu Chen was speechless. Was this fellow not afraid of strangers? Why was it sticking to him now? Lan Weiwei came over from the side. She crouched down and locked her eyes on the baby panda. The baby panda was a little scared from her movements and hid behind Lu Chen. Lan Weiwei seemed to be very interested in it and revealed an unpredictable smile. She lifted the baby panda up and the baby panda immediately made struggling noises. Its eyes were full of resistance as it cried out. Lu Chen watched as Lan Weiwei played with the baby panda like a ball. She threw it into the sky and then fell back down. The baby panda was so scared that it cried out. Lan Weiwei let out a silver bell-like laugh. The baby panda was in mid-air and looked at Lu Chen for help. That pitiful look made Lu Chen feel amused. “Alright, Weiwei, stop tormenting him. Give this little guy back to me.” Lu Chen said. However, he did not expect Lan Weiwei to hold the baby panda tighter and she even tried to hide the panda away from Lu Chen. She pouted and said, “But this panda is fun!” This little girl was treating the panda like a doll. This was not a good idea at all. This panda would die if it was toyed with by Lan Weiwei. Thus, Lu Chen said with a straight face, “Weiwei, listen to me! Give me the panda.” Sure enough, once Lu Chen was strict with his command, Lan Weiwei cowered. Biting her lips, she reluctantly handed over the panda. The both of them looked unhappy. Lu Chen shook his head slightly and patted her head to comfort her. Then, he took the panda from her hand. The little guy immediately felt as if he had been pardoned. He immediately shrank into Lu Chen’s arms as if indicating that that woman was really too scary! [The Ancient Panda recognizes you as its master. Do you accept?] This thought suddenly came to his mind. He looked at the panda in his arms in surprise. This thing was actually willing to acknowledge him as its master? He had originally planned to use his taming skill, but who would have thought that it would be so easy? Lu Chen did not hesitate and directly nodded. Not to mention about the aspects of this fellow, just the 800 defense on that level alone was enough for Lu Chen to not want to let it go. If he were to raise it in the future, it would be a perfect front liner shield! [Ding! You and the Ancient Panda have become master and servant.] [Please name it.] Lu Chen pondered for a moment and looked at the round little fellow. He thought of a name. He grinned and said, “Then I’ll call you Rollie.” When the little fellow heard this, he revealed a look of disdain, but Lu Chen directly ignored him. After a moment, Lu Chen brought Lan Weiwei out of the secret realm. They went offline again. The two of them slowly woke up in the room. They found a panda in front of them. It was round and slowly crawled in front of them… Lu Chen did not expect this to happen at all. Rollie had actually been brought back to the real world! Was this the same concept as what happened to Lan Weiwei? He rubbed his eyes and confirmed once again that this was not an illusion. On the other hand, Lan Weiwei had no reaction at all. However, this girl had never been the brightest of the bunch. It would have been abnormal for her to have a reaction to these findings. At this moment, in the room, Lan Weiwei was poking Rollie’s belly with her finger. Lu Chen could feel a headache coming on. Was he going to have to raise a panda as well? As he pondered, he heard a knock on his door. “Lu Chen, what are you doing? I’m really annoyed right now. Do you take me as your servant? Do I have to take care of everything?” Yes, it was Liu Yuan’s voice. Lu Chen opened the door and saw an infuriated beauty. She was glaring at him with a pair of red eyes. “What’s wrong?” Lu Chen asked. Liu Yuan rolled her eyes and said, “What do you think? You ordered takeout. The food in the living room has piled up like a mountain with what you ordered! I know Weiwei eats a lot, but this much?! Besides, shouldn’t you do these things yourself, it’s your food anyways.” Lu Chen rolled his eyes at her and said, “Since you want to be my girlfriend, shouldn’t you do these things for us?” This sentence made Liu Yuan choke on her anger. Her face immediately turned red. Right as she was about to find a way to refute Lu Chen, she saw Rollie crawling in the room. “Lu Chen, when did you have a panda? Don’t tell me that this is a gift from Gu Yiming?” Lu Chen scratched his head. He had not thought of an explanation. He could only say, “I guess so. Do you by any chance know how to raise it?” Liu Yuan widened her eyes and said, “I really don’t know what you’re trying to imply here. First you want to raise a little girl, and now you want to raise a panda. What else are you going to raise in the future?” Lu Chen shrugged and said casually, “Maybe you?” When he said this, Liu Yuan’s face turned red. “You… stop being crazy!” After saying that, he turned around and went downstairs. Lu Chen smiled. He finally knew Liu Yuan’s weakness. He turned around and called out to Lan Weiwei, “Weiwei, let’s go. Let’s go down and eat.” Lan Weiwei replied and quickly followed behind with Rollie in her arms. They took the elevator from upstairs to the first floor very quickly. When they reached, the living room was already filled with all kinds of food. Lan Weiwei was a gluttonous foodie. As soon as she saw food, she threw Rollie aside. Her eyes lit up and she started to eat whatever was placed on the table. Lu Chen picked Rollie up and realized that this little guy basically had no interest in food. After coming out of Second World, this guy seemed to have no energy whatsoever for anything. He lowered his head and lay on Lu Chen’s shoulder comfortably. Lu Chen felt that something was wrong. This guy seemed to be emitting a weak aura. Could it be that he was not able to adapt to the environment in the real world? After all, he looked like a panda, but he was actually a species from Second World. With this thought, Lu Chen began to wonder about other possibilities. After a moment, he raised his head and said to Liu Yuan, “I want to plant a bamboo forest in the garden. What do you think?” Liu Yuan widened her eyes and said, “Are you really going to keep it?” She was a little surprised. She thought that Gu Yiming gave Lu Chen the panda just for novelty sake. She assumed that he would send it back a few days later because she thought that he did not like pets. She had done some research on him and could make several judgments based on his interaction with others during this period of time. Lu Chen was the kind of person who would not do it unless there was something that could benefit him as well. Moreover, he was also the kind of person who would not give up until he saw the light at the end of the tunnel. In this world, even if pandas were not particularly rare animals, they were still not allowed to be kept privately. Lu Chen said, “I think that Rollie is very cute, so I’m going to keep it. What’s wrong with that?” Liu Yuan rolled her eyes and said, “You’d rather keep a panda than give me a room here. You still treat me like a servant. Only a ghost would be willing to help you.” Lu Chen smiled and said, “I’m not chasing you away. It’s such a big villa with so many rooms. Aren’t you free to pick any room you want?” Liu Yuan said, “Then why aren’t you letting me stay in the room next to you?” Lu Chen touched his nose and said, “I feel that we still lack some understanding between us. I don’t want things to develop so quickly. Don’t you think so, darling?” Liu Yuan immediately felt ashamed and indignant. “Lu Chen, you should stop with this nonsense!” Lu Chen said indifferently, “Who should stop? Who was the one that said that they wanted to be close to me because they liked me? That person even stole my first kiss!” Liu Yuan gritted her teeth and said, “Hah, you’ve never had your first kiss? Liar! How many girls have you met before me!” Lu Chen said, “Looks like you’ve done your homework on me. Then you should know that I’m very interested in beautiful women. You’re a lone woman who lives in my place. Aren’t you afraid that I’ll make a move on you?” Liu Yuan immediately covered her clothes and said warily, “What do you want?” Lu Chen waved his hand and said, “Don’t be nervous. I’m only interested in beautiful women. I’m not interested in you.” Liu Yuan said angrily, “Don’t tell me I’m not a pretty girl?” She was very confident in her looks and figure. She had charmed countless boys. Lu Chen waved his hand and said, “In the eyes of others, but not in my eyes. Besides, in terms of beauty…” Lu Chen gestured to Lan Weiwei, who was stuffing herself at the dining table. “You can only be second in this room.” Liu Yuan followed his gaze and saw Lan Weiwei eating messily. She had silver-white hair, sapphire-blue eyes, and snow-white skin, just like a beautiful human elf. Even if she did not care about her image when eating, she was still so beautiful that it was intoxicating for others were they to look. Liu Yuan’s eyes instantly dimmed from Lu Chen’s statement. It was true that she was not as pretty as Lan Weiwei. She covered her head and walked out dejectedly. “I know. I’ll handle the bamboo forest.” Lu Chen blinked. This lady actually took it seriously? Lu Chen could not help but laugh. Was appearance that important to her? He stood up and walked to the dining table. Lan Weiwei had already eaten more than half of the mountain-like food that was set on the dining table. Lu Chen picked up a piece of beef jerky from the side and handed it to Rollie. The little fellow only sniffed it but still refused to eat. Lu Chen had no choice but to put it on his lap. He rubbed its belly and began to eat. In the evening, a few large trucks drove directly to the entrance of the villa. A group of workers got out of the trucks with great fanfare. The trucks were filled with bamboo. Liu Yuan ran over and said, “I spent a lot of effort to find a bamboo forest for you. Tell me, how are you going to thank me for it?” Lu Chen thought for a moment and handed Rollie over. “I’ll let you play with Rollie for a while?” Rollie, on the other hand, was confused as to why he was being handed around like a toy. “….” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation In the villa, the progress of the bamboo forest was very slow. The bamboo forest was planted in the backyard because there was no longer any space for the bamboo forest in the garden in the front yard. Compared to the colorful array of colors in the front yard, the back yard was much more desolate. Because of this villa, the original owner of the yard had already been killed by Gu Yiming before the layout of the backyard had even begun. However, what worried Lu Chen was that Rollie may not be interested in these bamboos. Even when the bamboo shoots that were brought along with the truck passed by, Rollie still showed a lack of interest. Liu Yuan also clearly noticed this problem. She said to Lu Chen, “Is this little fluffy fellow sick?” She pointed at Rollie in her arms. Women generally had no qualms about cute animals. So, after being hugged by Liu Yuan for a while, Rollie did not let go either. Lu Chen shook his head. He really did not know the answer. This little fellow was different from Lan Weiwei. Lan Weiwei could at least talk and communicate. This fellow was a beast that could not communicate. At this moment, Lan Weiwei ran out of the villa. “Give it to me.” She pointed at the lifeless little Rollie in Liu Yuan’s arms. Although Liu Yuan did not know what Lan Weiwei wanted to do, she still gave the little fellow in his arms to Lan Weiwei. Lan Weiwei took Rollie and ran to the backyard. Lu Chen was also confused and chased after her. This villa was very big. Lan Weiwei crossed the overgrown backyard and stopped at a corner. She threw Rollie into the sky. The baby panda was shocked and immediately shrunk into a ball in the air. It landed on the ground and bounced a few times. Lan Weiwei was still holding her hand high in the air, looking silly. Liu Yuan, who was following behind Lu Chen, was shocked. “Weiwei, what are you doing? It will fall to its death!” Liu Yuan was about to scold the little girl when she realized that Rollie, who had landed on the ground, suddenly became energetic. He ran from afar and returned to the corner of the wall once again. At this moment, the moonlight fell from the sky and landed on Rollie’s body at the corner of the wall. The little fellow lay on the ground just like that. The moonlight was like dust as it slowly flowed into Rollie’s body. Liu Yuan, who was standing at the side, watched on. It was not that she did not know that some experts could absorb the essence of the sun and the moon. In some places, they could even practice breathing techniques. However, this was the first time she had seen such an animal do such a thing. Could it be that this panda had turned into a spirit? How was that possible? Liu Yuan was shocked by this absurd idea. Lu Chen was just as shocked as her. Lan Weiwei, who was at the side, smiled when she saw Rollie on the ground. At this moment, Lan Weiwei walked to Lu Chen’s side and stretched out a hand. “Bamboo.” Lu Chen was stunned for a moment before he reacted, Lan Weiwei wanted the 10,000-year-old Jade Bamboo in his backpack. However, could he open his in-game backpack in real life? If he could directly descend into Second World, he should be able to open his backpack, right? Lu Chen rationalized with this idea. Hence, he tried to call for his backpack. The next moment, something amazing happened. The interface of the backpack really appeared in Lu Chen’s mind. With a thought, the Jade Bamboo appeared in his hand! Liu Yuan, who was beside him, was shocked. What kind of trick was this? Taking things out from mid-air? Or was it a magic trick? Lu Chen handed the Jade Bamboo to Lan Weiwei. He was very curious about what Lan Weiwei wanted to do with the bamboo. Lan Weiwei took the Jade Bamboo and she directly inserted it into the soil in the corner of the wall. The moment the Jade Bamboo touched the soil, it immediately took root and sprouted. It grew at a speed visible to the naked eye! An indescribable fragrance spread out to their surrounding. Bamboo shoots also emerged from the ground! These bamboo shoots directly broke out of the soil. They grew crazily towards the sky! This piece of land they stood on immediately turned into a bamboo forest in a short time span! Beside them, Rollie looked to be completely energized. Carrying these bamboos, he ran back and forth excitedly. Lu Chen and Liu Yuan were both shocked. This scene of the ground taking root and a single bamboo stick turning into a whole forest was really too magical. It was just like the legendary immortal spell. Lu Chen hurriedly said to Lan Weiwei, “Weiwei, how did you know that the bamboo could be planted?” Lan Weiwei shook her head and said, “I don’t know. I just felt that it needed to be used this way.” Lu Chen fell into silence. He knew clearly that Lan Weiwei had several mindful states. Perhaps the original Lan Weiwei knew how to use this Jade Bamboo, but the current Lan Weiwei did not know. So everything she did was based on her gut feeling. Lu Chen looked at Lan Weiwei and then looked at Rollie who was running around in the forest. Suddenly, he felt that there were a few checkpoints needed to reach White Fog City. Perhaps they all had a special story. After Liu Yuan was shocked, she could not recover from what happened. She looked at Lu Chen and said, “Lu Chen, I think I need an explanation. You know, it’s impossible for me not to report this situation to the higher-ups.” Lu Chen spread his hands and said, “I too want to know, but the truth is, I don’t know either.” Liu Yuan said, “Then, you should know about her background, right?” She pointed at Lan Weiwei and said, “Don’t tell me that she’s a godsister that you picked up. Even if I believe that, do you think the higher-ups will? And let me tell you, the higher-ups have already been paying attention to Weiwei. The Dragon Country has compared Weiwei’s genes all over the world, but they haven’t found any traces! Do you know what this means?” Lu Chen was silent for a moment. He knew. This meant that Weiwei’s origin was unknown. The Dragon Country’s entire database could not find any traces of her, so that meant that she was someone who did not exist in this world! He would have to explain it sooner or later! What would he say when the time came? That Weiwei was the Ash Wolf King? That she was brought to reality from the Second World? This matter was too surreal to comprehend, and no one would believe him it if it was told. Even if some people believed it, it would undoubtedly bring more risks to Weiwei and himself. From what happened to the Xiao family last time, there were people from the big families coming to get him. The way of this world was not as simple as he imagined. Lu Chen slowly exhaled and said, “Liu Yuan, listen to me. You have to promise me that this matter can not be spread to the higher-ups or others. Before I confirm certain things, I don’t want this secret to be exposed.” Liu Yuan said, “What do you want to confirm?” Lu Chen slowly said, “The Xiao family still exists. The Second World is volatile. Too many things have happened recently. I have to protect what I care about. I want to wait until I destroy the Xiao family and understand the methods of the higher-ups, as well as the true attitude of the higher-ups toward me before I tell you anything.” Liu Yuan cried out in shock, “Are you crazy? “You want to destroy the Xiao Family? “I’m warning you, you better not act recklessly! “Don’t think that you can act recklessly just because you’ve won against Lin. “Everything is not as simple as it seems.” Lu Chen’s gaze focused. It was just as expected! Liu Yuan knew many insider details. “Tell me more then!” Lu Chen spoke in a deep voice. Liu Yuan was startled and realized that she had accidentally unintentionally spilled the beans. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation In the villa, Lu Chen looked at Liu Yuan and asked seriously. Lu Chen knew too little about this world. If it was not for the release of the Second World, he would never have had access to this information. Liu Yuan found it difficult to speak, but looking at Lu Chen’s expression, she could not refuse. She sighed and said, “Alright then. “Honestly, I actually wanted to tell you about these things in the far future when you were more ready. “But I guess it’s not considered a special secret. You will end up knowing about it sooner or later. “It’s just that it’s too early for you to know about this right now.” Liu Yuan’s expression turned solemn as she slowly said. “This world is different from the eyes of ordinary people. I believe you should be clear about this.” Lu Chen nodded. Through the incident with the Xiao family, he had come to an understanding. This world was far more mysterious than what he had seen. The so-called Dragon Team, Spirit Team, and so on. All of these existed before the appearance of the Second World. Liu Yuan continued, “Before the appearance of the Second World, this world already had extraordinary powers. “In the past, the Dragon Country called these ancient martial arts, Chakra Trainers. “The Elephant Country practiced yoga, the West has vampires, warlocks, and so on. “According to the cultivation division of the Dragon Country, the ordinary experts in the human world were divided into four levels — Heaven, Earth, Black, and Yellow. “The person you defeated last time, Lin, was a Heaven-grade expert. “Such experts usually require decades of training before they achieve such status. “Every Heaven-grade expert would become an important figure in various families. “In other words, even if you leave the Dragon Team right now, your value will still be endless.” Lu Chen nodded, these were all within his expectations. This world had supernatural powers, of course, it was not strange for him anymore. “Okay, you can go on.” Lu Chen indicated. Liu Yuan continued, “Heaven, Earth, Black, and Yellow. Above the four grades, there are two major realms, Acquired and Spiritual. “The realms are not known by most people. Generally speaking, Acquired realm experts are already one of the foundations of the Dragon Country. “People who achieve Spiritual realms are only known in the legends.” Lu Chen nodded and said, “Previously, you told me not to underestimate the Xiao family. Is there something I should know about? “Other than Lin, are there other experts in the Xiao Family? “Those that know about the existence of the Acquired or even the Spiritual Realm?” Liu Yuan looked at Lu Chen for a long time and said, “Yes. I told you not to act so impulsively because of that. “Although there is only a difference of one level between the Heaven-grade and the Acquired realm, it is still a huge difference in power. “Although I don’t know how strong you are now, it is absolutely impossible for you to win against an Acquired realm expert.” Lu Chen nodded and said, “According to what you said, the Xiao family has a strong master. “According to this calculation, every family on the same level as the Xiao family has at least the power to contend with them. “Otherwise, the Xiao family would have broken the balance long ago.” Liu Yuan nodded, she was impressed. Lu Chen was indeed smart as he managed to reach this conclusion at once. “You’re right. However, before the Second World arrived, all the realm experts from the major families of the Dragon Country went to a secret realm. “Among them, the Gu family has the most people that went. Therefore, almost all the realm experts are either alive… or dead. “In addition, there are many reclusive forces that even the Dragon Country hasn’t managed to uncover. “Some of the experts from the hidden families are definitely not what we can imagine.” Lu Chen’s breathing was stifled as he said, “Are you saying that these hidden families still have existences above the Spiritual realm?” Liu Yuan curled her lips and said, “I didn’t exactly say that. “But I still advise you to be careful. It’s not like there haven’t been experts who have surpassed the Spiritual realm before. “Such figures come and go without a trace. “And they have strange temperaments. “Once you anger them, you’ll forever have a target on your back.” Lu Chen placed his hand onto his head, “How can I meet them?” Although he spoke in a nonchalant manner, he was still secretly vigilant in his heart. It seemed that he had to increase his strength as soon as possible in the future. On the side, Rollie had already fallen asleep in the bamboo forest. From the looks of it, the little fellow seemed to be fine now. So, Lu Chen decided to let it rest in the forest. “What are your plans?” Liu Yuan asked. She had shared so much and hoped that Lu Chen would be on guard with a backup plan in case everything goes astray. It was best to keep a low profile and let him know that there was always someone better out there who could easily best him. Who knew that Lu Chen would smile and say, “I’m preparing to enter the game and quickly increase my strength. Then, I’ll destroy the Xiao family as soon as possible.” Liu Yuan was so angry that she could not help but retort his plans. “So what I said just now was for nothing? “You didn’t listen to a single word? “You know, you really infuriate me!” Lu Chen laughed and said, “Don’t be angry. I’m just trying to improve on my strength to protect what I care about. “And if I’m not wrong, the higher-ups have been unhappy with the Xiao family for a long time, right? “If I have enough strength and an excuse to go fight them, I believe that the organization will definitely support me.” Liu Yuan jumped in fright and said, “Lu Chen, I’m warning you. Don’t do anything rash. “The Xiao family has indeed offended you, but there’s no need to be so anxious about it. “There are some things that you should endure as long as you can.” Lu Chen waved his hand and said, “Don’t worry, I’m not that impulsive. However, it’s impossible for me to turn a blind eye to what they’ve done to me. “In this world, there are always some things that should not be excused. “This Xiao family and I are already mortal enemies! “If a colossus wants to kill me, I can not sit idly by. “If you were in my position, you would understand. “The Xiao family feels like they’ve put a guillotine hanging on my head, it could fall at any time. “What would you do if you were in this situation?” Liu Yuan was silent. Lu Chen’s words seemed to be said in anger, but it was also the truth. All the experts of the Xiao family were sent out to take Lu Chen’s life. Although they were killed by Lu Chen in the end, it was still a very shocking situation to experience! A large family almost went all out to kill him. What else would you expect Lu Chen to do except retort? Liu Yuan sighed and said, “I can understand how you are feeling and what you went through, but shouldn’t be impulsive! “You must do something you are confident of. “And don’t hide your plans from us. You have to know that you have the Dragon Team behind you now, and the entire Dragon Country! “If you have enough strength, you have to tell the organization. We will definitely do our best to help you achieve whatever you want.” Lu Chen believed half of what she said and nodded. “I understand.” After saying that, he walked past her with Lan Weiwei and walked towards his room. He would naturally take revenge on the Xiao family. However, now was the time to raise his strength! Without strength, everything he wanted to do would not be achievable! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Inside the villa, Lu Chen went back to his room. There had already been a gaming pod installed inside. This was sent over when the bamboo was being delivered in the afternoon. As of now, every room was equipped with the same gaming pod. Lu Chen had thought about not using it. Although he could now directly enter the Second World, the gaming pod should be able to provide a layer of protection should he get affected by anything in-game. In the face of danger, at least he would still have a chance to start over. Therefore, Lu Chen directly sat in the game pod and connected to the game system. With that, he entered the game. … In the Second World. Lu Chen opened his eyes, and his surroundings were dark. It was still early in the night, and there were many players around. However, the dangerous Bear Ridge was still a restricted area that other players could not enter. At this moment, Lu Chen opened his palm and a golden scroll appeared in his hand. This was a teleportation scroll that he had obtained from the old village chief after entering the game. Ever since that happened, he became the focus of everyone’s attention. Up until now, the value of this scroll kept increasing. It could be said that the price had risen to over one billion dollars! Lu Chen pondered for a moment and decided to give this scroll a try. It was time to go to White Fog City and take a look. Thus, he used the scroll in his hand. Suddenly, a magic array that was surging with magic power appeared under Lu Chen’s feet. Then, the scene before Lu Chen’s eyes was covered by golden light. A terrain within a radius of tens of thousands of miles appeared in his mind. It was as if he was looking down at the human world from the perspective of a God. Lu Chen’s gaze shifted around. He looked past the Bear Ridge and the Wolf Valley, to his sight he could see the White Fog City past those places. It was a vast and boundless city! It was almost comparable to the Peaceful Town in the real world! It stood tall like an iron fortress. The most shocking thing was that it was not built on the ground, but the city was floating in the air! That was White Fog City? Lu Chen was extremely shocked. His heart even beat wildly from this revelation. [Use a teleportation scroll to teleport to White Fog City?] The system rang out. “Teleport!” Lu Chen did not hesitate and chose to teleport! Soon, the surrounding space became blurry! In the blink of an eye, Lu Chen had crossed tens of thousands of miles and arrived in front of White Fog City. In front of him was the tightly shut gate of White Fog City. The surrounding area was silent. Lu Chen frowned slightly. Could White Fog City actually be a dead city? It should not be, right? According to the old village chief and the chubby merchant from the Chamber of Commerce, this should be a very prosperous city! However, why was it so quiet here? Lu Chen slowly approached the gates with curiosity. The large iron gate in front of him looked very old and heavy. Lu Chen approached and pushed the gates hard. The sound of rumbling could be heard, it was as if the entire city trembled with it. Dense white fog covered the surface when the gates opened. Lu Chen raised his hand, but he could not block the fog that made its way. A moment later, the fog dissipated. In front of him was a road paved with wide green stone slabs. One could not see the end of it at a first glance. Standing under the city wall that was dozens of meters high, one may feel small and insignificant. “Is this really White Fog City?” Lu Chen was very confused. This did not look like a city at all. It was too dead silent and not a single person could be seen. Lu Chen continued to walk forward on the path given. Only the sound of his shuffling on the pavement could be heard on this desolate street. At the same time, in the real world, countless people looked up at the sky! In the real world’s sky, the shadow of a city appeared! It was a city that was floating in the air and towering over many other buildings! It immediately attracted the attention of countless people! “Holy sh*t, what is that?” “Am I seeing things? That’s a city floating in the air, right?” “Could this be the legendary city in the sky?” “Ever since the Second World opened, this world has become more and more strange with random things appearing out of nowhere.” “What city in the sky? Can’t you see the city name? It’s called White Fog...;” “What the f*ck, it’s White Fog City?!!” When everyone saw those three words clearly, many discussions rang throughout the whole world! It had been more than a week since the server opened. All the players were still struggling outside the novice village. They had been searching for the legendary White Fog City this whole time! However, they had never expected that this White Fog City would actually appear in the real world? “Damn, is this really f*cking real?” “I don’t think so. This thing looks kind of fake to me.” “It looks like a projection of sorts.” “I think so too. However, would the Dragon Country not take action if such a big thing appeared in midair?” “What if it wasn’t a projection? What if it was something that dropped from the sky?” Everyone was talking among themselves. Meanwhile, in the building of the Dragon building, the faces of countless people who knew about the truth turned solemn. According to what they knew, when the first building of the Second World appeared in the sky, it would prove that other things were going to appear in this world! “If I’m not wrong, someone must have entered White Fog City!” “Who is it?” “We don’t know yet.” “We’ve already asked Du Hei. It’s not him.” “Could it be Lu Chen?” “Hurry up and contact Liu Yuan to ask about his whereabouts right now.” A moment later, the news came back. “I have news, it should be Lu Chen. According to Liu Yuan’s reply, Lu Chen said that he wanted to increase his strength, but she didn’t expect that he would want to go straight to White Fog City.” In the room, Liu Changping took a deep breath before he replied to the others. “Find out Lu Chen’s location right now. Everyone, move out! “We must ensure Lu Chen’s safety! “If Lu Chen can succeed, then our Dragon Country will receive a huge benefit!” “Yes, sir!” As soon as he finished speaking, all the people in the Dragon building immediately went to work. Countless experts swarmed toward the villa where Lu Chen was. ...; In White Fog City, Lu Chen walked for almost half an hour, and yet had not encountered anyone here. This city seemed to be abandoned or desolate. He could not help but feel lost, he did not know why this was happening. According to the old village chief, White Fog City should not be like this! Could it be that he came to the wrong place? It was impossible. Outside the city, there were clearly three words indicating the location of this place — White Fog City! Lu Chen shook his head. He did not plan to take it one step at a time. He quickly quickened his pace to see the city in its entirety first. In the next moment, he turned into afterimages. A moment later, he found an altar in the middle of the city. There was a sentence written on it but he could not read it properly. Lu Chen frowned. However, at that moment. Moonlight shone on the altar, and a flower moon mark appeared between Lu Chen’s eyebrows. The altar seemed to have been activated from that gesture. Suddenly, an array of divine light blazed straight to the sky! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The divine light reached the sky, and Lu Chen did not have time to react to the blinding light. The huge pillar of light shot straight up into the clouds and spread out layers of ripples between the clouds. What was going on? Lu Chen was stunned. There was not a single living person in such a large city. All he managed to find was an altar that suddenly emitted an inexplicable light. The golden light rushed into the night, and even White Fog City in the real world underwent a change. The entire world was paying attention to the city in the sky. A terrifying blaze of light rose from White Fog City. It swept through the clouds as if it was guiding a certain world to somewhere! “Damn, what the f*ck is going on?!” “Mom, come out and see what’s happening right now!” “Oh my gosh, what’s going on in this world?” Such a sight shook everyone’s hearts to their core. It was more intuitive than any special effects anyone has ever witnessed in any movie. On the other hand, the powerhouses of various families in the Dragon Country were all very solemn. Gu Yiming stood at the balcony of the Gu family’s household. He stood with his hands behind his back and looked at the city in the sky above Peaceful Town. “Bai, tell me, who do you think caused this?” Elder Bai said indifferently, “It can’t be Du Hei. If I’m not wrong, the only possibility of someone pulling this off would be Lu Chen. It looks like the young master has made the right bet this time.” Gu Yiming looked at the city floating in the sky and remained silent. After a long time, he said, “That may not be true. This could just be the beginning of everything.” In the south, the Xiao family were just as vigilant about what was happening. Many of the Xiao family’s disciples were extremely shocked. Back then, even when the patriarch came out of seclusion, he did not have such an imposing manner. “Could it be that Lu Chen really has such a great ability to do such things?” In the Xu family. An old man could be seen sitting on the balcony as he calmly drank tea. Beside him stood a slim and graceful young girl. “Ziyuan, that Lu Chen kid is more powerful than I thought. “The Gu family is already on the move in attaining his trust. “You have to hurry up.” Xu Ziyuan bit her red lips and nodded. “Got it, Grandpa.” Many forces gathered from the event that was unfolding. Even the west paid attention to this whole fiasco. “What’s going on? How did the east manifest the city before us?” “What did they do to get this far?” “Find out who was the one in charge of making the Second World’s city descend into this reality!” The western countries scrambled in panic. The Second World’s city descending into this world meant a huge explosion of resources! Many energy resources that did not exist on this planet could help a country break through the shackles of technology. This was a great opportunity for anyone! If the Dragon Country were to take the lead, they would be unstoppable! Therefore, the entire Western region became anxious. Amidst the chaos, Lu Chen frowned and looked at the pillar of light in White Fog City. He vaguely felt a sense of familiarity that came upon him. Suddenly, the moonlight filled the sky. Then, a human figure appeared from the pillar of light. It was a humanoid creature wearing golden armor. Its skin was greenish-purple, and it held a strangely shaped weapon in its hand. The long handle looked like an ancient longsword, but it was not exactly entirely it as well. Suddenly, the armor turned into bouts of fish scales, almost as though it moved with the humans figure’s every muscle movement. The appearance of this god-like person immediately caused the people in the entire world to go into a fit of frenzy. “This must be the god of our Eastern Camp!” “Look at its armor, it definitely belongs to our Eastern Camp!” “You guys are being shameless. Your Eastern Camp has a Hammer God, this god must belong to our Banzi Country. Our country is the origin of the Eastern culture after all.” “You guys are a bunch of ignorant Easterners, that is a demon. In our Western legends, its skin is greenish-purple as well, and its eyes are long and narrow!” “That is the incarnation of a demon!” The group of people argued endlessly. Meanwhile, in White Fog City, that mysterious existence slowly spoke. “Are you a member of the Wolf Moon God’s lineage who arrived here first?” Lu Chen raised his head, a trace of surprise in his heart appeared. This fellow actually could tell that he had some relationship with the Wolf Moon God. Thus, he opened his mouth and asked, “May I ask who you are, sir?” The man slowly said, “I am the general of the White Fog City in the upper realm. The White Fog City in the human world has not opened for ten thousand years. “It is now quite dilapidated. Since you were able to arrive here, it would mean that you have the qualifications to become the City Lord. “From now on, the heavy responsibility of subduing ten thousand miles of demonic beasts and commanding a city will be handed over to you. “However, before that, you need to pass a test!” What is a City Lord? Lu Chen was slightly shocked. What was so good about becoming the City Lord of an empty city? He had doubts in his heart, but he still managed to ask, “What type of test?” The man raised the weapon in his hand and said, “You would need to defeat me! “However, I won’t use my full strength. “Of course, I’ll give you a taste of what it’s like. “The stronger you display your strength, the more benefits you’ll reap from it.” As soon as he finished speaking, the interface’s attributes appeared before Lu Chen. [Guardian General of the Upper Realm] [Level: Unknown] [HP: 1,600,000,000] [Attack: 160,000 (continuously decreasing)] [Defense: 5,000 (continuously decreasing)] [Magic Defense: 4,000 (continuously decreasing)] [Skills: Unknown] As soon as the attribute panel appeared, Lu Chen’s scalp tingled! What the f*ck? 160,000 attack power? 1,600,000,000 HP? 5,000 Defense? How was he supposed to fight such a crazy monster!? Meanwhile, the attributes of this Guardian General had also appeared to everyone else as well! At the same time, Lu Chen’s figure also appeared in the virtual image of White Fog City in the real world. Under the dozens of meters tall Guardian General, his figure was exceptionally tiny. Countless people recognized him with one look. “F*ck, it’s the great and amazing Morning Mist!” “I knew it. Who else could’ve easily reached White Fog City that quickly? It turns out that only that great person could do it!” “Wait, but can he really pass this test?” “He’s basically going against a real god!” “F*ck, even I feel despair. This is definitely a test that I can’t pass!” “With 160,000 attack power, how would he even be able to block it?” In White Fog City, the taller man slowly said. “Don’t worry, as long as you can withstand three of my attacks and cause me to receive a certain amount of damage, I would consider it a success.” As a general from the upper realm, he had absolute confidence in his power. “Of course, the more attacks you can withstand and the more damage I receive, the higher my evaluation of you will be. “Now, the test begins.” With that, the taller man raised his weapon. The huge weapon was like a huge pillar taken from the heavens itself! With a wide swing, it turned into an astonishing beam of light that fell towards Lu Chen! Lu Chen did not have time to think. He immediately summoned his pet. He did not care if Lan Weiwei could appear or not! She shared his HP with him! He needed Lan Weiwei’s HP! After that, he directly activated his skill — Shield God! Countless people shook their heads. Even if this general took the initiative to reduce his attack power, it was still a full 100,000 attack power in one swing! How much HP did Lu Chen have to have to withstand such a hit? However, in the next moment, everyone was stunned! Two large golden words appeared above Lu Chen’s head! “Shield God!” A transparent light shield rose up from the ground! It appeared directly in front of Lu Chen! It blocked the Guardian General’s heavy attack! A loud booming sound could be heard and the huge collision created a shockwave! A row of red numbers appeared above Lu Chen’s head thereafter. “-10,000!” Lu Chen, who was standing on the spot, was safe and sound! At some point in time, a beautiful girl holding a panda appeared beside him! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation A string of red numbers appeared above Lu Chen’s head. Everyone was shocked! Did Lu Chen’s HP not be reduced by 10,000? How was Lu Chen safe and sound? What was going on? The game had only been online for less than a month, and the average player’s HP should be at most a few thousand points. Yet, Lu Chen already had more than 10,000 HP? Moreover, his opponent’s attack power was as high as 100,000 points! Yet, it was directly reduced to 90% by Lu Chen? Was this not a little too abnormal? “F*ck, that Morning Mist dude really knows how to put on a good show!” “Woah, who knows how many golden titles Morning Mist has!” “That was ridiculous, Shield God, Sword God, Blade God, how can such a person be allowed to have this many titles!” “Oh my gosh, that dude is absolutely insane!” “Is Morning Mist really that powerful?” “Yeah of course he is, but who is the little girl beside him?” Lan Weiwei’s appearance attracted everyone’s attention. At the same time, the various parties started to pay attention to her. They would not let go of anyone who could enter White Fog City. Liu Yuan’s eyes widened as she looked at the girl hugging the panda. She was almost certain that it was Lan Weiwei! Liu Yuan’s breathing quickened. She wanted to go to Lu Chen’s room in the villa immediately! However, she was afraid of disturbing Lu Chen. Within White Fog City, Lu Chen looked at Lan Weiwei who was beside him and felt somewhat at ease. This girl still had a conscience and knew how to help him when in need. However, why did she bring Rollie over? What was the use of this little fellow mascot? Lu Chen was slightly taken aback by Rollie’s presence. He also took a look at Lan Weiwei’s interface. [Ancient Ash Wolf] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Lan Weiwei] [Intimacy: 120] [Level: 20 (battle form)] [Attack: 5,000] [HP: 100,000] [Defense: 500] [Magic Defense: 500] [Skills: Frost Domain, True Form Transformation, Ash Wolf’s Fury] Lu Chen was shocked. This girl had actually entered into her battle mode. The 100,000 HP points on the interface made Lu Chen feel much more relieved. His HP was shared with Lan Weiwei’s. The strike from his opponent just now had only taken out one-tenth of his HP right now. Within the light pillar of the altar, that existence slowly spoke. He looked ahead with a complicated expression and said, “It’s been a long time since I’ve seen a pure Ancient Ash Wolf.” He looked at Lu Chen with a deep meaning and said, “Ash Wolf bloodline, Moon God’s imprint, who exactly are you?” Lu Chen was silent. The burly man continued, “I’m looking forward to seeing how far you can go. You may make your move.” When Lu Chen heard this, he said, “Then I shall begin with mine.” As he finished speaking, a blue longsword appeared in his hand! Everyone stared at Lu Chen excitedly. They were all looking forward to seeing how far Lu Chen could go. After all, the opponent’s defense was more than 5,000 points! This meant that if the damage that Lu Chen caused did not exceed 50,000 points, he would not be able to cause any damage to the opponent at all! The burly man also looked at Lu Chen with intrigue, as if he was looking forward to his performance. In the next moment, the golden font above Lu Chen’s head suddenly changed. From Shield God to Sword God! This time, Lu Chen’s interface was not completely covered, this allowed everyone to see the attack power on his interface! “F*ck, what the f*ck am I seeing?” “An attack power of 9,250 points?” “Am we even playing the same f*cking game with that dude?” “F*ck, one random slap from them would end my career in the game!” “No wonder he could kill all the White Alliance members in an instant!” “I would officially bow down to Morning Mist as my one true God!” “Hey you, eastern players, don’t be too happy with what he has.” “Having a 9,000 attack power, I’m sure that it won’t even break the opponent’s defense!” A western player opened his mouth, and only then did everyone react to what he said. 9,000 attack power was high, but the opponent had a true 5,000 defense! This bit of attack power might not even be enough to have chip damage towards Lu Chen’s opponent! However, in the next moment, the number on Lu Chen’s interface skyrocketed! It kept increasing from 9,000! 20,000! 30,000! 50,000! It directly rose to 64,750 points in the blink of an eye! Everyone was shocked! None of them knew how powerful the Sword God’s State was! Even the burly man in the light pillar was shocked. “I didn’t expect you to have such a talent for swordsmanship! “Good, good, really good! “Draw your sword, boy. Show me what you got!” Lu Chen took a deep breath and said, “Okay, I won’t hold back!” With that, the longsword in his hand turned into countless afterimages and slashed towards his opponent! Currently, Lu Chen’s attack speed was at 16.5 points. Under the state of the Sword God, it could be increased by eight times! In other words, he could now slash out more than 100 times in one second! However, that was his theoretical limit. If he really slashed out more than 100 times in one go, his body would definitely collapse first before giving out. Therefore, this time, he planned to slash out only 50 times! Because of the Ash Wolf King’s Sword, it directly cut through half of the opponent’s armor. With Lu Chen’s 60,000 attack power, each attack could cause 39,750 damage! Hence, the players all over the world knew something amazing was going to happen! “The f*ck, how many times has Morning Mist slashed this attack?” “Woah, and that was close to 100,000 damage, and this is under the condition that the opponent only has 5,000 defense points. Isn’t that too terrifying to release right now?” “I feel like Morning Mist is basically invincible. I bet no one in the game could match his powers.” “I feel that you easterners are breaking the rules. You clearly said one move, but he slashed so many times.” “Hehe, you silly westerner. He really did use one move, it was just that the other damage done was just the after effect of that one move.” “Why talk sh*t about it when you yourself can’t imitate what he did?” “Let’s not talk about this. I just want to know, how much damage did Morning Mist deal and how many slashes was it?” Countless people looked at the General’s HP bar, wanting to know how much damage Lu Chen had dealt in the end. Finally, the sword aura dissipated. Everyone’s gaze gathered over. “-1987,500!” Everyone’s scalps went numb! Did he really manage to deal close to 2,000,000 damage points in one second? He was simply a terrifying monster! What level was he truly at? The Guardian General should reconsider his next move now! Although this bit of damage was not worth breaking the 1,600,000,000 HP of the General… but it was terrifying enough! The Guardian General nodded slightly and said, “Not bad! It’s not easy for the lower realm’s White Fog City to have an expert like you. However, if I could take a guess, you haven’t used your full strength yet, right? I see that you’re still far from reaching your limit.” When these words were said, everyone else was shocked. Was this not the full strength of Morning Mist? What in the world did he mean by that! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen generously admitted to what the General suspected. “That’s right, this body is just unable to let me slash out my limit.” The General nodded and said, “If you can form the body of the Sword God, which is the Sword Saint, then you can bear this power. “Take another move from me. If you can bear this move, I will give you a token each time you succeed. With this token, you can enter the Upper Realm Sword Pool!” The General spoke in a deep voice. Although Lu Chen did not know what kind of Upper Realm Sword Pool he was talking about, based on his intuition, it definitely had something to do with his title of Sword God. Thus, he said, “Well then, please make your move.” As soon as he finished speaking, the General raised the weapon in his hand. The power it held this time was much stronger than the previous time! The entire light pillar was buzzing with energy! That kind of terrifying power caused the real world to tremble! The entire White Fog City even trembled along with it as well! Golden light shone brightly everywhere! The weapon seemed to have split Heaven and Earth apart! With that, it fell towards Lu Chen! This was definitely a skill move from the General! Information instantly appeared in Lu Chen’s mind. [Sky-cleaving Strike] [It causes a large amount of damage to the target. Ignoring the damage reduction of the opponent, there will be an 80% chance of it being fatal!] Lu Chen was shocked. Although the damage value was not written on it, the damage it caused was definitely not less than the attack power of the opponent’s panel! Moreover, it directly cut through the damage reduction of the opponent. Then, would his Shield God’s effect lose its effect when it came to protecting him? With 100,000 HP, he could barely deal enough damage with the addition of Lan Weiwei! However, the problem was that the damage dealt by the opponent’s attack was probably more than 100,000! What was even more ridiculous was that there was an 80% chance of the attack being fatal! In other words, as long as the attack landed, there was an 80% chance of death for Lu Chen! Getting an instant kill was simply unreasonable! Cold beads of sweat appeared on Lu Chen’s forehead. Even the people in the real world felt that it was much too terrifying to witness any further. “The Guardian General’s skills are too monstrous. How is he possibly going to withstand it!” “Although Morning Mist is strong, his level is still too low to withstand such an attack. I think that if Morning Mist is given some time to strengthen himself, he will definitely be able to defeat him.” “Hehe, the easterners love to watch themselves get pummeled isn’t it. If you easterners were given a lifetime to train, it would still be impossible for any of you to defeat him.” “Then, may I ask, is there an expert such as Morning Mist in your region?” “Huh, I don’t think you’ll be able to produce such an expert in your lifetime.” “Hehe, no matter what, the Morning Mist you worship and speak of will die in the next moment.” The words of the westerner made the hearts of many players sink to the bottom of the abyss. Even they did not believe that Lu Chen could withstand such a terrifying attack. Suddenly, a huge golden light enveloped Lu Chen. The sky shook from the attack. Lu Chen felt a bitter taste in his mouth. It seemed that even he could feel that was not able to withstand this attack. He raised the shield in his hand, and the word Shield God above his head was drowned out by the light. With a bang, a red number floated out from above! “-946,5886!” Everyone sucked in a breath of air. A single attack dealt over nine million damage! Was this the true damage dealt by a general from the upper realm? It was simply too terrifying! Countless people sighed inwardly from what happened. In the Dragon building, many members of the Dragon Team also shook their heads slightly, many of them pitied Lu Chen. It was not that Lu Chen was not strong enough, but this Guardian General was simply too powerful! A damage of over 9,000,000 damage was not something that players at this time could withstand. Many experts from the various clans felt both fortunate and regretful for him. “What a pity, what a shame.” “If this brat can pass the test, then the power of the world will rest in our eastern region.” Many people felt dejected. At this moment, someone suddenly exclaimed. “Something’s not right, Morning Mist’s figure hasn’t dissipated!” As soon as these words were said, everyone shifted their gazes back. That’s right. If an ordinary player received a fatal attack, their body would slowly disappear. Then, they would be teleported to the Resurrection Point and get resurrected. However, the Morning Mist’s body did not show any signs of dissipating. What was going on? “That’s impossible. This easterner clearly suffered over 9,000,000 damage. How could he be fine?” “Could it be that he has more than 10,000,000 HP? That shouldn’t exist!” Many eastern players were also confused with what was actually happening. Meanwhile, in White Fog City, Lu Chen was also a little confused. He also did not understand why he did not die. Nothing made sense. It was not until he saw Rollie on the ground jumping in front of him. A line of information finally entered his eyes. [Your pet Rollie has triggered the Luck Bonus skill.] [Congratulations, you are immune to this attack!] “Holy sh*t Rollie!” Lu Chen never thought that this guy could be so useful! This mascot was more than just a mascot! TheGuardian General nodded his head in satisfaction and said, “As expected, I was not mistaken. This is really the legendary auspicious beast.” Lu Chen was a little puzzled and said, “Auspicious beast?” The big man replied, “It is said that auspicious beasts can ward off all disasters. It seems that this is true.” Lu Chen looked at him with a strange expression and said, “Don’t tell me that you used such a powerful move just to test this little fellow?” The burly man smiled and said, “That’s right.” Lu Chen’s heart was heavy. He had said that the attack this time was completely different from the previous one. Could it be that he only wanted to see if Rollie was really a legendary creature? If Lu Chen had known earlier, he could have just tossed it to him to study the creature himself. When the general saw Lu Chen’s speechless expression, he knew that he had gone too far. He said, “Well, uh, actually, in terms of the test, you’ve already passed it from the first time you made your move. “Generally speaking, as long as you can break through my defense, you will be considered to have passed. Not only have you passed, but you have also surpassed me by much farther. “This attack was carried out with my own selfish motives. “How about this, I will give you a chance to attack with your full strength. “I want to see just how high you can reach to your fullest potential.” As he spoke, he casually raised his hand, and a red light landed on Lu Chen’s body. [ding! You have obtained the bonus of an Ancient God. You can now break through the limits of your body easily!] Lu Chen was delighted. He remembered what the Guardian General had said. The higher the damage he dealt, the more generous the reward! Now that he could directly break through the limits of his body, he could use the Sword God State without any scruples! Moreover, this was not just the buff from the Sword God State! Lu Chen raised his head and looked at the big man in front of him. “Thank you, sir. I shall show you what I’m really made of!” As soon as he finished speaking, the two words Sword God above his head flashed! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Bright golden light flashed above Lu Chen’s head. Everyone was paying attention to his next move. “Morning Mist is too terrifying. He didn’t even die in battle!” “D*mn, I want a pet too. It’s so cute and dangerous!” “Woah, it’s even immune to damage. If such a divine pet were to be put on the market, it would be a sky-high price!” “Let’s not talk about anything else. I just want to see how farMorning Mist can go!” “That’s right. That big guy said that he would give Mornin Mist a chance to attack with his full strength!” Lu Chen held his longsword in his hand and his eyes were solemn. One had to know that he did not only have the Sword God’s State skill! He had obtained the power of the Ash Wolf in the palace of the Ancient Ash Wolf! He was able to convert the moonlight that he had stored into a temporary attack power! During this period of time, Lu Chen was actually not idle. He had been constantly absorbing the moonlight! In the villa, the rate of absorption was even more terrifying! He did not need to take the initiative to sit cross-legged and absorb it. It would continue to increase no matter what! Thus, the attack power on Lu Chen’s interface started to increase from 9,250 points to much more! It was increasing crazily step by step! “Damn, Morning Mist’s attack power interface is increasing crazily!” “I don’t think that’s his end, right?” “What were his basic stats?” Everyone watched helplessly as Lu Chen’s attack power panel began to increase. In the sky above White Fog City, a dark and cold purple moon appeared! Under the illumination of the Moonlight, Lu Chen’s attack power skyrocketed! 10,000! 20,000! 40,000! The final number directly stopped at 56,000 points! This was not the end! With the blessing of the Sword God’s State! This number had to be increased by sevenfold! 392,000! Everyone went crazy! Nearly?400,000 point value! 400,000!?? What kind of concept was that! That would be absolutely terrifying! When the Guardian General saw this scene, he was extremely shocked. In the upper realm, with such strength, Lu Chen could become a powerhouse of a region! This guy’s potential was too terrifying! However, this was not the end! Let us not forget, Lu Chen had the Moon God’s Mark! Fighting under the moonlight would increase his attack power by 50% more! Therefore, when the players saw the number on Lu Chen’s attack panel change again, they completely lost control! A 588,000 point attack power! That was insane! Even when the bigger man in the light appeared, his attack power was far from this number! In other words, Lu Chen was practically a god-like existence right now! His combat power suppressed everything else around him! Even the Guardian General felt a little incredulous! If he did not have enough confidence in his own HP, he would have prepared to adjust his defense to not die. Lu Chen held the sword in his hand. This time, he did not hold back! Under the Sword God’s State, he could increase his attack speed by eightfold! Currently, his attack speed on the interface was 16.5 points! In other words, he could slash out 132 times in a second! The sound of the sword swishing could be heard! The world trembled with the energy of the sword being spread out! Countless sword auras enveloped the Guardian General in an instant! The sky was filled with a high red number! All the players were dumbfounded! Lu Chen’s graceful movement with his sword made them want to yearn for his powers too! They would probably never be able to deal that much damage in their lifetime! Finally, Lu Chen stopped the sword in his hand! -“776,160,00!” Everyone saw the HP of the warrior being reduced by 77 million HP! That was absolutely shocking! One had to know that Lu Chen’s current level was only level 15! Attacking 77,000,000 points per second?! No matter how much HP this warrior had, as long as Lu Chen is given a little more time, he could theoretically kill him! Meanwhile, on the other side, the Guardian General still stood his ground! Even with Lu Chen’s high damage, his full-power attack did not cause his opponent one-tenth of the damage. However, just as everyone was thinking this, the general’s expression suddenly changed! A huge red number appeared above his head! “-320 million!” The string of zeros behind that number almost made everyone unable to count. “F*ck, so many zeros. How much damage did Morning Mist deal with his final strike?” “Ten million, ten thousand million. This...; This can’t be over a hundred million, right?” “F*ck, it’s really over 100,000,000 and more damage?” “This is really teffifying!” In White Fog City, the Guardian General looked at Lu Chen seriously and said. “You’re very good. “That sword attack just now almost cut off one of my arms. Your skill is so-so however.” As a General of the upper realm, he could see that Lu Chen’s strength was extremely terrifying. He had never thought that he would be able to suffer such serious injuries in the lower realm. He was extremely satisfied with Lu Chen’s attack. The White Fog City in the lower realm and the White Fog City in the upper realm were connected. With such a person as the City Lord, he was very assured of how it shall stay. Hence, he nodded and said, “You did very well. You passed the test.” As he spoke, he threw out a token from the light screen. “This is the City Lord’s token. From now on, this city will be under your jurisdiction. In this city, you are everything!” Lu Chen reached out and held the token in his hand. In an instant, countless messages flowed into Lu Chen’s mind! It seemed that he had some unknown connection with this city. “And these, take them all. This is what you’ve earned after passing the test.” As soon as he finished speaking, a bundle was given to Lu Chen. Before Lu Chen could remember to open it, the light pillar on the altar slowly rose into the air, along with that figure. The man’s voice came from afar. “When you have the strength to open the altar again, we will meet again. When that time comes, I hope you can defeat me!” The man’s voice gradually faded away. Lu Chen finally heaved a sigh of relief. That last attack had clearly satisfied the other party. That attack was also a skill that came with the Sword God. [Void Sword] There was a 1% chance of dealing 20% damage to the other party’s maximum HP! Therefore, Lu Chen’s final attack had only dealt terrifying damage of 320 million! The entire world was in an uproar! “F*ck, what’s going on?” “Did Morning Mist really become the City Lord of White Fog City?” “The f*ck, what’s the meaning of this?” “Are we players going to seek refuge with Morning Mist?” “Woah, this is getting more and more interesting. A city built by players?” “If that’s the case, shouldn’t we look for Morning Mist to change our job classes? Dear Lord, please protect us when we meet him.” “Okay Morning Mist, hurry up and bring us to White Fog City. I’ll even willingly beg for you to bring me in!” “Hah, I know how to beg too. Don’t try to suck up to him!” The eyes of the Dragon Country’s higher-ups were burning with desire. Liu Changping said, “From now on, Lu Chen’s safety is the most important thing in the entire country! “Whoever dares to threaten Lu Chen’s safety would be seen as trying to destroy the Dragon Country! “The higher-ups have already given the highest order. We can start our attack on the Xiao family now!” At the same time, in the capital of the other western countries. The expressions of many of the higher-ups were extremely ugly. Apart from people like Lu Chen in the east, it made them feel uneasy. If they were to grow stronger in the future, how would they have any room to survive? “I don’t care what methods we use, you must get rid of this Morning Mist as soon as possible! “Now, take action immediately! “If we don’t get rid of Lu Chen, the entire west will not be at peace! “We must not let the Dragon Country become stronger!” Right when everyone was having different thoughts… In White Fog City, Lu Chen began to reap his benefits this time! From that one fight, his system’s notifications had been ringing nonstop from what he gained! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation In White Fog City, Lu Chen’s notifications kept ringing. [Ding! Congratulations on obtaining a large amount of experience!] [You are now level 20!] Lu Chen was shocked. Did he really just increase by five levels in one go? Looking at the attributes that could be distributed on the interface, Lu Chen only increased his strength. This was his usual habit, unfortunately. [Ding! Your Sword God title has been strengthened!] [Ding! Your Shield God title has been strengthened!] [Ding! Your Blade God title has been strengthened!] [Ding! Your Bow God title has been strengthened!] … Lu Chen was delighted by the continuous notification sounds. All his titles have finally received a full upgrade! He knew that every time these titles were upgraded, his strength would soar by an insurmountable amount! He took a quick look at his interface. [Sword God: Your comprehension of the sword has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a sword-type weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow along with your level!] [Sword Intent: When you use a sword-type weapon, it will burst forth with sword intent, and your attack power will increase to 700%!] [Sword God’s State: Your attack swiftness will cause irreversible damage. Items damaged by the god of swords state can not be recovered. ] [Godly Speed: The speed of your sword attack is on a godly level. The attack interval will be greatly shortened. Attack speed has now increased by 800%. Limited to one attack once it reaches the speed limit. Immune to side effects. Lasts for one second.] [Void Sword: The speed of your sword attack has reached an unfathomable level. There is a 10% chance of triggering this effect. Deals 20% maximum HP damage to the target. When this skill is triggered, you will be in an invincible state.] The overall effect of the Sword God did not change much. However, there was an additional side effect of immunity for his godly speed. He could now use the theoretical maximum attack speed! This was a terrifying power to behold! It should be known that it was already very taxing for Lu Chen to use his normal attack speed. Now that he could use the maximum attack speed at least once, his explosive power would be on a whole new level were he to attack his enemies with it! More importantly, the probability of triggering the Void Sword had increased from 1% to 10%! This was undoubtedly a good thing! After all, Lu Chen had only dealt over 70,000,000 damage to his opponent with his full explosive power just now. However, the moment Void Sword gets triggered, it could potentially take away 320,000,000 points of his opponent’s HP! From this, one could see that the Void Sword skill might be Lu Chen’s main source of damage in the later stages of the game. Lu Chen took one glance at it and continued to look at the next title. [Shield God: Your understanding of the shield has reached an unfathomable level. When you use any shield, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow along with your level!] [Indestructible: When you receive damage, you will be immune to 90% of the damage.] [Shield Backlash: Return 90% of the damage you receive to the enemy.] [Shield Spirit: You have a 1% chance to be immune to all damage!] Lu Chen let out a breath of cold air. Although the Shield God did not have any buffs, it now gained an additional Shield Spirit skill! This very skill has a 100% chance to be immune to all damage! This was a powerful skill to have! He could not help but think of Rollie. If that little fellow could increase his chances of being lucky...; That would mean he could basically be invincible in the future, right? At this moment, another title came into view. [Bow God: Your understanding of bows has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a bow-type weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with your level!] [Accurate Arrow: When you use a bow-type weapon, your attack is set to hit!] [Armor Breaker: When you use a bow and arrow type weapon to attack, you will dispel 90% of the target’s armor!] [Seven Star Succession: You can shoot seven arrows at once, and your attack power will be increased by 500%!] [Shattered Stars: You can shoot a powerful arrow that ignores all the defense of the target, and it will definitely land a critical hit, causing 10 times the penetrating damage!] This time, the Bow God’s attack power had increased to 500%, and there was also a new skill — Shattered Stars! This was equivalent to increasing his own explosive power. Ignoring all defenses, and having penetrating damage was extremely impressive! As for the remaining Saber God. He had two additional attributes! [Blade God: Your understanding of the blade has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a blade-type weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with your level!] [Frenzied Blade: When you transform into the Blade God, your attack will definitely be a critical hit. You will have a critical hit immunity effect and receive a 400% critical hit damage bonus!] [Bloodbath Blade God: When your enemies exceed more than 100, your attack will become an area-of-effect damage of 100 meters. 50% of the damage will be converted into your HP.] [Swift Blade: When you use a blade-type weapon, you can deal three damage attacks at the same time. You can also use 60% of your maximum attack speed, regardless of your body’s capabilities.] [Magic Blade: When you use a blade-type weapon, you can convert your physical damage into magic damage.] Only having the Swift Blade’s bonus was considered a big improvement. Lu Chen had yet to think of a good use for the Magic Blade skill just yet. However, the Blade God could be used to clear condense monster areas. Therefore, it could be extremely useful for multiplayer battles. Next, the class that Lu Chen was looking forward to the most popped up. [Dark Shura: Your understanding of darkness has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a hidden weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with your level!] [Shadow State: When you transform into a shadow, your body will be hidden into the void.?Ordinary attacks can not deal any damage to you. When you encounter special damage, you will be immune to it.] [Shadow Kill: When you use a long-range hidden weapon, your attack can surpass the opponent’s armor. This attack will not deactivate the Shadow State!] [One Hit Kill: When you use a close-range hidden weapon, Shadow State will be deactivated. Attacks will surpass the opponent’s armor. Critical strikes, dodges, and shield blocks from opponents will be ignored. Deals 300% true damage!] [Secret Whisper: You can curse an enemy in the dark. This enemy will be cursed with the curse of darkness. When you deal damage to the enemy, there is a 50% chance of killing the enemy in one hit. This skill ignores all immunity effects. Cooldown time is 30 days!] Lu Chen was shocked. The last skill was simply insane! Possessing a 50% true death? If this was not a godly skill, then what was it? Lu Chen calmed his breathing. After looking through the remaining titles, he slowly opened the package that the Guardian General gave him. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The weight of the parcel was quite heavy. Lu Chen could not wait to know what was inside. The parcel was opened and a golden flag appeared in front of Lu Chen. [Ding! Congratulations on obtaining the certificate to enter the Sword Pool.] [Sword Pool: The destination of the godly swords in the world. All the sword saints in the past would wash their swords here. Those who enter can choose a godly weapon in the sword pool.] Sword Pool? The Guardian General of?the upper realm seemed to have mentioned it before. However, Lu Chen still felt that it was too far away to go to the so-called upper realm. He knew nothing about the so-called upper realm. However, he still kept the certificate just in case he could use it in the future. Then, he continued to look at the package. [The Mysterious Gauntlet of the Upper Realm (epic)] [Level Requirement: 20] [Vitality: +150] [Strength: +150] [Agility: +150] [Intelligence: +150] [Defense: +240] [Magic Defense: +260] [Special Effect: Increases 1% of your attack power every time you attack in battle!] A piece of epic equipment! Lu Chen’s heart was burning with excitement. This was the first time he had seen a piece of epic equipment! The level requirement was not too high. It was only level 20, and the additional attributes were very impressive! Especially more so for the last special effect, every attack in the battle could increase his attack power! This was the most terrifying thing he has seen thus far! If he attacked 100 times, everything should be doubled, right? One had to know that Lu Chen’s current numerical base was already very terrifying! This additional effect was very impressive! Lu Chen carried on with the other items. [White Fog City Lord’s Scepter (legendary)] [Level requirement: None] [Special Requirement: Can only be used by the White Fog City Lord, growth-type equipment] [Vitality: +500] [Strength: +500] [Agility: +500] [Intelligence: +500] [Attack Power: +30,000] [Defense: +500] [Magic Defense: +500] [Special Effect: A piece of special equipment that only the White Fog City Lord may use. When the White Fog City Lord uses this equipment, all damage dealt in the White Fog City will be increased by 100%, and its attributes will be doubled.] It also mentioned that the City Lord can control the movement of White Fog City. It’s a piece of legendary-level exclusive equipment! Moreover, the attributes of this equipment were ridiculously high! This piece of equipment alone was enough for Lu Chen to reap a bountiful harvest! No wonder the higher-ups placed so much importance on being the first to enter White Fog City! The City Lord’s Scepter directly increased Lu Chen’s attributes by 1,000 points! Moreover, if he was in White Fog City, the damage he deals with would be doubled. With this effect, Lu Chen’s combat power can rise to another level! After that, the White Fog City series set equipment appeared in the package as well! [White Fog City Lord’s Armor (legendary)] Level Requirement: None] [Special Requirement: Can only be used by the White Fog City Lord, growth-type equipment] [Vitality: +500] [Strength: +500] [Agility: +500] [Intelligence: +500] [Defense: +1,000] [Magic Defense: +1,000] [Special Effect: Special equipment that only the Lord of White Fog City can use. When the Lord of White Fog City uses this equipment, he will be 99% immune to all damage in White Fog City!] … [White Fog City Lord’s Cape (legendary)] [Level Requirement: None] [Special Requirement: Can only be used by the White Fog City Lord, growth-type equipment] [Vitality: +400] [Strength: +500] [Agility: +400] [Intelligence: +500] [Defense: +1,000] [Magic Defense: +1,000] [Special Effects: A piece of special equipment that only the White Fog City Lord can use. When the White Fog City Lord uses this equipment, the magic damage and magic resistance received by the White Fog City Lord will be reduced by 90%] … [White Fog City Lord’s Crown (legendary)] [Level Requirement: None] [Special Requirement: Can only be used by the White Fog City Lord, growth-type equipment] [Vitality: +1,000] [Strength: +500] [Agility: +500] [Intelligence: +500] [HP: +80,000 [Defense: +1,000 [Magic Defense: +1,000] [Special Effect: A piece of special equipment that only the Lord of White Fog City can use. When the Lord of White Fog City uses this equipment, his HP will be shared with the city and he will recover 100% of his HP every second!] … [White Fog City Lord’s Boots (legendary)] [Level Requirement: None] [Special Requirement: Can only be used by the White Fog City Lord, growth-type equipment] [Vitality:?+500] [Strength: +500] [Agility: +500] [Intelligence: +500 [Defense: +1,000] [Magic Defense: +1,000] [Special Effects: A piece of special equipment that only the Lord of White Fog City can use. When the Lord of White Fog City uses this equipment, he can be teleported to any area of White Fog City!] … [White Fog City Lord’s Ring (legendary)] Level Requirement: None [Special Requirement: Can only be used by the White Fog City Lord, growth-type equipment] [Vitality: +500] [Strength: +500] [Agility: +500] [Intelligence: +500] [MP: +9,999] [Defense: +1,000] [Magic Defense: +1,000] [Special Effect: A piece of special equipment that only the Lord of White Fog City can use. When the Lord of White Fog City uses this equipment, skills used in White Fog City will not have a cooldown, and the maximum amount of mana will be recovered every second.] [Note: All equipment will only receive attribute bonuses when the City Lord is in the city] Lu Chen read all the equipment introductions in one go and was immediately shocked! These pieces of equipment were amazing! According to the special effect on it, as long as he did not leave White Fog City, he would practically be invincible! When the various attribute effects stacked together, his damage would be ridiculously high! At this moment, Lu Chen thought of the token that the Guardian General had given him. That was the token that he had obtained after passing the test. The token to become the City Lord of White Fog City! Lu Chen quickly took out the token from his backpack. The system gave him a notification. [Ding! You have passed the test to become the White Fog City’s Lord. Should you chose to accept this title?] Yes! Without hesitation, he chose the yes option! Soon, a title appeared on Lu Chen’s interface. [City Lord of White Fog City] [Type: Title] [Level: 1] [Vitality: +500] [Strength: +500] [Agility: +500] [Intelligence: +500] [Special Effect: The attributes of the title will increase according to the prosperity of the city.] The explanation of the title was very simple. The special effect was only one sentence. However, Lu Chen saw that there was an owner at the bottom of the panel. He opened it and looked. [White Fog City] [City-level: Bronze] [Population: 1] [Available Positions: Magister, Holy Light, Paladin...;] [Assets: None] [City Defense: 1,000,000] [Magic Defense: 1,000,000] [City HP: 10,000,000 [City Garrison: None] [City Array: None] Lu Chen blinked. So it really was an empty city… but how did he become the City Lord? After receiving the City Lord title, Lu Chen chose to equip all his equipment first. After all, even if he was a City Lord in an empty city, as long as he wore these pieces of equipment, he would be invincible! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation When all the pieces of equipment were equipped, Lu Chen looked brand new! [Name: Morning Mist] [Level: 20] [Class: Hero (now able to change to War God)] [Titles: Sword God (hidden), Shield God (hidden), Axe God (hidden), Blade God (hidden), Bow God (hidden), All-rounded master (hidden), White Fog City Lord (deployable)] [Vitality: 4,265] [Strength: 4,250] [Agility: 4,205] [Intelligence: 4,200] [HP: 137,000] [MP: 52,000] [Attack: 82,000] [Defense: 4,885] [Magic Defense: 4,885] [Reputation: 1,000] The luxurious panel numbers were unbelievable to Lu Chen! The attack power alone was already 82,000! If he were to add in all sorts of enhancements, he might even be able to kill the Guardian General in one hit! However, these attribute bonuses could only be obtained in White Fog City. Outside of White Fog City, his attributes would not be much different from before. However, this was not important. There was also a set of equipment that Lu Chen had kept in his backpack. Although the attribute bonuses could not be compared to this set of equipment, the bonuses were still terrifying were he to equip that outside of the city! Lu Chen now felt as if he had become one with the city. Closing his eyes, he seemed to be able to feel the white mist floating outside the city. As the strong wind blew, he heard a rumbling sound. Lu Chen’s heart skipped a beat. He had a feeling that he could now control the city’s mist. Hence, he tried to control the mist with his mind. In the end, the mist that was floating in midair really started to move! However, the projection of the White Fog City in the real world did not change. On the other hand, the White Fog City in the Second World could not stop roaring! Lu Chen controlled the White Fog City to slowly descend from the air. With that, he landed on the vast plain! Lu Chen opened his eyes again and felt that everything he had done was very magical. [Ding! Your pet has leveled up!] The system notified him and Lu Chen was slightly stunned. ‘Which pet? Is it Weiwei or Rollie?’ Lu Chen thought to himself. He quickly opened the interface to check. [Ancient Ash Wolf ] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Lan Weiwei] [Intimacy: 120] [Level: 25] [Attack: 20,000] [HP: 100,000] [Defense: 800] [Magic Defense: 800] [Skills: Frost Domain, True Form Activation, Ash Wolf’s Fury (can be activated)] Lan Weiwei’s level had increased by five levels, and her attack power had increased to 20,000. Her defense and HP had also increased to gratifying degrees! As for the other skills, they had not changed at all. Next was her appearance. Lu Chen felt that Lan Weiwei seemed to have grown up a little. ‘Did she seem to have grown up a little?’ Lu Chen wondered. Lan Weiwei blinked her googly eyes and tilted her head to look at him. Lu Chen shook his head thinking that he might be imagining things. However, to Lu Chen’s surprise, Rollie seemed to have leveled up too. Lucky, they are leveling up without even doing anything. [Ancient Panda] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Rollie] [Intimacy: 99] [Level: 5] [Attack: 1,000] [HP: 50,000] [Defense: 8,000] [Magic Defense: 8,000] [Skill: Luck Bonus [Luck Bonus: Provides a luck buff for 60 seconds. Has a certain chance to be immune to all negative effects and damage.] Truly amazing! Lu Chen could not believe his eyes. This little fellow was insane! This little fellow was level 5 and already had 1,000 attack power. His HP even jumped to 50,000 points! Moreover, he now had an 8,000 point double resistance! Rollie’s attributes were just as insane as Lu Chen’s! Lu Chen immediately gained a soft spot for Rollie. After checking the attributes of the two pets, he changed several pieces of equipment. This was to prevent his attributes from dropping after he walked out of White Fog City. Lu Chen basically had two panels now. One was related to the White Fog City and had heaven-defying stats. The other was a panel that was equipped with legendary equipment and looked slightly normal. Below was the normal panel. [Name: Morning Mist] [Level: 20] [Class: Hero (now able to change class to War God)] [Titles: Sword God (hidden), Shield God (hidden), Axe God (hidden), Blade God (hidden), All-rounded master (hidden)] [Vitality: 1,800] [Strength: 1,985] [Agility: 1,857 [Intelligence: 1,765] [HP: 27,650] [MP: 18,000] [Attack: 19,850] [Defense: 785] [Magic Defense: 685] [Reputation: 1,000] Lu Chen let out a breath of relief. He had gained a lot from entering White Fog City. However, there were also other concerning matters, White Fog City was suspiciously empty. The General from the upper realm had revealed that there were many terrifying existences in both the upper and lower realm. Everything was now filled with uncertainty and mystery. This includes his own very own White Fog City. When he was in the city, his attributes were basically higher. The more prosperous the people of White Fog City become, the higher the attribute bonus would be. There was even a potential of unlocking special skills. However, there was no specific standard for how prosperous the city could become. As of now, it could only be reflected in terms of population, money, and so on. Lu Chen began to frown. In that case, how could he increase the population of White Fog City? By attracting players to come into the city? This could be a possible solution Right now, all the players urgently needed to go into White fog City to change their class, including Lu Chen himself! However, there was nothing and no one in White Fog City. In order to attract players, the city needed to have NPCs that could change their class first. Right when Lu Chen was figuring out how to attract players to the city, the system’s notification popped up. [Ding! The host needs to recruit NPCs. Do you wish to recruit suitable NPCs to White Fog City using the tower?] Amazing! There were such functions in the game! Apparently, the tower could search for NPCs and request for them to come to the city! Lu Chen decided to give it a try, so he walked to the tower. The tower that had just dimmed lit up again. [Ding! Are you ready to recruit NPCs?] Lu Chen immediately pressed onto the yes option. [Please decide on the payment method.] [Option one, pay by gold coins. Option two, pay by special rewards.] Lu Chen frowned. It seemed that recruiting NPCs required certain conditions. It made sense to pay them with gold coins in option one. However, for the second one, what did it mean by special rewards?” Lu Chen could not understand. With such doubts, Lu Chen clocked onto option one first. [Ding! Please set the amount.] Lu Chen thought for a moment. Previously, he had received 2,000 gold coins. So, he proposed 1,000 gold coins as funds for the experiment. In a blink of an eye, rays of light appeared in the tower causing ripples in the air. After a moment, an old figure appeared. “Young leader, the upper realm’s Kaiser has come to seek protection.” “May I ask if you are seeking for a powerful mage?” Lu Chen looked at the short old man and an attribute panel appeared above his head.. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation [Name: Kaiser] [Race: Dwarf] [Class: Archmage] [Level: 42] [Vitality: 789] [Strength: 354] [Agility: 245] [Intelligence: 1,142] [Defense: 425] [Magic Defense: 578] [Skills: Fireball, Spatial Seal, Frost…] [Grade: B] This NPC could not become a great mage and would not be able to help with class changes for players. With these stats, he would not be able to benefit the city much. Lu Chen looked at the attributes of the short old man in front of him and was not very satisfied. How was it that 1,000 gold coins could only attract this kind of people? This person was even worse than the Village Chief of the Novice Village! Lu Chen muttered and shook his head slightly. He looked at the Mage in front of him and said, “Sorry, I’m not looking for someone like you right now.” A hint of displeasure flashed across the old man’s eyes. “You should feel honored to be able to find a Mage like me for 1,000 gold coins. “Young City Lord, your city has been run down, only a Mage like me who is in need of money would be willing to come here and help you. “To be honest, 1,000 gold coins a month is not considered expensive at all for a quality Mage like me.” Lu Chen’s eyelids twitched. What the f*ck, 1,000 gold coins a month? This Mage might as well rob him dry! Lu Chen raised his hand and the screams of the dwarf disappeared along with the wave of his hand. Lu Chen frowned. If he wanted to recruit someone such as that man for 1,000 gold coins, he might as well not take it. At this moment, he was reminded of the second option of recruiting NPCs. The special rewards method. Lu Chen scrunched up his eyebrows in confusion. What the h*ll was this special reward? With the mentality of giving it a try, Lu Chen tried to use the special rewards option to recruit NPCs. Soon, the light screen on the tower flickered again. Then, a young man wearing a black robe appeared. His eyes scanned the surrounded area as he gripped on a rusty iron sword. “Young City Lord, are you the one who intends on hiring me?” Lu Chen nodded. The young man said, “Perfect. I’m from the upper realm. I am Atzas, a pleasure to meet you. “For my special reward, you would need to give me a chance to enter the Sword Pool, then I shall stay here. “The time limit of my stay would be 100 years. In these 100 years, I will be at your disposal and will listen to your commands unconditionally.” Lu Chen was a little tempted by his proposal. 100 years, that was not a short period of time! He quickly checked the attributes of this Atzas NPC. [Name: Atzas] [Race: Human] [Class: Low-level Sword Saint] [Level: 72] [Vitality: 4,571] [Strength: 4,365]] [Agility: 4,765] [Intelligence: 4,521] [Attack: 85,462] [Defense: 2,246] [Magic Defense: 3,542] [HP: 79,545] [MP: 75,422] [Skills: Limitless] [Grade: S] He could become a Sword Saint class-change master! Lu Chen was extremely shocked by his attributes. This guy’s attributes were ridiculously high, and his grade was S ranked. Moreover, Lu Chen just so happened to have the opportunity to enter the Sword Pool in his hand! Actually, to Lu Chen, with the title of Sword God, it did not matter if he could go to the Sword Pool. Moreover, he had gained the opportunity to change his class yet. Apparently, there were special requirements for advancing his special title. Coincidentally, he could also ask Atzas about this. He had noticed this guy’s class being a low-level Sword Saint! He never expected that a Sword Saint could be considered as a class. Lu Chen looked at the young man in front of him and could not help but nod excitedly. “Okay, I promise that you would have to chance to go to the Sword Pool!” After saying this, the young man confidently walked out of the light pillar. Then, the Sword Pool certificate in Lu Chen’s hand floated in the air. A few rules appeared and turned into two beams of white light, connecting the two players, with that a contract appeared. Atzas then said, “This is a contract. Once it is signed, it can not be changed.” Lu Chen nodded. Soon, the contract was signed. The certificate fell into Atzas hands. Lu Chen also now felt an inexplicable connection with him. As long as he spoke, Atzas would listen to his orders unconditionally. At this moment, Atzas knelt down on one knee. “Respected City Lord, as your follower, Atzas, I am under your command.” Lu Chen said, “I need you to be my White Fog City’s Sword Saint master. Would that be alright?” Atzas said, “I’d be happy to, City Lord. However, if I may, could you allow me to make a trip to the upper realm first? I’ll be back soon after entering the Sword Pool. This way, I may be of greater service to you when I return.” Lu Chen nodded. With the contract being signed, Lu Chen was not afraid that he would not be able to return. This kind of contract should be formed by the will of this world. No one could violate it without experiencing severe penalties. Moreover, the stronger Atzas was, the more benefits his city would receive, right? “Thank you very much.” Atzas was delighted from this. He stood up and directly stepped into the light again. “I will be back very soon, City Lord.” Atzas walked into the light and quickly disappeared in front of Lu Chen’s eyes. After Atzas disappeared, Lu Chen started to look for more NPCs. Once again he chose the special reward option to hire them. The light flashed again. A young girl wearing a blue magic robe appeared in front of Lu Chen. Her figure was stunning and her eyes were bright. “Respected City Lord, I, Linda send my regards. “If you are willing to let me research on your Ancient Panda for half a year, I will stay here.” Study Rollie? There was no problem with that. That guy was just a lucky mascot to Lu Chen. Turns out Rollie had more uses now that that little fellow could get people to stay in White Fog City. Soon, Linda’s interface appeared. [Name: Linda] [Race: Human] [Class: Water-type Grand Mage] [Level: 82] [Vitality: 2,453] [Strength: 2,456] [Agility: 7,454] [Intelligence: 24,567] [Attack: 3,545] [Defense: 9,999] [Magic Defense: 9,999] [HP: 42,351] [MP: 321,322] [Skills: Grand Magic, Forbidden Blizzard, Curse of Misfortune] [Rating: S] She could be the Grand Mage of White Fog City! Lu Chen gasped in shock. This NPC was really ridiculous. Her strength and other attributes were not that good, but she had an intelligence that was over 10,000 points? She even had high defense and magic defense! Lu Chen immediately agreed that he was willing to let her study Rollie. He completely ignored the little beast complaining behind him and immediately shook hands with the NPC. Very soon, the two of them signed a contract again. Linda would only stay in White Fog City for a year. After finding a Mage and a Sword Saint, Lu Chen used the same method to find Warriors, Archers, Assassins, and so on… The class-change masters of White Fog City were finally all assembled after a while. [Ding! Congratulations on recruiting the class-change masters in your city.] [City defense has increased by 100,000 points!] [City gold coins increased by 1,000,000!] Lu Chen was shocked. The city defense being increased by 100,000 points was expected, but it came with 1,000,000 gold coins? If this was in the real world, Lu Chen would be 10 billion dollars richer! What a generous reward! [Ding! The city is now sparsely populated. The city defense array can not be activated. Do you wish to recruit Craftsmen?] After the system notified Lu Chen, he immediately chose the yes option! However, this time, he only used gold coins. These so-called Craftsmen only needed one gold coin to be recruited. Therefore, Lu Chen directly recruited 10,000 Craftsmen in one go! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation In an instant, 10,000 craftsmen appeared in White Fog City. The Craftsman master was recruited by Lu Chen at a special price. Then, the city defense array blueprint was handed over to him, directly eliminating the cost of finding someone else to design it. After doing all this, Lu Chen chose to go offline. At this moment, on the official website of the Second World, information about White Fog City appeared! “F*ck, what’s going on?” “White Fog City is now open?” After Lu Chen finished recruiting class-change masters, White Fog City’s announcement of it being available appeared on the Second World’s official website. [White Fog City] [City Lord: Morning Mist] [Status: Open] [Class-change Masters: Linda, Atzas...;] The information regarding White Fog City’s class-change masters was extremely detailed. Countless players were completely dumbfounded by the array of options. “I don’t care. I want to change my class to Sword Saint. Being a Mage is too weak!” “Hehe, go play with your iron swords. Doesn’t master Linda look stunning? Her skin is fair and beautiful!” “Among you losers, being the Holy Light Wielder is the strongest. Everyone would need a Holy Light Wielder when fighting bosses in the future.” “Eh, this is ridiculous. Morning Mist really went from a player to a City Lord just like that?” “I’m starting to wonder if he really is a player or an NPC in the game!” The discussion about White Fog City opening up on the internet exploded. However, Lu Chen, who had gone offline, did not have the energy to pay attention to any of it. He knocked on Lan Weiwei’s door and found that she was carrying Rollie. From the looks of it, the two of them had just come out of the game as well. Lu Chen looked at the empty game pod in the room and sighed. The two of them must have entered the game directly and did not want to rely on the game pod anymore. When Lan Weiwei saw Lu Chen, her eyes lit up. She patted her belly and spoke demandingly, “I’m hungry.” Lu Chen smiled and stroked her head. “Then I’ll bring you to something to eat.” Lan Weiwei nodded happily. Rollie, on the other hand, was a little angry. It was obvious that the little follow was angry that Lu Chen had thrown it to Linda for research. Lu Chen ignored Rollie’s tantrum and brought them downstairs. When he reached the hall, they realized that something was wrong. He could sense that there were many people around and an ambush was going to happen to them! With that, all his sense immediately heightened in alert! At this moment, Liu Yuan walked in from outside. When she saw Lu Chen, she said in surprise, “Lu Chen, you actually left the game?” Lu Chen said warily, “Don’t move. There are people around!” When Lu Chen spoke, only then did Liu Yuan realize that Lu Chen had already discovered that the people in the organization are here. She said, “Don’t worry, they’re the higher-ups.” Then, she took out her walkie-talkie and said, “Everyone, disperse. Lu Chen has left the game.” Lu Chen asked in puzzlement, “What’s going on?” Liu Yuan pointed at the projection of White Fog City outside the window and said, “Can’t you just see for yourself?” Lu Chen turned his head and was startled. What the h*ll was going on? Why was White Fog City in this world? At this moment, Liu Changping walked in with the members of the Dragon Team. “Lu Chen, I’m sorry that I came here without informing you beforehand, but all this was for your own safety.” Lu Chen ignored what Liu Changping said. Instead, he pointed at White Fog City outside the window and asked, “I just want to know what’s going on with that thing.” Liu Changping looked around and said, “This is not the right place to talk. Let’s go back to the Dragon building first.” Lu Chen nodded in agreement before speaking again, “Alright.” After saying that, he walked out with Liu Changping and the others. … The car sped along, and no one around dared to be in its way. They were all Flood Dragon cars, and there were many other armored vehicles that surrounded each of these cars on both sides. Not long after, they arrived at the Dragon building. Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei had to carry Rollie directly into the building as that little fellow refused to move an inch. Then, they took the elevator to the top floor. In a conference room, one could see that Liu Changping looked solemn. “White Fog City appearing in this world is because of you.” “Because of me?” Lu Chen asked in puzzlement. Liu Changping nodded. “I should have told you that we recently had contact with our connections. They even revealed some new information to us. “They said that important resources of Second World will slowly materialize in this world over time. “Therefore, when the projection of White Fog City appeared in our sky, we knew that you must have been the first to enter White Fog City. “Therefore, we surrounded your residence immediately to ensure your safety in case anyone intends of sabotaging your process. “Please forgive us for this.” Lu Chen waved his hand. “It’s fine.” He understood that his entry into White Fog City had triggered a strange phenomenon. Moreover, this strange phenomenon could now be seen by the whole world. In order to ensure his safety, Liu Changping had sent people to his home to protect him. However, if White Fog City really descended into this world, would he still get to be invisible? He remembered the bonuses of White Fog City and the special effects of those pieces of equipment. Lu Chen could not help but hope that that bonus part of the game could be transferred to the real world as well. He looked at Liu Changping and said, “I think the reason why I’m here isn’t just because of White Fog City, right?” Liu Changping nodded and said, “That’s right. The appearance of White Fog City was within our expectations. However, their appearance was something we didn’t expect.” Liu Changping pointed at Lan Weiwei and Rollie. Lu Chen was not surprised. Sooner or later, Lan Weiwei’s presence would be known by the higher-ups. He had long been prepared for this. Moreover, since the appearance of White Fog City, they must have seen Lan Weiwei in-game and in real life as well. Eventually, they would put two and two together It was obvious they would speak up about it. He looked at Liu Changping and said, “I am sure that you guys have investigated upon this matter. Could it be that you have not found anything?” Liu Changping shook his head and said, “Nothing.” “It’s impossible to exist in this world with no background information. The Dragon country could not find anything on them at all.” He paused and looked at Lan Weiwei. “There’s only one possibility. She’s not from this world!” In the room, everyone’s heart trembled! She’s not from this world!? How could that be? Could this girl be from the Second World? If that’s the case, then things are quickly escalating to heights that they could not comprehend anymore! Everyone’s eyes focused on Lu Chen. They hoped that he would give them an answer that would settle their nerves. Lu Chen did not try to hide it. Instead, he nodded affirmatively and said, “That’s right. Weiwei is indeed not from this world. She came from the Second World!” After saying that, everyone felt a chill in their hearts. “How did you manage to bring her out of the Second World?” Liu Changping asked in a trembling voice. This was an extremely serious matter! The Second World was gradually combining into this world. If he could teleport people over, this would undoubtedly be a huge crisis as it would mean that monsters could destroy this very earth that they are standing on. The beings of the Second World were basically filled with terrifying destructive power! Lu Chen only spoke the truth and nothing but the truth. He directly said, “I don’t know either, but it could be related to the signed contract.” “A contract?” Everyone was puzzled. Lu Chen nodded and said, “That’s right, a contract.” He looked at Weiwei, patted her shoulder, and spoke to everyone around. “Weiwei is my pet. Her true form is an Ash Wolf!” After saying that, everyone looked at Lan Weiwei in disbelief. No one would have thought that such an obedient little girl was actually a wolf? <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The meeting room fell into a dead silence once again. Lan Weiwei blinked her eyes innocently. She did not understand what was happening at all. Liu Changping’s eyes widened. He pointed at Rollie who was in Lan Weiwei’s arms and said, “Then… What about this panda?” Lu Chen nodded and said, “That’s right. This panda is the same as Weiwei. After signing the contract with this little fellow, he too mysteriously appeared in this world. “In addition, I discovered that I can now enter the Second World without using the game pod. “Going into the Second World without it is completely different from entering with the game pod! “Plus, I can also summon the weapon I use in-game to the real world and use the skills I have in-game to the real world.” As Lu Chen finished speaking, a golden light flashed above his head. The word Sword God appeared for everyone to see. With a flip of his palm, an aqua-blue longsword also appeared in his hand. His entire body was exuding a terrifying aura when it appeared. This gesture made everyone hold their breath in fear! Liu Changping was dumbstruck. He had never thought that Lu Chen would be able to do such a thing! “Good, very good! This is amazing progress!” He was too stunned to speak of anything else except praises. Lu Chen’s strength was equivalent to the strength of the Dragon Country and the strength of the east. No matter what his attitude was as a citizen, it would not change the fact that he is from the Dragon Country . With that in mind, Lu Chen could be seen as a powerful trump card for other countries to worry about! Lu Chen paced around the room with his weapon in hand as he spoke. “All kinds of signs indicate that the connection between the Second World and our world is greatly merging. “I think it won’t be long before the two worlds begin to merge into one… “I’m sure that the White Fog City in the sky and the phenomenon that happened to me can prove this case in point.” Liu Changping nodded and said, “Your speculation is correct. In fact, all the countries have been preparing for this very day.” Lu Chen looked at Liu Changping and said, “Then, after answering your questions, shouldn’t I have some questions of my own? Or should I say, what should you tell me?” Lu Chen needed information to exchange in this situation. Whether it was the Second World or the real world, he knew too little about everything that was going on. He felt like he was left in the dark. If Liu Yuan had not told him part of it and him guessing part of it, he would have lived in total darkness. Liu Changping looked at him and sighed. “Well, it’s time for you to know some things. “Otherwise, it’s not fair to you, and it won’t be convenient for you in the future as well.” Liu Changping pondered for a moment and said slowly, “This world has supernatural powers. Liu Yuan should have told you about it, right?” He glanced at Liu Yuan in the distance and guessed from her expression. Lu Chen nodded and said, “That’s right, but I forced her to say it. Don’t blame her for sharing the information with me. To be honest, she’s quite a responsible team member.” Liu Changping said somewhat embarrassedly, “We were just being cautious.” Lu Chen said, “I know.” Liu Changping heaved a sigh of relief before speaking again. “It’s good that you can understand. “Then I’ll continue with what I said just now. This world has had supernatural powers since ancient times. “The martial artist experts in the east, the mages and knights in the west. “For example, in Dragon Country, every family has a strong background. “This is also the reason why the Dragon Country is monopolized by major families. “Because their status in strength is too strong.” Lu Chen nodded. He knew all of this. “About five years ago, a secret realm appeared at the border between the Dragon Country and the Bear Country. “At that time, the Gu family took the lead and led many experts from the families to explore the realm. “There were more than a hundred people in this group. The weakest one was at the Heaven-grade, and the strongest one was a legendary spiritual realm expert!” After saying this, many people felt a chill in their hearts. A spiritual expert! An expert that only existed in legends! Lu Chen was just as shocked as everyone. He had a rough idea of his own strength. Before entering White Fog City, he knew that he could only barely surpass Heaven-grade experts. He knew that he could not reach the level of acquired realm experts at all. With just one look, one could tell how terrifying the strength of any expert was. As for strong martial artist fighters in general, it was something that he dared not to think about ever. However, after entering White Fog City, he had obtained a huge improvement. In addition, he even had a series of title upgrades. He was now confident that he could fight against a master. However, he had never seen a master anywhere, so could not yet gauge his abilities and skills.  Liu Changping’s voice continued on as Lu Chen pondered. “That group of people went for about three months, but there was no news! “That secret realm also slowly disappeared, and the masters of the big families were cut off just like that. “It even triggered inner turmoil in the Dragon Country. “Half a year after the secret realm disappeared, the will of the Second World slowly descended. “They began to communicate with the higher ups of the world, sending out its will to descend. “At the beginning, everyone was terrified. “Everyone wondered why such an unknown existence wanted to descend. “Could it be a disaster? “Without rushing too quickly into it, the higher ups carefully communicated with it for nearly four years. “They decided that it didn’t seem like an invasion. Instead, it seemed like it was asking for help. “Its final message was that it couldn’t hold on any longer and that the world had no choice but to only descend. “It couldn’t control it anymore. It had no choice but to activate the Second World’s plan.” Lu Chen pondered. It sounded like the Second World’s will had encountered some difficulty. The Second World had descended into this world and then asked for help from this world. It descended into this world in the form of a game. It has even helped the humans of this world to modify their bodies. Lu Chen nodded to show that he understood. He looked at Liu Changping and said, “Are there any images and information left behind from them? I want to take a look.” Liu Changping nodded and then spoke, “Follow me.” With that, he walked out. Lu Chen followed directly behind him. They walked all the way to the top floor of the Dragon building. After passing countless checkpoints, they finally arrived at a secret hidden room. Liu Changping turned on a device, and an image appeared in front of Lu Chen’s eyes. It was an unknown object, like a disorderly ball of thread. Then, it made an irregular sound. Lu Chen could feel some kind of will from that sound. “Save me… Save me…” the voice rang out. This feeling?he felt was similar to him voluntarily descending into the Second World. However, at the same time, it was completely different. After a while, Lu Chen and Liu Changping walked out from inside. At this point, he completely believed Liu Changping’s words. He looked at Liu Changping and said, “Then, what are your next moves?” Liu Changping pondered for a moment and then looked at Lu Chen and said, “We have a plan. In doing so, we would need your help.” Lu Chen said, “Go on.” Liu Changping said, “You should know that the existence of the aristocratic families has been hindering the development of the Dragon Country, especially the arrogant aristocratic families who rely on their countless expert fighters. “They always look down on the entire organization. “Therefore, we need you to eliminate some of the aristocratic families. “However, the prerequisite is that you must have sufficient strength in order to carry out this mission.” Lu Chen’s eyes gleamed with desire as he replied, “You mean, you’re going to make a move against the Xiao Family?” Liu Changping nodded his head heavily. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen knew that the day would come when the Xiao family would be destroyed. He had also wanted to be the one to personally end the Xiao family. However, he had never thought that this day would come so soon. Moreover, this method was actually proposed by the higher-ups. This was very intriguing. The reason why Lu Chen was a little surprised was that he had no idea how important he was. As a level one player, they knew that he currently owned three golden titles — Sword God, Blade God, and Bow God. As a newbie who could complete an insanely dangerous mission and capture a giant rabbit that was as big as a hill… As a player who could kill a boss that was a dozen levels higher as easily as drinking water… As a player who could bring a Second World character out of this world… Most importantly, he was a person who could kill a god! What kind of protection did the country have to give to such a person? No one dared to imagine what this person could do! If nuclear weapons were the high-end combat strength of mankind in the past hundred years, then no one would doubt that one day, Lu Chen would replace the status of nuclear weapons and become the anchor to protect the Dragon Country! In the past, the Xiao family used their power for personal gain, and the higher-ups had no choice but to turn a blind eye to it. Even if the Xiao family forcefully took away Lu Chen’s information and prepared to cause trouble in this world, the higher-ups of the Dragon Country still hesitated, they only took away Lin and Xiao Chuan, but did not immediately execute them. They did not want to escalate the conflict. This was both a protection method and a blow to the Xiao family’s ego. After all, the Xiao family was the largest organization and the backer of the White Alliance. They had power over the economic lifeline of the Dragon Country. Even among the higher-ups, there were quite a few of them. Pulling out this malignant tumor of the Xiao family would very likely cause the Dragon Country to suffer severe injuries! However, the moment Lu Chen became the City Lord of White Fog City, the higher-ups of the Dragon Country finally made a decision. Lu Chen had to be protected! The enemies outside the Dragon Country should be demolished! The malignant tumor within the Dragon Country should be removed! Although the Dragon Country was powerful, its position in the international world was not so great that it could monopolize over certain powers. Lu Chen was the greatest hope for the entire Dragon Country! When Liu Changping and Lu Chen said this, the higher-ups had already started to take action. The higher-ups of the Xiao family in the Dragon Country were being strictly monitored, and they were not allowed to enter or leave at will. It was to ensure that they could strike a fatal blow and uproot the entire Xiao family to shambles! The one to pull the trigger should be by the well-deserved Lu Chen! Liu Changping began to explain the specific situation of the Xiao family to Lu Chen. “Those people from the White Alliance are mostly mobs. There’s no need to pay any attention to them. “Especially when you killed them time and time again at the Resurrection Point. Their main bodies are also very weak now. They don’t have the ability to fight back and won’t dare attack you.” Liu Yuan’s eyes widened as she looked at Lu Chen, who listened attentively. She could not link this 18-year-old boy in front of her with Morning Mist, who had killed tens of thousands of people from the White Alliance, casually killed eight golden-ranked officials from the White Alliance, and even robbed and killed Xiao Chuan a hundred times. Her eyes faintly glowed with desire. This young man in front of her seemed to have a different kind of magical power and had created countless miracles. It was as if nothing was impossible when it came to him. Liu Changping continued, “Previously, you killed the eight golden-ranked experts. Similarly, they would not pose any threat to you. “However, according to our understanding, the Xiao family should still have an expert hidden behind the scenes who had never appeared before. “Because a year ago, there was a heaven rank expert who wanted to go to the Xiao family to kill the head of the Xiao family, and his skills were far higher than Lin’s. He had just barely touched the threshold of the acquired realm. “According to our spies, the head of the Xiao family had been slashed twice, and the second slash had almost cut off his hand. “At the most critical moment, a black shadow flashed by, and the assassin’s head was separated from his body.” “An instant kill?!” Liu Yuan’s eyes widened, and she covered her mouth with her hand. Her eyes were filled with disbelief. Liu Changping’s expression was solemn. “That’s right. Most importantly, we don’t know who that person is, what his identity is, or what methods he had used to be that quick.” Lan Weiwei’s expression was not one of kiddy happiness anymore. Instead, she looked like a grown mature woman when she spoke up. “In other words, as long as we kill him, we can kill the Xiao family’s patriarch and wipe out the entire Xiao family. After all, the Xiao family’s patriarch doesn’t have any skills to protect himself, right?” Liu Changping nodded slowly. “That’s right. In the past, whenever there was a need to fight, Lin would be the one to step in. And during the assassination a year ago, the Xiao family’s patriarch’s wrist, which had been slashed until it was a bloody mess, could not be recovered perfect.” After saying that, everyone fell into deep thought. No one continued to speak. Everyone had seen how powerful Lu Chen’s combat strength was. Especially the scene of him killing Lin. Even the group leader of the Dragon Team could not help but sigh in admiration. However, everyone knew that the Xiao family had an acquired realm expert! If a heaven rank expert was the king of humans, then an acquired realm expert could be said to have already left the category of being a human. That person could be seen as the god of lands. Although Lu Chen was able to cut down the 320 million HP of the Guardian General in White Fog City with a single slash, everyone knew clearly that Lu Chen would not be able to casually unleash such a critical strike again. Otherwise, no one in the Second World would be able to stand against Lu Chen. Even if the pre-heaven rank fighters of the Xiao family were not as invincible as the Guardian General in White Fog City, it would still be extremely difficult to finish him off. Lu Chen did not hesitate and directly agreed, “No problem. I’ll deal with that person myself. The rest of the pawns in that family will be left for you to clean up.” Liu Yuan’s expression was a little worried, “Lu Chen, do you want to reconsider this decision? That is an acquired realm expert after all...;” Lu Chen shook his head slightly, “There’s no need. Even if I don’t kill him, he will find an opportunity to kill me. Instead of waiting for death and guarding against it, it will still appear at any moment, it’s better to directly strike and kill him first!” Liu Yuan was speechless. Liu Changping also nodded. “Alright, it’s settled then. Tonight at 11 p.m. sharp, we will begin the operation!” … Late at night, moonlight cascaded the earth and the wind blew gently, as if it knew what was going to go down. Xiao family. Xiao family’s head, Xiao Bai, could be seen in the hall. There were eight people sitting below him. Their faces were filled with fear. “Master, Lu Chen is too strong. Even if we join forces, we still can’t defeat him.” Another woman with a pale face said, “I’ve been killed by him ten times. I can’t even walk properly anymore. Now, the young master has been locked up, and most of the members have left out of fear.” Xiao Bai’s face was gloomy. The White Alliance had more than ten thousand people, the largest in the entire Dragon Country. They thought that with this force, they would be able to rise up in the Second World, but they did not expect to fall so hard and become a laughing stock. The most important thing was that the hearts of the people in the White Alliance had already shattered. Their own grandson had also been imprisoned. As the head of the family was about to say something, a message suddenly came from his cell phone.. This message directly brought upon creases on his face as he eyes widened in fear. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation When he read the message, the veins on the Xiao’s head of family bulged. He was so shocked that the phone screen started to crack from a tight unconscious grip. After a full ten seconds, he forcefully suppressed his anger. “All of you can go back. These matters are not your fault.” The eight people below the man felt a sense of relief. Some of them even wiped the beads of sweat off their heads, bowed deeply, and hurriedly got up and walked out. Xiao Bai slowly closed his eyes, and softly spoke, he looked as though he was speaking to himself. “Elder Ling.” At this moment, an old man appeared from a shadowed corner that would have been difficult for one to notice his presence. One could vaguely see that he was a short and hunchbacked old man, and one could assume that he was extremely weak. However, the fierce aura emitted from his body made people feel that there was a sharp edge and grit in the way he carried himself. The old and sinister voice spoke, “If I make a move, it’ll be the last time you’ll ever get my assistance. Have you thought this through? Is it really worth it to use it to kill this brat?” A burst of terrifying laughter ensued. However, Xiao Bai did not have the slightest bit of fear. “Back then, our Xiao family found the right pills for you and helped you become an acquired expert. We hope that you can help us get through these difficult times. “The first time was when my father asked you to kill the head of the Xu family in order to reach the peak of the Dragon Country. “The second time was a year ago when that heaven rank expert tried to assassinate me. You saved my life. “This third time, as long as you can kill him, you won’t owe our Xiao family anymore.” “Alright, then I shall help you with this request.” As he spoke, the figure that seemed to be on the verge of death moved slightly and slowly merged into the darkness once again. It was as if there had never been anyone there ever. It was extremely strange. “Lu Chen, oh Lu Chen, I didn’t even have to take the initiative to look for you. You actually delivered yourself to my door. You can’t blame me for this.” After he finished speaking, Xiao Bai closed his eyes, as if waiting for Lu Chen’s arrival. The hall was so silent that if a pin dropped, it could be heard. … At the entrance of the Xiao family manor, iron doors towered high. This place, which should have been tightly sealed, was opened, as if it waited for Lu Chen to enter. Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei stood at the door, and the atmosphere was somber. Only the panda in Lan Weiwei’s arms seemed to be unaware of everything. It held the bamboo and nibbled it bit by bit contently. This happy scene did not fit well with the current situation. The two walked in through the door. The manor, which should have been brightly lit, was now incomparably dark. If it was not for the moon that hung high in the sky shining the way, one would not be able to see anything at all. Lu Chen frowned slightly. “Be careful, something is not right.” Obviously, no matter how well the secret measures of the Dragon Country were done, it would be difficult to completely hide information from the Xiao family. The secret of this operation could have been leaked, they might have been expecting them already. However, it did not matter. In the face of absolute strength, all techniques were illusory. Moreover, as long as the moon still shone, it would be advantageous to Lu Chen. Lan Weiwei’s ears twitched slightly. At this moment, her eyes flashed with a hint of green light. Her gaze was somewhat cautious as she held onto Rollie tighter. “I have a feeling that danger will appear from the surrounding shadows.” Lu Chen nodded. If Xiao Bai dared to wait for him in such a grand manner, then it means that he was extremely confident in being able to destroy him. How strong was an acquired realm expert? Lu Chen was eager to experience battling one, but he dared not to let his guard down. The two carefully walked towards the hall, on constant high vigilance. Only the panda in Lan Weiwei’s arms ate happily, he even enjoyed himself in Lan Weiwei’s arms. In the dark night, as an ancient wolf, Lan Weiwei’s night vision was not hindered at all. Even Lu Chen was a little envious for that characteristic. If he could have such a strong night vision, then his assassination ability could be doubled! However, feeling the nourishment of the moonlight, Lu Chen was not afraid. After more than ten minutes, he finally arrived at the hall. “You’re finally here. I’ve been waiting.” Xiao Bai, who sat on his seat comfortably, narrowed his eyes slightly as if he had just woken up. Lu Chen’s eyes were solemn. “I did make you wait for a long time. In the Second World, when the Xiao family attacked me for the first time, I should have been the one at the Resurrection Point killing all the members of the White Alliance myself.” Not only did Xiao Bai’s expression not turn ugly, he even looked relaxed. He picked up the tea on the table and took a sip. “The tea is good, but it’s a pity that it’s gone cold.” Then, he raised his head and looked at Lu Chen. “You’re brave coming here knowing that you’ve become an enemy of our Xiao family. “I know that you’re very strong, but there’s a limit to how strong you can be! “Because your physical body has restricted your highest strength, there’s no way that you can withstand great attack. “If you’re willing to join our Xiao family, not only will I let bygones be bygones, but I can also help you solve this problem!” Lu Chen’s gaze was slightly shaken. How was he going to solve the issue of his physical body holding him back? This offer was much too tempting. To Lu Chen, if the grudges he held were not severe, he might have been tempted. The opportunity that could allow him to unleash his full strength was no small feat! However, it quickly turned into a passing thought. Within a second, Lu Chen’s gaze regained its calmness. “If you said this from the start, even if it was to threaten me to find my real identity, I would be able to accept it. Now, after what you’ve done, it’s too late to say things like these.” When Xiao Bai heard Lu Chen’s reply, all hope he held in his eyes instantly disappeared. Even his gaze dimmed a little. He waved his hand and extinguished the few lamps beside him. His voice was desolate as he spoke, “In that case, do you really have the courage to destroy our Xiao family?” The moment the candles extinguished, the hall instantly darkened. With that, Lu Chen instantly felt a chill run down his spine and hesitantly stepped back. Suddenly, a pitch-black dagger flew right towards where Lu Chen moved from! This dagger seemed to not be made from normal metal. It did not have any luster. Instead, it moved like a shadow, making it hard for one to notice its presence! At this moment, a thread of cloth hung on the dagger and a light appeared when it slashed downward. Then, with a swing of the dagger going upward, it once again entered the darkness. There was no trace of it after it disappeared! This fluid assassination technique was extremely smooth, without the slightest bit of sloppiness. Even Lan Weiwei, an Ancient Ash Wolf, did not manage to react in time to such an attack! This terrifying speed and perfect assassination technique shocked her beyond compare. Most importantly, with her keen eyes, she did not notice that there was someone in the shadows. To be exact, this assassin did not rely on his shadow to hide his identity! At this moment, beads of sweat appeared on Lu Chen’s forehead. He thought that he still stood a chance against an acquired realm expert, but they did not mention that this expert was an assassin as well! He was familiar with this technique of escaping further away after missing an attack, but it was because of this that he understood how terrifying this assassin could truly be. If he was not mistaken, this assassin was able to be one with the shadows! What kind of supernatural power was this? Was this the ancient martial art technique that had once disappeared from the world? Was this the one and only legendary move from it?! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation While Lu Chen was shocked, in a corner far away from the hall, a shadow appeared from the darkness around it. In the end, it turned into a hunched old man. The old man looked at the person in front of him as if he had seen something rare. “Hah! Little child, you’re quite nimble. This is the first time I’ve missed in twenty years. You’ve hurt my pride. I’ll have to kill you for that.” The old man spoke indifferently, he talked as though he was going to step on some measly ants. The first time in the past twenty years? Lu Chen was confused. Lan Weiwei had already placed Rollie on the ground to let him play by himself. Meanwhile, the faint image of a wolf’s claw could be seen on her palm. The old man looked at Lan Weiwei’s hand and his eyes seemed to emit a glow. “This girl is special. She succeeded in transforming her hand into a wolf claw. It seems like a supernatural ability. “If my guess is correct, you should be a wolf demon, right? “In that case, looks like I’ve struck gold today! I’ll have a demon core soon!” Hearing these words, the coldness in Lu Chen’s eyes became even colder. In his eyes, this assassin was already a dead man. Lan Weiwei had long lost her cute appearance. She looked at him coldly, ready to find a loophole to attack at any time. When Rollie heard that the assassin wanted to take Lan Weiwei’s demon core, he trembled in fear. Then, he mustered the courage to bare his teeth at the assassin to express his dissatisfaction. Xiao Bai sat in the hall and let out a long sigh. “Well, there goes your opportunity to attack. Ling, how did you miss that shot? “Do you know how difficult it was to rope him in?” Looking at Xiao Bai, who was ridiculed the old man in the hall, Lu Chen still felt that something was not right. This old man was just an assassin. If he really did not care about killing Xiao Bai, he would not be able to stop him at all. What exactly was Xiao Bai relying on now? What other backup plans did he have? Without allowing Lu Chen to think too much, the old man once again slowly disappeared into the shadows around him. “Brat, you are worthy of knowing my name. I’m the first President of the Night Union, Ling Yin.” What was surprising was that the old man’s voice seemed to have echoed from all directions. Lu Chen could not figure out where to real sound was coming from. How did he do it?! Lu Chen was reminded of Hei Yu, who he had given the other party a teleportation scroll, being the President of the Night Union was he not? One had to know that the Dark Union had been somewhat fearful of Xiao Chuan back then. At the same time, he remembered some information that Liu Yuan had given him, including this person called Ling Yin. She even mentioned that this person came from an ancient martial arts aristocratic family. His entire family had been exterminated because they had offended their enemies. Only he, who was still young, was rescued and trained. Finally, at the age of twenty, he assassinated all of his enemies and formed an assassin organization, the Night Union. Therefore, Ling Yin had completely established his name in the ancient martial arts world. He was known for his magical ability that could merge with the shadow and it was close to impossible to guard against. No one in their right mind would dare provoke an assassin who could appear from his shadow and kill them at any time! Therefore, the reputation of the Night Union soared high. However, when Ling Yin was fifty years old, he suddenly disappeared, and no one knew where he went. The Dark Union had gone through a long period of turmoil and reorganization before it was directed into the right track today. Of all places to meet him, Lu Chen did not expect to meet him here. What made him feel troubled was that none of Ling Yin’s targets had ever escaped. A one-hit kill was his signature move. No one would survive until he assassinated them. It was the same even if their level was higher than his. However, today was destined to be a long battle. Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei’s came prepared. It was impossible to kill them in one hit. Lu Chen knew that Liu Changping’s troops were far away. If he needed them, he could shine a military searchlight that could illuminate a signal a kilometer away at any time. However, if that was the case, it was very likely that Ling Yin would not show his presence at all. Just as Lu Chen was thinking of a solution, Lan Weiwei, who was at the side, had already started fighting with the shadows! Black daggers kept appearing from the black shadows in all directions. From different angles, the daggers were aimed at her vital points. One second, the daggers were still in front of her, but the next moment, they appeared behind her. This ability to teleport in the shadows was very troublesome. Although Lan Weiwei’s movements were agile and her attack power was as high as 20,000, she could not cause any damage to the shadowed attacks. On the other hand, Ling Yin’s casual slash was enough to reduce Lan Weiwei’s health bar by quite a bit. 3,500 HP! 4,678 HP! 14,534 HP! 3,429 HP! … In less than a minute, Lan Weiwei’s 100,000 HP bar had been reduced by half! If not for Moonlight’s Blessing, she would probably have died by now. This fighting pace was already considered slow for Ling Yin. After all, he usually his targets with a single slash! … In the distance, many members of the Dragon Team observed the fight. They were extremely anxious, but they knew that the matter at hand was not something they could participate in. With their strength, they would just end up becoming burdens in the fight. One of the team members said anxiously, “Why don’t we use the specially made bullets to snipe him from a distance? It’s not like we haven’t sniped an ancient martial art practitioner before!” Liu Yuan quickly denied this suggestion, “No way! That assassin should be Ling Yin, who disappeared for many years. Look at him, he’s been fighting for so long, but his body has never left the shadow. The bullets won’t have any effect at all. Moreover, they’re moving too quickly, we might accidentally hurt Lan Weiwei.” They all knew that Lan Weiwei could be fast enough to dodge the bullet. However, the problem was that if she gets distracted even for a second, she would be instantly pierced through! Ling Yin’s dagger might normally cause thousands or even tens of thousands of damage, but if it really cut Lan Weiwei’s throat off, it could be equivalent to a Second World armor-piercing and explosive strike, directly taking Lan Weiwei’s life away! While everyone silently pondered, Liu Changping’s earpiece suddenly rang out, “Get the Dragon Team to immediately spread out and surround the entire manor. Wait for my signal later, turn on all the searchlights!” It was Lu Chen’s voice! Everyone’s spirits were instantly lifted! Initially, when everyone saw that Lu Chen was idle, they held heavy hearts, “Can’t Morning Mist breakthrough this trap?” However, now, when they heard his voice, everyone felt as if they had been reassured! Liu Changping immediately assigned tasks to the team, “Zhang Ming, lead three people and a searchlight to the high mountain five hundred meters north of the manor. Chen Liang, take two people and a searchlight to the signal tower eight hundred meters east.” Liu Yuan was a little anxious. “What about me? I don’t have a searchlight!” Liu Changping gritted his teeth. “Go to the Chunmao building in the north and immediately contact their general manager. Move all the commercial searchlights in their building to the top of the building. We need as many as we can get! “Today, our task is to help Lu Chen as much as possible. Let’s see Lu Chen kill that old man alone!” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation As soon as Liu Changping’s order was given, everyone rushed to their destination without any hesitation. This battle was not only about the life and death of an individual, but it might even be about the life and death of the entire Dragon Country! Throughout the entire world, the Beautiful Country, the Island Country, the Cold Country, and the Eagle Country had all made great achievements. Beautiful Country had relied on its outstanding technological strength and powerful financial strength to stand at the peak of the mecha field. There was once a top-tier warrior who used a mecha to kill a lord with a single shot! Island Country was split into two major factions, ninjutsu experts and yin-yang families. They each used their own abilities to fight and relied on their unfathomable abilities to crazily fight monsters. Cold Country had almost disappeared under the suppression of the country. However, the arrival of the Second World game had made them rise up and become the top guilds. It was said that a priest of that country had arrived in a city and was ready to accept the test in the next few days. Eagle Country has a unified system and an absolute specialized army. They were completely different from the motley crew of the White Alliance. Although they did not have the combat strength like Lu Chen, they had already become heavy fighters for attacking cities and plundering land with their army. If something went wrong with Lu Chen this time, the entire Dragon Country would fall behind by a lot. If they could not catch up with other countries, they would probably lose countless lives. This was something no one wanted to experience. Everyone moved very quickly. In less than five minutes, everyone was in position. At this time, Lu Chen finally moved! He switched to the Sword God mode. If he was in Second World, everyone would have seen a golden symbol Sword God appearing above his head. His stats soared! His original basic combat power increased by seven times from 19,850 to 138,950. When the moonlight shone in from the outside, under the Moonlight’s Blessing, the moonlight fused into his body. After an enlightening feeling, Lu Chen’s combat power increased by 50% again, reaching an astonishing 208,425! This was the combat power buff that came from the title. One had to know that Lu Chen’s attack speed was already 16.5. Under the Sword God title, his attack speed increased by 800%, and he could now slash 132 times in a second. This also meant that Lu Chen could deal 27,512,100 damage in a second, this was close to 30 million! Such a strike was definitely not something the opponent could withstand! However, the problem was, how was Lu Chen going to break out of this situation? As long as the shadow was there, Ling Yin would be able to turn invisible. If he shined his light, the opponent would also shift away as the shadow retreated. No one could think of a solution. Xiao Bai, who sat on the throne, grew more and more confident as time went by. He was not worried that Ling Yin would fail. He also knew that as long as Lu Chen died, the country would not dare make a move against the Xiao family. After all, among the people who entered the acquired realm, the strongest was the ancestor of the Xiao family, who was at the spiritual realm. No one would dare offend a dead person from the Xiao family. If it was just a dead person in the Second World game, no one would bat an eye. So much so in the real world, no one would care. When Lu Chen was ready to make a move, adrenaline pumped into his veins, readying himself. At this time, Ling Yin was fighting with Lan Weiwei. When he saw Lu Chen move, he returned to the shadows and disappeared without a trace. Lan Weiwei took a few steps back and stood under the moonlight. Lan Weiwei’s was recovering rapidly. In less than a minute, she was back to full health. This gave Lu Chen some confidence in this situation. Lu Chen constantly sensed his surroundings. The area was dark and the wind blew silently. Other than the faint sound of the wind coming from outside, there was nothing unusual. The shadows on the ground seemed to hide countless killing intent, but no one could figure out where Ling Yin was. At the same time, Ling Yin tried to confuse him even more, and his voice came from all directions. “Kid, I have to say that your combat strength is really strong. Judging from your aura just now, you can definitely reach the peak of the mid-acquired realm fighter. “If you were to meet other acquired realm experts, although you might not be able to win, at least no one would be able to stop you. “That girl looked weak. I didn’t expect her to react well and not be able to instantly be killed by me. “Heh, I don’t know if you have the same grit as her. Why don’t I kill you in an instant first and then grind her to death bit by bit?” Lan Weiwei looked at Lu Chen worriedly. She wanted to rush forward to help, but was stopped by a certain look from Lu Chen. He closed his eyes and began to listen carefully to the other party’s words. Although the voice came from all directions, Lu Chen was still trying to figure out the main direction it was coming from. Suddenly, he opened his eyes. “You hid yourself very well. I really can’t tell where you’re from. Although, there is something wrong with your voice.” Ling Yin’s breathing paused, and then he asked, “Oh? Tell me about it?” Lu Chen said, “This hall is too big. There are echoes everywhere, but when I listen carefully, I found that only the echo in the southeast corner is the smallest. There is almost no echo. “So, you must have spoken from there!” Before he finished his words, Lu Chen charged directly toward the southeast corner and swung his sword fiercely! At this moment, even Xiao Bai’s eyes became a little solemn. The high-level officials of the Dragon Country had investigated Lu Chen’s situation before, so the damage that he had caused under the Sword God State could not be recovered at all. No one dared to bet whether this kind of damage would affect the shadow. The golden light of his weapon directly hit the southeast corner. The sword aura directly passed through and emitted golden light. The moment it touched the wall, it sliced through like butter. Without any hindrance, it passed through the wall! A bottomless crack appeared on the ground! Under the power of the Sword God State, even the shadow on the ground shook slightly! “You’re much too arrogant, boy!” Lu Chen’s movements were indeed quick. However, as an assassin, Ling Yin’s movements kept up with the motions. When Lu Chen swung his blade 132 times, Ling Yin did not dare to be careless at all. He immediately dodged and left. At the same time, he found a loophole and flashed out with his weapon! The pitch-black blade directly pierced through his skin, brushed past his ribs, and ruthlessly stabbed into his heart! Puchi! A bloodthirsty killing intent appeared in Ling Yin’s eyes! It worked! His three-time agreement to help the Xiao family was finally lifted, and he was free. More importantly, the number one person in the Second World, Lu Chen, actually died in his hands. This was definitely a great honor to hold! Lan Weiwei’s face instantly turned deathly pale, and her body suddenly trembled. Even Rollie, who had been gnawing on bamboo all this time, stopped and looked nervously at Lu Chen. In the distance, Liu Yuan’s heart seemed to have been violently tugged, and she could not help but shout, “Lu Chen!” Liu Changping’s fight was being played in the Dragon Country’s conference room. At this moment, there were more than ten high-level officials watching the scene unfold. Their heartbeats were raised manifold when they saw what happened! Ling Yin smiled cruelly, he tried to look for fear, helplessness, and fear on the other party’s face! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Everyone’s hearts felt heavy. On the contrary, Xiao Bai, who was further away, could not help but reveal a look of joy in his eyes. The scourge that had caused the Xiao family to fall into disarray in the Second World, and destroyed more than half of the members of the White Alliance to withdraw from the association, finally died! Even Lan Weiwei, who would share the same fate as Lu Chen, felt a little uneasy in her heart. With such a serious injury, even if Lu Chen did not die, his strength would probably be greatly reduced. Everyone thought that Lu Chen was finished, but Ling Yin, on the other hand, wavered. This was because, in the next second, a hand firmly grabbed onto Ling Yin like an iron pincer, and he could not move! Ling Yin did not falter, instead, a trace of a smile actually appeared on his face. He slowly raised the weapon in his other hand and directly chopped down the limb that grabbed onto him! Odd enough, Ling Yan felt goosebumps on his neck when he did that. He quickly used his other hand to pull out the dagger that was stabbed into Lu Chen’s chest and swung it down again! This time, he did not charge at Lu Chen, he only hacked away at his arm. The opponent in front of him seemed like he could not be killed at all. The dagger had been stabbed into his heart, so how could he still be moving and alive?! At this moment, the most ruthless decision he made was to cut off his arm to save his life! Blood splattered everywhere once he made that desperate choice! Ling Yin cut off his arm and immediately prepared to return to the shadows. At this moment, Lu Chen suddenly raised the hand that held onto the severed arm! In an instant, searchlights appeared in all four directions at the same time! Not just the illuminated halls, but even the surrounding 1,000 meters were as bright as day. There was no chance for a shadow to appear at all! “F*ck!!” Ling Yin finally understood what was going on. Whether it was Lu Chen being assassinated, grabbing onto his arm, or even cutting off his very own arm, every step was within his opponent’s calculations! As for him now, without a shadow aid, he was probably only slightly stronger than a heaven rank expert. How could he beat his opponent? Escape was the only option! This was the only thought left in Ling Yin’s mind. With that, his feet soared away like the wind! However, Lu Chen was one step ahead of him. A dagger appeared in his hand and he directly slashed it across Ling Yin’s neck. Ling Yin felt the whole world spin, as his head fell onto the ground, dead. Due to Lu Chen’s speedy move, his body had already run dozens of meters away from his head. The first president of assassins had just been murdered! Everyone was completely shocked by this scene! How could this be! Xiao Bai stared with widened eyes, he could not believe that his assassin had died this quickly! The people of the Dragon Team were also incomparably shocked. This series of events had come too suddenly. They had just turned their light beams on when the other party had issued an order, but Ling Yin had actually died within that short time. The meeting room of the high-level officials of the dragon country was completely silent. Sitting at the very end, Gu Yiming, who had been brought in by the elders of the Gu family, swallowed hard and let out a gulp. Too many things had happened in the past few seconds, and the turn of events was quite a shock for everyone there! First, Lan Weiwei had been tortured by Ling Yin, who hid in the shadows countless times. Then, Lu Chen had found a loophole, but Ling Yin was already one step ahead. Suddenly, the tables turned, and Ling Yin had been killed. This series of reversals could be said to be the biggest roundabout event ever! It was amazing! Only Lu Chen understood how he survived. That was because after he had slashed 132 times with his activated Sword God State, he immediately changed his title to Dark Shura, which allowed him to be immune to damage once! Therefore, even when Ling Yin stabbed Lu Chen’s heart, he was unable to cause any damage. This was also Lu Chen’s second life skill! It was because of him activating Dark Shura that his opponent was unable to escape and complete the instant kill move! From an outsider’s perspective, this battle ended in just a few seconds. However, only Lu Chen, who was in the middle of it, understood the dangers and everything involved. However, this time, Lu Chen now understood that even among acquired realm experts, he was a rather powerful existence. Liu Changping’s orders were transmitted through the earpiece after a moment of silence. “Lu Chen, you can go back and rest after you’re done. We’ll clean up the rest.” The so-called cleaning was to clean up the remaining members of the Xiao family. Regardless of whether it was Xiao Bai, his subordinates, or even the industry workers, they all needed to be dealt with separately. However, Lu Chen’s reply was curt, “I’m not done yet.”  Not done yet? Hearing Lu Chen’s words, the members of the DragonTeam were somewhat puzzled. Ling Yin’s head had already fallen off. Was there anything else that needed to be dealt with? In the hall, only Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei looked at Xiao Bai without the slightest intention of dropping their defenses.. If the fight with Ling Yin was considered a ten, then Xiao Bai could be rated as a 100! If Lu Chen was not sure before, then Lan Weiwei’s attitude towards Xiao Bai made him certain that this person was definitely not what was mentioned in the information they had before. He definitely was not an ordinary person whatsoever. At this moment, Lan Weiwei reacted like a wolf and slightly bared her teeth at Xiao Bai. However, she did exert the slightest bit of fear. On the contrary, she looked a little cute. If it were not for the current situation, Lu Chen would have wanted to rub her head. Beside her, Rollie, who had been eating on a piece of bamboo, took out two bamboo shoots from Lan Weiwei’s pocket and hid in the furthest corner. This time, however, even when he ate the bamboo shoots, the little fellow’s eyes were still fixed on Xiao Bai. He did not look relaxed one bit. Xiao Bai’s face revealed a faint smile. He then clapped his hands together as the sound echoed throughout the silent building. “Good, it really you Morning Mist. You’ve only trained for less than a month, yet you were able to kill Ling Yin, who has trained for nearly a hundred years.” Lu Chen was unmoved from his spot. He glanced at Ling Yin who was lying on the ground. “Did you just watch as I killed your subordinate? If this matter were to spread, have you ever thought of how much your Xiao family’s reputation would drop from it?” A trace of disdain actually appeared on Xiao Bai’s face. “Xiao family? Him? Part of the Xiao family?” “Ling Yin said that he would leave after completing the Xiao family’s three requests, so why should I protect him? “Moreover, this trash couldn’t even beat you. He should just die like the trash he is!” Lu Chen frowned. “What do you mean?” From the intelligence reports, not only were Lin and Xiao Bai classmates, but they were also comrades who had fought together in the past. The two of them had a relationship as close as family. Back then, Lin was always being humiliated, and it was Xiao Bai who had personally led people to wipe out others that got in his way. With such a history, how could Xiao Bai call the other party trash? Xiao Bai smiled coldly, and the wrinkles on his face creased. However, his entire aura instantly rose. A strong gust of wind shot out from his body and blew in varying directions! The strong wind blew Lu Chen’s attire, causing the clothes to flutter wildly. The wall that had been cut open by Lu Chen’s sword had finally collapsed! Liu Yuan looked at the hall in the distance and her eyelids twitched! Yellow grade… Black grade… Earth grade… Heaven grade… Xiao Bai’s aura rose at a rapid speed from the beginning to the end. He did not stop at all! “He has already broken through to the heaven grade. Xiao Bai is actually an acquired realm expert!” Liu Yuan covered her mouth and her beautiful eyes looked at Xiao Bai in disbelief. Liu Changping’s mood seemed to have worsened greatly as he spoke. “It seems...;. that things are about to get more complicated!” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Liu Changping continued on, “If he’s just an ordinary acquired realm expert, why would the Xiao family hide it? “With such an expert around, the Xiao family’s status could have skyrocketed. “Xiao Bai’s strength seems endless! “Has he reached the peak of the acquired realm?!” Liu Yuan found it hard to believe. If the acquired realm was hard enough to achieve, the peak of the acquired realm was an existence that could absolutely crush other ordinary acquired realm experts. If the first president of the Dark Union, Ling Yin, faced an expert at the peak of the acquired realm, he would definitely not have the slightest intention of assassinating him. Instead, he would flee as far away as possible! As expected, Xiao Bai’s condition had risen to almost the peak of being in the acquired realm. Although his speed had slowed down, he did not stop at all. Lu Chen and the others felt the pressure Xiao Bai exerted onto them increased as made his way. Prior to this, Ling Yin and Lan Weiwei’s combat strength were not that far apart. It was just that his methods were eccentric, just like how Lan Weiwei, who was still in her ancient wolf form, faced Lu Chen. If it was not for the fact that Lan Weiwei had used a powerful skill, she would probably have been killed by Lu Chen as well. However, her special skill was still on cooldown and could not be used immediately again. Otherwise, Ling Yin might not have been a match for Lan Weiwei who had high attack and defense points. After all, Lan Weiwei’s bloodline can continuously be upgraded after she receives the Moonlight’s Blessing. Once she enters a berserk state, she might be able to barely enter the early stages of the acquired realm. However, Xiao Bai was apparently different. His aura had already reached the peak of the acquired realm, giving people a great sense of pressure. Although Ling Yin had given people a great sense of pressure before, the feeling that Xiao Bai exuded was completely different from Ling Yin. If Ling Yin gave people the feeling that he was like a dangerous poisonous snake, then Xiao Bai was like a ferocious tiger that only had murderous intent. As everyone was shocked by Xiao Bai’s sudden change, an almost inaudible but also exceptionally clear sound suddenly rang out in everyone’s ears. It was as if a glass had suddenly shattered, or the sound of an egg cracking. The sound was extremely soft but extremely sharp. As the members of the Dragon Team were looking around in astonishment, someone shockingly discovered that the hair on Liu Changping’s arm had all stood up! His mouth was wide open, and his eyes stared into the distance. He was so shocked that he could not speak for a long time. After a full half a minute, he growled at everyone and gave an order, “Everyone, retreat at least 2,000 meters from here immediately! Pay attention, run as fast as you can, and don’t look back!” The others who were from another location could no longer wait for an order when they heard that noise. They hurriedly took out their communicative devices and asked, “Leader, should we gather somewhere else” Liu Changping did not even have time to pack his equipment. He directly dragged the two members beside him and ran out without caring about their lives. “Leave all your equipment, don’t bring any with you! “With Xiao Bai’s location as the center, run to a place at least 2,000 meters away! That Xiao Bai…” “He’s a spiritual realm expert!!” Liu Changping’s roar could be heard from every walkie-talkie. Everyone felt as though the temperature around them had dropped by tens of degrees when they heard him! A spiritual realm master! If an acquired expert could dodge bullets and weapons, then a spiritual master would definitely be invulnerable to any attacks whatsoever! Ordinary pistols could not penetrate their defense at all, and their attacks were stronger than a missile launch! This kind of fighting strength was incredible and could be considered the top of the country. Each spiritual realm expert was considered a national treasure, and they were the people that the country would focus on protecting. The focus of protection also meant strict surveillance and defense. In the Dragon conference room, the high-level officials of the Dragon Country looked at everything in front of them in great shock. Perhaps ordinary people would not care about that slight sound, but everyone present was sure what that sound meant. This was precisely the symbol of an acquired expert stepping into the spiritual realm — Cocoon Breaking! The higher-ups were all stunned. Originally, some of them watched and commented on the battle anxiously. Some people nodded their heads in satisfaction because the Xiao family had been destroyed and Lu Chen had risen. Some people even smiled and drank their drinks happily as they prepared to leave after the meeting. The moment the sound of Cocoon Breaking was heard, everyone stopped moving. The secretary, who was still refilling the tea for everyone, gripped the teapot so hard that their knuckles turned white. After that, he remained motionless like a wooden figure. He did not even notice that the tea had spilled out of the cup. A large pool of tea flowed onto the table. After that, it flowed onto the outfit of another long-bearded old man. Only when the old man realized that something was burning him… Only then did he come back to his senses. “Should we ask the chief to send out the great elder of the Dragon Team immediately?” Another executive immediately replied, “I agree! When an unknown expert appears, we can always ask the great elder to come out and then report to the chief who is first-in-charge! “After all, this matter had gotten way more serious than we expected. We must contain it as soon as possible!” The Dragon Team was an important combat team that only the higher-ups of the Dragon Country knew about. Even the reserve members were at least second lieutenants, and their strength was at least a late-stage yellow grade expert! The leader of the Dragon Team, Liu Changping, had the strength of an early-stage heaven grade expert. However, only the top higher-ups who truly understood the Dragon Team knew that after every leader of the Dragon Team retired, they would become part of another Dragon Team run by Zhang. Liu Changping was certain that there was an acquired realm expert in the country because of this. However, he did not know that the first elder of the Dragon Group had the strength of a spiritual realm expert! He was also the only acquired realm expert in the country who had not entered the mystic realm! The difference between an acquired realm expert and a spiritual realm expert was extremely huge. Lu Chen was definitely not a match for the other party. The third chief in charge, who sat in the first seat furrowed his brows tightly. His eyes continuously flickered, and then he said in a steady voice, “There’s no need. Report it to the chief that is first in charge normally and deal with it according to the procedures of newly discovered spiritual realm experts.” “But...;” “There is no but. This is an order.” The third in charge took a deep breath and continued speaking, “Even if we find the first in charge now, it will take at least two hours to get to the Xiao family. This time could be enough for Xiao Bai to kill Lu Chen hundreds of times. It’ll be meaningless.” As he said that, he took out his phone and dialed a number. In the hall, Xiao Bai’s phone rang. Xiao Bai glanced towards the sound and picked up the phone. His voice was a little gloomy as he answered, “What’s the matter?” In the past, whenever the third in charge chief called the head of the Xiao family, the other party’s attitude would be on good terms. However, today, everything has changed. Xiao Bai no longer needed to pretend to be kind anymore. The third in charge chief was obviously dissatisfied with the change in the other party’s attitude. “I hope that you can give him a way out. You should know the importance of Lu Chen to our Dragon Country.” “Of course I know.” Xiao Bai’s voice was emotionless as he spoke with a blank face. “As long as Lu Chen is around, the Dragon Country will rise because of him. “And his growing curve could be enough for the Dragon Country to crush all the other countries in the world. However…” Xiao Bai paused for a moment. “I also know that Lu Chen is a sworn enemy of our Xiao family. If he leaves this place alive today, you will no longer have the Xiao family by your side. “I have given him a chance, more than once, in fact. “Since he didn’t want it, then he should just die.” With that, the phone in Xiao Bai’s hand shattered. Then, with a raise of his hand, a gust of wind formed into the form of a tiger’s claw as it directly charged towards Lu Chen!! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation When Xiao Bai made his move, it looked just an ordinary attack, but it was definitely a killing move for Lu Chen. That strong wind looked like a tiger’s claw carried a faint whistling momentum as it was directed towards Lu Chen. Killing intent surged as it got closer and closer. This kind of killing intent could be clearly felt by even the higher-ups that sat in the meeting room through the cameras in the extreme distance. This kind of killing intent had even condensed more and more! The third chief looked at the other party hanging and gritted his teeth fiercely. “Xiao Bai has to be eliminated, or else he would be a great disaster for the Dragon Country! “Quickly, get the first elder to the meeting room.” Following the order, someone immediately invited the first elder to the meeting room. In less than a minute or two, the first elder arrived in the meeting room with a strong presence. “What are you all doing? There was a spiritual realm expert hiding in the country this whole time, but no one knew? I don’t know what all of you are doing, but you’ve made a big mistake!” The first elder came in with a walking stick and a spear. Although his position was not as high as the third chief, he did not care about statuses and spoke his mind. This was due to the appearance of a spiritual realm expert that was enough to bring a crisis to the country. The third chief dared not to express any dissatisfaction because the first elder was the Guardian God of the country. He only had a helpless look on his face. “First elder, let’s not make haste. Let’s focus on Xiao Bai’s situation first before pointing fingers, all right?” The matter was urgent. The first elder shut his mouth. Instead, he looked at the screen and narrowed his eyes slightly as he spoke to everyone around. “As you all know, he has been an ordinary person for so many years and has never shown any great strength. “It is obvious that he should be a pseudo-spiritual realm expert right now! “A pseudo-spiritual realm expert?” All the higher-ups were puzzled. No one had ever heard of the term pseudo-spiritual. The first elder nodded slightly. “That’s right. I have never seen this realm before either. However, I once discovered the existence of this realm in an ancient book. “If it was an ordinary expert, without a special training technique or treasure, it would be impossible for them to hide their training all the time. “However, if they trained using some unorthodox evil techniques, in order to avoid getting themselves killed, they would often support a training technique that could hide their training tactics from the very beginning. “Only when one day they truly entered the spiritual realm and released their training knowledge would they be able to fully display their skills in front of outsiders. “However, he is only at the spiritual level right now and doesn’t have the corresponding strength and battle experience. Thus, he can only be called a pseudo-spiritual realm expert.” When these words were said, the higher-ups all understood what he meant, but everyone still had tense shoulders. At the same time, the secretary mentioned some new information to Liu Changping and then to Lu Chen. .. In the hall, when Lu Chen faced Xiao Bai’s powerful attack, he immediately felt an abnormal sense of danger. He dared not to hesitate at all and immediately dodged the attack. On the wall behind him, a tiger claw mark that was as tall as a person suddenly appeared. It pierced through the wall and directly shattered a room dozens of meters behind him. Lu Chen turned his head to look at the marking and noticed that it was a clean hit. This was an indication of an extremely high training level. Lu Chen did not hesitate at all. He immediately activated the Sword God title again and attacked Xiao Bai with 132 slashes! Damage of close to 30,000,000 directly struck in front of Xiao Bai. Xiao Bai himself was vigilant. He raised his hand and punched out with all his strength, directly dispersing Lu Chen’s attacks. The remaining power did not pose any threat to him at all. However, this attack did indeed make Xiao Bai apprehensive. His opponent was clearly only at the acquired level, yet he was actually able to stand on equal footing with him. However, after this attack, he was certain that this kid would not be able to keep up. In the next moment, Lu Chen, Lan Weiwei, and Xiao Bai directly engaged in battle. Wolf claws, tiger fists, blades, and swords interweaved, turning the entire hall into ruins. Occasionally, attacks were missed as it destroyed the countless buildings nearby. At the same time, everyone that was around retreated. Of course, the Dragon Team was constantly controlling these people from the outside. As for whether to detain these people or give them preferential treatment, it would depend on the outcome of this battle. The title of Blade God and Sword God continued to rotate above Lu Chen’s head. However, it did not seem to be of much use to Xiao Bai. The high load of the battle increased the pressure on Lu Chen and Xiao Bai. “Lan Weiwei, hold on!” After saying that, Lu Chen immediately flashed and jumped out of the battle. Lan Weiwei could not withstand the pressure coming from Xiao Bai alone. Her body suddenly burst out with a bright light, and she directly transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf! Lu Chen looked at Lan Weiwei in surprise. After Lan Weiwei transformed into a human form, she once again transformed into the appearance of an Ancient Ash Wolf. This was also her skill – True Form Transformation. When transformed into the ancient Ash Wolf King, all attributes are increased by 50%. Moonlight shone down and entered Lan Weiwei’s body. This power coursed through her bloodstream as she bared her fangs. With the blessing of the Ancient Ash Wolf King’s bloodline and the Moon God’s Blessing, Lan Weiwei’s combat strength had more than doubled! [Ancient Ash Wolf King] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Lan Weiwei] [Intimacy: 150] [Level: 25] [Attack: 20,000 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with the moonlight buff, the total is now 40,000)] [HP: 100,000 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with the moonlight buff, total, the total is now 200,000)] [Defense: 800 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with the moonlight buff, total, the total is now 1,600)] [Magic Defense: 800 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with the moonlight buff, the total is now1,600)] [Skills: Demonic Flame, Frost Domain, True Form Transformation, Ash Wolf’s Fury, Moonlight’s Blessing] [Demonic Flame: The Ancient Ash Wolf King spits out terrifying demonic flames, causing 8,000 physical and magic damage per second to the enemy in front of it.] [Frost Domain: Creates a frost domain, slowing down the enemy’s attack speed and casting speed by 50%.] [True Form Transformation: When transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf King, all attributes increase by 50%.] [Ash Wolf’s Fury: The ancient Ash Wolf King awakens the sleeping bloodline in its body, greatly increasing its own attributes, and has a chance to obtain an additional skill!] [Moonlight’s Blessing: Under the moonlight, all attributes increase by 50%.] … Under the moonlight and the True Form Transformation enhancement, Lan Weiwei immediately unleashed her full firepower! Frost Domain was activated! Xiao Bai’s movement speed was reduced by half! Ash Wolf’s Fury was activated! Her sleeping bloodline was instantly awakened! A new skill was awakened! At this moment, a new skill suddenly appeared on the interface in front of Lu Chen. [Soul Tracking: When this skill is used, it can leave a mark deep within the target’s soul. It can track up to three people. The mark will remain for three months. This skill can be shared with the owner.] Lu Chen’s eyes lit up when he saw this skill! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation When the Soul Tracking skill appeared, Lu Chen got more and more excited. This skill may not seem as powerful as the True Form Transformation or Moonlight’s Blessing, however, to Lu Chen, it was definitely a very useful skill. Especially for enemies that liked to run away or hide themselves, like Ling Yin. Once he can find an effective way to attack, it would be useless no matter how invisible an assassin could be. If any enemy escaped thousands of miles away, then Lu Chen would be able to find the enemy no matter where they went. It could be a weapon to kill and seek revenge on others! When Lan Weiwei transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf King form, everyone in the Dragon Team and the conference room widened their eyes. Although some people knew that Lan Weiwei had come from the Second World, only a few people knew her true identity. When she appeared, everyone finally confirmed that she was definitely the boss that had disappeared from the Wolf Valley! However, everyone quickly realized that she was far more powerful than the video that had circulated on the internet. Many people in the Dragon Team widened their eyes. They did not expect that such a cute girl could turn into such a menacing wolf! This scene was witnessed by many people! Although everything was hectic, including the scene of the house collapsing, no one thought too much about it. After all, who would have thought that there would only be a few people fighting in such a huge battle? Although people had discovered that their skills were transferable from the Second World, there were still very few people who could not transfer it yet. There were even quite a number of people who went back to the Resurrection Point as they tried to bring their skills out of the Second World. Their strength was only equivalent to those who trained regularly or knew a little martial arts. When this wolf appeared, everyone was shocked. “What the h*ll is going on? Did I really cross over from the game after waking up?” “I didn’t enter the gaming pod! What’s going on?” “That’s not right. There shouldn’t be a cell phone in the Second World. Moreover, the place where we woke up is indeed the real world. That wolf...; why do I feel that it looks a little familiar?” “Doesn’t it look a little like the silver boss of Wolf Valley?” “That silver boss? Stop bull sh*tting me. If you say that this is the boss of Wolf Valley, I won’t believe it! Doesn’t it look different?” “That’s not right! This wolf looks a little like the one that Morning Mist fought. Wasn’t there a video on the internet of Morning Mist defeating the silver boss of Wolf Valley?” “F*ck, you’re right! The color of its fur looks exactly the same!” “Stop bull sh*tting. That one is obviously much bigger than the one that fought with Morning Mist.” “Definitely. I remember that the wolf had a faint crescent between its brows back then. This one has it too!” “No way? Did it level up!” “Eh? But why is it with Morning Mist now?” “Please watch your words. It’s not and it, it’s a she.” “What?” At this moment, a player named Entertaining Dinosaur suddenly appeared. “I have a shocking piece of news for everyone! Everyone, do you still remember Morning Mist having a cute girl by his side?” “I remember, I remember that cute girl with big eyes. She looked like she was in love or something!” “If it wasn’t for her following Morning Mist, I would have chased after her!” “Didn’t that cute girl call Morning Mist brother or something?” “Then...; Morning Mist is my brother-in-law?” “Bull sh*t, that’s my brother-in-law!” Entertaining Dinosaur immediately interjected. “Alright, alright, stop arguing! When that girl first came out, I was nearby. At that time, I remembered her calling him master!” “What?!” “I would never dare touch her! I’m afraid to get killed by Morning Mist. I don’t want to go back to the Resurrection Point...;” “So I guess Morning Mist is into these kinds of things. I want to call Morning Mist master too though…” When Entertaining Dinosaur overheard that, he choked. “Get lost! When the Ancient Ash Wolf appeared just now, I was observing it with my binoculars from a kilometer away. I saw that cute little girl transform into that wolf!” “F*ck! What’s going on? Is this for real?” “Although the contrast between cute and scary being the in thing now, this is just too much!” “F*ck, I remember now, I flirted with this girl who seemed to be called...; Lan Weiwei. Then, I was slapped back to the Resurrection Point!” “So, I actually offended a silver boss!” “Props to you for trying though!” “F*ck, f*cking h*ll. I’ve offended Lan Weiwei too. I was planning to go to White Fog City to change my job. What should I do? Will I be slapped to death?” “You’re thinking too much. I’m sure she’s killed so many players. Do you think she’ll even remember you?” Seeing Lan Weiwei’s appearance as the ancient Ash Wolf King, the game forum instantly exploded. The officials and some large factions were shocked that people from the Second World could actually enter this world. The ordinary people were shocked that the Ash Wolf King appeared in front of them. Lan Weiwei looked like a small mountain, and no one could believe that such a small girl turned into such a huge wolf! Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei caused a huge storm of public opinion, but they did not know all of this went on because they faced a larger crisis! Xiao Bai’s attack power was too strong. Any one of his attacks made it difficult for Lan Weiwei to block them. If Lan Weiwei had not transformed into the Ash Wolf King, she would have been defeated long ago. Even so, her health bar continued to drop tremendously. Moreover, even if Lan Weiwei used all her firepower, she could not hurt her opponent at all. The defense of a spiritual master was too strong. The difference made Lan Weiwei feel somewhat weak. If not for the Frost Domain being able to reduce the opponent’s speed by half, Lan Weiwei’s HP would have been emptied long ago. At this time, Lu Chen was not idle either. The moon in the sky gradually turned from white to purple! The moonlight sprinkled on the ground and shone on Lu Chen’s body. His attack power soared crazily! +30,000! +60,000! +100,000! With the support of the moonlight stored in his body, his combat power directly surged towards +140,000! It did not stop either! With the support of the Sword God State, his attack speed increased by sevenfold! It directly reached 1,120,000! At this moment, Lu Chen already felt physically strained. After all, he had not really completed the class change, so his endurance power was very limited! Even though his attack speed was enough to unleash 132 slashes, his body absolutely would not allow it! He slashed out nonetheless, he had to try his best! With that, 72 slashes ensued! In a second, he directly unleashed 81,160,000 combat power! At this moment, even the great elder of the Dragon Team in the meeting room could not help but take a deep breath! If it was him...;. he knew he would not be able to block such a fierce attack! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Although Lu Chen managed to hit the Guardian General with 320 million attack power, that was because of his skill that could take out 20% of the enemy’s health with a single slash. However, the chance of triggering it was actually extremely low. The actual attack power was only less than 400,000. Now, Lu Chen has managed to slash out more than 80 million combat power, 20 times more so than before. In addition, he was in this world now, not in the game world. Everyone, especially the members of the Dragon Team present, truly felt what it meant to have such power to destroy the world! Although the higher-ups were unable to feel that kind of aura on the spot, from the first elder’s reaction, Xiao Bai probably would not be able to block it either! Although Lan Weiwei had already transformed into the Ash Wolf King, the worry shown on her eyes could still be seen. With a loud sound, the originally dilapidated hall turned into rubble. A deep pit the size of a hundred meters had even appeared! Everyone’s hearts raced from what happened. The members of the Dragon Team even let out a loud sigh. With this, even if Xiao Bai did not die, his fighting strength would probably be greatly reduced. However, only Lu Chen’s eyes were still filled with deep worry. He still did not let down his guard. Because when he made his move, Xiao Bai’s lips revealed a hint of a smile. Lan Weiwei, who was at the side, had already picked up something that rolled on the ground and quickly threw it further away. After that, she stared at the center of the deep pit with concern The sound of unhurried footsteps could be heard from the thick smoke. “Shame, it’s a pity that my mirror was used on you.” A black shadow gradually appeared. Not only was Xiao Bai unscathed, even his clothes were untouched! Xiao Bai’s lips curled into a smile as he casually threw the silver mirror from hand to hand. Lu Chen glanced at it. This mirror looked somewhat damaged, but it was able to withstand 80 million critical hits! This kind of item could almost be classified as a divine weapon! “You fool, everyone says that the acquired realm attacks could be godlike, but in front of a spiritual realm expert, that is nothing! “This is because ordinary attacks can not even break the protective barrier of a spiritual realm expert! “As for your 80,000,000 damage attack, I’m afraid you won’t be able to use it a second time, right? “Now, it’s time for you to die!” Xiao Bai’s eyes suddenly turned vicious. His body arched slightly, and a tiger-shaped figure appeared on his body. It looked exactly like Lan Weiwei who had transformed into the Ash Wolf King! However, Lan Weiwei had transformed into a physical form, while Xiao Bai one looked like a phantom. However, his aura was more than three times stronger than before! He immediately pounced forward! In less than a tenth of a second, he arrived in front of Lu Chen! When that happened, Lu Chen unleashed a critical strike. His body did not have the strength to resist the attack, however. He did not even have the speed to escape. At this moment, under the purple moonlight, a huge wolf leaped high into the air. As it descended from the sky, a huge pillar of light filled with purple energy shot out from its mouth! Demonic Flame! With the buff from her true body and the moonlight’s help, the damage of this move reached 16,000. Moreover, it dealt both physical and magic damage. Although it was far from being strong enough, the distance between her and Xiao Bai was quite far. Lan Weiwei could only use this method in order to protect herself from a distance. Xiao Bai could not even be bothered to dodge the attack and directly tanked it head one! In return, a scream came out of Xiao Bai’s mouth! Lu Chen was stunned by the noise and hurriedly stepped back. Her attack had close to 20,000 attack power. How could a mere 16,000 attack power make Xiao Bai react like this? At this moment, Xiao Bai felt as if his soul was being burned. The pain was unbearable. Impossible! That beam of light just now clearly only had an insignificant attack power. It did not even have the possibility of stopping him in his tracks. How could it make him feel such pain? The first elder in the meeting room shook his head in confusion. What was going on! At this moment, Lu Chen suddenly understood that when the few of them fought earlier, they only had physical attacks. Even if he had used 80 million attacks, it was still a physical attack! Could it be that in this world, spiritual masters could only be immune to physical attacks?! Thinking of this, Lu Chen directly changed his title to Blade God! [Blade God: Your understanding of the blade has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a blade-type weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with your level!] [Frenzied Blade: When you transform into the Blade God, your attack will definitely be a critical hit. You will have a critical hit immunity effect and receive a 400% critical hit damage bonus!] [Bloodbath Blade God: When your enemies exceed 100 amount, your attack will become an area-of-effect damage of 100 meters. 50% of the damage will be converted into your HP.] [Swift Blade: When you use a blade-type weapon, you can deal three damage attacks at the same time. You can also use 60% of your maximum attack speed, regardless of your body’s capabilities.] [Magic Blade: When you use a blade-type weapon, you can convert your physical damage into magic damage.] In an instant, the attack power of the original 19,850 points instantly increased by four times, reaching 79,400 points! Under the effect of the Swift Blade skill, even though Lu Chen was very weak at the moment and was unable to unleash his maximum attack speed of 16.5%. His attack speed could ignore the burden on his body, and he could still unleash a critical strike! That was a 9.9% chance. Therefore, within a second, Lu Chen’s attack could reach 786,060! The attack of nearly 800,000 combat power was exerted under the effect of the magic blade. All his attacks were converted into magic attacks, a total of 49 times more damaging than the Demonic Flames that Lan Weiwei used just now! Lu Chen launched this combo! Xiao Bai had never been attacked by magic before. In addition to his lack of combat experience, the Demonic Flame had already thrown him into a panic. In a hurry, Lu Chen took advantage of this situation and attacked. “No!” “This can’t be!” Miserable sounds came out from Xiao Bai’s mouth. At this moment, he did not even have the strength to stand. He could only crouch onto the ground and wither. However, gradually, he did not even have the strength to crouch. If it was not for the faint undulation of his chest, everyone would probably think that he was dead. Lu Chen carefully walked forward step by step and saw that the other party’s breathing was very weak. It did not seem like he was faking it. However, at this moment, Xiao Bai hugged himself tightly. He was trying to endure the intense pain and tilted his head. He looked at Lu Chen in the distance and laughed bitterly. “Haha! “The whole of the Dragon Country actually destroyed our Xiao family by a brat like you. “However, do you think you can take me down so easily just like that?” He took out a scroll from his hand! Immediately, Lu Chen’s eyes widened! “That’s not good!” Lu Chen could tell at a glance that that thing was actually a teleportation scroll! The Xiao family indeed had a deep foundation. They actually managed to conceal such an item! However, there was no time to stop him at this moment. “Lan Weiwei!!” The distant wolf immediately understood what the other party meant. An incomparably complicated mark immediately appeared on her forehead and entered Xiao Bai’s body at the speed of light. Soul Tracking! Xiao Bai’s face turned slightly pale, and his gaze was vicious. “Brat, I’ll wait for you at the Western Castle. One day, we shall meet again!” In the Dragon Team, Hei Yu’s eyes suddenly turned stern! The one who killed his child back then was at the Western Castle. That meant that the b*stard Xiao Bai actually colluded with people from there! Finally, Lan Weiwei could not hold it in any longer and directly used her Demonic Flame skill once again! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation When Hei Yu heard this name, the knuckles on his first turned white as he trembled on his spot. Although he did not immediately go to take revenge, he had never given up on the idea of it. If it were not for his lack of strength and his worry that his other members would follow him, he might have already made his way to the Western Castle. Lu Chen was not too sure about what happened in Hei Yu’s past and did not bother asking. Liu Changping’s voice appeared in his earpiece. “Lu Chen, you might not know about this. Hei Yu was originally a member of our Dragon Team. In another mission, his daughter died in the west. “And the person who killed her daughter back then was someone from the Western Castle. “In order to take revenge, he had no choice but to leave the Dragon Team. “His daughter’s death had always been very strange and suspicious. There wasn’t even a corpse left behind. “Although the higher-ups had used a lot of connections and resources to investigate the situation, the clues that they had a lead on would always be inexplicably cut off. “It was as if all the plans made within the organization were being shared by others, and all the evidence was wiped out in advance. “It was precisely because of this reason that Hei Yu had left the organization and joined the Dark Union. “After many years of hard work, he became the leader with his outstanding assassination ability and outstanding achievements. “After many years of chasing, he finally received information that the murderer who killed his daughter came from the Western Castle. “But the stronghold that organization had over others was extremely huge. It was far from what the Dark Union could compare to. Over there, there were no less than three acquired experts among them. “There is evidence that the person that is first in charge in the Western Castle is most likely a vampire count. His strength is even greater than our first elder.” Lu Chen was slightly shocked when he heard this. If that was the case, the Western Castle’s influence was so strong that it was even stronger than some of the top forces in the country. Xiao Bai was obviously someone who worked with the Western Castle. That was why he chose to escape to that place. Then, with that thought, he closed his eyes and began to sense where Xiao Bai had gone. Somehow, it was as if the entire world was right in front of him, and he was like a giant that stood on top of the sky, overlooking the entire planet! With a simple thought from Lu Chen, the entire virtual planet began to rotate slowly. After almost half a circle, it stopped. The planet rapidly enlarged and finally locked onto a specific place. To be exact, it locked on to a specific person. It was Xiao Bai, and he looked like he was struggling to survive. Although Lu Chen could not see the situation on the other side clearly, he was able to find Xiao Bai’s location. Were he to be strong enough, he might have been able to do some proper damage to that man. However, he was afraid that if he used a teleportation scroll as well, considering the state that he is in, he might get killed. Lan Weiwei, who was far away, finally returned to her human form and handed Ling Yin’s pitch-black dagger to Lu Chen. When Lu Chen received the dagger, he seemed to have received some sort of message. However, he was too tired to investigate further, so he decided to go back and take a good rest before continuing on this mission. The rest of the mess would be left for the Dragon Team to deal with. Lu Chen felt like he stretched his capabilities thin, he was overworked. He returned to his own manor and immediately fell asleep on his bed. Although he had the Moon God’s Blessing, Lu Chen had reached a deep level of mental exhaustion. He had to rely on sleep to replenish himself, that was the only way to recover right now. When Lu Chen woke up again, it was dark out. He slept for a whole day. He stretched his back and felt better, his energy replenished. He came to the room where the gaming pod was placed. At this moment, he discovered that besides his and Lan Weiwei’s gaming pod, there was an additional one. He looked around and saw Rollie holding onto a bamboo shoot and rolling around inside. The Gu family was indeed diligent. It seemed that they were worthy of his trust. However, he knew that he had to stop collecting pets knowing how much of a hassle everything could be. Lu Chen scratched his head awkwardly at the thought of this. Without saying much, Lu Chen, Lan Weiwei, and Rollie entered the gaming pod and entered the Second World. The moment they entered the Second World, a series of notifications rang in Lu Chen’s ears. [Congratulations on raising your level by 5 levels!] [Congratulations on obtaining the origin world’s weapon, the Shadow Dagger!] [Analyzing the Shadow Dagger…] [Analysis complete! The Shadow Dagger is classified as a gold-grade weapon in the Second World!] [When using the Shadow Dagger, the weapon has an additional hidden attribute, increasing its attack power by 500%!] [With the Shadow Dagger, it can blend into any given shadow, and can not be found by the enemy.] [Passive Skill: When not attacking, it weakens the enemy’s physical attack by 99%, and weakens the enemy’s magic attack by 50%.] “Holy sh*t!” Lu Chen could not help but exclaim in admiration, this attack-type weapon could actually have a hidden effect. It was no wonder that Ling Yin wanted to constantly hide in the shadows, it was because of the effect of this dagger! The ability to weaken the enemy’s physical attack by 99% was amazing! This skill coupled with his Dark Shura title could turn many tides in his favor! If he did not attack, then he would weaken the enemy’s attack. If he attacked, then the effect of hiding would be extremely high, and his attack power would be increased by 500%! It was definitely a divine weapon! Before Lu Chen rejoiced from such an item, another piece of news popped up! [Congratulations on obtaining the Sky-piercing Mirror (fragment)!] [A gold-rank weapon! The Sky-piercing Mirror can withstand an attack of 100 million damage, or it can withstand an attack of 10 million magic damage. It is a one-time use weapon!] [Note: The Sky-piercing Mirror is currently in a damaged state. If you wish to repair it, you will need to find a gold-rank blacksmith to return it back to its original state.] Another gold-ranked weapon! This weapon was a true life-saving equipment! Although its magic attack defense was not as high as the physical attack defense, it was enough to withstand most bosses’ attacks. If Lu Chen had not broken the Sky-piercing Mirror with a single strike, he would not have had the chance to use his magic blade to finish off the other party in the later stages. He had to know what rank the blacksmith that he had found was. After that, a series of numbers appeared once again. Whether it was attack power or other attributes, they had all increased to a certain extent. Lu Chen opened the interface. The first thing he saw was Rollie’s information. [Ancient Panda] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Rollie] [Intimacy: 110] [Level: 10] [Attack: 1,500] [HP: 80,000] [Defense: 12,000] [Magic Defense: 12,000] [Skill: Luck Bonus] [Luck Bonus: Provides a luck buff for 60 seconds. Has a certain chance to be immune to all negative effects and damage.] “This little fellow only eats and eats all day long, but managed to level up by five levels?” This could make those noob players who practiced hard every day cry in pain! Rollie, who sat at the side, seemed to see Lu Chen’s confused face, and gave him a disdainful look! Lu Chen immediately understood the meaning behind it! Why work hard when you can just work smart?! Lu Chen was shocked! This was too f*cking logical, was it not? For a moment, he could not refute such a saying! Then, he looked at Lan Weiwei’s profile. Lan Weiwei’s status had also improved. What was going on? Lu Chen had not been online for two days due to him passing out from exhaustion.. However, it seemed that someone hacked into his game and leveled up his pets! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen admitted that after the earth-shattering battle yesterday, his combat experience and combat strength had indeed improved. However, he would not be so arrogant as to think that he was some sort of fated wonder! Could it be that the strength he obtained in the main world could be synchronized with the Second World? But if that was the case, then when the Second World descended, the first elder and Xiao Bai, these spiritual experts, would probably be invincible right away, right? Would that mean killing bosses could be as simple as eating and drinking? The only explanation could be that only after the Second World descended, would the increase in strength obtained in the main world be counted in the Second World! However, in the main world, everyone’s improvement speed was constant. Even a peak expert like the first elder would not have gained much of a change in just a month or two. Even if he wanted to increase his strength as soon as possible, he would definitely decide to go to the Second World first to train. Only someone like him lacked the experience to fight experts in the main world. Thus, when he fought Ling Yin and Xiao Bai in the main world, there was a huge increase in his strength, which was displayed on the interface in the Second World. Thinking up to this point, Lu Chen’s eyes suddenly shrank. According to this logic, in the real world, Xiao Bai, whose strength had been suppressed to that of an ordinary person, had now become a pseudo-spiritual expert. After this battle, he could even become a true spiritual expert. Then his strength could probably measure up to the Guardian General that overlooked White Fog City! That was terrifying! When the White Alliance had been developing wantonly in the Dragon Country, Xiao Bai had not been there at all. This meant that when he first entered the game pod, he had not been in the Dragon Country at all. If there were no accidents, the next City Lord would soon appear! If Lu Chen had known this would happen, he would have directly borrowed the item that he had given to Hei Yu from the Dragon Country’s higher-ups. That way, he would have two in his possession. He could have directly teleported to Xiao Bai’s side, killed him, and then teleported back to the Dragon Country! Back then, he had been careless. He had not expected that such a huge hidden danger would be left behind. Should he use the ability of the Secret Whisper skill from his Dark Shura title? [Dark Shura: Your understanding of darkness has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a hidden weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with your level!] [Shadow State: When you transform into a shadow, your body will be hidden into the void.?Ordinary attacks can not deal any damage to you. When you encounter special damage, you will be immune to it.] [Shadow Kill: When you use a long-range hidden weapon, your attack can surpass the opponent’s armor. This attack will not deactivate the Shadow State!] [One Hit Kill: When you use a close-range hidden weapon, Shadow State will be deactivated. Attacks will surpass the opponent’s armor. Critical strikes, dodges, and shield blocks from opponents will be ignored. Deals 300% true damage!] [Secret Whisper: You can curse an enemy in the dark. This enemy will be cursed with the curse of darkness. When you deal damage to the enemy, there is a 50% chance of killing the enemy in one hit. This skill ignores all immunity effects. Cooldown time is 30 days!] Although there was a 30-day cooldown period, once used on an enemy, the enemy would be cursed forever. Plus, there was a 50% chance of dying. However, after some consideration, he decided to not act on this. Xiao Bai was already considered a defeated general. If he could defeat him once, he could defeat him a second time. Moreover, rather than using his skills on such a defeated general, it would be better to use them on the next powerful boss, such as the Guardian General of White Fog City. Improving oneself was always the way to go! Somewhere further away, not only did the White Fog City’s Guardian General suddenly sneeze, he looked around, but found nothing. … Lu Chen shook his head, clearing his mind of distracting thoughts. He looked at his interface again. This time, he had improved by a lot! … [Your Sword God title has been strengthened!] [Your Shield God title has been strengthened!] [Your Blade God title has been strengthened!] [Your Bow God title has been strengthened!] [Your Undead title has been strengthened!] [Your Dark Shura title has been strengthened!] … [Name: Morning Mist] [Level: 25] [Class: Hero (now able to change class to War God)] [Titles: Sword God (hidden), Shield God (hidden), Ax God (hidden), Blade God (hidden), All-rounded master (hidden)] [Vitality: 2,500] [Strength: 2,356] [Agility: 2,381] [Intelligence: 3,012] [HP: 38,030] [MP: 23,000] [Attack: 24,860] [Attack Speed: 18] [Defense: 1,050] [Magic Defense: 1,200] [Reputation: 3,000] [White Fog City Lord Set: Every attack in battle can increase a player’s attack power by 1%! In White Fog City, all damage caused will be increased by 100%, and the attributes will be doubled. You can control the movement of White Fog City. In White Fog City, you will be immune to 99% of all damage! Magic damage received in White Fog City will be reduced by 90%. The player’s magic resistance will be calculated on White Fog City. HP will be shared in White Fog City and will recover 100% HP every second! Can be teleported to any corner of White Fog City! Skills used in White Fog City will have no cooldown and will recover 100% maximum MP every second.] [Item: Teleportation Scroll x1, Class change to Sword God Scroll x1, Shadow Dagger x1, Sky-piercing Mirror (broken) x1] [Ancient Wolf Transformation: You can summon a full moon regardless of the terrain and climate when howling. It will also deal 500 light attribute magic damage to enemies under the moonlight every second!] [Moon God’s Blessing: You have been blessed by the Moon God. You can use the moonlight to recover your status and remove negative attributes. When you fight under the moonlight, you will receive a battle strength buff. The specific buff will increase with the user’s affinity with the moonlight.] [Current Affinity: 65 (you will receive a 50% attack bonus in battle!)] [Light Magic Resistance: +50%] [Note: When the affinity reaches a certain value, an additional special effect will be unlocked. You can now store moonlight 0/100,000.] When Lu Chen saw the increase in his attributes, his entire body went numb. Although his battle this time could be said to be a narrow escape, it was really worth it! With those two weapons alone were enough to consider this battle a win. His various attribute bonuses had also received a huge increase. However, what caught Lu Chen’s attention the most was that his reputation value, which was originally only 1,000 points, now had suddenly reached 3,000 points. What was going on? Other than fighting, he did not do anything else. He had no idea what was going on with the real world outside! … “What a surprise! The cute girl next to Morning Mist is actually a silver boss, the Ancient Ash Wolf King!” “That’s awesome! This time, I’m completely convinced. I just want to say on behalf of everyone else, Morning Mist is amazing!” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation “Morning Mist, can I have your number? As long as you take me through the job transition process, I can accompany you for a month. You don’t have to come to me, I can directly teleport into your city!” “Morning Mist, I want your number, I can accompany you for half a year!” “Get lost, you’re a man, what are you getting involved in?” “Everyone, calm down. Look in the mirror and see how big the gap is between you and Lan Weiwei!” “Well, that might not be the case! If you’re tired of eating vegetables, you would want to eat delicacies if given the chance, right? I’ll take whatever he wants to offer” “Before that, I have a question… The path of White Fog City from Bear Ridge has been opened, but the white fog has not dispersed?” “Same question here. I saw a lot of people walk around in the white fog and come out. Some people did not even come out. Has Morning Mist not opened the gates of White Fog City yet?” The battle that Lu Chen was recorded and shared to others, thus causing his popularity to skyrocket. These videos quickly spread out, and the response on the internet was extremely strong! Everyone began to join in the discussion. Not only did the officials not stop it, they even intentionally or unintentionally spread the news that Xiao Bai had betrayed the country and that the entire Xiao family and the upper echelons of the White Alliance had been contained. The message being sent to the citizens was controlled as well! Originally, Lu Chen was only seen as a strong person, but now he was seen as a messenger of justice! Not only did the game players hold Lu Chen in high esteem, but even the children also regarded him as their idol! Of course, there were very few people who could provide Lu Chen with 3,000 reputation points. They had to be fanatical or pious. … In White Fog City, Lu Chen had just arrived, and the huge castle was already well prepared. All kinds of class change masters were ready, and there were a total of 10,000 craftsmen. He even saw the NPC who had first accepted his tens of millions of rabbits. At this moment, he was looking at Lu Chen with a smile. He let go of the granary and walked towards him. “City Lord, look, this is the rabbit that I bought from someone back then. The prices were very low, so I could buy plenty, and it was enough for our city to eat for several years! Take some!” The fat merchant’s face was full of joy. He even reached his hand out for Lu Chen to shake. To be exact, he was not aiming for Lu Chen’s praise, but for the White Fog City Lord’s set. He did not realize that the City Lord in front of him was the youth whom he had ruthlessly bargained with before! Lu Chen’s face was stoic. Lan Weiwei, who was at the side, vaguely understood the situation. She ended up covering her mouth and snickered at the fat merchant. However, Lu Chen did not blame the other party as he was just an NPC. Moreover, he was now his subordinate. “Good...; well done...;” Lu Chen was momentarily at a loss for words. He only managed to utter a few things that did not have any meaning. This made the fat merchant even more excited. “I knew that you would definitely need this! City Lord, I’ve also received some other things. Do you want to take a look? “I was worried that you’d punish me for purchasing such things. Since you like it, I’d be honored to show you the other things!” “Uh…” Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei were dumbfounded. It sounded like a hidden mission had been activated! Without any hesitation, he let the other party lead the way forward. However, Rollie was obviously willing to go because the bamboo in the residence was really delicious! After walking for more than half an hour, they finally arrived at a huge open space. In the open space stood a few large buildings that looked like thatched cottages. These buildings were several thousand square meters wide and a height of several tens of meters. The fat merchant proudly opened the first warehouse. “City Lord, look, these are our wild rabbits!” Lu Chen looked over. The rabbits that he had killed for a thousand years were all here. Even the way he had stacked them when he took them out was the same as before. They had not changed at all. Naturally, these rabbits would never go bad in the warehouse. The fat merchant was still chattering proudly on the side. “I bet you’ve never seen so many rabbits. These are all low-priced rabbits that I bought from a silly boy...;” “Enough!” Lu Chen could not listen anymore. If it were not for the fact that the other party was his subordinate and an NPC, he would have sent this man back to the Resurrection Point...; However, if the fat merchant was not embarrassed by this way of taunting the main character, the only one who would end up being embarrassed was Lu Chen! Although the fat merchant could recognize Lu Chen, he could tell that Lu Chen was unhappy. He quickly shut his mouth and led Lu Chen to the next warehouse. “Look, this is the refined iron I bought from someone!” When Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei saw the pile of refined iron, they were stunned. These refined iron must be at least hundreds of thousands of tons here! Originally, Lu Chen was still thinking about how he could forge weapons with only craftsmen and no metal, but he did not expect this problem to be solved this quickly! This fatty was not bad! Lu Chen looked at the fat merchant with satisfaction in his eyes! The fat merchant looked a little depressed. “It was difficult for me to collect these refined iron. I collected them from different people, one kilogram by one kilogram each.” Lu Chen quickly comforted him, “Thank you for your hard work...;” However, before he could finish, he said, “I really want to find that st*pid kid who sold the rabbits though. I know that he has many things, and it’s easy to deceive him...;” Lu Chen’s face instantly darkened again! He finally could not hold it in anymore and reached out his hand to pat the other party’s head. “Shut up! From now on, you’re only responsible for leading the way, and you’re not allowed to speak!” The fat merchant did not know what he had done wrong, but he could only obediently do as he was told. One warehouse after another was opened. Medicine storehouse… Cultivation storehouse… Clothing storehouse… Everything was impressive, but it was more shocking when he saw the gold coin warehouse, Lu Chen could not hold it in any longer! With such a huge mountain-like warehouse, there should be at least a few million in there! Previously, Lu Chen was quite miserable. He only had a total of 1,000 gold coins on him. Now that he suddenly became a millionaire, it actually felt somewhat unrealistic! “These...; These are all mine??” The fat merchant placed his right hand in front of his left chest. With a smile on his face, he bowed slightly. “Respected City Lord, these are all your wealth!” Lu Chen’s breathing became somewhat intense, he felt like he was about to faint. Lu Chen could already imagine his happy life as the City Lord. However, he also understood that these gold coins could not all be used by him. After all, the expenditure of White Fog City should be taken into consideration as well. He confirmed once again to make sure, “Is there any use for these gold coins?” “Yes, we need to pay the salaries of the class changing masters and craftsmen, as well as the construction of the city.” Lu Chen licked his lips, his eyes filled with excitement, “Then what about the rest?” The fat merchant replied, “I’m afraid that for the rest of it, it’ll be up to you, City Lord.” “Huh? What do you mean?” Lu Chen felt that something was not right. “City Lord, this money is not enough to sustain the city. I hope that you can earn more money to support our White Fog City!” “What the-?!” The word f*ck almost came out of Lu Chen’s mouth as he gasped in despair! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen was about to curse out loud when he heard the fat merchant’s words. What the h*ll did the fat merchant mean by that? He thought that after becoming the City Lord and obtaining glory, he would be able to obtain higher combat power and more resources. Now, he was being told that after becoming the City Lord, he would have to think of how to earn more money to support tens of thousands of people, or even hundreds of thousands of people every day? What’s the difference between this and working as a common laborer? Working as a laborer would at least only be needed to support himself. As a City Lord, he would have to handle the supply of the entire city. ‘Is there still time for me to step down as the City Lord?’ He subconsciously looked at the privilege of being the City Lord on his interface and instantly dispelled the thought. Suddenly, he seemed to have thought of something. “I have a mission for you.” When the fat merchant heard this, he was pleasantly surprised. “Anything you desire, City Lord!” “From now on, you don’t have to stay in White Fog City. You can go to bigger cities to develop and increase your wealth.” The fat merchant happily accepted the order. “Alright, thank you, City Lord! Then can I take a portion of these resources as capital?” “Don’t even think about taking it!” Lu Chen immediately refused without thinking. What a joke. He was already poor to the point of being in poverty, yet he still wanted to take money from White Fog City? “Right now, as long as you can withstand the test given by me, there will naturally be rewards in the future for you. “Of course, it wasn’t necessarily forbidden for you to take away the capital, but that way, the rewards would be greatly reduced. “You can decide for yourself the path you wish to take.” The fat merchant was in a difficult position. He probed, “City Lord, can I ask what the reward is?” Lu Chen revealed a mysterious smile. “Don’t worry, the value of the thing I want to reward you will definitely far exceed the contribution you will make to White Fog City!” Then, Lu Chen looked at the fat merchant with a charming smile. His face revealed an extremely human-like expression. It was extremely complicated. After a long while, the fat merchant finally gritted his teeth and made up his mind. “Alright then! I’ve decided. I won’t take any of the things here with me! City Lord, don’t worry. I will definitely contribute to White Fog City handsomely!” Lu Chen smiled and nodded his head, but his heart was finally at ease. He did not expect this fat man to be so loyal to White Fog City. ‘Not bad…’ he thought to himself. Then, the fat businessman bowed deeply and disappeared in front of Lu Chen. Lan Weiwei, who had not said anything, asked curiously, “What are you going to give him?” Lu Chen reached out his hand and rubbed Lan Weiwei’s head. “Well...; We’ll talk about it when the time comes...; but the next time I see him, I’ll have to ask him how he teleported here without a trace.” Fortunately, the fat merchant had long left. Otherwise, he would have regretted his decision. Not only had he not prepared the reward, but he also wanted to learn a skill from him! After that, Lu Chen returned to the place and directly summoned the Saint Blacksmith he had previously recruited. A tanned and muscular middle-aged man with a relatively short stature instantly appeared in front of him. Although he looked like a dwarf, in terms of strength, an average warrior was considered inferior to him. “Tang Lei is of service!” Lu Chen looked at the NPC. [Name: Tang Lei] [Race: Human] [Class: Saint Blacksmith] [Level: 88] [Vitality: 13,639] [Strength: 12,456] [Agility: 2,454] [Intelligence: 8,567] [Attack Power: 5,535] [Defense: 6,420] [Magic Defense: 1,836] [HP: 82,351] [MP: 8,322] [Skills: Great Forging, Hundred Forging Hammer Technique] [Grade: S] The Saint Blacksmith named Tang Lei did not have an outstanding attack power, but his physique and strength were indeed outstanding. Only with this kind of super-strong physique could one forge a truly high-grade weapon. Lu Chen took out the Sky-piercing Mirror. This dilapidated gold-grade weapon was enough to withstand an attack of 100 million combat power. It had to be repaired. Tang Lei took the Sky-piercing Mirror and examined it carefully. “Fortunately, if the person who attacked this Sky-piercing Mirror back then was a little stronger, I’m afraid it would have been completely damaged. “City Lord, I can repair this, but I’m afraid the cost would be too much to bear...;” Lu Chen felt his heart ache a little. However, he made a decisive decision. “How many gold coins do you need? Go to the storeroom and get it. Fix it as soon as possible for me.” Tang Lei revealed a simple and honest smile. “City Lord, don’t worry. I’ll be able to fix this mirror by tomorrow!” Then, he turned around and left. Lu Chen looked at the information on his interface and was very satisfied. His attack power was definitely the strongest among the players of the Second World. Even Xiao Bai, who had just revealed his strength, would not be stronger than him. However, what troubled him was that his body was not strong enough to withstand such a high-intensity battle. He could not even physically withstand his strongest attack. Otherwise, when he had unleashed a critical attack, Xiao Bai would not have been able to block his attack even if he had the Sky-piercing Mirror. The so-called invincible body-protection of a spiritual expert was only aimed at the attacks of ordinary acquired experts. He was not one of them. Therefore, the most important thing now was to quickly improve his physique. At this moment, a complicated magic array suddenly appeared in the hall. A moment later, the Sword Saint was teleported into the hall, along with a few other people. At this moment, the man who walked in looked confident. The shining golden sword in his hand, which was inlaid with many gemstones made his whole look menacing. One look and one could tell that it was extremely powerful. At this moment, Lu Chen looked at the NPCs interface again. As expected, Atzas’s combat power had increased tremendously! [Name: Atzas] [Race: Human] [Class: Intermediate Sword Saint [Level: 80] [Vitality: 5,571] [Strength: 5,365] [Agility: 5,465] [Intelligence: 4,521] [Attack: 135,462] [Defense: 2,846] [Magic Defense: 3,942] [HP: 81,545] [MP: 78,422] [Skills: Limitless] [Rating: S] He can become a great swordsman class-change master now! The original Atzas only had a rusty iron sword. Now that it had been replaced with an unknown grade weapon, his combat power had almost doubled! This basic combat power really made Lu Chen a little envious. “Thank you, City Lord, for your help. It has allowed my combat power to increase manifold. Next, I will do my best to carry out my duties in this city. “Oh right, the few people who appeared beside me are my good friends. They are also willing to work for you! “As long as you are willing, they only need to be paid by gold coins.” Lu Chen looked at the other few people. Their attack power and level were not as good as Atzas. However, they also had the ability to become a swordsman class-change master. Lu Chen was quite satisfied with their set of skills. This was because the next few days, the entire White Fog City would be welcoming hundreds of thousands of players to become a swordsman class-change master. If he were to rely solely on Atzas to become a swordsman class-change master, he would probably be so overworked that he would pass out within three days. However, one more person meant one more mouth to feed. These few swordsman class-change masters would definitely not be cheap. No wonder fatty had repeatedly told him that he had to make money! Lu Chen’s head was slightly aching from all the losses. Fortunately, the initial method to earn money was going to be available soon, and that was to open up White Fog City! Anyone who wishes to enter the city, pay up! Anyone who wishes to eat hares, pay up! Anyone who wishes to sell potions, pay up! Anyone who wishes to change their classes, pay up, pay up, pay up! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation If his city was developed enough, he could use trade to increase taxes. However, he did not have that condition at the moment. As long as everyone wanted to improve their strength, they had to change their class, so this method of earning money was quick and easy! Lu Chen silently apologized to the players in his heart… Just as Lu Chen was thinking about these things, Atzas opened his mouth and said, “City Lord, I see that you haven’t changed your class yet. Do you need to change your class?” [Ding! Congratulations on triggering the class change condition! You have a class change scroll. Would you like to use it?] At this moment, Lu Chen finally remembered that every time he looked at the interface, his attention was focused on his combat power. He had always neglected this section. This class change scroll had been given to him by the old village chief of the Novice Village when he was selling rabbits. He had actually forgotten about it till now! Thinking of this, Lu Chen stretched out his hand, and a class change scroll appeared in his hand. “Of course, I want to change my class.” If he succeeded in changing his class, not only would his combat power be increased, but his body’s endurance would also be greatly increased. Moreover, this was an intrinsic increase in his basic attributes, not the external armor equipment. This kind of upgrade was immeasurable in terms of its worth. Atzas took the scroll and looked at it carefully. He then looked at Lu Chen with baffled eyes. Finally, he frowned. “City Lord, this scroll of yours is different from ordinary scrolls. It’s very precious. It can skip different levels of a class change. “City Lord, you have long been a Sword God. Therefore, with this scroll, you can skip the intermediate level and directly become the highest level Sword God there is. “However, I am only a Sword Saint. The highest I can do is help you change your class to a Sword Saint. “Although, I can use a certain method. The next time you meet a Sword God to change your class, you don’t need to show the scroll again. You can directly change your class to become a Sword God.” Lu Chen was very satisfied with this condition. When he agreed, Atzas opened the scroll. The moment the scroll was opened, a dazzling light burst out. Atzas immediately held the sword in his hand and chanted an extremely complicated and profound incantation. Then, he pierced the sword through the scroll. The light of the scroll instantly dimmed and disappeared. In the next second, Lu Chen’s body began to emit light. The light gradually brightened and eventually completely submerged Lu Chen. The entire process lasted for a full 15 seconds before the light gradually disappeared and entered Lu Chen’s body. At this moment, Lu Chen felt that his body had experienced unprecedented growth in power. It had also undergone immense change. Especially when the light appeared, his entire body seemed to have been cleansed and transformed. He could feel that his combat strength had greatly increased. Moreover, his constitution had also undergone a huge change. His endurance was also absolutely vastly different from before. If the maximum attack speed that he could withstand under the Sword God State was more than 70 times, then now he could withstand 100 times without any side effects. It would be absolutely impossible for him to be in a state of extreme weakness like he was when he fought with Xiao Bai. Thinking of this, Lu Chen looked at his interface again. [Name: Morning Mist] [Level: 30] [Class: Sword Saint (now able to change class to War God)] [Titles: Sword God (hidden), Shield God (hidden), Ax God (hidden), Blade God (hidden), All-rounded master (hidden)] [Vitality: 4,800] [Strength: 3,356] [Agility: 4,381] [Intelligence: 3,812] [HP: 48,030] [MP: 28,000] [Attack: 44,860] [Attack Speed: 25] [Defense: 2,050] [Magic Defense: 1,500] [Reputation: 3,000] … Everything he worked towards finally paid off! Recruiting Atzas was definitely the right choice! Although he had been given the opportunity to enter the Sword Pool, it was definitely more worth it for Atzas! If he had known this would happen, he would have sold everything he had to recruit a Sword God class change master! Moreover, his level had risen by another five levels! Atzas was an intermediate Sword Saint. Since he had the Sword God title, his level was now even higher than Atzas’s, and he had become a high-level Sword Saint. While Lu Chen was immersed in his joy, he did not know that the outside world was in an uproar. Because both Wolf Valley and Bear Ridge had been destroyed by Lu Chen, more and more players had to find other methods to find White Fog City. Because White Fog City had yet to open, everyone was trapped in the white fog, unable to enter the city. “What’s going on? Why hasn’t Morning Mist opened up White Fog City?” “I’m not sure. Could it be that he is harvesting everything in the city alone?” “Impossible. The Morning Mist is already the City Lord. Everything belongs to him, what’s there to harvest!” “Can you quickly let us in? I really want to change my class as quickly as possible!” “I’ll try to find a way to contact him!” “I can’t hold it in any longer. I really want to go in! Have you heard of it? There are people from overseas countries who have already attacked a new city. They are undergoing the test of the city Guardian Generals right now!” At this time, Entertaining Dinosaur appeared again. “That’s right, there’s actually someone who’s more well-informed than me! It’s said that the person in charge of the City Lord’s test is a Western Dragon.” “Hah! What Western Dragon? How can those things be called dragons? They’re clearly just lizards!” Some players were unconvinced and ridiculed by this statement. “That’s right, our Eastern Dragon is the only real deal! Those in the west can only be classified as lizards with two tiny wings.” “How did the west progress so quickly? Morning Mist, the best in the entire server, has only been a City Lord for a few days. Which faction is that player from that can be compared to our very own Morning Mist?” “Where’s Entertaining Dinosaur? Why isn’t he talking?” “Quick, quick, quick, Entertaining Dinosaur, come out and tell us!” Feeling the adoration of the crowd, Entertaining Dinosaur was very pleased. He happily spoke again, “This isn’t a secret. It’s just that the news hasn’t reached our country yet. It’s already popular all over the internet abroad though. That mighty force is from the Western Castle.” “The Western Castle? Isn’t that where Xiao Bai escaped?” Entertaining Dinosaur nodded his head in approval before speaking again. “That’s right. The Western Castle besieged a silver boss. As long as you capture this boss, you can enter the city to accept the challenge. “The person to accept the challenge had long been decided. It was a foreigner. “But who would have thought that when Xiao Bai went online to the Second World. He actually killed that silver boss with one strike. “Now, this means that he is now at the top of the food chain in Western Castle. So the last-minute replacement made Xiao Bai the City Lord of Giant Lizard City.” The players became excited! “Giant Lizard City? See, I told you. That’s not a giant dragon at all!” “Those who are not of our race have different thoughts. Don’t westerners understand what’s going on here? Why did they let Xiao Bai become the City Lord?” This feeling of being sought after by everyone was something Entertaining Dinosaur really liked, he patiently explained to everyone as he calmed them down. “Have you forgotten what the Guardian General of White Fog City said back then? The stronger the challenger is, the higher the reward will be? They are doing this to maximize the benefits!” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Entertaining Dinosaur analyzed the situation further before he spoke once again. “From the looks of it, Xiao Bai seems to have already gained their trust. That means that this traitor has long been colluding with those guys from the Western Castle!” The players were instantly filled with righteous indignation! “I knew that those people from the White Alliance weren’t good people!” “Don’t hurt us, please! When I joined, I didn’t think that they would be like this!” “Well, fortunately, I was smart enough to quit the White Alliance a long time ago.” “D*mnit! If I had known that the Xiao family people were such traitors, I wouldn’t have joined them! Back then, I shouldn’t have listened to their nonsense and ganged up against Morning Mist!” “Uh...; How many times have you died?” “...; Can you stop reminding me of the pain?!” Just as everyone passionately discussed, a voice suddenly boomed out, and it made everyone stop. “Stop talking, White Fog City is open!!” “F*ck! White Fog City is finally open, I need to hurry up and change classes!” “Don’t get in my way everyone, I want to be the first to enter!” “Get lost, I want to be the first to enter! I want to be Morning Mist’s lackey!” Thousands of people fought, one after another as they made their way. However, the really smart ones did not even say a word and immediately made their way. Many people even immediately ran to their gaming pods when they heard the news! … In the Second World, when Lu Chen gave the order to open the city, the fog around White Fog City gradually rose into the sky at a speed visible to the naked eye. The white fog — which had originally trapped all the players inside — slowly floated up into the sky and turned into a sky full of white fluffy clouds. With that, an extremely lofty city with a vast area stood before everyone’s eyes. The outer walls of the city stood tall and looked extremely sturdy. The ancient castles within the city were lined up, row by row. Although they were not as modern looking as those in the main world, the simple and unadorned aura it showed instantly shocked everyone on the spot. It’s finally appeared, White Fog City! Everyone’s hearts were filled with excitement. The one and only White Fog City that everyone has been waiting for over a month has finally appeared! They could change their classes! They could buy equipment! Those who did not have money could use their luck to find a miracle, and the other players could comfortably spend their money! Countless players appeared and rushed towards White Fog City in an incomparably crazy manner! Among them, some players shouted, “The f*ck, who are those people in front? How are they so ahead of us?” “What the h*ll, I see a group of people ahead too. When the city opened, they even immediately ran towards that direction as they knew about the plan all along!” “The f*ck, what’s going on? Are they Morning Mist’s friends? Was that why they knew the news in advance?” “How could Morning Mist have any friends? The strong don’t need friends!” “That’s right. Back then, remember when Xiao Chuan tried to get Morning Mist to join the White Alliance. Look at what happened to Xiao Chuan now. The entire Xiao family is gone. His grandfather has even gone overseas to seek refuge!” “That’s right. Only the direct descendants of the Xu family and the Gu family are friends with Morning Mist. Do you think Morning Mist would simply make friends with commoners?” “If it wasn’t for the fact that the other party took the initiative to look for Morning Mist, I’m sure Morning Mist wouldn’t even know who they are!” “Keep your f*cking voice down. You’re talking about the Gu family and the Xu family behind their backs. Do You wish to die? Aren’t you afraid that their subordinates will hear you and kill you?” Beside them, a pair of handsome men and beautiful women’s faces were flushed red. The person who had spouted nonsense just noticed their strange behavior and asked with half curiosity and half concern, “Hey, what’s wrong with the two of you? We only ran for a few kilometers, how are you so flushed already? Is running really that hard?” The handsome man hurriedly waved his hand and stuttered for a long time without saying anything. Instead, he sped up and rushed forward. The two people just now were the direct descendants of the Gu family and the Xu family — Gu Yiming and Xu Ziyuan. When they heard what the other player said, their faces burned terribly. However, they understood that what those two people said just now was not wrong at all. With Lu Chen’s strength. They were simply not qualified to be friends with him. These words sounded very cruel, but it made sense. A strong person did not need friends. After they furthered their distance between the others, Gu Yiming and another two players whose pacing were similar to him could not hold back their laughter. Gu Yiming could not be bothered with them because he understood that these people were the top warriors of the Dragon Country. The reason why these people reacted so quickly and set off as soon as they appeared in the White Fog City was that they had long known that Lu Chen would definitely return to the Second World after solving the problems in the real world. It was only a matter of time before the White Fog City was opened. Therefore, ever since Lu Chen and Xiao Bai fought that battle. These people had been paying close attention to Lu Chen’s movements. When they heard that Lu Chen had entered the game pod, they immediately entered the game pod as well and waited for White Fog City to appear at any time. Everyone rushed toward White Fog City excitedly. 3000 meters… 100 meters… 800 meters… 300 meters… 50 meters… 10 meters! Finally, the first wave of players arrived at the gate of White Fog City. Almost all of them were members of the Dragon Team and the direct descendants of the major families. However, just as they were about to enter into White Fog City...; The city guards at the gate stretched out their long spears and blocked their way. These city guards were all ordinary NPCs. Their low combat power was also very low. However, no one dared to barge in because this was Morning Mist’s territory. Not far from the group of soldiers, there was a lazy-looking middle-aged man lying on a deck chair with his eyes closed. He seemed to be sunbathing. When everyone looked at that old man, they were immediately attracted by his attributes. [Name: Hade] [Race: Human] [Class: Advanced Sword Saint] [Level: 24] [Vitality: 871] [Strength: 125] [Agility: 1,465] [Intelligence: 1,521] [Attack Power: 8,462] [Defense: 846] [Magic Defense: 742] [HP: 7,545] [MP: 8,422] [Skill: Berserker’s Fury Slash] [Rating: B] [Class: Swordsman class change master!] This caused many people’s eyes to turn fervent! This was a Swordsman class-change master! Gu Yiming himself even felt a little excited. He opened his mouth and asked, “Excuse me, can we enter White Fog City now?” The soldier replied, “White Fog City is open, but everyone who wishes to go in has to pay an entrance fee.” Hearing the soldier’s words, some people were unhappy. Did the city not belong to the Second World? Why did they have to pay to enter?! At this time, many players in the distance had already ran over. Some of them could not wait any longer. Some of the players in the main world were gangsters. At this moment, they tried to cause trouble and clamored on the outside. “What right does he have to earn the city fees? As the City Lord of this city’s Second World, how dare Morning Mist rob us of our cash!” “That’s right, everyone should enter this city as they please. The treasures inside belong to whoever finds them. What right does Morning Mist have to monopolize them? Don’t tell me that just because he has the strength, he can do whatever he wants?!” “True, this is unfair. We should be allowed to enter this city as we please.. We want to go in and change classes. If they stop us from entering, then we’ll have to force our way in!” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation However… These players dared not to barge in, it was as though they were all bark and no bite. After all, there were too many players that were currently waiting outside the city right now. Could it be that Morning Mist dared to offend the entire Dragon Country and kill everyone, just like that? Hade, who laid on the chair, lazily basked in the sun as they fought. When he heard that a player was going to barge in. He lazily opened his eyes. For some reason, at this moment, everyone felt a chill rise up their backs. Hade slowly stood up. His eyes sharpened as he swept his gaze over the few players who had clamored in the crowd. When these few player’s gazes met with Hade’s, they instantly felt as if their souls were about to leave! Especially more so for the player who had complained the loudest, his entire body was drenched in sweat. “What did you just say?” Hade asked, enunciating each word Although his voice was not loud, everyone could hear it clearly. It was just a short sentence, but it made everyone present feel a bone-piercing chill. The complaints and chatter from earlier instantly disappeared. However, although the last player who shouted was covered in sweat, he looked at the thousands of surrounding spectators and mustered up his courage to repeat himself, “I said, why don’t we force our way in? Do you think you can snatch our money just because you have money and power? Do you think you can do whatever you want just because you have power?!” This player was not a fool. There were already thousands of others surrounding outside the city. Moreover, there were tens of thousands of players who were still rushing here from behind. Soon, there would be tens of thousands of players at the entrance here. He did not believe that Lu Chen would dare to kill everyone. After all, everyone in the Dragon Country was here. If he really went on a killing spree, then he would not be able to survive in the Dragon Country alone! Moreover, that player had nothing to lose, he had no money after all. Maybe this opportunity could turn his life around and make him rich! As soon as he said this, the other players at the side had also mustered up their courage and clamored again. “Open the door, yes, open the door! Otherwise, we won’t go in and see how this White Fog City develops!” Hearing someone chime in, the player who had been the loudest earlier gained confidence and had a smug look on his face. However, his smile did last even a second. Hade instantly unsheathed his sword. In a flash, his head was directly taken off! At the same time, the heads of the other players who chimed in also fell at the same time. All of this happened in an instant. Most of the players did not even see how he attacked. Only a few strong players understood that his opponent was using a sword aura to kill people. In the blink of an eye, he had used more than ten slashes! One slash per person! Immediately after, Hade’s originally cold eyes returned to a lazy look, and he returned to the chair and sat down. The weapon was put back into its scabbard and placed on the ground. Everything returned to its original state as if nothing had happened. Other than the few extra heads on the ground, of course, after a few seconds, the corpses disappeared and returned to the Resurrection Point. Hade picked up the straw hat at the side and covered his face to block the glaring sunlight. A muffled voice came from under the hat, “Since you can’t solve the problem of theirs, then solve the problem of the troublemakers.” Everyone was full of questions. Hade continued, “There’s something I have to say.” Everyone quickly perked up their ears to listen. As the strongest NPC at the city gate, what Hade might say could be beneficial to entering the city. “With the strength that he has, he can indeed do whatever he wants!” Everyone was somewhat speechless. “But don’t worry, White Fog City will not take your money for no reason. It’s just that White Fog City is already City Lord Morning Mist’s private property. “The White Fog City Lord had previously instructed that if one wanted to enter the city, each player had to pay 10 gold coins. According to the order, first come, first served, one had to queue up.” 10 gold coins was not a small amount. In real life, it would be 100,000 dollars. “Everyone, prepare your identity verification information. We have to check them one by one when you enter the city.” After saying that, he continued to bask in the sun and did not speak again. For a full half a minute, no one dared to move. After a long time, a player finally mustered up his courage and decided to enter the city. The soldiers guarding the city were very responsible and carefully inspected him. From his identity information to the equipment he was carrying, everything was checked. It was similar to the security checks in the main world. However, this meticulous inspection was destined to be slow. The entire process actually took three to five minutes. Seeing that the first person had safely entered White Fog City, the others also began to accept the security checks with ease. However, what made everyone annoyed was that the security check could only check two to three people at a time, and each person needed three to five minutes. If this continued, they would probably have to wait until the end of their lifetime before they could enter the city. Finally, someone could not hold it in anymore, but he did not dare to lose his temper. He could only ask the city guard politely, “May I ask if we can finish the security check as soon as possible? We are very excited and eager to enter.” The soldier replied coldly, “If you think it’s too slow, you can take the VIP passage next to me.” As he spoke, he pointed to a small door with a golden border. Although it was not big, the entire door was covered with a golden border. One look and one could tell that it was filled with the aura of an aristocrat! This time, everyone was stunned. There was actually such a method to enter?! Morning Mist must be very good at making money! When they saw the VIP passage, many players who had money to burn immediately swarmed over. One had to know that time was money in this place. The earlier one entered, the faster one’s strength would increase. At this moment, many players stomped their feet on the ground in frustration. They regretted selling the gold they had earned in order to improve their lives in the main world. When the people who wanted to walk through the VIP channel arrived, there was also a group of soldiers there. However, the attitude of the soldiers here was obviously not as cold as the previous soldiers. Instead, they were full of smiles and were very enthusiastic. “Welcome, everyone. May I ask if you are going to enter the city?” Among these people who came to the VIP channel, the first to bear the brunt was a member of the Dragon Team. These members of the Dragon Team had good physiques. With their alertness as soldiers, they were always able to seize the initiative. Liu Changping, who was standing in the lead, could not hide the excitement on his face. He hurriedly nodded and said, “That’s right. I want to enter the city quickly. Can you help me with the procedures immediately?” “Of course. Please pay 30 gold coins to enter the city.” The soldier extended his hand with a smile on his face. 30 gold coins! That was 300,000 dollars! Someone sucked in a breath of cold air. Gold coins were not easy to gather, and these players had to fight a lot of monsters to gather a large sum. How many items would they have to sell to get one gold coin? Ordinary players only carried copper and silver coins. Due to the entrance fee being ten gold coins, 60 to 70 percent of players could not enter. Even those who had gold coins, many of them had exchanged them with real-life money. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Normal players would not be able to make much money fighting monsters. As the best fighter in the Second World, Lu Chen only had around 2,000 gold coins. In the Dragon Team, there were only a few people who could gather 30 gold coins. Liu Changping was a little troubled. “We don’t have any gold coins. Can we exchange it for things?” The city guard replied, “Of course you can. The pawn shop is right next to here. You can take your treasures and pawn them off. There will be people there to evaluate the items and exchange them for gold coins.” Everyone was stunned. This Lu Chen was extremely good at making money! At this time, a member of the Dragon Team said with a bitter face, “Leader, why don’t you take the VIP passage? The few of us will take the normal passage. After all, we don’t have that much money.” These members of the Dragon Team did have money, but they needed it to support their finances in the real world. When they came to the game, even if they wanted to get better, they would need to use it to buy equipment to increase their strength. Spending it here would be a waste. Liu Yuan was also a little dissatisfied. “This Lu Chen really is a money-grubber. He’s a crooked businessman I tell you!” Liu Changping let out a long sigh. “Although, I’m sure he has his own difficulties. How about this, I’ll take the VIP passage with those who can afford it, and the other members of the Dragon Team will take the normal channel.” After saying that, just as the others were about to leave, the city guard suddenly called out to them, “Wait, are you all members of the Dragon Team?” Liu Changping was stunned. “That’s right, how did you know about us?” The other members of the Dragon Team looked at each other in dismay. These NPCs should not know about their existence, the Dragon Team was an army from the main world, how could these NPCs know about it? “Since that’s the case, then you can’t use the VIP channel.” Liu Changping raised his eyebrows, his expression turned sour, “Why can’t we use the VIP channel? We can pay 30 gold coins.” However, what surprised him was that this soldier became even more enthusiastic, his face full of smiles as he immediately explained to diffuse the situation. “You’ve misunderstood. The City Lord has instructed that all members of the Dragon Team, as well as members of the Gu family, the Xu family, and the Dark Night Guild, can use the super VIP passage at the other side.” When everyone present heard this, their eyeballs almost fell out of their eye sockets! There was a super VIP passage?! This ridiculous method of earning money was really astounding. Could it be that Morning Mist studied finance in the main world and specialized in scamming people’s cash? The players that lined up in the normal passageway were also stunned. “I guess it’s true, you can really do whatever you want with money!” The others also echoed. “I’ll stick to having ten gold coins per entry, thank you very much.” “That’s right, Morning Mist sure knows how to run a city. He doesn’t cheat the poor...;” Liu Changping trembled when he heard that. The VIP passage was already 30 gold coins. Would that not mean he would be ripped off by the super VIP passage? Liu Changping hurriedly waved his hand. “No, no, no, there is no need to be so polite! We insist on taking this VIP passage. It’s already 30 gold coins here. We really can’t afford to take the Super VIP passage. We don’t have that much money.” The other members of the Dragon Team nodded repeatedly and smiled bitterly. At this moment, in the Super VIP passage far away, a few soldiers trotted over. These soldiers were actually all made up of squad leaders. Their service attitude was even more extreme than everyone here. Although they were strong, their attitude was simply comparable to the service staff of a high-end restaurant! They enthusiastically dragged the members of the Dragon Team into the super VIP passage. As they brought them along, they said, “Normally, the entrance ticket to the super VIP passage costs 100 gold coins.” Everyone was speechless when they heard that. That was too much, was it not?! A million dollars! Only the rich could truly afford to fork up such an amount! After all, this was only the entrance fee! The soldier continued on, “However, the members of the Dragon Team don’t need the entrance fee. This is something that the City Lord has deliberately emphasized.” Upon hearing this, the members of the Dragon Team were instantly overjoyed. “See, I told you that Lu Chen is a good guy, right?” “That’s right, I’ve always thought that Lu Chen is a good guy!” “Bullsh*t! You did not want him to join the Dragon Team! I remember that you were the one who called him the loser back then!” “Bullsh*t! I’m definitely a loyal fan of Lu Chen! If anyone dares to say anything bad about Lu Chen in the future, I’ll be the first to fight him to the death!” At this moment, Liu Yuan’s expression finally brightened up. It was all thanks to Lu Chen that she was able to save her gold coins. At the same time, she thought to herself if she should go easy on him the next time she spies on him. Even Liu Yuan herself did not realize that her attitude toward Lu Chen had changed drastically. Gu Yiming and Xu Ziyuan were still waiting in line at the entrance of the VIP channel. Although they heard that they could go to the Super VIP channel for free, they did not move at all. They continued to line up at the VIP channel as if they did not hear anything and walked toward the entrance along with the crowd. They were not rich, nor did they like to line up. When they entered White Fog City, many players were talking about how they took the initiative to ask Lu Chen to be their friend. Although it was not an embarrassing action, they were still a little embarrassed. In order to avoid such a thing, they continued to line up and stopped talking. “Hey! Gu Yiming, Xu Ziyuan! Come here, you can also come to this passage for free!” Thinking that the direct descendants of these two big families were also Lu Chen’s friends, she kindly reminded them. However, the next moment, her face flushed red. Why did it feel like she was a hostess that was entertaining guests when they arrived? Gu Yiming and Xu Ziyuan were originally walking forward by themselves and did not bother about other things. When they heard Liu Yuan shouting at them, the other ordinary players looked at them. Gu Yiming thought to himself, this is bad. The reason why his people were lining up here was because there were many players who were ridiculing him. As a direct descendant of the Gu and Xu families. They even took the initiative to stick to Lu Chen for benefits. Although he understood that for a player like Lu Chen to be able to talk to him was definitely an honor. In the Second World, the family background of people was not important. However, when he thought about how there were several players discussing this matter beside him, he felt somewhat embarrassed. So they decided to keep a low profile and hurry over. Even if they spent 30 gold coins, it was just a drop of water in the ocean for them. However, now that Liu Yuan had directly exposed their identities, it made them feel a little awkward. They could only walk towards the super VIP passageway with shame. At this moment, a member of the Dragon Team walked out from the group. “Excuse me, I want to become a Swordsman. Can I ask that Swordsman outside at the entrance to help me?” The soldier nodded and said, “Of course you can. Lord Hade is here to help everyone become a Swordsman.” As soon as he said that, many members of the Dragon Team swarmed toward Hade! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation These members of the Dragon Team used all their might to be the first to reach that old man. Their current speed was even faster than when White Fog City first appeared! There were already tens of thousands of players surrounding the entire White Fog City. If they were even a little slower, they would not be able to get a spot! The eyes of the other players were swarmed with jealousy. Although they saw that Hade was a Swordsman class change master, they still subconsciously thought that Hade was just a general guarding the city. They did not expect him to help everyone change their class. They too surrounded Hade not far away and said, “Sir, please help us change our class!” Hade lay there calmly. However, his heart raced anxiously. The reason why he had his hands on the city gate was firstly to protect order. Secondly, it was to attract more customers than other class changing masters. After all, even in the Second World, one had to have money to buy equipment. Everyone was a worker, who would not want to earn more? However, he had just killed players to warn the others, so everyone was stunned. No one dared to come to him. Now that the members of the Dragon Team had taken the initiative to look for him, he did not pretend?to act coy anymore. He stood up and asked, “Do you have a class advancement scroll?” The members of the Dragon Team had long prepared these basic items. Those who wanted to become Swordsmen immediately took out their class advancement scrolls. Hade did not make haste. He immediately took out his sword and drew a simple incantation. The next second, flames appeared out of thin air on the scroll. As the scroll burned and disappeared, a trace of sword aura gradually appeared on the body of this Dragon Team member! At the same time, his bodily functions had undergone earth-shattering changes. His attack power, in particular, increased fivefold! Moreover, with the support of a Swordsman class, he could deal three times the critical strike. Class change completed! This member of the Dragon Team became the first player to successfully complete the class change. Of course...; Lu Chen, the avaricious City Lord, would not be counted as one of them. Not long after, all the members of the Dragon Team who wanted to become a Swordsman successfully completed their class change and became a Swordsmen. This made many other players envious. They did not even line up and directly ran over to Hade. They cautiously probed, “Sir Hade, can you help us to complete our class change? I have a scroll here too.” Meanwhile, the other players who had used their class change scrolls were even more anxious. “Sir Hade, we don’t have any class change scrolls. What should we do?” When Hade saw so many players coming to him, the corners of his mouth could not help but curl up crazily! He pointed at the pawn shop in the distance and said happily, “Everyone, don’t be anxious. Those who don’t have any class change scrolls can go to the pawnshop to exchange for class change scrolls. However, the scrolls are limited. There are only 100,000 of them per day!” Liu Changping opened his mouth in surprise and mumbled softly, “This kid even learned how to sell a limited number of scrolls per day? He must have learned how to play money making games when he was younger…” However, he did not know that Lu Chen was feeling helpless as well, because the craftsmen in the city were already making all kinds of props day and night that he had to pay for. Hade continued, “Those who have scrolls can look for me to change their class, but the prerequisite is that you must first obtain the qualifications to enter the city. This is the rule, even I can’t change it.” This made the faces of the players who excitedly came to change their classes fall once again. They originally thought that they would be able to change their class here, and then turn around and start farming monsters. This would save them the money to enter the city. Earning 100,000 dollars would take about two to three years for an average worker in the real world to have, these people would never get the chance to go in! After all, their main goal was to be able to change their class to increase their combat power and improve their lives in the main world. They were not clear about the changes that had occurred in the world. For ordinary people, the purpose of entering the Second World was to improve the quality of life in the main world. To eat their fill, wear warm clothes, buy a house, marry a wife, that was all. This was the happiness epitome of ordinary people, and it was also what Lu Chen had once thought. However, in this era that was about to erupt, it became the burdened sorrow of ordinary people. The players had no choice but to go back and queue up to enter the city. When the time came, they would look for Hade to change their class. Now, everyone’s motivation to queue up to pay was even higher! At this moment, Hade was overjoyed. It must be known that the vast majority of these players wanted to become Swordsmen. If they wanted to change their class, not only would they need scrolls, but they would also need to give him gold coins as a reward. Even those super VIPs were no exception. In less than an hour. Hade had earned a lot of money. There were also quite a number of people in the Dragon Team who chose to enter the city to look for other class change masters. At the very least, those who had been snipers in the main world would definitely choose to become Marksmen. The number of people in the city increased, and the city became more and more prosperous. … [Ding! White Fog City population +1!] [Ding! White Fog City population +10!] [Ding! White Fog City population +1!] [Ding! White Fog City population +30!] [Ding! White Fog City population +1!] [Ding! White Fog City population +10!] [Ding! White Fog City class change number +1!] … A series of notifications appeared in Lu Chen’s mind. He opened the interface excitedly. [White Fog City] [City Level: Bronze] [Population: 14,305] [Available Positions: Magister, Holy Light, Paladin…] [Assets: 3,004,680] [City Defense: 1,003,921] [Magic Defense: 1,003,921] [City HP: 1,000,2936] [City Garrison: 10,000] [City Array: None] As expected, as the population and garrison increased, the defense of the entire city also increased greatly. Not only were the assets increasing, but the defense and HP were also increasing. No matter from all aspects, it was beneficial to everyone. Lu Chen looked at his White Fog City Lord title once again. [White Fog City Lord] [Type: City Lord Title] [Level: 2] [Vitality: +800] [Strength: +800] [Agility: +800] [Intelligence: +800] [Special Effect: The attribute bonus of the title will increase according to the prosperity of the city.] As expected, the prosperity of White Fog City increased the attribute bonus of his White Fog City Lord title, and the power he gained became even stronger. Although it could only be used in White Fog City, one had to know that White Fog City could be summoned at any time and place to fight alongside him! This kind of fighting method was simply heaven-defying! At this moment, Lu Chen had already thought about how great he would be when White Fog City maxed out with players and power! At this moment, Lu Chen also thought about whether this White Fog City could be summoned to the main world or not. If it was possible, when he faces Xiao Bai next time, he could directly summon White Fog City. With all sorts of buffs on himself, he would be able to push Xiao Bai to the ground and destroy him in a spiffy way. Speaking of which, seeing that White Fog City was moving towards the right track, his heart finally calmed down. If everyone really was not willing to spend money to enter the city, then he would have suffered a huge loss. Since he did not need to worry about the matters in White Fog City anymore, he could go out and farm monsters. Having not killed monsters for a long time, Lu Chen’s hands were becoming a little itchy. It was time to kill a silver boss! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The first thing he remembered was the territories of the six silver bosses around White Fog City. Wolf Valley, Bear Ridge, Snake Pond, Bat Cave, Mass Grave, and Tiger Mountain. Apart from Wolf Valley and Bear Ridge, there were four other places that had not been cleared. “Lan Weiwei, Snake Pond, Bat Cave, Mass Grave, and Tiger Mountain. Do you know these places?” Lu Chen asked. At this moment, Lan Weiwei, who had silver hair that reached her waist and snow-white skin, blinked her sapphire-blue eyes. She thought for a moment before replying. “Actually, I don’t know much about the other places. The only place I’m in charge of is the Wolf Valley. The six of us siler bosses won’t go to the other party’s territory. Otherwise, a war will break out. “However, I know that the Tiger Mountain’s strength should be the strongest. “Although each of the nine tigers aren’t as strong as me, they were born from the same womb. They have a tacit understanding with each other and have special skills. They’re very difficult to deal with. “There’s a giant snake that’s always entrenched at the bottom of the Snake Pond. He’s the oldest among all the silver bosses, at least 5,000 years old. “It was said that he was a silver boss because he had tried to transcend his tribulation and transform into a Flood Dragon. He didn’t succeed though. Instead, his cultivation regressed and he had become the weakest existence. “He has been at the bottom of the pond for many years. He had been recuperating and relying on the water to nourish his body. However, he had not challenged any of the bosses in many years. It’s likely that he hasn’t recovered from his injuries. “As for the Bat Cave, I know that it’s a huge cave that is more than twice the size of my Wolf Valley. “Plus, the cave there was complex, and there are countless bats in it. Most importantly, there’s no light in there at all. Even for us wolves, it was difficult to see what was going on inside “Oh also, the bats are extremely poisonous. Once they go crazy, they would crazily rush towards the enemy, the infrasound waves that made it impossible to guard against. The number of bats could overpower an individual’s attack easily. “In addition, they are the only race that can fly. Therefore, they are born with an unparalleled defensive ability and are invincible.” After Lu Chen heard Lan Weiwei’s analysis, he nodded slightly. Then, he asked, “What about the Mass Grave?” At the mention of this place, Lan Weiwei’s eyes were obviously filled with fear. “I don’t know...;” “You don’t know?” Lu Chen was a little confused. Lan Weiwei nodded. “The Mass Grave is the most mysterious and bizarre place. Although I’ve been to the other four places many times, I’ve been to that place. It’s not just me that has never been there. The other four silver bosses have never been there either.” Lu Chen’s eyes narrowed. Lan Weiwei could be seen as a relatively powerful existence among these bosses. Even when she mentioned the nine tigers, she was not the least bit afraid. However, when talking about the Mass Grave, she was extremely hesitant. “Weiwei, what else do you know about the Mass Grave?” Lan Weiwei calmed herself down, finally, she said, “The Mass Grave isn’t just filled with human corpses. Most importantly, the other five regions’ past bosses have been visited by the Mass Grave’s silver boss before they died and got replaced.” Hearing this, Lu Chen’s pupils constricted. One had to know that Lu Chen had spent a lot of experience fighting both Lan Weiwei, who was an Ancient Ash Wolf, and the boss of Bear Ridge. Especially when he was fighting the Ancient Ash Wolf, if he had not obtained the Undead title, he would have long since returned to the Resurrection Point. Now, there were actually countless dead silver bosses lurking in the Mass Grave. The Mass Grave had been around since ancient times. For 10,000 years, who knows how many powerful monsters and even powerful bosses have accumulated there. Even though these dead existences might not be as powerful as they were when they were alive, they could still retain powerful skills from when they were alive. Moreover, after becoming a member of the Mass Grave, their attack methods would probably be abnormally strange. Even if one were powerful, they would still be in danger when faced with an endless stream of strange enemies with strange antics. Moreover, after so many years of its existence, who knew how many other strange things could be nurtured inside. Lan Weiwei continued, “When I was very young, I once heard a rumor from an elder. In their grandfather’s area, although the Mass Grave was very dangerous, there would still be some powerful ancestors who would go in to explore the area, trying to obtain opportunities. “However, 10,000 years ago, a huge black dragon suddenly fell from the sky and directly fell into the Mass Graves. “Since then, the Mass Grave’s aura began to become terrifying and violent. “There was even a top human mighty figure who once fell there. However, no one knows what kind of strength that mighty figure had when he was alive.” Hearing Lan Weiwei’s analysis, Lu Chen thought for a moment before deciding on a place. “Then… Let’s go to Tiger Mountain first!” Lan Weiwei was slightly startled. “Shouldn’t we go to the Snake Pond first?” Although she had to go past the other bosses’ territories, in her opinion, they should first kill the simple ones and place the powerful ones last. Lu Chen smiled slightly. “This morning, I saw Liu Yuan. She told me that the old b*stard Xiao Bai is already preparing to accept the City Lord’s challenge in the west. “In that case, our advantage in power might not be big enough. “Therefore, we should continue to build on our strength. The nine silver tigers will just become our stepping stones. “If we kill them, the rewards should be even more generous, right?” As he said that, he led Lan Weiwei to Linda, the Grand Mage, so that he could bring Rollie with him. Although Linda was studying Rollie and was a little displeased that she was suddenly interrupted in her experiment, she also knew the priority of the matter. Rollie seemed to be relieved of a heavy burden as he crawled onto Lan Weiwei’s body. His speed was so quick that it did not match his figure at all. It was obvious that he had been tortured here. Then, he arrived at the teleportation array in White Fog City. The teleportation array was different from teleportation scrolls. The scrolls were one-time use, and the teleportation distance was extremely long. They would become useless after use. However, the teleportation array could not teleport players far away. Fortunately, it was permanent, and a certain amount of magic would be used each time. The two of them and the panda stood on the teleportation array. Then, it emitted a dazzling purple light. Immediately after, the light slowly contracted, as if it had condensed into a liquid, outlining the complicated and mysterious patterns of the array bit by bit. When the last stroke of the magic array pattern was finished, they instantly disappeared from White Fog City. The two people and the panda felt dizzy. Their vision was a little blurry, and when they regained consciousness, they were already in a jungle. Before they could take a closer look, a fierce looking tiger with black and yellow stripes charged at them with a loud roar! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The moment they landed, they knew that the location they were sent to was not the best place to be teleported to. They were immediately attacked before they could even fully open their eyes and gain their bearings. However, when faced with the tiger that suddenly attacked them, the two of them did not panic at all. Lan Weiwei’s expression changed from her baby face to a cold expression as she slashed out with her claw. A phantom-like wolf claw flew out directly and hit the tiger’s chest. The sound of bones shattering could be heard when she slashed it out. The fierce tiger’s chest bone had been smashed into pieces! -8,000! It was an instant kill! A red number appeared in the air! “What the f*ck!” At this moment, exclamations could be heard from their surroundings. Lu Chen turned his head to find the source of the noise. Five or six people had actually crawled out from the bushes. “What the f*ck is going on? We’ve been lying in ambush here for half a day, and this tiger has already been killed?” “Where did you two come from? Why did you fight the monster?” “Did you come to this area first?” The three or four of them were obviously angry from the kill steal. They had been lying in wait here for a long time, just to take down this tiger. Lan Weiwei was a little stunned. Before this, the others were either afraid of her or looked at her with disapproval. This was the first time someone had been so aggressive and responsive with the way they spoke to her. Most importantly, it was odd that the reason for the blame was because she had killed such an ordinary wild monster… Lu Chen looked at the tiger’s corpse that lay there. There were still many wounds on its body. However, he could tell at a glance that these wounds were not alarmingly serious. To the tiger, it could probably be just a little scratching itch. It seems that the journey was going to be a little complicated. For a moment, he could not tell whether these players were planning on catching the tiger, or the tiger was deliberately luring these people to take the bait and eat them. After all, he could tell that these people’s vigilance was too low. He looked at the tiger lying on the ground again and took a deep breath. As expected, the most high-end hunters often appeared as prey. Lu Chen looked at the people around and was speechless. “Are you guys here to team up and fight small monsters? You guys are pretty weak though. Or are you here to be food to the monsters?” The first player to jump out and criticize Lan Weiwei had an unconvinced look on his face. “What right do you have to make fun of us? We’re all rookies. What right do you have in saying you’re much better than us?” Lu Shen opened his mouth slightly, but he did not think of how to respond to him. After all, he was currently seen as being pretentious. At this moment, two players who had not spoken all this while gathered together and whispered while the rest had a stare down. “Why does this person look familiar to me?” “Yeah, I feel like I’ve seen that silver-haired girl before. I feel like I’ve seen her somewhere.” “Hey, remember the video I shared a few days ago. Is it them?” Once these words were said, everyone looked at Lu Chen carefully again. Their eyes went from doubt to panic, then to shock, and finally to horror! “Sh*t! Isn’t he Morning Mist!” “I think so! The beauty next to him seems to be the Ancient Ash Wolf King who fought the Xiao family in the video!” “What?!” “Holy f*cking sh*t, no way! Did we seriously just start a fight with the only and only Morning Mist! Is this the end for us?” “This is the end, now we have to return to the Resurrection Point!” The person who had jumped out to scold Lan Weiwei and Lu Chen at the beginning was a little dumbfounded. He would have never expected the legendary Morning Mist to appear in such a place. In his opinion, he thought that he would never meet such a top-tier player in his lifetime. Now that he had angered the other party, he knew that he was probably doomed. However, he was very single-minded. After all, he had been in the Second World for so long and did not actually have any equipment. Returning to the Resurrection Point was not a loss to him. Thinking of this, he stood taller and mustered up his courage. There was some fear in his eyes and a little fanaticism as he spoke. “Morning Mist, my name is Liu Yang. I have worshiped you for a long time. Can you give me an autograph before you kill me?” Lu Chen was slightly taken aback by his words. How could this kid be thinking of such a thing right now? However, before he could respond, the other five players ran over in unison. “Morning Mist, I’d like your autograph too!” When the five players heard the first player who requested it, they all cursed in their hearts. ‘F*ck! If I had known that this would happen, I would have definitely rushed out to ask for an autograph first.’ Lu Chen looked at the players in front of him. Initially, he could not tell that they were young because their faces were dirty. Now that he was closer, he realized that they all seemed to be just a bunch of high school students. The levels of these people were really too low. One was level three, one was level two, and the rest were all level one. These players were just ordinary players and just noobs. Lan Weiwei looked at this group of confused high school students and could not help but laugh. Lu Chen also smiled helplessly. “Who said I wanted to kill you guys? I won’t argue with you guys if you hurry up and leave now. Plus, I’d advise you guys to go to Wolf Valley or Bear Ridge instead.” This group of high school students were curious. “Why?” When these teenagers heard that Lu Chen did not have any intention of killing them, they were a little excited. Although they were little trash who often resurrected, they had finally reached Tiger Mountain. None of them wanted to start from scratch. After all, every time they died, there would be a day of weakness. However, they still asked curiously, “Are you going to Tiger Mountain to kill those nine Tigers?” Lu Chen replied, “These Tigers’ have a much higher combat power than yours. You can’t beat them at all. Even if you stay here, you’ll be courting death. “And today… “We’re here to kill those nine silber tigers “I reckon that the mountain will be in chaos today. If you’re not careful, you’ll die here.” The others looked troubled as they frowned. After all, they had been here for a long time. If they turned around and went to another place, it would probably take them another two or three days to reach their destination. More importantly, once the nine Tiger Mountain became chaotic, they might not even be able to leave the mountain and would immediately return to the Resurrection Point. They still had this bit of self-awareness. They did not want to go back. Liu Yang mustered up his courage and said, “Morning Mist, if we go down, we’ll probably be killed too. “After all, it’s too dangerous for us to go down the mountain alone. Once you start fighting, all the wild beasts will probably run down the mountain. At that time, we’ll be dead for sure. “Don’t worry, we won’t fight you for experience points!” Liu Yang stretched out his right hand and patted his chest, indicating that he would not lie. After listening to Liu Yang’s words, Lu Chen felt that it made sense to not go down the mountain right now. However, when he heard the other party’s final promise to him, Lu Chen opened his mouth slightly, not knowing what to say for a long time. This youth really dared to say such words to him. With their ability, even if they wanted to fight for gain EXP with him, they would probably die at least 800 times at the base of Tiger Mountain before going up. However, he did not want to discourage these youths. The words in his heart circled a few times before he finally replied, “Your courage is commendable!” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation He found these kids rather pleasing to the eye, so he did not say anything else. He turned around and headed straight to the center of the Tiger Mountain. When Liu Yang saw that Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei did not reject him, the six of them looked at each other, their eyes filled with excitement. They hurriedly ran in Lu Chen’s direction and took the initiative to act as guards. Moreover, their division of labor was very clear. Liu Yang and another player stood a dozen meters in front of Lu Chen to scout the way. There was also a person on each side of the team, constantly observing movements on both sides. The last two people had to cover the rear ten meters away for flanks. This set up made them look like they were Lu Chen’s bodyguards. However, only Lu Chen knew that these high school students were bound to be useless… Because every time a wild monster appeared, Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei would be the first to notice it. Fortunately, the two of them were skilled and brave, so they did not take these students’ carelessness to heart. Usually, some monsters would not bother attacking and would go about with their lives. If it did not come, the group would not take the initiative to kill it. After all, the level of these monsters was too low, so they could not gain much exp. However, Liu Yang and the others were different. Every time, they would almost reach the range of the monster’s attack and would want to rush forward. There were even a few times when they were only a few meters away from the monsters before they shouted loudly. Sometimes, Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei were too lazy to attack. If Rollie encountered a monster with low combat power, he would run over and slap them to death. Then, he would drag the monster’s corpse over to claim credit, he then took the bamboo shoot from Lu Chen’s hand and continued munching on it. Whether he knew it or not, even Rollie was more useful than these six players… Lu Chen felt that this arrangement did not help at all. It felt like an overpowering god bringing a newbie to the top… After a while, he could not help but speak up, “If you find any more wild monsters, just go up and attack. Don’t be afraid. “If there’s any danger, I’ll help you take care of it. “In this way, your battle experience will be greatly increased.” When Liu Yang and the others heard this, they were so happy that their hearts were about to burst. They could get a little experience points by forming a team with him. Of course, Lu Chen only wanted to quicken the journey. To them, it was too much! In a short while, Liu Yang had already risen to level five. The weakest among the others was also at level three! Everyone was so excited about the prospects of leveling up this quickly! However, they knew that this was only a one-time opportunity. Increasing their combat power was the way to go. Now that they basically had the protection of a so-called god, it could be said that the entire Tiger Mountain was at their beck and call! Even if the six of them were to fight the nine tigers, they would not hesitate to charge forward and do it! With Morning Mist around, the nine tigers would not stand a chance! Plus, the Ancient Ash Wolf King had already become Morning Mist’s woman! Morning Mist was clearly giving them a chance to increase their strength and battle experience! Hearing such a good thing happen, the eyes of the player at the left, right, and back of the party turned red with envy! Because the wild monsters basically appeared at the front, they also wanted to increase their experience and battle strength. Although they wanted to kill these monsters, they would be exhausted holding the back and sides. However, they could increase their combat EXP if they were upfront. As time passed, their combat power, experience points, and levels would all increase rapidly if they all fought together. Lu Chen saw through their thoughts and smiled. “You guys go to the front. Kill the monsters with them.” After hearing this, these players jumped and ran to the front, the corners of their mouths almost reached their ears. Thus, these players began to fight with the wild monsters. Once a wild monster appeared, these players would swarm over, relying on their numbers to kill the other party. However, when they really faced a powerful monster, they were helpless. However, along the way, Lan Weiwei had completely shocked them. No matter what level of wild monsters came up, Lan Weiwei — this seemingly cute girl — only used one move to defeat them. Every single attack made these six players admire her strongness even more! -2,000! -3,800! -6,600! -12,200! Each attack she did caused them to fall into deep thought. They could only deal 2,000 damage. However, Lan Weiwei could deal more than 2,000 damage, but it was not necessary because the monster only had 2,000 HP. This feeling was the same as meeting a straight-A student in school! There were even a few times when they saw monsters with higher levels and had activated a certain level of intelligence. When they saw Lan Weiwei, they were so scared that they ran with their tails between their legs. When they ran, they even peed all over the ground! The main reason was that Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei had intentionally hidden their auras to avoid scaring the monsters away in order to train them. The six of them swarmed forward, but the monster could not be bothered with them. Its gaze was as if it was telling the students that it was full and did not want to eat anymore. However, when Lan Weiwei quietly walked up to it and suddenly revealed her terrifying aura, the tiger was immediately scared to death! The few of them had been fighting the monster for half an hour, but in the end, they were not as effective as the other party who showed up. Could this be the legendary saying, “If you do your best, you might not even be as good as others?!” This incident kept happening again and again. However, this did not make them feel the slightest bit of frustration. Instead, it inspired them to learn from Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei. Finally, when they had killed four to five hundred monsters, the strongest silver tiger in the mountain could not hold it in any longer. If this continued, all of his monsters would be slaughtered, and they would be left with nothing. Without these monsters to stop them, what would the other players fight with? Most importantly, if it was just players killing monsters, they might not care too much. However, when the Ancient Ash Wolf King, Lan Weiwei, as a silver boss of another territory, took the initiative to attack them, this represented a challenge. This challenge enraged them to no end. They had to accept it! Following three loud roars, the Tiger Mountain trembled three times! All the other animals on the mountain seemed to have heard their natural enemies. They all lay on the ground trembling, their heads buried in the ground, not daring to move at all. When all the monsters heard the roar, they instantly received a berserk buff! All their attributes, including their combat power, instantly doubled! Originally, there were still many players farming monsters below. Seeing that the monsters were about to be grinded to death made them excited, but when these three roars appeared, their HP instantly recovered by more than half, completing the counter-attack! For a moment, the cries of countless players rang out from Tiger Mountain! Following that, all the three tigers ran in the same direction! That was precisely where Lu Chen was located. At this moment, three fierce tigers that were as big as tall buildings suddenly appeared in front of Lu Chen. They crazily roared and spewed out terrifying auras from their mouths! Their entire body was covered in yellow and black stripes. Only their four legs were covered in white fur. These tigers seem to contain a trace of white tiger bloodline! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Looking at the information of the three tigers before them, it shocked them. [Fire Tiger] [Level: 16 (silver boss)] [HP: 80,000] [Attack: 5,000] [Defense: 800] [Magic Defense: 80] [Skill: Raging Flame, Injury Transfer] [Raging Flame: The exclusive skill of the Fire Tiger. It will have different effects depending on the awakening of the bloodline. When the Fire Tiger lets out a furious roar, its entire body will be covered in flames of heat nearly 3,000 degrees. Its attack and defense will become doubled. The duration will be until the end of the fusion period! Any enemy that gets covered in flames would receive 500 magic damage per second for 20 seconds. There is even a chance to awaken the bloodline and complete the transformation! Cooldown time is six months] [Injury Transfer: The injuries of the nine Fire Tigers could be transferred to each other and shared. The injuries could also be transferred to one Fire Tiger while the rest of the Fire Tigers remain at their peak condition.] [Mysterious Skill: Unknown] One could tell that the level of the Fire Tiger was not high. It was only level 16, far inferior to the level 20 Wolf from before. However, the most powerful skill of this Fire Tiger was Raging Flame. If he was not facing an enemy with high agility like the Gray Wolf, that one minute incident would probably be enough to grind some enemies with high defense to death. However, it could be seen from this that the Fire Tigers were indeed stronger than the Ancient Ash Wolf. If they were at the same level, Lan Weiwei might not be a match for these Fire Tigers. After all, the White Tiger was one of the top four divine beasts. These Fire Tiger’s had a trace of bloodline, it might even be stronger than the Ancient Ash Wolf. However, even so, it was not a problem for the current Lan Weiwei. Lan Weiwei’s talent had always been far superior to ordinary monsters. Otherwise, it would be very difficult for her to become a powerful presence in the six territories. Now, Lan Weiwei had already become the Ancient Ash Wolf King. The bloodline in her body had been gradually awakening. In addition, her level was much higher than these Fire Tigers, so these three Fire Tigers were not a big match for her at all. When the two parties confronted each other, Liu Yang and the others did not rush forward to court death like before. Instead, they consciously retreated behind Lu Chen. Only Rollie did care about what was going on, he found a frog on the ground and this little fellow started to follow it around. Speaking of which, Rollie was indeed a lucky creature. When they were in the Xiao family, the entire Xiao family was wiped out, but Rollie was not injured at all. Even when Xiao Bai attacked them and the house had been torn down, the corner that Rollie hid in did not collapse. This could only be explained by luck. After so many battles today, Lu Chen had clearly discovered that many Fire Tigers were clearly keeping their distance away from Rollie. However, they would rather sneak up on Lu Chen from afar than hurt Rollie. This made Lu Chen extremely envious knowing that he had the claw and fight to survive. Rollie, on the other hand, was just a giant panda playing with a frog on the ground, yet no one dared to disturb that little fellow. Is there any justice left in this world? Even though three Fire Tigers appeared in front of him at once, Lu Chen had no intention of making a move. It was not just because these ordinary tigers were too low-leveled and unnecessary. It was also because this battle belonged to the battle between the leaders of two silver territories. Although Lan Weiwei was a cute girl, this battle played a role in her dignity. Unless it was absolutely necessary, Lu Chen should not need to intervene. Lu Chen looked at the Fire Tiger’s interface. That skill, Injury Transfer, was indeed a helpful skill. It was similar to how he and Lan Weiwei shared HP together. In other words, although the Fire Tiger only had 80,000 HP, if Lan Weiwei wanted to kill any of them, she would have to take 720,000 HP off the opponent at the end of the day. From the looks of it, the Fire Tigers were an existence with high attack and defense. Moreover, he was still trying to figure out the last skill of the Fire Tigers. What kind of skill would appear as an unknown? He looked at Lan Weiwei with a puzzled gaze. Lan Weiwei shook her head in reply. When she fought with the nine tigers, she had never seen the nine tigers use their special skill. If there were any, it would be that the nine tigers were extremely well-coordinated. It was as if the nine of them were thinking the same thing. Lu Chen nodded. Normally, a tiger could give birth to many cubs. With the strength of their parents, they could grow into adults. However, as the saying went, two tigers could not live on the same mountain. Therefore, it was strange that the nine Fire Tigers could exist in the mountain at the same time. However, Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei were not the only ones who felt strange. The three Tigers looked at Lan Weiwei’s interface and revealed a human-like expression of surprise! [Ancient Ash Wolf King] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Lan Weiwei] [Intimacy: 165] [Level: 33] [Attack: 28,000 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wol, increases by 50% with moonlight buff, increases by 50%)] [HP: 150,000 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff)] [Defense: 1,200 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff)] [Magic Defense: 1,200 (increases by 50% when transformed into the ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff, a total of 1,600)] [Skills: Demonic Flame, Frost Domain, True Form Transformation, Ash Wolf’s Fury, Moonlight’s Blessing, Soul Tracking] [Demonic Flame: The Ancient Ash Wolf King spits out terrifying demonic flames, causing 8,000 physical and magic damage per second to the enemy in front of it.] [Frost Domain: Creates a frost domain, slowing down the enemy’s attack speed and casting speed by 50%.] [True Form Transformation: When transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf King, all attributes increase by 50%.] [Ash Wolf’s Fury: The Ancient Ash Wolf King awakens the sleeping bloodline in its body, greatly increasing its own attributes, and has a chance to obtain an additional skill!] [Moonlight’s Blessing: Under the moonlight, all attributes increase by 50%.] [Soul Tracking: When this skill is used, it can leave a mark deep within the target’s soul. It can track up to three people. The mark will remain for three months. This skill can be shared with the owner.] This little girl is actually the Ancient Ash Wolf? How did she become the Wolf King? Not only is she the Ancient Ash Wolf King, but as a little girl, she had the fighting capacity to make earth-shaking moves. The three Tigers were shocked and it made them want to kill her even more! Not only will the Fire Tigers level up, but they would also have a better chance of knowing her secrets. Three tiger roars and a wolf roar were heard. Lan Weiwei and the three Fire Tigers were already engaged in battle. However, Lan Weiwei did not need to transform into her real body at all. She could rely on her own combat strength to not fall into a disadvantageous position. Her swift phantom wolf claws and the raging flames that were released from the roars clashed together, creating a monstrous formation. The two sides fought back and forth. Although Lan Weiwei’s agility and attacks were very high, she was unable to kill either one of them in one hit. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Every time Lan Weiwei attacked, she could only deal 28,000 damage. -28,000! -28,000! -28,000! -28,000! A string of red numbers floated in mid-air. These three Fire Tigers worked closely together. One was responsible for attracting Lan Weiwei’s attention, while the other was responsible for attacking. The thinnest one was extremely fast and was responsible for sneak attacks. Their division of labor was extremely clear, and the timing of their attacks were very precise. As long as Lan Weiwei attacked one of the Fire Tigers, the other two would either pounce on her or spit fireballs from their mouths to attack from a distance. Although their attack power was not that high, it still made Lan Weiwei feel a little constrained. What was more annoying was that when Lan Weiwei’s attack landed on the Fire Tigers, even though one of the Fire Tigers was hit, all of the Fire Tigers would start to lose HP. Lan Weiwei’s attack! -28,000! The three Fire Tigers all attacked! -3,111! -3,111! -3,111! The most frustrating thing was that Lan Weiwei’s attack could only deal 28,000 damage. The opponent instantly spread the damage to the other two Fire Tigers, only losing over 3,000 HP in one hit. This was nothing compared to their 80,000 HP. Even though she had sent the three Fire Tigers flying time and time again, the opponent was able to pounce on her again with almost full HP. However, what made her somewhat puzzled was that this time, they actually did not activate their Raging Flame skill. Lu Chen, who was at the side, noticed something unusual. The three Fire Tigers seemed to be looking in his direction, intentionally or unintentionally. Their eyes were still filled with fear. Lu Chen’s attack power was almost twice that of Lan Weiwei’s. Moreover, judging from his equipment, he was probably very powerful. Lu Chen felt that the reason why they did not use their ultimate skill was because they were on guard against him. However, as the three Fire Tigers’ injuries gradually increased, their HP also continued to drop. When their HP dropped to a quarter, the other Fire Tigers finally could not hold it in any longer as it let out a loud roar. Clouds followed the dragon, Tigers followed the wind. A gust of strong wind appeared from all directions and rushed into the center. With Lan Weiwei and the three Fire Tigers standing at the center, it seemed like a tornado was forming. Then, in less than ten seconds, six Fire Tigers came whistling from their surroundings. Some of them were drowsy, as if they had just woken up. Some of them had blood on the corners of their mouths, as if they were eating. The six Fire Tigers had different forms, but they appeared at the same time during a crisis. Lu Chen felt that something was not right. This was too abnormal.?As the saying went, there was no room for two tigers on a mountain, unless they were a male and a female. Moreover, a normal birth should be both male and female. However, these nine Fire Tigers were actually all males, and they even lived together in harmony on this mountain. It was too strange. Moreover, although each Fire Tiger had different forms, their combat abilities were all the same, and their parameters were all the same. This made this whole situation… very strange. The moment these six Fire Tigers appeared, they instantly joined the battle. For a moment, the battle situation instantly heightened in stakes! Fireballs flew all over the sky! Meanwhile, Lan Weiwei’s wolf claw attacks continuously caused damage to the nine Fire Tigers. Despite her high attack and high agility, it was already a little difficult for her to deflect them. Although the Fire Tigers had an advantage in numbers on their side, they did not collide with each other. On the contrary, they cooperated very well. Their attack power was powerful. Moreover, they attacked from many angles. Even Lan Weiwei had no way to dodge all of them. Even if Lan Weiwei wanted to attack one of the Fire Tigers at close range, the other Fire Tigers would find loopholes from all sorts of angles and launch sneak attacks. After a while, Lan Weiwei was also slightly injured. However, Lan Weiwei was no longer the Ancient Ash Wolf King from before. Her combat strength was indeed much stronger than the nine tigers, so nine tigers HP continued to drop. Before long, the nine tigers HP bar had already bottomed out. More than 700,000 HP was forcefully hit by Lan Weiwei until a bit was left. In one more minute, these nine tigers would be completely wiped out by Lu Chen! Lu Chen was very satisfied. Not only was taking in this beauty Lan Weiwei very pleasing to the eye, but her combat power was also so strong that it saved him a lot of trouble. This was no different from hacking and leveling up! It was awesome! However, at this moment, nine Tigers finally felt that Lan Weiwei’s strength was far beyond their imagination. The number was simply not enough to bridge the gap in strength. They quickly exchanged glances with each other. After that, they made a decision at the same time and pounced on the largest Fire Tiger! The following scene completely shocked Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei. Liu Yang and the others watched with their eyes wide open. When the other eight Fire Tigers touched the largest one, it looked like snow touching fire as they directly merged into the body of the Fire Tiger. Meanwhile, the remaining Fire Tiger rapidly expanded at a speed visible to the naked eye. The aura it emitted became more and more terrifying the more it merged with the others. When Liu Yang looked at the information on the tiger’s interface, his scalp immediately went numb! [Ancient Fire Tiger] [Level: 30 (silver boss)] [HP: 1,440,000] [Attack: 90,000] [Defense: 14,400] [Magic Defense: 1,440] [Skill: Raging Flame, Injury Transfer] [Raging Flame: The exclusive skill of the Ancient Fire Tiger. It will have different effects depending on the awakening of the bloodline. When the Fire Tiger lets out a furious roar, its entire body will be covered in flames of heat nearly 3,000 degrees. Its attack and defense will become doubled. The duration will be until the end of the fusion period! Any enemy that gets covered in flames would receive 9,000 magic damage per second for 360 seconds. There is even a chance to awaken the bloodline and complete the transformation! Cooldown time is 0!] [Injury Transfer: The injuries of the nine Fire Tigers could be transferred to each other and shared. The injuries could also be transferred to one Fire Tiger while the rest of the Fire Tigers remain at their peak condition.] [Nine Tigers to One: The nine Tigers were born from the same womb. They have a telepathic connection with each other and possess the white tiger bloodline. During critical moments, they could combine into one and temporarily become an Ancient Fire Tiger. They would merge their powers into a single Fire Tiger and double the powers!] Lu Chen’s heart thumped when he saw these attributes! This Ancient Fire Tiger not only possessed the strength of nine tigers, but all its attributes were also doubled! Its attack power of up to 90,000 was already more than three times that of Lan Weiwei. Even Lu Chen himself had more than doubled it! The difference was too huge! Especially that magic attack of 9,000 points, it was simply ridiculous! Even if the HP of Lan Weiwei and Lu Chen were added together, it would not be enough for the other party to burn for 20 seconds! On the other hand, the other party’s skill could last for 360 seconds. If Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei were tied together, even 10 of their lives would not be enough! Moreover, the cooldown time of this skill had no time limit. As long as the Ancient Fire Tiger that was formed from the fusion did not disintegrate, this skill would continue to exist. This was even higher than the attributes that Lan Weiwei had, and she was the Ancient Ash Wolf King! Lan Weiwei’s face turned just a little pale. After all, although Lan Weiwei was still in the process of awakening, she still possessed the Ancient Ash Wolf King’s bloodline!! However, now, she seemed to be at a disadvantage. This was indeed the white tiger bloodline. Even if it was just a thread of difference, it was still able to surpass the Ancient Ash Wolf King’s bloodline! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Seeing that the situation was unfavorable to her, Lan Weiwei could no longer hold back her strength. With a long howl, she directly transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf King! [True Form Transformation: When transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf King, all attributes increase by 50%.] At this moment, the moon hung high in the sky, and the moonlight nourished her body. [Moonlight’s Blessing: Under the moonlight, all attributes increase by 50%.] Under these two enhancements, the Ancient Ash Wolf King’s attributes also doubled. However, even so, it was still inferior to the Ancient Fire Tiger. The Fire Tiger roared, and even Lu Chen felt a tremor. At the sidelines, Liu Yang and the others were already at a loss. However, even at this moment, they still did not escape, which made Lu Chen commend them for their bravery. The Ancient Ash Wolf King took the initiative to strike first. With incomparable speed, it directly leaped into the air. Under the moonlight, a pitch-black shadow of a wolf crossed under the moon! In the next moment, the Ancient Ash Wolf King suddenly opened its mouth. A purple ball of light formed in its mouth and gradually expanded. Then, it directly formed a pillar of light that charged at the Ancient Fire Tiger. [ sky-piercing demonic flame ] : the Ancient Ash Wolf King spits out a terrifying demonic flame, [Demonic Flame: The Ancient Ash Wolf King spits out terrifying demonic flames, causing 8,000 physical and magic damage per second to the enemy in front of it.] The Ancient Fire Tiger howled in pain, and it tried to dodge, but its speed was far from enough to dodge the Ancient Ash Wolf King’s attack. The 13,000 physical and magic damage landed on the Fire Tiger’s body, and for a full ten seconds, it depleted 130,000 of its HP! It was a very powerful attack! However, it was only a fraction of the opponent’s HP. The Ancient Fire Tiger was furious. It raised its head and spat out fireballs at the Ancient Ash Wolf King in the sky! [Raging Flame: The exclusive skill of the Ancient Fire Tiger. It will have different effects depending on the awakening of the bloodline. When the Fire Tiger lets out a furious roar, its entire body will be covered in flames of heat nearly 3,000 degrees. Its attack and defense will become doubled. The duration will be until the end of the fusion period! Any enemy that gets covered in flames would receive 9,000 magic damage per second for 360 seconds.There is even a chance to awaken the bloodline and complete the transformation! This skill could be maintained forever, and is a passive skill.] Countless flames suddenly emerged from its body, enveloping it. Even though Lu Chen was more than a hundred meters away, he could still feel the scorching heat. These countless fireballs were like suns being shot out, illuminating the entire deep forest. The Ancient Ash Wolf King’s actions were extremely swift and violent. It jumped left and right, avoiding most of the attacks. However, the Ancient Fire Tiger was ultimately more powerful. Two of the fireballs had hit the Ancient Ash Wolf King. Instantly, 18,000 HP decreased from the Ancient Wolf King! Then, the Ancient Fire Tiger charged forward, and the two towering beasts immediately engaged in a fierce battle. The Ancient Fire Tiger tried to bite the Ancient Ash Wolf King continuously, and its two front claws jumped up high, trying to hit the Ancient Ash Wolf King. The Ancient Ash Wolf King dodged left and right, relying on its high agility to dodge the damage. The Ancient Fire Tiger was extremely smart. Once it engaged in close combat, it would use its powerful attack power to hurt the Ancient Ash Wolf King, and once it engaged in a long-range battle, it would spit fireballs wildly. The Ash Wolf King was at a disadvantage and immediately howled to the moon. Lu Chen immediately understood that Lan Weiwei was asking him for help. Lu Chen did not say anything else. With a thought, a golden title instantly appeared above his head! Bow God! [Bow God: Your understanding of bows has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a bow-type weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with your level!] [Accurate Arrow: When you use a bow-type weapon, your attack is set to hit!] [Armor Breaker: When you use a bow and arrow type weapon to attack, you will dispel 90% of the target’s armor!] Lu Chen immediately took out a bow from his backpack and loaded seven arrows at once! [Seven Star Succession: You can shoot seven arrows at once, and your attack power will be increased by 500%!] Based on Lu Chen’s current attack, each arrow could deal 44,860 damage. A total of seven arrows, would give more damage! In an instant, it reached 1,570,000 points! “Fire!” This 1,570,000 attack point was enough to directly kill this Ancient Fire Tiger! The Ancient Fire Tiger felt its hair stand on end, and a chill ran down its spine! In the next moment, the originally tall and mighty Ancient Fire Tiger suddenly split into nine, and became an nineAncient Fire Tiger again! Lu Chen’s seven arrows hit one at the same time and its HP was instantly reduced to zero! The Ancient Ash Wolf King killed one with its claw and another one with its mighty bite! The three Fire Tigers HP was reduced to zero! However, in the next moment, the three Ancient Fire Tigers actually stood up once again! Then, the HP of each Fire Tiger decreased once again. Lu Chen immediately understood that regardless of whether it was his or the Ash Wolf King’s attacks, they could only kill the Fire Tiger that was currently being attacked. Once it escapes the attack, other Fire Tigers would absorb the HP of the attacked Fire Tiger and reappear. This kind of skill was very similar to the situation between him and the Ash Wolf King. However, Lu Chen did not stop at all. He shot out another seven arrows! This time, the Ancient Fire Tigers finally reacted. They merged together again and shot out fireballs consecutively! However, in order to offset Lu Chen’s arrows, they needed more than ten fireballs! This arrow was only enough for the Ancient Fire Tiger to shoot out five or six more attacks. This time, more than half of the arrows landed on the Ancient Fire Tiger. The Ancient Fire Tiger only had less than one-third of its HP left from this hit! The Ancient Fire Tiger was shocked and furious. It directly charged at the Ancient Ash Wolf King without hesitation! [Ash Wolf’s Fury: The ancient Ash Wolf King awakens the sleeping bloodline in its body, greatly increasing its own attributes, and has a chance to obtain an additional skill!] At this moment, the Ancient Ash Wolf King had already activated its wrath of the Ash Wolf’s Fury, increasing its attributes once again! Then, it activated its Moonlight’s Blessing. [Moonlight’s Blessing: Under the moonlight, all attributes increase by 50%.] The Ancient Ash Wolf howled at the moon, causing 8,000 magic damage per second to enemies under the moonlight for 50 seconds! This also dealt significant damage to the Ancient Fire Tiger. Seeing the Ancient Fire Tiger charge forward, the Ancient Ash Wolf had prepared for such a move to occur. It immediately unleashed its strongest attack! Demonic Flame! However, this attack missed! Because at this moment, the Ancient Fire Tiger suddenly changed its direction, avoiding the attack and charged towards Lu Chen! It was a diversion! This Ancient Fire Tiger not only had extremely high combat strength, it was smart as well! At this moment, the Ancient Ash Wolf King had no time to stop the charging attack! However, this also caught Lu Chen somewhat unprepared! The Ancient Ash Wolf King was anxious, and directly released its other skill Frost Domain! [Frost Domain: Creates a frost domain, slowing down the enemy’s attack speed and casting speed by 50%.] Once this domain was activated, the Fire Tiger’s speed instantly decreased by half! Lu Chen did not dare to hesitate and directly took out an arrow! [Shattered Stars: You can shoot a powerful arrow that ignores all the defense of the target, and it will definitely land a critical hit, causing 10 times the penetrating damage!] This arrow was enough to deal over 400,000 damage in one go! The Ancient Fire Tiger, who was slowed down, definitely had no chance to dodge now! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation This Shattered Stars skill carried a terrifying aura as it shot straight towards the Fire Tiger! The power of this arrow caused the surrounding air to continuously distort around it! The Fire Tiger was unable to dodge in time. It could only continuously spit out fireballs from its mouth as a counterattack. However, the Frost Domain had a huge impact on the Fire Tiger’s attack speed. The last time Lu Chen used the Seven Star Succession, the Ancient Fire Tiger had only spat out six fireballs. Now, at such a close distance, after passing through the Ancient Ash Wolf King’s Frost Domain, it could not. -400,000! A shocking red number appeared above the Fire Tiger’s head. With a world-shaking explosion, the Ancient Fire Tiger was killed by Lu Chen’s attack! Liu Yang and the others were stupefied! After all, they had a total of six players. Facing an ordinary Fire Tiger, they had to use all of their abilities to deal only a little damage. However, when Lu Chen was facing a silver boss — not just nine bosses — but a boss with doubled attributes, he could still defeat the enemy in one move. As expected, some people could defeat things even in their sleep. As expected of the only and only Morning Mist! Looking at the equipment dropped by this Ancient Fire Tiger, everyone was even more dumbfounded. If the equipment that Lan Weiwei had dropped from killing monsters had made Liu Yang and the other six jealous, then the equipment that had dropped from this boss was truly amazing. However, when they saw the equipment that this boss dropped, their eyes turned green with envy. If they were given this equipment, their strength would at least be threefold. Other than the silver boss, they could kill the rest of the monsters as they pleased! However, facing so many pieces of equipment, they did not even have the thought of snatching it. They knew that if they dared to make a move, they would meet a fate far worse than this Ancient Fire Tiger. They vaguely remembered the fear of the 10,000 members of the White Alliance being destroyed by Morning Mist. However, Lu Chen was not in the mood to check his equipment because the Ancient Ash Wolf King let out a sad cry and fell to the ground. Even the aura of the wolf was declining rapidly. Lu Chen quickly checked the interface of the Ancient Ash Wolf King. [Ancient Ash Wolf King] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Lan Weiwei] [Intimacy: 180] [Level: 37] [Attack: 32,000 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wol, increases by 50% with moonlight buff, increases by 50%)] [HP: 35,619 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff)] [Defense: 1,500 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff)] [Magic Defense: 1,600 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff)] [Skills: Demonic Flame, Frost Domain, True Form Transformation, Ash Wolf’s Fury, Moonlight’s Blessing, Soul Tracking] [Demonic Flame: The Ancient Ash Wolf King spits out terrifying demonic flames, causing 18,000 physical and magic damage per second to the enemy in front of it.] [Frost Domain: Creates a frost domain, slowing down the enemy’s attack speed and casting speed by 50%.] [True Form Transformation: When transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf King, all attributes increase by 50%.] [Ash Wolf’s Fury: The Ancient Ash Wolf King awakens the sleeping bloodline in its body, greatly increasing its own attributes, and has a chance to obtain an additional skill!] [Moonlight’s Blessing: Under the moonlight, all attributes increase by 50%.] [Soul Tracking: When this skill is used, it can leave a mark deep within the target’s soul. It can track up to three people. The mark will remain for three months. This skill can be shared with the owner.] [Ash Wolf’s Howl: The exclusive skill of the Ancient Ash Wolf. It will have a different effect as the bloodline awakens. When the Ash Wolf howls at the moon, it will deal 12,000 magic damage per second to enemies under the moonlight for 60 second!] After experiencing this battle, Lan Weiwei’s level had risen by 4 levels. Her combat power, defense, and others had all received a huge increase. Even the Ash Wolf’s Howl skill, whether it was the damage points or the duration, had increased. It was definitely a good sign to work towards! Oddly enough, her HP seemed to be constantly decreasing! -5,000! -5,000! -5,000! Every second, her HP decreased by 5,000. By the time Lu Chen checked on Lan Weiwei’s condition, Lan Weiwei’s HP had decreased by another 15,000. She only had around 20,000 HP left. If not for the Moonlight’s Blessing, she would have died long ago. Lu Chen instantly understood that Lan Weiwei had accidentally touched the flames on the Ancient Fire Tiger’s body and that was why her HP kept dropping! Based on Lan Weiwei’s current injuries, she would lose all her HP in less than a minute. Moreover, this condition would even affect him through the pet contract, causing his HP to drop as well. At this moment, Lu Chen was at a loss. He watched as Lan Weiwei’s health bar decreased bit by bit. However, Lan Weiwei looked at Lu Chen without a trace of resentment in her eyes. There was only reluctance in her eyes. If she was just an ignorant young girl before this, then at this moment of near death, the young girl’s heart had finally awakened. At this moment, a voice sounded in Lu Chen’s ear. A golden title appeared above his head again! [Your medical proficiency has been raised to the highest level. You have obtained the title — Medicine God!] [Medicine God: Your understanding of medical skills has reached an unfathomable level. When you use medical skills, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow along with your level!] [Negative Elimination: When you use the Medicine God title, you will be immune to all negative effects of your own body. When you use medical skills on others, there is a 90% chance of helping others to be immune to all negative effects!] [Herb Bonus: When you plant herbs, the growth rate of the herbs will be 20 times faster than the original speed. The medicinal effects of the herbs will be increased tenfold!] [Continuous Healing: The effect of your healing is outstanding. When you use your skills, you can cast a continuous healing on yourself. The healing time is 30 seconds. The healing effect is to recover 2% to 30% of your HP every second! When you use it on others, the effect will be reduced by half.] This title was definitely very useful! Previously, other than the title of Undead, all the other titles were used to increase combat power. However, the effect of the Undead title was only to increase the probability of not dying. However, this title, Medicine God, could definitely increase his combat power by a lot. After all, this was equivalent to having a mobile HP buff. Once he uses it, he would be able to constantly recover his HP. Especially the first skill, Negative Elimination, which could heal his teammates at any time. Right now, he was basically a high-attack, high-defense assassin with medical support! He could practically be omnipotent at this point! This was undoubtedly a great thing! However, now was not the time to be in awe at this new found title.. At this moment, Lan Weiwei only had a little bit of HP left! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lan Weiwei’s HP continued to drop. -5,000! -5,000! -5,000! -5,000! Four seconds later, Lan Weiwei’s original 300,000 HP in her true form was now only left with over 1,000 HP! She was in grave danger! Lu Chen did not dare delay things any longer. With a thought, a golden title appeared above his head. “Medicine God!” Following that, a Negative Elimination was cast on Lan Weiwei. In the next moment, a green light shot out from Lu Chen’s hand and enveloped Lan Weiwei’s entire body. The flame that was faintly attached to her body disappeared in an instant. Lan Weiwei’s HP finally stopped decreasing! Then, Lu Chen once again cast a skill — Continuous Healing! [Continuous Healing: The effect of your healing is outstanding. When you use your skills, you can cast a continuous healing on yourself. The healing time is 30 seconds. The healing effect is to recover 2% to 30% of your HP every second! When you use it on others, the effect will be reduced by half.] At this moment, an even brighter green light entered Lan Weiwei’s body again. +22,500! Lan Weiwei’s HP immediately increased by 22,500 points! 15% of her own HP recovered! +1,500! +7,500! … Lan Weiwei’s HP recovered at a speedy pace. Her complexion and condition were also rapidly improving! The scene before their eyes once again exceeded the understanding of Liu Yang and the others! Was everyone playing the same game? Could it be that she was playing a fake Second World game?! In less than ten seconds, Lan Weiwei’s condition had almost completely recovered. Lu Chen helped her up, and the two of them looked at the equipment dropped by the Ancient Fire Tiger together. [Demonic Flame Incineration] [When you use a bow-type weapon, all your attacks will have the demonic flame incineration effect. It will cause the enemy to continuously lose health for three seconds, which is equivalent to receiving three times the damage.] [Note: This skill has the effect of both physical and magic attacks!] This skill was the same as the Ancient Fire Tiger used on Lan Weiwei, only the duration was shorter. However, when the Ancient Fire Tiger used this skill, opponents would only lose 9,000 HP every second. However, Lu Chen’s attack power was several times higher than that. Therefore, it was still considered a win! In addition, when he used Shattered Stars, it will now have the additional effect of demonic flame. That was equivalent to a full 30 times of his attack power! If he were to face this Ancient Fire Tiger again, Lu Chen would directly beat in an instant! One had to know that the Shattered Stars skill ignored the defenses of opponents. The damage that it dealt would all be considered true damage! If he had attacked Xiao Bai back then, this arrow would have taken care of him in a blink of an eye! Not to mention running away, he would not even be able to leave any remnants of bones behind. Lu Chen was a little excited as he looked at the equipment that had dropped. [Congratulations, you have killed the nine silber bosses. You have received a reward of 9,000 gold coins!] Both Lu Chen and Liu Yang loved this reward! To Liu Yang, this was a total of 90 million dollars! If he went out, he could be considered a rich man in a big city. If it was a small town, he would definitely be the richest! If Liu Yang received this 9,000 gold coins, he would directly exchange it for money! He would not need to play the game anymore. He would just buy 30 apartments and collect rent every day! When Lu Chen saw the gold coins, his burden lightened. As the City Lord, many ordinary players said that he was extremely greedy. However, only he knew what he truly had to do! Every morning when he opens his eyes, tens of thousands of craftsmen, farmers, and all kinds of craftsmen come to him for support. God knows what would happen if his White Fog City ran out of money! Although this 5,000 gold coins was not too much, it was not enough either. With a sigh, Lu Chen looked at the last treasure that dropped. This item looked a bit strange. It was actually a drop of milky white liquid that was floating in the air. It was constantly emitted a mysterious aura, and within the round drop of liquid, there was a faint roar of an illusory white tiger! [White Tiger Soul Essence: Contains a trace of the ancient Divine Beast White Tiger’s bloodline, can be consumed by tiger creatures. After consuming it, it can increase one’s own training. [Special Effect: Once consumed, it can improve one’s physique. In future training, one can have the possibility of evolving into a Divine Beast White Tiger.] This was a bountiful battle! Seeing this, even Lan Weiwei could not help but praise the items. After all, Lan Weiwei had gone through such a tough battle to defeat the Ancient Ash Wolf King and obtain the ancestral bloodline. However, if it was a tiger creature that obtained this White Tiger Soul Essence, it could gradually awaken the White Tiger bloodline, and its future cultivation speed would be far beyond imagination. Otherwise, these nine Ancient Fire Tigers would not have been so powerful. Right as Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei were about to put away the drop of White Tiger Essence, a chubby, furry hand suddenly reached out. It snatched the drop of White Tiger Essence away. Lu Chen turned his head and saw that the person who snatched the drop of White Tiger Essence was Rollie. Before anyone could react, Rollie swallowed the drop of White Tiger Essence in one gulp. Rollie moved as fast as lightning. Before anyone could react, not only did he eat the White Tiger Essence, he even burped like a champion. Lu Chen’s heart ached. The White Tiger Essence was eaten by Rollie just like that. He was worried that the White Tiger’s attributes were incompatible with Rollie as he was a panda. Even level Lan Weiwei dared not to devour it so easily. Would there be any side effects from Rollie eating it? However, reality proved that they were overthinking things. As Rollie ate the White Tiger Essence, a golden title lit up on Rollie’s head once again. Luck Bonus! [The Ancient Panda has activated the Luck Bonus skill. The White Tiger Soul Essence has been transformed into the Ancient Iron Beast Soul Essence!] [The Ancient Panda Rollie has obtained an Ancient Iron Beast Soul Essence. The Ancient Iron Beast bloodline in his body is gradually awakening. There is a certain chance for him to obtain a new skill!] When Liu Yang and the others saw this scene, their jaws almost dropped to the ground. “The f*ck, this works too?” “That’s not right, this doesn’t make sense!” “Is there something wrong with your brain? Are you trying to apply scientific explanations in the Second World?” “What you said makes sense. I can’t refute it, but why do I feel that something is wrong?” “I thought that Morning Mist was of a different plane, but now it seems that this giant panda is way above him!” “You id*ot, look carefully at the panda’s information panel.” “Holy f*ck! This Ancient Panda’s information panel has changed again. How did his combat power increase again? Why is he so much higher than us now?!” As soon as he said that, everyone immediately looked at Rollie’s information panel. [Ancient Panda] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Rollie] [Intimacy: 130] [Level: 15] [Attack: 2,500] [HP: 120,000] [Defense: 20,000] [Magic Defense: 20,000] [Skill: Luck Bonus] [Luck Bonus: With Heaven’s blessing, there is a high chance of avoiding disaster, turning a bad situation into a good one, and averting a disaster! Provides a Luck buff for 60 seconds.. Has a certain chance to be immune to all negative effects and damage.] <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Everyone was shocked when they saw Rollie’s transformation. Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei had fought for so long, but why did it feel like Rollie was the one who had improved the most? Was the world this unfair? Apart from eating bamboo shoots, gnawing on bamboo, and catching little frogs, this little fellow had leveled up just like that. Was there any justice in this world? At the same time, a few players who had not been paying close attention to Rollie’s information panel finally noticed something strange. “No way, no way? This Ancient Panda is like Lan Weiwei, both of them are Morning Mist’s pets?” “Where did Morning Mist get so many top-tier pets? I want one too.” “Who doesn’t want them, they’re so special!” “Look at you guys. You guys only want ordinary pets? I’m different from you guys. My dream is to be Morning Mist’s pet!” “You’re amazing! You have an impossible dream!” “This is ridiculous. I never thought that I would be jealous of a panda one day.” “The world has changed. People either want to be other people’s pets or have lame pets.” At this point, they all looked at Lu Chen with different emotions in their eyes. It made Lu Chen’s hair stand on end. Liu Yang realized that after a short period of time, Lu Chen’s attributes had all been maxed out under the blessing of his title Medicine God. However, Liu Yang and the others were already numb to such things. In less than a day, everything that Lu Chen had done was a godly skill in their eyes. At this moment, the improvements that Lu Chen had obtained in this battle were finally revealed. [Name: Morning Mist] [Level: 35] [Class: Sword Saint (now able to change class to War God)] [Titles: Sword God (hidden), Shield God (hidden), Ax God (hidden), Blade God (hidden), All-rounded master (hidden)] [Vitality: 6,800] [Strength: 6,356] [Agility: 5,381] [Intelligence: 4,612] [HP: 63,030] [MP: 66,000] [Attack: 68,860] [Attack Speed: 29] [Defense: 4,250] [Magic Defense: 2,500] [Reputation: 3,010] Lu Chen had definitely made a huge profit from this. Among the information on the interface, other than the small increase in reputation points, the rest had increased by a lot. Especially more so for his attack power, which had increased by almost half, to over 20,000 points. All of his stats had also increased by 10% to 50%. Moreover, his level had also increased by 5 levels. It should be known that the further one leveled up, the harder it would be. Lu Chen’s 5 level increase far surpassed Liu Yang and the others. Going to Tiger Mountain and battling the boss was truly worth it. Lu Chen, Lan Weiwei, and Rollie — the two of them and one beast — had gained great advancements. Moreover, their skills had also been further improved. Lu Chen noticed that Rollie’s Luck bonus increased its ability to turn misfortune into good luck. This was a new characteristic that he had obtained after obtaining the Ancient Iron Beast bloodline. Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei looked at each other with eyes filled with joy. For a moment, the atmosphere actually felt a little different. “Morning Mist, you’re really…” Just when the atmosphere on Lu Chen’s side started to turn chipper, a discordant voice suddenly interrupted them. Lan Weiwei’s heart was filled with displeasure. Her gaze was ice-cold when she heard it. She turned her head and stared at Liu Yang. “What are you doing?” Liu Yang shivered when she asked. This big-eyed girl in front of him actually looked menacing. He quickly turned his eyes to Lu Chen and said, “I’ve recorded everything that happened to Morning Mist. I want to put this video into my live broadcast account. Want to take a look?” Lu Chen weighed the 9,000 gold coins in his hand and thought to himself, “It’s too slow to earn money just by fighting monsters and leveling up. If I can put my battle video online and let everyone reward me, I’m sure my income will increase.” Most importantly, although the reputation value was not useful right now, Lu Chen felt that this was likely to be more important than gold coins in the future. He said to Liu Yang, “Sure, but how do we split the reward?” Liu Yang never expected Lu Chen to agree so easily. He waved his hands excitedly and said, “Morning Mist, I don’t want a single cent of this money. All the income belongs to you!” Although Liu Yang was only a junior high school student and was a noob in the Second World, he was able to gather five people to fight monsters with him on the mountain. Moreover, he had been with Lu Chen for so long without being despised, there was definitely something unique about him. He knew very well that to be able to obtain the exclusive battle video of the one and only Morning Mist, especially at such a close distance, it was definitely the only one in the world in terms of rarity. One had to know that the video of Morning Mist’s battle in the past was never this close range. Moreover, that kind of trash video quality was almost completely grainy. One could imagine how much of a reaction the world would elicit when this video gets released. Nothing could be compared to being able to be by the side of Morning Mist’s battles though! Just by standing by his side and gaining experience points, he had been able to level up so quickly. This was a benefit that many people could never dream of. Was this not just a cheaper version of a contracted pet?! Lu Chen shook his head slightly. Although this battle video was his, if Liu Yang really operated the entire short video account, he would probably have to expend a lot of energy. It was fine if it happened once or twice, but if it went on like this, the other party might be dissatisfied. So, it was better to settle the score now. “How about this, let’s split it with a ratio of 9 to 1. Do you have any objections?” Liu Yang was ecstatic. He had no objections. This 10% was at least a few hundred thousand! “Thank you, Morning Mist!” Liu Yang’s actions made the other five extremely envious. He even graciously hugged onto Morning Mist’s thigh! Who was Morning Mist, should someone ask? Well, he was the most powerful person in the entire Second World. No one could surpass him. The other players could not let Liu Yang monopolize such a good thing. They quickly rushed over to express their stance, “Morning Mist, we too want to follow you. We have video accounts that can post your videos too!” Lu Chen shook his head, “Only Liu Yang alone can release the video.” When he said this, the other five player’s faces were filled with disappointment. However, Lu Chen’s next sentence rekindled their hope, “Your level is not low anymore. If you still want to follow me, you can go to White Fog City and report to Hade. Just say that I sent you all and gave you all permission.” They asked curiously, “Morning Mist, aren’t you going back to White Fog City?” Lu Chen smiled. “Aren’t there still three silver boss territories that haven’t been cleared yet? I’m planning to go to the other three places and clear them all together!” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation When Lu Chen said that he was going to farm the other three silver bosses, Liu Yang and the others had mixed feelings. Liu Yang was thinking that he might never be able to achieve Morning Mist’s leveling speed in his entire life. However, the other five beated their chests and stomped their feet in their hearts. Why could they not be as shameless as Liu Yang? If they could, they could have possibly been the one to follow him! However, Morning Mist had also arranged a good deal for them. It was already very difficult for ordinary people to become Swordsmen, but they were actually able to directly acknowledge Hade as their master. This was something that they had never dared to hope for. At the same time, Liu Yang had already uploaded the video of Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei fighting the nine tigers. As the fusion between the Second World and the main world slowly merged, players could now use their phones in the Second World, so this video was immediately seen by countless citizens. The enthusiasm of all the citizens were instantly ignited. “Damn, why is Morning Mist starting to clear dungeons again?” “I’m really annoyed. While Morning Mist is frantically grinding monsters over there, I’ve queued up for an entire day, but I still haven’t changed my class.” “Have you guys noticed that Morning Mist has already changed his class, but the person he changed his class to is actually a Sword Saint!” “What? He’s actually a Sword Saint! As far as I know, we can only change our class to become Swordsmen. Above swordsmen is sword soul, and above sword soul is sword Saint!” “Isn’t that right? There are already thousands of players who have already changed their class. As far as I know, there are only three or five people who have become Sword Souls. They’re the direct descendants of the Dragon Team and those from the big families!” “You’re being much too arrogant. It’s one thing for Morning Mist to harvest our gains, but he doesn’t need to personally take charge of them. Comparing different people from different classes would just infuriate us more.” “Don’t spout nonsense. I heard from Hade just now that all the expenses in the city are provided by Morning Mist. It’s said that this bit of income can’t make up for the expenses of the whole of White Fog City.” “If it weren’t for Morning Mist, do you think we would still have a chance to change classes now?” “No way, I didn’t know he had to do so much.” “If the great Morning Mist was really a greedy person, wouldn’t he have sold the teleportation scrolls back then? You should know that the highest price was a few billion each, and the three scrolls in his hands could become three to five billion dollars!” “That makes sense. Alright, stop talking. Hurry up and watch the video. I saw a few tigers on Tiger Mountain just now, and they were all silver bosses!” “There are only three Fire Tigers I see on screen right now, so it’s not that bad. But this silver-haired girl is really powerful. She’s actually able to fend off three silver bosses by herself.” “Silver-haired girl! You probably didn’t watch the battle video from a few days ago, right?” “What video? I don’t think I did. I’ve been in the game pod every day for the past month. Once I return to the main world, other than eating and going to the toilet, I’ll hurry back and farm more monsters.” “The silver-haired girl you’re talking about isn’t a player of our game. She’s the Ancient Ash Wolf from Wolf Valley. She was originally on the same level as the silver bosses from Tiger Mountain. Later on, she followed Morning Mist and became the Ancient Ash Wolf King. Wouldn’t she have an easy time fighting these three?” When everyone saw that Lan Weiwei was not at a disadvantage fighting the three Fire Tigers, they got more excited. When Lan Weiwei suppressed the three silver-tier Ancient Fire Tigers, everyone cheered on. They were even happier than when they themselves defeated a boss. In an instant, everyone’s reaction was the same as Liu Yang and the others. “I also want a pet like Lan Weiwei. I can go to the battlefield during the day, drop her off, and go to bed.” “Hey, you’re thinking too much. Lan Weiwei is the Ancient Ash Wolf that Morning Mist got. You probably have to work hard to even kill a level 5 Wild Dog. Don’t tell me you want to rely on a Wild Dog to do your bidding?” “If I have a pet like Lan Weiwei, I’ll follow her, let her fight monsters, and level up myself.” Just as everyone was envious of Lu Chen having a pet like Lan Weiwei, the other six Ancient Fire Tigers suddenly jumped out. When the others saw that nine tigers actually came from an Ancient Fire Tiger...; Everyone was shocked. The pressure that this Ancient Fire Tiger gave off made people shudder through their phone screens. “Isn’t he amazing? I feel that he’s much stronger than an ordinary silver boss. He’s even stronger than the Ancient Ash Wolf.” “I remembered that the White Alliance wanted to attack the Tiger Mountain boss back then. Now that I think about it, even if Morning Mist didn’t destroy the White Alliance back then, they would’ve still died to the Tiger Mountain bosses.” “Yeah, I’m sure they’d do badly.” “D*mn, this Ancient Fire Tiger’s combat power is way too strong. Especially since the flames on its body can last for 360 seconds. If it were me, I’d definitely die.” “Let alone 360 seconds, I can’t even last a second with an attack of 9,000 points.” “That’s so scary. Last time, I wanted to find a few friends to farm a silver boss. Now, it seems that no matter how many players go, we’ll just be sending these players on a silver platter to the boss.” “The Bow God title has appeared again. He even shot seven arrows in one go. His combat power is too strong.” “I’m so jealous, I want to fight monsters with Morning Mist as well.” “Me too. I’m so desperate that I’d be happy to even become one of Morning Mist’s leg hairs!” “This silver boss was killed by Morning Mist. F*ck, he died in just one hit!” When Lu Chen used Shattered Stars to kill the Ancient Fire Tiger, the entire place went into an uproar. Morning Mist being able to kill a silver-tier lord from Bear Ridge was already very impressive. However, this battle had once again refreshed their understanding of Morning Mist. As everyone wanted to see just how many benefits Morning Mist would receive and how many pieces of equipment he would drop, the video suddenly came to an end. This scene greatly disappointed many players. It was obvious that the next moment would be the best. It made their hearts itch in wanting to know more. “Who the h*ll recorded this video without showing its end? Does he even know how to make a video?” “Exactly who recorded it. If anyone has any clues, let me know. I’ll give them 10 gold coins for the end of the video!” “I too want to know who recorded it! Also, I want to know if he still needs people to record the video. I’m a cameraman in the main world...;” “Who the h*ll recorded this? This video is getting too popular. I’ll give them 200 gold coins for the ending!” “So what if you give them 200 gold coins? If I give them 5,000 gold coins, wouldn’t that be insulting Morning Mist?” “I want to support Morning Mist as well. All of you, pay up! If you don’t, you’re not from the Dragon Country!” As soon as these words were said, in an instant, hundreds of thousands of other players shouted! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation [Entertaining Dinosaur would reward a sports car for the end of this video!] [Romantic Zhang would reward a carnival date for the end of this video!] [Little Flame would reward a plane for the end of this video!] [Xu family’s young master would reward 88 rockets for the end of this video!] [Gu family’s young master would reward 100 rockets for the end of this video!] Instantly, countless gift rewards appeared on the comment section of the video. When the 100 rockets appeared, it made those who were originally streamers in the main world extremely envious. However, everyone knew who the Xu family’s and Gu family’s young masters were. It was definitely Xu Ziyuan and Gu Yiming. These two naturally understood that this battle video must have been posted with Lu Chen’s acquiescence. Otherwise, how could there be such a close-up view of the battle? Moreover, there were several times when the person who was recording the battle was clearly less than 10 meters away from Lu Chen. Liu Yang’s livestream room had only uploaded the battle video for less than half an hour. There were already 400,000 to 500,000 dollars worth of gifts that poured in. This made Liu Yang extremely happy. According to the 50 to 50 split platform rule, the current video alone could earn him more than 200,000 dollars. This was only the beginning to becoming rich. What made him even happier was that the video broadcasting platform immediately contacted him. The higher-ups of the video broadcasting platform personally made a call, indicating that from now on, the hosting platform would no longer take a cut of all the videos sent out by this account. All the income would be given to the streamer himself. Liu Yang proudly said to the other five people, “I knew it. There are so many rich people online. How could there be someone who would casually give us a reward to farm money? “Fortunately, I had the foresight to ask you guys to take the initiative to give us money in the comments section. This way, we would definitely earn more!” Liu Yang’s friends saw him like this and their faces darkened. This was clearly the most basic trick to getting cash. Why did he feel like he had made a great contribution after using it? However, it had to be said that this trick really worked. When the players saw that someone took the initiative to give money, they also followed suit to give gifts and rewards. As for the money that these patreons tipped, Liu Yang would double it from his own income and return it to them. Therefore, for a time, they were very motivated to tip, and the amount he gained just kept increasing. Lu Chen looked at their actions and felt a little embarrassed. Why did this make him feel like a certain vigilante with a green hood? Fortunately, Lu Chen’s video also taught everyone a lot of battle knowledge and how to analyze monsters. It was very beneficial for players who wanted to farm monsters. Therefore, the benefits gained from the players were worth it. It was a win-win situation. … In the meeting room, many senior leaders and experts of the Dragon Country were studying the video carefully. After the first elder of the Dragon Group watched the video, he pondered for a moment before he spoke. “I have studied these monsters in the Second World for a long time. “After my analysis, I found that these beasts are much stronger than humans. “Their innate physical fitness is stronger than humans. “The only advantage humans have is their fast leveling speed and high IQ. This is also our magic weapon against the enemy. “It should be known that whether it’s Lan Weiwei who is by Lu Chen’s side or the Ancient Fire Tiger in front of us, both of them have been cultivating for at least several thousand years. “Setting aside Lu Chen, for example, existences like Xiao Bai and I can only reach that level of strength within several decades or even a hundred years.” The other experts nodded slightly. Their strength was far from being as powerful as Lu Chen and the first elder. Many of them had even obtained their strength through various fortuitous encounters after entering the Second World. Therefore, when they saw that the silver boss Lu Chen was facing — the Ancient Fire Tiger — was actually so powerful, their hearts were pounded. If silver bosses were all such existences, then they would not be able to defeat them no matter what. The first elder of the Dragon Group pointed at a corner of the screen and continued on with his thoughts. “Look carefully at this angle. It seems that the cameraman intentionally missed it, trying to cover it up. “But if we look carefully, there is a faint red minus sign there. “If I’m not wrong, it should be the Ancient Ash Wolf King that is continuously losing HP. “The demonic flame skill on the Ancient Fire Tiger in the video just now was activated. This means that the fireball that was spat out from their mouth, touched the Ancient Ash Wolf. “No matter how fast the Ancient Ash Wolf King moves, it would still be unable to avoid being hit. “Ever since the Ancient Ash Wolf King was hit by the fireballs, I had been calculating the time in my mind. If I guessed correctly, the Ancient Ash Wolf King’s HP would definitely be reduced to zero! There is no chance of survival. “I told the members of the Dragon Team that the next time they met Lu Chen, they would have to observe the Ancient Ash Wolf King beside him.” “Oh, right, her current name is Lan Weiwei. We were told to observe her physical condition. If she’s fully recovered, it means that Lu Chen still has many secrets that we don’t know about. However, everyone must be careful. No matter what, don’t make an enemy out of Lu Chen.” Once these words were said, all the other people nodded. In fact, even if the higher ups did not say anything, they would not dare to go and find trouble with Lu Chen. Especially the members of the Dragon Team who had just left the Second World, they were even more aware of Lu Chen’s terror. On the other hand, a beautiful woman in the Dragon Team had her head lowered and her two fingers crossed in circles. A small idea arose in her heart. ‘When Lu Chen returns, I must tell him what the higher ups of Dragon Country think of him so that he will be on guard. I can’t let all of Lu Chen’s trump cards be exposed.’ At this moment, she had completely forgotten that she was sent by the Dragon Team to monitor Lu Chen. If Liu Changping knew about this, he would definitely regret his decision of pushing them together. At this time, the third in charge — who had been sitting in the upper seat the whole time and had not said a word — finally spoke. He frowned slightly and with a wave of his hand, he spoke. “But there is something troubling me. I’m afraid that those ancient martial arts aristocratic families might not listen to us...;” “Moreover, Lu Chen has been gaining more attention these past few days. Those descendants of the ancient martial arts aristocratic families are proud and arrogant, so they would definitely look for someone like Lu Chen. “If someone really wanted to compete with Lu Chen, he might not even bother with them. “If there really were some blind people who were jealous and wanted to find trouble, then this would become a bit troublesome for us.” Thinking of those people from the ancient martial arts aristocratic families, the first elder could not help but frown. He took a deep breath. “I can’t be bothered about it right now. I just hope that those people won’t cause trouble for no reason. “Those young masters probably would not have much effect on Lu Chen. However, if it really did come down to some elites or even elders from the ancient martial arts aristocratic families who made a move…” His voice paused for a moment, then, he seemed to have made an extremely difficult decision before speaking. “Lu Chen is the hope and prosperity of our entire Dragon Country. No matter which ancient martial arts clan it is, as long as they dare interfere with Lu Chen’s progress, even if our Dragon Country turns hostile, we must protect Lu Chen!” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation When he said that he wanted to protect Lu Chen, everyone in the meeting room was shocked. He had mentioned this before. Not just the ordinary high-level officials of the Dragon Country, even the third in command chief had said this before. However, everyone knew that the first elder’s words carried more weight than anyone else’s. The third in command chief could command the entire conference room and all the high-level officials of the Dragon Country, he could even make extremely important decisions for some countries. Even if he had to launch some small-scale wars against foreign countries, he could still make the decision on his own. However, the identity of the first elder was placed on a higher pedestal. His importance was reflected in the fact that he had a veto power when he attended the top-level meetings of the country. More importantly, he had an extremely large number of ancient martial arts special forces under his command. Every member of his army was at least at the heaven rank! The vast majority of the members of this group had entered the ruins to explore when the country had just learned of the existence of the Second World. The remaining few of them were still on some special missions and were unable to rush back in time. Otherwise, Lu Chen would not have been needed to wipe out the Xiao family back then. The elder was precisely the reason why the Dragon Country was able to suppress all the ordinary aristocratic families. He was the guardian of the Dragon Country. At this moment, the first elder continued, “Recently, I’ve conducted some analysis of the Second World. “I’ve gotten a few of my subordinates to carry out some experiments. They used a secret technique to seal their own cultivation when they entered the Second World. “After that, when they entered the Second World to reveal their full strength, their level in the Second World would soar.” “This is extremely good news in our case. “However, I’m afraid that the other countries have already discovered this from Xiao Bai’s situation. The battle situation in the Second World has now become more confusing. “This has brought us great danger, but this is also where our opportunity lies.” Due to various reasons, none of the first elder’s soldiers entered the Second World. Originally, he was worried that he had missed the opportunity. He did not expect that he would actually benefit from this misfortune and have the opportunity to overtake the first elder. One had to know that if they entered normally, everyone would start at level one. Even if there was some difference in physical fitness, there was practically no difference once they entered the game. However, things could be different now. If these warriors sealed their cultivation and entered the game, then revealed their full strength, their levels would probably increase to at least level 20 and above. In the Second World, many players had high combat strength. Moreover, the first elder was not just a theorist. There were already warriors under nameless organizations who had become high-level players. At this moment, they were farming the Snake Pond. … “The f*ck, captain, why are there snakes everywhere? Even Wolf Valley and Bear Ridge weren’t this exaggerated, right?” The person in front of them was the first elder’s subordinate, Zhang Ming. Originally, he had been a heaven-ranked expert in the main world. After entering the Second World and displaying his strength, he had directly risen to level 21. His combat power was even comparable to that of the first world. The other people were the same. The highest level captain had already reached level 28. This meant that the fusion between the Second World and the real world was accelerating. The captain, Li Xiaotian, quickly cut down the five level 11 snakes that flew towards him. He did not bother wiping the sweat off his head. He only panted heavily as he spoke up, “Asking me this question will give you no answer. “If it wasn’t for the fact that Lu Chen had to destroy both Wolf Valley and Bear Ridge, we wouldn’t have come here! “Fortunately, we have snake repellent powder. Otherwise, these snakes would have overwhelmed us.” As far as they could see, there were tangled vines wrapped around the trees. These snakes were hidden among them. They were almost the same color as the trees. As long as they did not move, no one would be able to notice them. Moreover, their attack speed was very fast, leaving less than a second for people to react. Most importantly, the snake’s poison was extremely strong. If an ordinary snake bit a player, it would consume 100 HP every second for five minutes. Who could withstand the consumption of 3,000 HP in a go? An ordinary player would not be able to withstand such damage. If it was a beginner player, they would immediately return to the Novice Village. After all, they would have only encountered a basic snake. They were only at the outermost layer of the Snake Pond. If it was not for the fact that the party members were of high levels and were top-notch warriors in the real world, they would have died the moment they entered the Snake Pond. As the top-notch warriors of the Dragon Country, they definitely had sufficient funds to level up comfortably. When they entered the Second World, they had large amounts of gold coins and bought quite a few high-end equipment and weapons. There were already ten antidotes on their backs. However, when now faced with the densely packed snakes everywhere, they felt that they had not bought enough equipment. If there was any weakness of these snakes, it would be that their intelligence was extremely low and their defense was also very weak. “Ah!” The captain spat on the ground and said fiercely, “I saw the video that was released today. That Lu Chen is indeed quite powerful. He was able to solo kill three bosses. He’s a ruthless person. “But I’m still not convinced! I’ve been on the battlefield for 10 years. Through the rain and storm, I’ve been through icy mountains and seas of fire. What kind of dangerous situation have I not seen? What kind of powerful enemy have I not killed? “Our party has been cooperating with each other for so many years. I don’t believe that we can’t be compared to that guy, Lu Chen! No matter how powerful Lu Chen is, he’s just a boorish man. “Plus his Ancient Ash Wolf King, there are only two of them. I don’t believe that we can’t be compared to them! “When they fought the Ancient Fire Tigers, their levels weren’t much higher than ours. “He was just an ordinary person who became an expert by luck. How could his battle experience be compared to ours? “A battle relies not only on strength, but also on brains and cooperation! “What could a kid like him know what that means! “Today, we’ll kill this big green snake in the Snake Pond. Let’s let everyone see that we’re the most awesome team in the entire Dragon Country! “Oh right, I heard that Xiao Bai’s status in the Western Castle has been soaring. If Lu Chen is targeted by the Western Castle, he will most likely die. “If Lu Chen is not satisfied with us, we will go to the Western Castle and kill that b*tch Xiao Bai ourselves! “We can be Lu Chen’s savior. When that time comes, we will see how he acts in front of us! Hahaha!” “Hear hear!” “Captain is right. We have to kill that br*t’s arrogance!” “To be honest, he doesn’t seem that bad. I think it would be good to recruit him into our squad!” “Hah, we’ll have to test him first!” Although they had been chatting and laughing, their movements did not stop as they slashed away at their enemies. -2,000! -2,400! -3,200! -1,800! A string of red numbers appeared when the monsters were hacked to death. In the blink of an eye, they had reached the center of the Snake Pond. At this time, Lu Chen and the others had just reached the edge of the Snake Pond. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei walked in front. Rollie played and ate as he rolled forward. Only Liu Yang had to run around. As he ran, he started the livestream with his phone and introduced it to everyone in detail. “Everyone, it’s time to take a closer look. The snake in my hand is called the short-tailed viper. “It’s a type of small poisonous snake. It’s the most widely distributed and most numerous type of poisonous snake around the entire Snake Pond. “Its attack power isn’t high, so killing this kind of snake won’t earn a lot of points. However, it is suitable for beginners to practice killing them first. “However, if you’re an advanced player, it’s not advisable to provoke this kind of snake. There are simply too many of them. Not only do they earn less, but they also frequently pounce and bite after being attacked, it’s a little difficult to deal with for the long run. “If I were to use my skills to kill this snake, it would be a waste of time.” Following which, Liu Yang turned his body and pointed at the camera that zoomed in on the top of the tree. He saw an extremely thin and small snake on the top of the tree. However, its color was particularly bright. It kept baring its fangs at him, at a glance, one could tell that it was a small snake with extremely high attack power. “Everyone, pay special attention to this snake. Can you see the green in its eyes? “It’s very green, right? Everyone, remember… The weirder the color, the faster you die! “Although you may not know, you must have heard of these snakes because they look like bamboo leaves. They often hang themselves around the branches of the trees. They especially like to live in the bushes near the cave. “And along the way, I don’t know if you have noticed, but you won’t be able to see it. Now that the sky has turned dark, they are active, circling around. “This is because they’re more active during rainy days. You can’t see them on a sunny day, and they’re the most active in the evening and at night. “When you come here, you must not light a fire, because these bamboo leaves looking snakes will jump at the fire, but if it’s a flashlight, then there’s no such problem. “You must pay attention to these points I’m talking about, don’t accidentally return to the Resurrection Point!” At this moment, in the live broadcast room, hundreds of thousands of people were watching Liu Yang’s live broadcast. Everyone was very interested in this new type of live broadcast. Not only was it interesting, but most importantly, it was equivalent to a real-time game guide. One had to know that this was not an ordinary game guide, but the live broadcast of Morning Mist! If it was someone else’s live broadcast, it might not have any reference value, but how could it be wrong to learn from Morning Mist? The only and only Morning Mist’s live stream was even more valuable than the Dragon Country’s official live stream! The comments shot like bullets in the live stream room as it frantically refreshed itself. [That’s strange. After entering the Snake Pond, why didn’t Morning Mist and Lan Weiwei fight the monsters around?] [You can’t use logic on Morning Mist! His level is much higher than ours. There’s no need to kill all these small monsters.] [What the streamer said was true, killing these tiny monsters is pointless.] [That’s right, can’t you see? Even those small snakes with low IQ were easily killed by Liu Yang and Rollie, even Lan Weiwei didn’t have to do anything.] [Right, right, right, the streamer was right. In just a short while, they killed hundreds of them.] [Haha, that’s right. The streamer’s level is too low. For Morning Mist, he could breathe on them and they’d probably die.] [I want him to breathe on me too! Liu Yang has already leveled up two to three levels in just a short while. He’s so lucky to be following Morning Mist to level up!] [Look at Rollie. He seems to be entangled by a large snake!] [Is he going to die? Please don’t let anything happen to him!] [I think you’re thinking too much. Morning Mist and Lan Weiwei aren’t taking it seriously at all.] Liu Yang saw that there was an argument happening in the comments section. He quickly aimed the camera at Rollie in the distance. He must garner their attention for the hot topic. Liu Yang kept pushing the focus of his phone to make the video on Rollie’s side clearer. “Everyone, the python in front of you is already an adult python. Look at him. He’s more than seven meters long. “Its level is already higher than Rollie. Although it’s not poisonous, its combat ability is very strong! “If it’s an ordinary venomous snake, even though you will continue to lose HP after taking a bite, as long as a serum is injected in time, you won’t respawn at the Resurrection Point. However, if you encounter a python. You have to run quickly. Otherwise, once you’re entangled. “It will be very difficult for you to break free. “However, everyone, you won’t have to worry about Rollie. I’ve been following Morning Mist for a day. “We discovered that basically no monsters would take the initiative to attack Rollie. Even if there were, they would die inexplicably. “Yesterday, when we came down from Tigers Mountain, a tiger tried to ambush Rollie. In the end, it slipped and fell off the cliff! “Rollie’s luck is heaven-defying, and his defense is extremely strong. He is definitely a lucky beast. “Let’s put it this way, even if something happens to me, nothing will happen to him.” While he was explaining, Rollroll had already opened his big mouth and taken a bite off the python’s body like he was biting onto a bamboo shoot. -8,000! -8,000! -8,000! -8,000! Liu Yang was shocked that every bite of Rollie’s could deal 8,000 damage! As he bit the python, the python’s nearly 40,000 HP was instantly destroyed! The players in the live broadcast room were just as shocked, [What the h*ll, isn’t this panda’s attack power at 2,500? How did he deal 8,000 damage?!] [I saw a 8,000 HO drop notification just now. Could it be a critical hit each time?] [This Ancient Panda’s luck is too heaven-defying. One or two critical hits is fine, but he actually managed to deal a critical hit every single time. Awesome, I’m impressed!!] [I’ve changed my mind. I don’t want Morning Mist to breathe on me. I want Rolie to breathe on me!] [Why is life so unfair? Even Morning Mist’s pets are awesome. It’s one thing if he has Lan Weiwei, but he actually has such a heaven-defying lucky bonus walking along with him!] They had no idea at all. They were not the only ones surprised by Rollie’s many critical hits. This was also the first time Lu Chen had seen it. Although Rollie had fought some ordinary monsters in the past, those that dared to provoke him were mostly low-level monsters with very low intelligence. Basically, Rollie could kill them with one attack. However, this giant python was a cold-blooded animal, so it did not have a strong sense of danger, nor could it sense or feel Rollie’s luck. To be exact, other than Lu Chen, Rollie was probably the second luckiest being. Of course, the outcome was also very tragic. On the other hand, other than losing a few hairs on its body, after killing the giant python, it spat out all of the snake’s blood in disgust.. Then, as if nothing had happened, it dug out the bamboo shoots and began to eat them again. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation However, some sharp-eyed people finally realized that the number of snakes here was not only incomparable to those in the previous silver-tier territories, but their numbers were also very small, occasionally, one could even see the bodies of the snakes that were about to disappear. Even Lu Chen realized that there were many players along the way. Many low-level players had already entered the deeper areas of the Snake Pond. Logically speaking, with their abilities, they could only wander outside the Snake Pond. Hence, if there were no accidents, there should be experts at farming the Snake Pond. That meant that they were a step too late. However...; As far as Lu Chen knew, no one had the ability to reach the deepest areas of the Snake Pond this quickly. Who were these people? … On the other side, the team under the first elder was making progress deeper in. The operation is codenamed Dragon Slayer. Although they knew that the silver boss that they were going to fight this time was only a snake, it was still one of the top-tier bosses. Becoming a dragon slayer was not an exaggeration. “Hou Zi, get ready. When everyone is in position, you will be in charge of luring the giant python out of the Snake Pond.” The person known as Hou Zi was a scout in the real world, responsible for observing and attracting enemies. “Qin Lie, have you reached the high point on the south side? Once the giant python appears, you must immediately shoot. Got it?” Qin Lie was currently dressed in disguised clothing. Although he had come to the Second World, his instincts as a sniper allowed him to put on this set of ugly but professional clothing. “No problem!” “Han Xiong, after Hou Zi lures the silver boss out, Hou Zi will immediately retreat. Therefore, for the giant python’s low attack, you must withstand the attacks with your shield. “As long as you can knock him out with this one hit, we will be able to kill this silver boss.” Han Xiong was originally the heavy machine gunner in this team. He was in charge of suppressing the firepower and protecting his own people from attacking. Therefore it made sense for him to suppress the attacks of the boss right now. “Okay boss, no problem. I specially wore three pieces of defense equipment today!” Hiding behind the trees nearby, a burly man with a body as strong as an iron tower smiled honestly. “Zhang Ming, once you start fighting later, your support is very important. Maintain your condition well. If your condition declines, you can take medicine. If you don’t have enough medicine, you can call for our support.” “Understood!” Zhang Ming in the distance. He took out three bottles of Health Potions from his backpack and directly consumed them. The next second, his aura rose. Although Zhang Ming was the person with the lowest combat strength in the entire team, his impact was very great. Not only could he slow down the enemy, but he could also increase the combat strength and endurance of his teammates. To put it bluntly, he was a supporter. The captain hid behind a huge reef. He held a very large machete in his hand. He was ready to explode at any time and kill the Python with one strike. Everyone was in their positions. Hou Zi immediately put on his diving equipment and jumped into the Snake Pond. Although his equipment was excellent, Hou Zi felt a bone-piercing chill as soon as he entered the water. He could clearly feel that there seemed to be a pair of cold eyes staring back at him in the entire pond, this feeling made him feel as if there was a knife placed at his back. However, as a top-notch special forces soldier, he adjusted his emotions in less than three seconds. Then, he quickly found a dark spot and hid himself well. After repeatedly observing the surrounding situation and making sure that there was nothing abnormal, he continued to swim down the cold pond. From the surface, the pond looked like a small lake. However, as Hou Zi dived deeper and deeper, it became narrower and narrower. What shocked him even more was that there seemed to be some high-level weapons on the ground every once in a while. Clearly, there had been some experts who tried to farm monsters here a long time ago, but were killed instead. As the name suggested, Hou Zi was thin and agile. In just a short while, he swam down a few hundred meters. However, it seemed that this distance was far from enough. The Snake Pond seemed to be bottomless. After a full half an hour, he felt that he had already reached a distance of more than a thousand meters at the bottom of the pond. Finally, he saw a huge python that was as thick as a log and more than a hundred meters long entrenched itself in the pond. Each of its scales was as big as a plate. The flow of water at the bottom of the pond was very slow. This huge python seemed to be in a deep sleep. Every time its body moved unintentionally, it would cause the scales to rub against each other. The friction was as sonorous and ear-piercing as metal, showing its extremely strong defense. This was especially true for this silver boss. The faint protrusion on its forehead indicated that it would probably really turn into a dragon given more time. This was completely in line with the information the Dragon Country had obtained. At this moment, the information of this giant python finally appeared in front of him! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation At this moment, he had no choice but to take out the crossbow he had prepared beforehand and fix it to the rock wall. This crossbow was capable of unleashing an attack power close to 10,000 points. This was an extremely rare one-time use silver-tier weapon that his party had obtained before. This was also one of the reasons why his party had dared to attack a silver boss. After all, this 10,000-point attack not only took away one-seventh of the boss’s HP, but also the boss’s defense. Most importantly, such a powerful attack would definitely infuriate the boss and agitate it. That way, it would be easier to kill it. In a flash, Hou Zi finished setting up the crossbow. He then pulled out a rope from his body and tied one end to the trigger of the crossbow. He then placed the other end into his hand and swam upstream. After swimming for a few hundred meters, Hou Zi finally found a distance that was enough for him to retreat and allow the silver-tier python to not discover his identity. Hou Zi carefully pulled the rope. Then, he mustered all the strength in his body and pulled back with all his strength! “Boom!” It was clearly just a crossbow firing, but it sounded like a cannon. Even from a few hundred meters away — and it was underwater — Hou Zi felt that it was deafening. Then, he heard the roar of the giant python! This roar was not like the sound of an ordinary snake sticking out its tongue. Instead, it sounded like the roar of an ox. To be exact, it was similar to the roar of a dragon. Hou Zi was a little dizzy from the explosion and the roar. However, he did not have the time to rest. That was because he could see that the giant python at the bottom of the pool suddenly pointed its tail at the bottom of the pool. The entire snake was edged like a sharp sword. The moment the snake straightened its body, it had already moved a hundred meters out of thin air. Hou Zi was greatly shocked. He pushed up with all his strength. His entire body was like a cannonball as he charged towards the surface of the water. The people outside the Snake Pond heard the sound of an explosion and the mighty roar. When Hou Zi resurfaced, they were too shocked to react. However, soon after, they saw Hou Zi shoot out of the water like an arrow. He reached the highest point and began to fall. When everyone looked at the surface of the water, it was as if two huge searchlights were shooting into the sky. It was getting closer and closer to the surface of the water. They were sure that it was the pythons eyes that glowed. Then, the giant python shot out of the water like a pillar. It opened its bloody mouth, which was six to seven meters wide, and faced the falling Hou Zi! “Han Xiong! Qin Lie!” Hou Zi roared desperately. He believed that the two of them must have been prepared since the whole team trusted their lives with their teammates! “Ah!” Before Hou Zi finished his words, the boss roared and shook the entire Snake Pond! Then, a figure that was like an iron tower rushed out and charged at the python without any fear. It was Qin Xiong! Under the gaze of the entire squad, he was obviously bravely making his way to save his teammate! He pressed forward!! There was someone who was one step faster than Qin Xiong. It was the sniper Qin Lie who was at the highest point. That arrow hit the giant python right in the left eye! One sniper and one iron-clad tanker, both of them were serious targets! Another painful roar sounded. The giant python first closed its eyes in pain, then it was sent flying by Qin Xiong. Hou Zi was saved. -3,000! -2,000! Two red numbers appeared above the giant python’s head. Although it was not serious enough to significantly lower its HP, the attack on its eyes made it blind on one side. Qin Xiong’s fierce collision made its head dizzy. Its body, which was hundreds of meters high, fell to the side. When the giant silver python fell to the side, it hit the ground and shook the earth, causing waves of water. Almost at the same time. A figure suddenly rushed out from behind a reef, holding a broadsword. When he lifted it up, the radiance of the broadsword suddenly burst out, ready to attack. It was the captain. “Hah, take this!” In order not to disturb the silver-tier giant python. The captain only let out a low shout with his broadsword and slashed at the giant python. -12,000! A string of red numbers appeared directly above the giant python’s head. The giant python’s HP was reduced by another fifth at a speed visible to the naked eye. At the same time, Qin lie, who was far away, did not stop shooting arrows at all. He kept firing arrows one after another. -3,000! -3,000! -3,000! -3,000! Meanwhile, Hou Zi, who had already landed on the ground, was also extremely fast on his feet. The moment he landed on the ground, he used both his hands and feet to run to the side of the giant python and began to stab it. -2,567! -3,104! -1,043! Han Xiong was even fiercer. As he had three pieces of defensive equipment in his backpack, he did not even have the time to change his equipment. He directly puffed out his chest and crashed into the body of the giant python again and again, producing loud bangs. -4,300! -2,839! -1,539! Due to using too much of his strength, his face turned red, but there was still no sign of him giving up. Zhang Ming, who was hiding in the forest far away, shot out beams of green light at his teammates. He held two potions in each hand, and from time to time, he would quickly consume the potion. It was obvious that he was going all out. After suffering a series of attacks, the python finally reacted when its HP was reduced to one-third. It immediately tightened its 100-meter-long body and tried to strangle all of them together. However, the captain and Hou Zi were very agile, so the big python could do nothing to them. Han Xiong knew that he was slow and clumsy, so he directly rammed into the big python’s tail and used the reaction force to send himself flying. After using his powerful armor to protect himself, he went backed up to avoid the python’s ultimate skill. It had to be said that these player’s reactions were considered fast, and their battle awareness was high. Moreover, they had been together for a long time, so they had a good tacit understanding. Although the python’s combat power was off the charts, under the strangling net formed by these five people, there was no room for resistance. However, the Ancient Python did not give up on resisting. Instead, it continued to fight back bravely. It used its tail to whip the three people, and it stuck its head out to attack them with its teeth. If it were any other player’s party, such a blow would definitely be effective. However, this party’s combat power was so strong. More importantly, their equipment was of good quality. In fact, these equipment were gained through their powerful financial strength. They beat the Ancient Python till it finally breathed?its last breath! [Ding! Congratulations on defeating the silver boss, Ancient Python. Please check your equipment!] The party of five was exhausted! However, when they saw the equipment all over the ground, their energy surged! However, before they could pick up their equipment, the system voice rang again. [Ding! Due to the silver boss, Ancient Python being killed, the hidden gold boss has been triggered!] <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation [Ding! Due to the silver boss, Ancient Python being killed, the hidden gold boss has been triggered!] [Once it’s killed, you will receive a reward!] When the notification sounded, all the party members’ stopped celebrating. Instead, they felt chills down their spines. Then, a deep and long groan came from the Snake Pond again, as if it was a spell from the ancient times! The horror! Soon after, the entire Snake Pond began to tremble. In fact, the entire forest around the Snake Pond began to tremble uncontrollably! Originally, when the silver boss appeared, the other snakes had already scattered and fled. At this moment, they did not even dare to move. One after another, they threw themselves on the ground. It was as if they were bowing to an entirely strong and powerful existence! This was an act of absolute submission. It was a suppression from their bloodline, a tremble that was deeply engraved in their ancient genes! “Run!” The captain of this party was the first to react. Then, he let out a deafening roar! No one would be ecstatic over a gold-rank reward. All that was left was the fear of death! Although they had previously thought that they were definitely stronger than Lu Chen, when they saw the battle between Lu Chen and the Ancient Fire Tiger, they were very clear in their hearts, it would be difficult to do better than Lu Chen. However, they do not admit defeat, they will never submit to him! Although it was only a level of difference between a silver and gold boss, they still ran. As soon as the captain gave the order to retreat, all of the team members ran out of the Snake Pond with all their might. They did not even have time to pick up the equipment dropped by the silver boss. Before they could even take a few steps, they heard a loud bang as if something had exploded! [Ding! Congratulations to player Li Xiaotian for resurrecting! Level restored to level 1, equipment cleared! Do you wish to proceed with the novice quest?] [Ding! Congratulations to player Zhang Ming for resurrecting! Level restored to level 1, equipment cleared! Do you wish to proceed with the novice quest?] [Ding! Congratulations to player Qin Lie for resurrecting! Level restored to level 1, equipment cleared! Do you wish to proceed with the novice quest?] [Ding! Congratulations to player Han Xiong for resurrecting! Level restored to level 1, equipment cleared! Do you wish to proceed with the novice quest?] [Ding! Congratulations to player Hou Zi for resurrecting! Level restored to level 1, equipment cleared! Do you wish to proceed with the novice quest?] The five players were dumbfounded! “F*ck!” After a moment of silence, the five members of the party cursed in unison. They were instantly killed by a gold boss! Zhang Ming’s face was filled with shock as he asked, “Did you guys see that gold boss? I was so focused on running that I didn’t even notice what it looked like!” “I didn’t see it. When I heard that the gold boss had appeared, I just turned around and died before I could even run!” The party leader, Li Xiaotian. He said in a low voice, “I didn’t see it clearly, but when I turned my head slightly before I died, I could only see a shadow.” Everyone was silent. It was one thing to be instantly killed, but the most important thing was that the gold boss’s combat power could actually send Han Xiong away. After all, he was wearing three pieces of defensive armor! The most shameful thing was that the five of them did not even see the appearance of the gold boss! After all, the strength of their party was not weak. Yet they still had just been insta-killed by a gold boss. As compared to the silver boss, everything went smoothly. Right after, once the gold boss appeared, they were insta-killed in just three seconds. It was too depressing. “F*ck, what kind of a place was that? Isn’t this a silver boss territory? Why was there a gold boss?” Hou Zi could not stop cursing. At this moment, the captain was gasping for breath due to shock. He said intermittently, “Do you guys still remember what Liu Yang said about Lan Weiwei in the live broadcast?” “That kid talked too much nonsense. I didn’t remember what they said!” “I was too focused on killing monsters and leveling up. I didn’t pay much attention to it.” On the other hand, as Hou Zi was a scout, he observed carefully. “Liu Yang seemed to have said that Lan Weiwei was originally an Ancient Ash Wolf. When Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei entered a secret realm of the Wolf Valley together, they defeated the Ancient Ash Wolf King. That’s why Lan Weiwei advanced.” Li Xiaotian nodded slightly. “That’s right. That’s why it’s very likely that there’s a secret realm or a more powerful boss behind the silver bosses. “However, I think that even the Ancient Ash Wolf King that they killed back then is far inferior to this gold level boss.” After all, Lu Chen had only been around level 20 after encountering Lan Weiwei back then. And this gold boss was definitely something that even Lu Chen would not be able to defeat in the past. Zhang Ming, who had been in a daze the whole time, finally said after a long while, “It took so long to clear the Snake Pond. Was everything for nothing?” A hint of awkwardness filled the air. Everyone was silent. In order to successfully clear the silver boss in the Snake Pond, they had prepared for a whole week. This time, they had spent tens of millions of dollars. After all, when Lu Chen became the City Lord of White Fog City, they had only spent this money to prove him wrong. However, in the end, they had actually returned to level 1! How were they going to explain everything when they got back? Before they killed the silver boss, they had already made a report to the higher-ups of the Dragon Country. The news of their victory had already been sent back. The higher-ups of the Dragon Country had even sent cheers to congratulate them. It was simply a social death. The five of them stayed at the Resurrection Point for a full 10 minutes. Only then did Li Xiaotian break the silence. “Everyone, destroy your communication devices.” The others were stunned at first. Then, with tacit understanding, they took out all their communication devices at the same time. Their phones, radios, and so on were smashed to pieces on the ground. It was impossible for them to reply to the higher-ups if they had no communication devices. They would never reply to a letter for the rest of their lives! If this news gets spread out, they would become a joke in front of all the first elder’s subordinates for the rest of their lives. The leader, Li Xiaotian, spoke with a defeated expression, “Let’s go. Everyone, go and kill three rabbits...;” They understood that Li Xiaotian was bringing everyone to farm monsters from level 1. When they had achieved a certain level, they would contact the higher ups again. They would rather not suffer the actions of the first elder than return as Level 1 newbies! … In the vicinity of the Snake Pond. Lu Chen did not pay too much attention to the commotion as he continued walking towards his destination. After half an hour, they finally arrived at the Snake Pond. Lu Chen’s eyes widened. “Huh? What’s going on? Why is there silver equipment all over the place?!” Looking at the silver equipment dropped by the five stack party, Lu Chen was delighted. [Python Fang Dagger: Increases attack power by 100%. 30% chance to ignore opponents defense and deal real damage to the enemy.] [Python Spirit: Normal defense is 1,000 points, maximum defense can reach is 5,000 points. This item can not be used after the maximum defense is reached. Cooldown time is one month.] [Python Strength Potion: When consumed, permanently increases vitality by 2,000 points, increases attack power by 10,000 points!] Looking at these three pieces of silver equipment, Lu Chen’s heart busted with joy. Although the first two pieces of equipment were not very useful to him, the third piece of equipment was something that no one could ignore. It felt even better when it came to picking up equipment for free. How amazing! However, Lu Chen had a lot of doubts in his mind. Who had killed the silver boss? Since these pieces of equipment were actually silver, it meant that someone must have killed the silver boss here. Oddly enough, even if they had successfully killed the silver boss, they did not take the equipment. Was it because they did not like the equipment here? Something was not right. Not just for1 the equipment, even Lu Chen, who was covered in both legendary and epic equipment, did not dare underestimate the equipment dropped by a silver boss. There was also a potion that could permanently increase one’s attribute points. Where did these players go? Brushing it aside, Lu Chen walked straight to the three pieces of silver equipment. He thought for a moment before throwing the first two pieces of equipment to Liu Yang. Liu Yang hurriedly took the Python Fang Dagger and the Python Spirit, feeling a little dazed. “I’ll give these two items to you. You’ll be following me around. You need to increase your strength as well. Otherwise, you’ll become a burden.” Hearing Lu Chen’s casual words, Liu Yang was extremely shocked. After all, these were silver equipment. How could he possibly hope for Lu Chen to give it to him? If this thing were to be sold, it would be worth at least tens of millions, right? How could these money making equipment be given away so easily? Was this the imposing manner of Lu Chen? Liu Yang’s heart was instantly moved to tears. At this moment, he was finally certain. He was gald to be shameless enough to follow Lu Chen. This was definitely the best choice he had ever made in his life! In the future, if Lu Chen told him to go east, he would not go west. If he told him to jump, he would ask how high! Even if he was asked to become cannon fodder, he would not say a single word. Lu Chen did not pay attention to this drama queen. Instead, he walked straight to the third silver grade treasure and picked up the items. He could not wait any longer and consumed the potion. In the next moment, a cool liquid was poured into his throat and then into his stomach. His entire stomach felt slightly cold. In less than three seconds, the potion was dispersed to his entire body through his limbs. Lu Chen could clearly feel that his strength was increasing. Then, he clenched his fist and punched the huge rock next to the Snake Pond. With a bang, the huge rock exploded and many debris flew into the Snake Pond! One had to know that this rock that broke weighed at least ten tons, and Lu Chen did not even use much strength to destroy it. This huge rock was made of granite with the sturdiest hardness. However, Lu Chen still did not show any joy on his face. Instead, he looked at the center of the Snake Pond and his pupils suddenly shrank. He did not know if it was an illusion, but when the pieces of granite fell into the Snake Pond, the pond water seemed to dip toward the center. This feeling was as if the pond water was like a contracted pupil. This feeling was too strange. Lu Chen flipped his palm and struck out. This time, it was not aimed at the Snake Pond, but at Liu Yang. Liu Yang was sent flying dozens of meters away by this palm strike. Although he was dumbfounded, he believed that Lu Chen would not harm him for no reason. Lan Weiwei also understood Lu Chen’s intention and quietly moved out of the Snake Pond. She also took a few steps back. Lu Chen turned around with his back facing the pond and nonchalantly picked up a rock from the side of the pond . This rock weighed at least a ton, but he lifted it lightly and tossed it into the air. Then, he threw it towards the center of the pond! The speed was so fast that it hit the center of the pond in the blink of an eye! However, what happened next made Lu Chen even more convinced that there was definitely something wrong with the pond! The Snake Pond seemed to blink and quickly closed into a line from both ends, forcefully withstanding the one ton of attack. This one ton rock was sent flying one meter into the Snake Pond. Something was strange! A loud roar was emitted from the Snake Pond, forming a huge shock wave that shook the entire Snake Pond, bouts of water spurted everywhere! The water turned into thousands of sharp swords that shot out in all directions. It was extremely destructive! A golden title suddenly appeared above Lu Chen’s head! [Shield God: Your understanding of the shield has reached an unfathomable level. When you use any shield, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow along with your level!] [Indestructible: When you receive damage, you will be immune to 90% of the damage.] [Shield Backlash: Return 90% of the damage you receive to the enemy.] [Shield Spirit: You have a 1% chance to be immune to all damage!] -2,000! A string of red numbers floated above Lu Chen’s head. Lu Chen sucked in a breath of cold air. With the protection of the Shield God, he had already filtered out 90% of the damage. Yet, the monster was still able to deal 2,000 damage to himself. This meant that the opponent’s attack had reached about 20,000 points! If this kind of damage was applied to an ordinary player, one hit could instantly kill more than half of the members of the White alliance. One had to know that the splash was an AOE skill. If not for the shield that he had just activated, along with the protection of Lan Weiwei, even as the Ancient Ash Wolf King, Lan Weiwei would not be able to withstand a few attacks with over 100,000 HP! At the same time, the golden bottom of the pond actually blinked like an eye again! In the next moment, there was actually a direct charge towards the surface of the pond . A huge golden looking snake that was hundreds of meters long that had three eyes on its head, directly rushed out of the pond and swam in the sky! However, it was clear that it could not fly in the air for a long time. In just a few seconds, it landed on the ground again and coiled around the Snake Pond. It raised its head high and hissed with its tongue. It glared at Lu Chen and the others viciously. At this moment, the information of the three-eyed looking snake finally appeared before Lu Chen. [Three-eyed Golden Dragon] [Level: 40 (gold)] [HP: 3,040,000] [Attack: 250,000] [Defense: 64,400] [Magic Defense: 31,440 [Water Control: The exclusive skill of the Three-eyed Golden Dragon. It will have different effects depending on the awakening of its bloodline. It creates a water domain and controls the water within the domain. It can control the blood in the body of a living creature! There is a certain chance to directly extract the enemy’s HP and replenish it on one’s own body. At most, it will be one-third of the enemy’s total HP.. It can only be used once in a single battle! There is even a chance to awaken the bloodline in the body and complete the transformation!] <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen looked at the Three-eyed Golden Dragon’s first skill. This skill was very similar to his Bloodbath Blade God skill. [Bloodbath Blade God: When your enemies exceed 100 amount, your attack will become an area-of-effect damage of 100 meters. 50% of the damage will be converted into your HP.] However, Bloodbath Blade God had a higher requirement for the number of enemies to reach was 100. However, the skill of the Three-eyed Golden Dragon did not have such a requirement. Moreover, this skill seemed like an instant kill kind of attack. If the opponent only had less than one thirds of his HP left, then this skill of the Three-eyed Golden Dragon would be able to directly kill the opponent. Following that, Lu Chen looked at the other skills of the Three-eyed Golden Dragon. [Crazy Dragon Breath: Spits out a dense fog filled with poison, covering an area of 1 square kilometer. Any enemy who inhales the poison would lose 1,000 HP every second, lasts until the enemy dies.] This attack skill of the Three-eyed Golden Dragon did not have a high attack power, but it had a large area of attack and a very long duration. Even if someone withstood 1,000 points of attack, their HP would gradually be worn away. [Golden Gaze: The Three-eyed Golden Dragon is an ancient mutant. It was originally a Three-eyed Golden Python. A few hundred years ago, it received the heavenly tribulation and became a Three-eyed Golden Dragon. Its third eye was the horn of a dragon! When the giant Python uses this skill, it could freeze the opponent for one second! Within that one second, all of the opponent’s defense will be lost! Can only be used twice per day!] When Lu Chen saw the third skill of the Three-eyed Golden Dragon, he was stunned. F*ck! This was a godly skill! Initially, he thought that the first skill of the Three-eyed Golden Dragon was already very powerful. However, when he saw the third skill, he was stunned. The combat power of this gold boss was 250,000. If someone was immobilized for a second, which player would be able to withstand 250,000 damage? Not to mention a human player, even the Ancient Ash Wolf King that had 300,000 HP after using its true form would die. If the Three-eyed Golden Dragon had first used a Water Control skill, then pinned it, and then used a 250,000 point critical hit, anyone would instantly die. This level 40 Three-eyed Golden Dragon was ridiculously strong. It did not use any of its skills to increase its attack power, but these three support skills were simply too powerful. Looking at its high physical and magic double resistances, no one in the entire White Fog City and the surrounding area could withstand this fight. Lu Chen even wondered if Sword Saint Atzas could defeat this Three-eyed Golden Dragon if he came over? If it were the five-man party under the first elder’s command, they would probably cry when they saw the Three-eyed Golden Dragon’s skills. They had thought that the silver boss was the boss that was the strongest in the Snake Pond. They had not expected the Three-eyed Golden Dragon to be the true master. Moreover, it had successfully transcended its tribulation a long time ago. All it had done was wait for the silver boss to die, the female python, to transcend its tribulation. The reason why they had been killed before they had even seen the true master was because of the Three-eyed Golden Dragon’s third skill. It was simply too tragic. The sky was not completely dark yet, and the moon had not appeared. However, Lu Chen could not care about this at all, and directly activated his skill — Ancient Wolf Transformation. [Ancient Wolf Transformation: You can summon a full moon regardless of the terrain and climate when howling to the sky. It will also deal 500 light attribute magic damage to enemies under the moonlight every second!] In the next moment, Lu Chen’s body rapidly expanded and transformed into a small mountain, he looked like a tall ancient wolf. He raised his head and roared towards the sky. “Awooo!” A bright purple moon appeared in the sky. Clearly, in front of the Golden Dragon’s powerful dual defense, this 500 points of light magic damage per second had no effect on it. However, Lu Chen could rely on the moonlight emitted by the moon to obtain the power of moonlight. [Moonlight Buff” You have already obtained the power of the Ancient Ash Wolf. When you are in battle, you can use the power of moonlight to activate the power of Ash Wolf! Every time you consume a little of the moonlight that you have stored, you can increase your attack power by a little! The increased attributes will not be retained forever, and will disappear after the battle ends.] Following that, Lu Chen used his third skill — Moon God’s Blessing. [Moon God’s Blessing: You have been blessed by the Moon God. You can use the moonlight to recover your status and remove negative attributes. When you fight under the moonlight, you will receive a battle strength buff. The specific buff will increase with the user’s affinity with the moonlight.] [Current Affinity: 85! You will receive a 65% attack bonus in battle! [Light Attribute Magic Resistance: +70%] [Note: When the affinity reaches a certain value, additional special effects will be unlocked. You can now store 150,000/150,000 moonlight!] At this moment, Lu Chen’s moonlight had already been fully stored. Adding the 65% combat buff, his combat power had already reached 130,119 points! However, that was not enough! A golden title appeared above Lu Chen’s head again — Sword God! [Sword God: Your comprehension of the sword has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a sword-type weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow along with your level!] [Sword Intent: When you use a sword-type weapon, it will burst forth with sword intent, and your attack power will increase to 700%!] Lu Chen’s combat power increased by sevenfold again, reaching 910,000 combat power! However, this little bit of combat power was far from enough! Compared to the 3,040,000 HP of the Three-eyed Golden Dragon and the over 100,000 double resistance, it was still far from enough! After all, once the other party used the third skill, he would definitely die! “White Fog City, Rise!” … White Fog City. The city gates that weighed over 10,000 tons let out an ear-piercing sound as they slowly closed! “F*ck, what’s going on? Can’t we enter?” “Stop messing around, I want to go in. What’s going on now? Are we no longer allowed to change classes?” “Hade, What’s wrong with White Fog City?” Hade looked at White Fog City, which was gradually closing its gates, and his gaze became slightly serious. “This is the City Lord summoning White Fog City! The City Lord has met his match. Everyone stop your entry. All the residents of White Fog City, return to your houses. White Fog City is about to go to war!” When the heavy city gates rumbled and closed, White Fog City, which spanned tens of thousands of miles, actually began to shake violently. Then, it shook up from the ground, rose up to a height of 1,000 meters, and slowly moved in the direction of the Snake Pond! At the same time, Liu Yang’s livestream room finally began to broadcast what was going on. Liu Yang looked at the players who instantly poured into the live broadcast room, and his eyes were instantly stunned. In just a few seconds, more than a million viewers had come in. This was absolutely an unprecedented battle! In the Novice Village, each of the members of the team held three rabbits in their hands, and their had long faces. Zhang Ming swallowed his pride and asked with a heavy face, “Do we...; still need to hide it from the higher-ups of the Dragon Country?” Captain Li Xiaotian said expressionlessly, “What do you think?!” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation This was definitely a nightmare-level failure, especially since the screen in Liu Yang’s live stream room had already been flooded. Back when Lu Chen and the others had discovered the silver-tier equipment that had dropped all over the floor, the screen had already gone out of control. [F*ck, how did he find the equipment?] [F * ck, this is a silver-tier equipment. Why is it just sitting by the pond ? Which boss was it from?] [Something’s not right. Could it be that some big shot fought the silver boss until both sides suffered heavy losses and both died?] [But when did the party appear? Why is there no sign of the party who defeated it at all? I’ve never heard of anyone who could defeat a silver boss before. Even a few big clans couldn’t do it.] [This is sad. It’s one thing for Morning Mist to be strong, but he actually picked up a bunch of equipment for free. Life is unfair.] [There’s nothing to be sad about. If Morning Mist wasn’t strong, he wouldn’t have been able to reach the center of the Snake Pond.] [If someone told you that there was silver equipment in the center of the Snake Pond, would you still go?] [That’s true, but I’m more curious about which unlucky person killed the silver boss and then died?] [I’m really too curious!] [Look carefully at the live stream. It seems that there are some personal equipment scattered in the distance, and there seems to be a video recorder among them?] [This is for sure. It’s definitely some big shot who killed the silver boss. As long as we open that video recorder now, we’ll definitely be able to break down what happened back then!] When Li Xiaotian and the others saw this scene, they were so disheartened that they could almost hear their hearts cracking. When they had first used that video recorder, their goal had been to bring the video data inside to the main world’s army to the Dragon Country for analysis, so that their other teammates could farm more monsters. Of course, they had their own selfish motives. They wanted to use this video to prove how they had killed a silver boss. This was both for merit and glory. However, at this moment, it became evidence that they had died. Zhang Ming was so embarrassed that his face turned red. “Captain, I’m so ashamed right now I could dig up a hole for myself and hide in it forever.” Li Xiaotian’s gaze was dull. “I can’t take this shame either. Why don’t we change our lives to another planet...;” Following which, they watched as Lu Chen and the others picked up the equipment dropped by the silver boss and consumed the potion. When they saw that Lu Chen could shatter the rock with one punch, their hearts were filled with mixed feelings. All their hard work had been in vain, and they had wasted their efforts on others. Not to mention, when Liu Yang carefully searched through their backpacks and picked out the equipment inside, he felt even more aggrieved. However, what they found the most difficult to accept was that Lu Chen did not even care about any of their equipment, and just gave them all to Liu Yang! This was a blatant humiliation! After all, they treated every single item in there as a treasure! Somehow, Lu Chen actually threw them to Liu Yang who had just reached level 10 like it was trash. Li Xiaotian felt as if his heart was about to break. However, when they realized that the Three-eyed Golden Dragon had charged out and confronted Lu Chen, their hearts felt as if a bucket of cold water had been poured on them, and they instantly felt a chill down their spines. This was the gold boss! Its entire body was covered in gold! Its huge body was far stronger than the one they had killed previously, and even its length was six to seven times longer. Moreover, with just a glance, they could tell that this Three-eyed Golden Dragon was definitely not an ordinary gold boss. Just based on its mutated eyes, they could tell that this was an ancient monster! Although they had failed, they were convinced that they would not have lasted with the gold boss. The existence in front of them was definitely not something that they could match. However, at the same time, they were also mourning for Lu Chen. They did not think that Lu Chen was a match for this gold boss. Although they had always wanted to surpass Lu Chen, they still recognized Lu Chen as far superior. Plus he was still the mainstay of Dragon Country. If he dies, it will be a great loss to the Dragon Kingdom, which they did not want to see. However, what happened next stunned all five of them. The Three-eyed Golden Dragon’s used the Water Control skill. That’s 20,000 damage! Although they could not see it through the live broadcast, they could accurately feel just how strong the attack was. Deep down, they definitely knew that their own players would not be able to block this move. Most likely, after a wave of attacks, the only one who could survive was Han Xiong, who specialized in defense. However, even if it was him, he would definitely not have a lot of health left. If he took another hit, he would definitely die. This attack would probably hurt Lu Chen very much. The entire party felt that no matter how strong Lu Chen was, his defense would not be much stronger than Han Xiong’s. However, a terrifying scene appeared. That incomparably terrifying Water Control skill actually only dealt 2,000 damage to Lu Chen! They even discovered that the decrease in Lu Chen’s HP was almost negligible! They were shocked. Just what kind of monster was Lu Chen? He could actually reduce his attack to nearly 90%! And how could his HP be so high? After all, among the players in front of them, even Zhang Ming, who had the highest HP among them, had only around 10,000 HP. When they looked at Lu Chen’s HP, they were surprised to find that Lu Chen’s HP had already reached more than 60,000 points. This meant that even if the five of them combined their HP, they would not have more than half of Lu Chen’s HP! High attack! High defense! High HP! They began to doubt their own capabilities. Could their party ever be stronger than Lu Chen alone? One had to know that he even had an Ancient Ask Wolf King with 150,000 HPin the distance. Moreover, as the subordinates of the first elder, they knew very well that once the Ancient Ash Wolf King activated its true form transformation, its HP bar would double to 300,000! When Lu Chen transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf and directly summoned the moon, this scene stunned them. This was f*cking illogical. How was this an online gaming world, it was simply a fantasy! After the moon appeared, Lu Chen exited the ash wolf state, and a golden title appeared above his head. That was the Sword God! Sevenfold critical strike, eight times attack speed! The morale of the small party had suffered a major blow from it! The five players in the small party had not even gone through the class change. They were not even Swordsmen, so they could not be compared to the Sword God at all. The most infuriating thing was that Lu Chen had more than one golden title. There were already three or four known ones. When White Fog City finally rose up from the ground and appeared in the sky above the Snake Pond, it was not only the earth that was shaken, but also their worldview that had just collapsed… The difference between humans was simply too great. It was as if the tacit understanding and experience that they had accumulated through so many years of life and death could not withstand a single blow in front of absolute strength. Was Lu Chen the child of fate?! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Thousands of meters above the Snake Pond, a huge city that was surrounded by white fog descended and enveloped the Snake Pond! At this moment, the Snake Pond was like a lake in White Fog City. It naturally merged with White Fog City and did not seem out of place at all. It was as if this Snake Pond was supposed to be in White Fog City in the first place. Instantly, a mechanical notification appeared in the sky above White Fog City. [Ding! White Fog City has been summoned by the City Lord! When the City Lord is in White Fog City, they can enjoy the special buff of the White Fog City Lord set!] [In battle, every attack can increase their attack power by 1%!] [In White Fog City, all damage caused will be increased by 100%, and the attributes will be doubled.] [In White Fog City, the City Lord will be 99% immune to all damage dealt!] [The magic damage received in White Fog City will be reduced by 90%. The wearer’s magic resistance will be calculated on White Fog City.] [HP will be shared in White Fog City, and the wearer will recover 100% of their HP every second!] [Can be teleported to any corner of White Fog City!] [Skills used in White Fog City will have no cooldown, and the wearer will recover 100% of their maximum mana every second.] This series of buffs was transmitted to everyone’s ears along with Liu Yang’s live broadcast! In an instant, the live broadcast room instantly went silent. It was as if all the players had gone offline in an instant from such an announcement … At this moment, Hei Yu, who was in White Fog City, had just completed his class change, and he was very excited. When he heard the reward that belonged to the White Fog City Lord ringing in the sky above White Fog City, his combat power that had just been upgraded by his class change instantly lost its appeal. At a certain moment, Hei Yu was even thinking that if he had obtained the scroll back then and teleported directly to White Fog City… would he get to be invisible? However, he was only thinking about it. After all, if he were to become the White Fog City Lord with his combat power...; He would have to bring White Fog City with him no matter which boss he attacked. … The five-man team that was still at the Resurrection Point was petrified. Li Xiaotian said to Zhang Ming numbly, “Zhang Ming, help me pull up the information on White Fog City.” Zhang Ming, who was still in a daze, trembled, and he immediately pulled up the information on White Fog City. [White Fog City] [City Level: Bronze] [Population: 24,305] [Available Positions: Magister, Holy Light, Paladin...;] [Assets: 3,054,680] [City Defense: 1,303,921] [Magic Defense: 1,203,921] [City HP: 1,100,2936] [City Garrison: 15,000] [City Array: None] The five of them quietly looked at the information about White Fog City. Silence. Complete. Dead. Silence. “I remember the system notification saying that the White Fog City Lord will share his HP with White Fog City, right?” “That’s right.” “So now Lu Chen’s HP has reached more than 10,000,000 points, which is even higher than this Three-eyed Golden Dragon’s HP, right?” The other team members were silent for a long while before someone finally said, “Not only that, his Shield God title can reduce his damage by 90%...;” “Is there anyone who can f*cking kill Lu Chen?!” The entire team fell into a deathly silence once again. … In the Dragon Country’s high-level meeting room. Everyone looked at the silver-tier equipment lying on the ground beside the Snake Pond and fell silent. At this moment, the first elder who was sitting at the seat of honor had an ugly expression on his face. No one dared to provoke him. “Say something. Tell me your thoughts. What the h*ll is the meaning of silence?!” The first elder had already lost his composure. However, the meeting still had to continue. However, those who dared not make a sound. In the end, it was the third in charge chief who came out to mediate the situation. “Well…Uh… Players make mistakes every once in a while. It’s normal to fail when facing a gold-tier boss...;” “What?!” The first elder slammed the table fiercely, and the teacup beside him was knocked over. “Was I talking about that? Was I freaking talking about that?! I’m talking about Lu Chen!!” He had high expectations for this party of his. Initially, they thought that if they wanted to defeat this silver-tier boss, they would have a lot of casualties. Even if they were killed by that silver boss in the Snake Pond, he would still accept it. However, the problem was that this party had won! They won one second, but were killed the next! Moreover, they did not even pick up the equipment that had dropped before. This was too shameful! One must know that in the past two days, the Dragon Country’s first elder had been bragging to everyone here about how strong his party was. Whenever someone asked if the team was confident enough to take the Snake Pond, the first elder would wave his hand and confirm their strength. However, everyone could see that the corner of the first elder’s mouth was crazily twitching right now! This 100-year-old face was hurting too much! How dare the third in charge bring it up! The third in charge quickly changed the topic, “Well, we know some of Lu Chen’s skills. We’ve known for a long time that Lan Weiwei, the pet, had her HP tied with his. This way, Lu Chen’s health would be equivalent to more than 300,000 points. “As long as the beast didn’t die, Lu Chen wouldn’t die. “Later on, we all saw Lu Chen accept the challenge from theGuardian General of White Fog City and become the City Lord of White Fog City. However, Lu Chen had never used this reward before. “Originally, Lu Chen’s attack power was the strongest in the world. His only weakness was that his HP was a little low. “Of course, this weakness was only relative to his own combat power. Compared to ordinary players, he was still ridiculously strong. “However, facing a silver or even gold-tier boss was not enough. “But now, we’ve discovered that he can actually summon White Fog City at any time and place. This can make up for his weakness.” At this moment, a high-ranking official suddenly said, “Does this mean that we won’t be able to control this Lu Chen? Will he become very dangerous?” “I’m a little worried how Xiao Bai would react when he gets his city.” The first elder, whose face had long turned red, said at this moment, “Never think of controlling “a martial artist! The more powerful a person is, the more they have their own thoughts. Only those who have a strong will can become the top warriors. “Therefore, never try to control them. If you want him to be our friend, then we must help him as much as we can.” Hearing the first elder of the Dragon Country’s final decision, everyone nodded. Only the third in charge opened his mouth, as if he wanted to say something but hesitated and did not say it. This made the first elder of the Dragon Country a little depressed. He frowned and said, “If you have something to say, just say it. Don’t hide it from me.” “Uh...; I just want to ask about those few pieces of silver equipment. Should we ask Lu Chen for them back?” “Ask my *ss! It’s just a few pieces of silver equipment. It’s just a few tens of millions. It’s not like we can’t afford it! “If you want to kiss his feet and take them back, then be my guest. I will not drop my ego for this!” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The third in charge chief’s expression changed several times when was reprimanded by the first elder. In the end, he suppressed the thought of getting his silver equipment back. It had to be said that even he, who stood at the top of the Dragon Team, felt a little pressured when facing the Dragon Country’s first elder. In order to ease the awkwardness, the chief quickly changed the topic. “If White Fog City can give the City Lord such a huge boost, then I’m afraid the city that Xiao Bai just obtained will have the same effect. “It’s said that the city over there is even bigger than White Fog City, and there are even some NPCs inside already.” As soon as these words were said, they quickly diverted everyone’s attention, and everyone frowned. Due to the emergence of the Second World, even these old players, who were at least 50 years old, began to learn from some of the main world’s online games. This helped them greatly in understanding the rules of the Second World. As players who set rules in the main world, if they wanted to maintain their position in the world, the first thing they had to do was to adapt to new changes. Now, they were very clear that as a city, having high attack, defense, population, and the number of various craftsmen would have a great impact on the attributes of the city. If Xiao Bai’s city had a large number of NPCs already, this undoubtedly meant that once Xiao Bai’s city was taken over, it would have a very high combat strength. If Lu Chen was unable to make up for this gap, they were afraid that he would fall behind. It was precisely because of Xiao Bai’s existence, as well as the fact that those who had entered the arcane realm had yet to return, that the higher ups of the Dragon Country ountry had not truly dealt with the members of the Xiao Clan. There were too many things at stake here. No one knew when the Xiao’s were going to return from the arcane realm, so there was no need to think too much about it. Moreover, there were other experts of the Dragon Country who had entered the arcane realm to restrict their passages. In that case, the only person who could restrict Xiao Bai in the main world was Lu Chen right now. Even the first elder found it difficult to do anything. This was because the first elder had entered the Second World a long time ago, and his level was barely above level 20. Although he was already at the peak of battle strength in the Second World, he was a bit inferior to a heaven’s favored son like Lu Chen. If Xiao Bai had just displayed his strength, the first elder would have been able to easily take him down. However, if it was now, the first elder was not confident. Once Xiao Bai could also control the city to strengthen himself, then even the first elder would die without a doubt. The fate of the Dragon Country now depended on Lu Chen alone. The third in charge chief also took a deep breath at this time. “The crisis we’re facing isn’t just limited to Xiao Bai. As far as I know, other than the ancient fortresses in the west, there are also fortresses in other regions that are ready to accept challenges at any time. “In addition, when I visited the middle east, I accidentally discovered that their pyramid is very likely the secret entrance to the second world. “Their country’s mummies and pharaohs were the spirits of the dead guarding the entrance, preventing the powerhouses from the other world from coming to our main world. “It could also allow some players from that?country, who needed experience to enter the Second World, increase their strength.” The first elder nodded slightly in agreement. “That’s right. This isn’t old news. Their ancient documents have recorded such things. “However, because it was too bizarre, no one believed it. They treated it as a myth or a story used to strengthen the king’s power. “But I have to say, I once saw a pharaoh on their side a few decades ago. “There are indeed many things they’ve done. They have many abilities that we martial artists do not have. They are also things that current science can not explain.” He took a deep breath and widened his eyes. As a high-ranking official of the country, he often went to various countries to establish diplomatic relations, but he did not know much about supernatural beings or martial artists. Now that he heard the first elder’s explanation, he could not help but suck in a breath of cold air. If that was the case...; Then there were probably a lot of powerhouses in the middle eastern side. At the same time, he was also a little puzzled. “I remember that the pharaoh of the Pyramid Country had disappeared a long time ago. Based on what we know, the last one was Cleopatra. Since then, there has been no more!” The first elder smiled slightly. “At that time, there were four great ancient civilizations in our world. If the civilization of our Dragon Country could survive, how could the other few perish so easily? “The pharaohs of the Pyramid Country did not disappear. It was just that they had come into contact with the Second World earlier, so they had a better understanding of this Second World. “Therefore, they no longer aimed their desires in the original world. “The powerhouses who remained in Egypt were like Xiao Bai and I, who had not explored the ruins. “If one day we discover their powerful presence there, there should be no accidents. “Besides, I have a suspicion. “The number of mummies in the pyramids may not be as little as we think. “Those mummies are most likely bodies left in our main world, and their consciousness has long become a Second World existence. “Once their consciousness descends into this world again, they’ll probably be very powerful.” These were all secrets that had long been spread among the warriors, but they had never been made public to the meain world. It was precisely because these contents were too mystical and easy to cause panic. Now that the Second World has descended, these things should also be made public. Even so, this news still caused quite a shock to the high-level officials of the Dragon Country. Was it possible that the country, which had been thought to have declined and disappeared long ago, had now become so powerful that it was unknown? So, were the other two ancient countries that had disappeared among the four great ancient civilizations in the same situation? If so, how powerful could they be now? … Not only was everyone in the Dragon Country paying attention to Lu Chen’s battle, even the various factions in the world were watching as well. In the Western Castle, Xiao Bai had just stood up from his game pod when he turned on the stream. A holographic projection from the stream gave him a feeling as if he was there with Lu Chen. This allowed him to have a deeper understanding of the might of the Three-eyed Golden Dragon in front of him. “Is this the gold boss?” At this moment, he looked at Lu Chen’s information panel once again, the corners of his mouth curled into a scornful smile. “Lu Chen, during the time that I was away, did you only improve by a little? It seems that there’s no need for us to fight. “After a while, your White Fog City will be harvested by me. “Perhaps, even the Golden Dragon could defeat you before I do!” … “Don’t bite, please don’t bite. This is a phone, not a bamboo shoot!!” In the live stream, Liu Yang was wearing the newly picked up silver equipment as he took back the phone that had been stolen from Rollie and continued to broadcast the event. Originally, the Three-eyed Golden Dragon had looked down on low-level creatures like Lu Chen. However, when Lu Chen received the City Lord’s buff, it could no longer hold it in. The towering head pulled back, and like an arrow leaving the bow, it opened its bloody mouth and charged straight at Lu Chen! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation When the Golden Dragon’s swooped down, the audience was not worried at all. They were all excited. Everyone could see the attributes of this Golden Dragon. Just one attack was enough to damage 250,000 points. No one could withstand it. Even if Lan Weiwei activated her true form and had 300,000 HP, she would not be able to withstand the second attack. However, Lu Chen was different! Even though his HP was only over 60,000, he could not withstand a single attack from his opponent. However, Lu Chen’s HP was now shared with White Fog City. This was definitely a force to be reckoned with! As long as Lu Chen kept on activating his Shield God title, he would be invincible. Even though the Golden Dragon’s attack power was as high as 250,000 points, after Lu Chen’s Shield God title, only 25,000 points could be landed on Lu Chen. However, when Lu Chen put on the White Fog City lord set, all the attacks received in the city were now reduced by 99%. In other words, only 250 attack points landed on Lu Chen. The rest were accumulated on White Fog City. Moreover, under the effect of being in White Fog City, Lu Chen could instantly recover to full health every second. This attack was the same as blowing air onto him. As expected, Lu Chen did not dodge. He did not even activate his Sword God title to take the initiative to attack. Instead, a golden light flashed above his head, and the Shield God title appeared in front of him. In an instant, a huge round shield enveloped Lu Chen. The shield had only been activated for less than a second when the Golden Dragon’s tail suddenly swung over. The Golden Dragon’s body was simply too huge. No matter where Lu chen went, he would be blocked. It flattened everything that stood in its way and struck Lu Chen’s shield. The Golden Dragon’s body crashed into Lu Chen’s shield with the force of a tsunami. A metallic clanging sound could be heard even from miles away. Even though the shield had weakened, this attack still forced Lu Chen to retreat dozens of meters. A gold tier boss was simply too powerful. This was the first time Lu Chen had been forced to retreat after activating Shield God. Moreover, the attack of the Golden Dragon seemed to have a tremor effect. His arm was still numb from the shock. Lu Chen shook his already numb hand and sighed in amazement. The Golden Dragon, which had just launched an attack, looked down at Lu Chen after sending him flying dozens of meters away. Its eyes actually revealed a trace of contempt like a human’s. It knew that 250,000 attack power could definitely cause great damage to Lu Chen. Although it did not know how the other party had created a city to surround it, it did not panic at all. At this moment, its scarlet tongue was sticking out of its mouth. It was certain that even if Lu Chen could use that strange shield to block 90% of its attack, 25,000 HP was enough to attack again. After a few times, it would still die. -25,000! Initially, the Golden Dragon was still feeling smug when it saw the red numbers. However, the next scene caused the boss to go numb. The tongue that had been trembling and hissing suddenly stopped. It could not even tremble in mid-air, nor could it retract its tongue. This was f*cking illogical! How could this be! What the f*ck was happening! The opponent has a bonus of 70,000 HP. What’s the use of inflicting 250 damage?! The opponent needed a recovery potion to recover from such a shock! Just as the Golden Dragon was beginning to suspect that the opponent was alive, a notification sounded in the sky. [Ding! White Fog City’s City Lord has been detected to have received damage. HP reduced. HP recovery effect activated!] In the next moment, Lu Chen’s HP was fully recovered! This caused the Golden Dragon’s brain to go completely blank. It had used all of its strength to attack the City Lord, but it had only managed to take away one grain of his HP. In the end, not only had the City Lord recovered, but the boss had lost HP from it. How was anyone supposed to play this game with him in it? Then, he immediately understood that this must have something to do with the city. Finally, he looked at the sky above White Fog City. As expected, in the vast white fog, there was a message board. It was information about White Fog City. [White Fog City] [City Level: Bronze] [Population: 24,305] [Available Positions: Magister, Holy Light, Paladin…] [Assets: 3,054,680] [City Defense: 1,303,921] [Magic Defense: 1,203,921] [City HP: 1,100,2936] [City Garrison: 15,000] [City Array: None] The Golden Dragon seemed to have understood something. Its raised head did not even move. It just swung its tail, and a sonic boom sounded in the air. It hit the shield in front of Lu Chen again. -250! Another drop of HP appeared above Lu Chen’s head. Once again, his HP was immediately fully restored. However, the Golden Dragon noticed that the HP of White Fog City had decreased! Although it had lost 10,000 HP, the defense of the entire city was also decreasing. In total, it had just 25,000 HP left. In other words, other than the reduction of the Shield God’s defense on Lu Chen’s body, all of his attacks had clearly landed on White Fog City! However, if he really wanted to reduce the defense and HP of White Fog City to zero, it would be too difficult. However, what surprised him was that Lu Chen did not seem to have any intention of launching an attack. Instead, he only activated the title of Shield God. The millions of players that watched Lu Chen fight the Golden Dragon in anticipation. THe only one that was puzzled was Xiao Bai, the number one enemy far away in the Western Castle. He had done a lot of research on Lu Chen. This person could definitely be called a warrior. When Lu Chen was still very weak, he dared to challenge the Ancient Ash Wolf directly and even challenged the Ancient Ash Wolf King together with the Ancient Ash Wolf. When Lu Chen was just an ordinary person, he dared to fight against the White Alliance, which was a huge existence in the entire Dragon Country. One against ten thousand, he killed his own direct descendant more than a hundred times at the Resurrection Point. Back then in the Xiao family’s manor, he had displayed the strength of the spiritual realm expert, which was far beyond Lu Chen’s realm. The other party still took the initiative to attack, not at all cowardly. He took out the Sword God title and fiercely hacked, not even using the Shield God title once. His kind of courage could be said to be the most ferocious one in the whole of Dragon Country! However, now that he had the title of the City Lord with him, it could be said that he was almost invincible in White Fog City. Therefore, why did he act like a coward instead, using the Shield God title instead of the Sword God title. Xiao Bai knew that if he followed Lu Chen’s previous momentum and used the Sword God title to fight, this Golden Dragon would probably be killed by him in half a day’s time. Especially if he used the assassination skill, Secret Whisper, the boss would probably die even faster. At this moment, Xiao Bai actually had a headache.. What kind of underhanded move was this guy holding? What was he trying to do?! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Xiao Bai was not the only one constantly guessing at the Western Castle. Liu Yang’s livestream room was already in an uproar. [Why is Morning Mist so cowardly? Why isn’t he attacking? That’s a little embarrassing.] [That’s right! He’s like a cowardly turtle. It’s not interesting at all to watch him passively take a beating. How can he have the title of a City Lord?] [This live broadcast is showing him being super passive. Why is it that the higher the level, the more cowardly he becomes?] [That’s right. Is Morning Mist’s plan to make the boss die from laughter?] [Stop making sarcastic remarks. When has Morning Mist ever cowered before? Have you seen him cower before? I believe that this is Morning Mist’s tactic.] [I suspect that Morning Mist has some passive skill? The higher his rage, the higher the damage he can deal?] [Maybe when Morning Mist has very little HP left, he might be able to kill the Golden Dragon in one hit?] [That’s unlikely. If he had this skill, Morning Mist would have used it when he was fighting Xiao Bai. He wouldn’t have waited until now. However, I really don’t understand why Morning Mist would do this.] Even Liu Yang could not understand Lu Chen’s actions. Could it be that Lu Chen had spent so much effort to specially summon White Fog City just to make himself more resistant to being beaten up? Only Lan Weiwei, who was not far away, looked deeply at Lu Chen. Her eyes revealed a thoughtful look. Furthermore, Rollie, who had always been focused on eating, drinking, and having fun, seemed to have stopped what he was doing. He extended his chubby and furry little hand and charged towards the Golden Dragon, waving it back and forth as if he was trying to express his goodwill. Although the Golden Dragon was puzzled, it did not stop what it was doing. It whipped, bit, and attacked Lu Chen many times. -25,000! [Ding! White Fog City’s City Lord has been detected to have received damage. HP reduced. HP recovery effect activated!] -25,000! [Ding! White Fog City’s City Lord has been detected to have received damage. HP reduced. HP recovery effect activated!] -25,000! [Ding! Detected that White Fog City’s city Lord has received damage. HP reduced. HP recovery activated!] … The Golden Dragon continuously attacked, as if it did not know what fatigue was. Lu Chen, on the other hand, continued to activate his Shield God’s effect. He did not retaliate at all. A few hours passed, but the Golden Dragon did not stop attacking. The defense of White Fog City was different from the armor on a person’s body. The defense of the city would gradually decrease with the attack of the enemy, similar to the amount of HP. At this moment, both the HP and defense of White Fog City had been reduced to half of their original amount. The Golden Dragon panted slightly. The player in front of it was really too durable. The audience in the livestream were also extremely shocked. This Golden Dragon did not seem to have exhausted its stamina at all. How could it continue fighting for a few hours? One had to know that in these few hours, it had already taken away tens of millions of HP. What made everyone even more speechless was that for such a long time, not only did Lu Chen not counterattack, he did not even dodge. He just took on the attacks of the Golden Dragon time and time again. [This Golden Dragon has been fighting for so long.] [Back then, when the Ancient Ash Wolf, Lan Weiwei, was subdued by the Morning Mist, it was not so difficult. Most of the time, he was waiting for the opportunity to strike.] [But did you guys see this Golden Dragon? His breathing has become heavy.] [That’s right. His originally indestructible body seemed to be trembling. I think he’s very tired.] [Everyone, look at this Golden Dragon. His eyes are actually moving around like a human. It seems like he’s thinking about something.] [Haha, Morning Mist is really too difficult to defeat. This Golden Dragon should be thinking of another way.] At this moment, Lu Chen was still displaying his Shield God title, maintaining a defensive state. Although he looked like a turtle in his shell, his gaze was incomparably firm, and even somewhat provocative. Then, he stretched out a hand and waved at the Golden Dragon. It was as if he was saying, if you are not satisfied, come again! At this moment, in the livestream, the audience was laughing like crazy. [Wow! Could this be the legendary noob who loves to play?] [Morning Mist will never be a coward. He will never be a coward in this life. At the very least, he must hide behind his shield and provoke!] [I must say that this is the best form of mockery!] Seeing that the audience’s passion had been aroused, Liu Yang also quickly made a comment and kept the ball rolling. “Come, come, everyone, all of you, brush up on your gifts. “Let’s give some support to Morning Mist and let the Golden Dragon understand that our Morning Mist army can not be defeated!” The Morning Mist army was what Liu Yang called the audience in his livestream. Lu Chen, who heard Liu Yang baiting the audience to donate money, was somewhat speechless. The Golden Dragon did not watch the live broadcast. What was the use of collecting on gifts? However, Liu Yang’s bait was effective. In just ten seconds, hundreds of thousands of gifts poured in, and all kinds of rockets, carnivals, and sports cars began to flood in! The Golden Dragon was still coiled around its body. Even so, its tall head was still over a hundred meters tall. At this moment, although it did not understand what the weak human in the distance was saying with a machine, it understood that it was being mocked as well. Then, it looked at Lu Chen, who had been hiding behind the shield and did not fight back, but kept provoking him. It was so angry that it roared loudly. There were even a few times when he wanted to kill Liu Yang, who was currently live streaming, but Lu Chen would still rush over to protect him. The Golden Dragon could clearly see that this human was fighting against him. THe Golden Dragon knew that Lu Chen was quicker, but chose not to attack. However, after such a long battle, it also discovered a problem. It would reduce the opponent’s HP by more than one third every time, but the opponent would need a one second delay to recover their HP. This also meant that if it could hit Lu Chen for three consecutive times within one second, he would be killed! Then, the audience saw the Golden Dragon once again reveal a sinister and cunning smile like a human! This kind of smile appearing on a Golden Dragon really made everyone feel very strange! However, everyone was also shocked by this Golden Dragon. [I remember that?Liu Yang said that a few hundred years ago, there was a silver boss in the Snake Pond who tried to transcend the heavenly tribulation and ascend!I now seriously suspect that the Golden Dragon back then definitely succeeded in transcending the heavenly tribulation, and that very Golden Dragon is the one Morning Mist is fighting!] [I agree. I feel that the Golden Dragon in front of him is becoming a f*cking spirit god!] [That’s right. When the Golden Dragon fought against Morning Mist, I thought that this Golden Dragon’s IQ might be even higher than mine…] <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation [That’s right, that’s right. Why are there divine beasts everywhere, but we can’t meet them? If only I could get a divine beast as a pet myself.] [Don’t think too much. If we meet such a monster, we’ll directly return to the Resurrection Point.] [Wait, what did you just say? Don’t you want a pet like that as well?] [I remember that the Golden Dragon’s name on the interface said that it was an ancient mutant, right?] [D*mn, I just noticed that as well. Morning Mist isn’t going to keep this one as his pet as well… right?] [Damn, I get it now! Morning Mist is planning to slowly subdue this Golden Dragon and let him realize how powerful he is so that he can submit to him.] [If you want to subdue it, why don’t you just defeat it directly? If you can’t beat it up, then beat it up twice!] [Do you think that the other party is as d*mb as you?! You can’t just beat it up and make it follow you around!] [A top-tier mutant like that would have a very strong self-awareness and would not easily submit.] [Didn’t you see that during the fight, the Three-eyed Golden Dragon was always looking at the information panel of White Fog City? Have you ever seen a boss that would look at the information of its opponent during the battle?] [Especially during the battle, the Golden Dragon has always been changing its battle style. Moreover, it has never used its strongest skill!] [This means that its intelligence far surpasses that of an ordinary ancient mutant. If you want to subdue it, you have to be far stronger than it can imagine!] The audience in the livestream was right. Lu Chen was indeed thinking of this. Back then, when he subdued Lan Weiwei, he had taken advantage of her weakness. When he subdued Rollie, the Ancient Panda, he had relied on the temptation of delicious food. If he wanted to subdue this ancient mutant with incredible combat strength, he had to use his true ability to completely crush him. As the audience was discussing, the Golden Dragon moved again. This time, its speed was twice as fast as before! -25,000! -25,000! After two consecutive attacks, more than half of Lu Chen’s HP was instantly taken out. Lu Chen’s HP instantly fell to less than 20,000 points! [Ding! Detected that White Fog City’s city Lord has received damage. HP reduced. HP recovery activated!] Even though Lu Chen’s HP had once again recovered to full health, this made the Golden Dragon very happy that its strategy was working. Right now, it was only missing one last attack. As long as its attack speed could reach three times quicker than a second, Lu Chen would be dead for sure! After receiving two consecutive attacks, Lu Chen was sent flying for hundreds of meters and was a little stunned. He did not expect the other party to actually notice this flaw, but the smile on his face became even wider. Lu Chen was not afraid of the other party’s attack, but he was afraid that the other party would not attack! The fiercer the Golden Dragon attacked, the more imposing it would be. In the future, when he defeated it, the other party would submit to him completely, which would be more advantageous for him to subdue and become his pet. One had to know that the title of the Taming God required the other party to be willing to be his pet. However, Lu Chen did not have time to think too much, because the next moment, the Golden Dragon attacked again. It was another two consecutive attacks. The time it took to attack was shorter. The Golden Dragon could no longer hide the smug look on its face. The corners of its mouth even curled up slightly! It charged towards Lu Chen once again! Three times! After hearing three bangs, the corners of the Golden Dragon’s mouth had already split open to the back of its head! This time, it succeeded! This arrogant brat was finally finished off. He could already imagine Lu Chen’s body turning into specks of light and dropping equipment all over the ground. The Golden Dragon roared into the sky! “Hey, silly Golden Dragon, what are you doing? Can’t you focus on the battle?” The Golden Dragon’s long roar was instantly interrupted! His huge head slowly lowered and opened its eyes in shock! Not only did Lu Chen not die, but his HP had once again recovered to full health! This made the Golden Dragon doubt everything. Could it be that the Golden Dragon was careless and d*mb? He carefully looked at Lu Chen’s HP again. It was indeed more than 68,000 HP. Although Lu Chen’s White Fog City’s City Lord title had two additional attributes?— the first having attributes doubled, and the second was that the damage immunity of the White Fog City was 99% — these two attributes seemed to have always been gray, and for some reason, they could not be used. The Golden Dragon was somewhat unconvinced, and it watched as Lu Chen waved his hand at it again. This provocation made it gather all the strength in its body once again, and it charged forward at lightning speed! Another three times! After this attack, the Golden Dragon stared at the HP above Lu Chen’s head. -25,000! -25,000! -13,030! Lu Chen’s 63,030 HP was instantly reduced to zero! This time, he was dead for sure The corners of the Golden Dragon’s mouth curled up to the back of his head once again! [Ding! Detected that White Fog City’s city Lord has received damage. HP reduced. HP recovery activated!] The Golden Dragon was shocked! What was going on? It had already killed him, how could he be revived?! Impossible! Looking at the smug Lu Chen, it started to panic. It quickly looked around. At this moment, he saw Lan Weiwei in the distance. Her HP had dropped by more than 10,000 points! It quickly looked at Lan Weiwei’s interface and realized that she was Lu Chen’s contracted pet. On top of that, they even shared HP! When it saw this, it immediately thought of something. Its body bent slightly backwards before it finally shot out fiercely! It hit the target! It did not know why, but that brat Lu Chen was clearly able to come and rescue her, but his body did not move at all. Even Lan Weiwei did not retaliate. She took the hit head-on and directly escaped. One had to know that Lan Weiwei’s HP would be doubled when she activated her true form. The Golden Dragon directly took out 250,000 of Lan Weiwei’s HP! Water Control! Knowing that its speed could not catch up to Lan Weiwei, the Golden Dragon immediately activated its Water Control skill. Once the AOE attack was used, it took away another 20,000 of Lan Weiwei’s HP! This time, even Lan Weiwei was only left with a short health bar. Following that, the Golden Dragon ignored Lan Weiwei and turned around to charge towards Lu Chen. The audience in the livestream cried out in surprise. [D*mn, this Golden Dragon is really smart. He actually killed Morning Mist’s pet in an instant!] [This is the end. Why didn’t Lan Weiwei stop it or dodge it? It’s clearly so fast.] [Exactly. Lu Chen didn’t go over to help either. Otherwise, he would have been able to reduce 90% of the damage once he activated Shield God’s title.] [This is getting too much for me. He had high aims, but it led to a total failure. Not only did he fail to catch the Golden Dragon as his pet, he even lost his other one.] [Does anyone want to pick up Morning Mist’s equipment with me? Let’s form a party together!] <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Watching Lan Weiwei’s health, the Golden Dragon roared in delight. The audience in the group also began to joke around. However, if these people really dared to pick up Lu Chen’s equipment, they would be absolutely courting death. To know that Lu Chen’s equipment is absolutely top-of-the-line, many in the Second World would kill each other to have it. Putting everything else aside, no one was sure if Lu Chen would still be the City Lord of White Fog City after he died. If he really was the City Lord of White Fog City, no matter who picked up Lu Chen’s equipment, they would all be instantly killed by the City Lord of White Fog City’s super strong attributes. Even if Lu Chen was no longer the City Lord of White Fog City, the big shots in the country and the experts of the Gu and Xu families would definitely protect Lu Chen’s equipment. At the very least, it would be divided among the top-tier big shots. However, only the truly top-tier big shots understood that no one would dare to steal Lu Chen’s equipment, unless they had a screw loose in their minds. For Lu Chen to be able to survive until now, the extent that everyone else could not catch up to was definitely due to his uniqueness. Although everyone tacitly agreed not to ask, who could guarantee that Lu Chen would not make a comeback? When that time came, anyone who stole his equipment would be killed by him. At this moment, almost everyone was paying attention to this huge change. Many people who were fighting monsters even retreated to the safe zone to watch the live broadcast. The number of people in the livestream kept rapidly increasing. In the blink of an eye, it had already exceeded two million people! Even the gifts given by the citizens in the livestream had already reached millions. One had to know that the higher-ups of the online platform had personally informed them. All the rewards in this livestream would not be split by the platform. All of them would belong to Lu Chen. The number of followers in the entire livestream was increasing, and the number of fans was also soaring. According to what Lu Chen had said before, Liu Yang could receive a 10% commission this time. It directly reached hundreds of thousands. This kind of money was definitely an astronomical figure for a middle school student. However, at this moment, Liu Yang’s face did not have a single trace of joy. Because he was hugging Lu Chen’s thigh while he faced an unprecedented crisis. He understood Lu Chen’s thoughts. He wanted to subdue this gold-tier ancient mutant in front of him. However, right now, Lu Chen gave him the feeling that he was at wits end. At this moment, he was even thinking, if Lu Chen really died and Lan Weiwei and Rollie were gone, how should he plan his route and bring Lu Chen’s equipment to him when he gets resurrected? At this moment, the Golden Dragon had already turned its gaze towards Lu Chen and charged forward. It attacked Lu Chen three times again! Following that, the Golden Dragon stared at Lu Chen’s health bar! He actually discovered that Lu Chen’s health bar had not changed at all! What was this situation? Was the Golden Dragon even trying?! [Shield God: Your understanding of the shield has reached an unfathomable level. When you use any shield, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow along with your level!] [Shield Spirit: You have a 1% chance to be immune to all damage!] At this moment, the Shield Spirit actually took effect! When he saw the Golden Dragon see the skill above Lu Chen’s head, it’s eyes were wide open. This human in front of it was too strange. If it were any other person, they would have been beaten to death 800 times by it. However, the person in front of it not only had an extremely high status and extremely strong defense, but he also had a terrifying pet like the Ancient Ash Wolf King. He even had an endless number of tricks up his sleeves. It could be said that during the past few hours, the other party had practically stood still and allowed him to fight. He had not even killed the other party. This made him feel a little frustrated, but at the same time, he also felt a hint of fear towards the man in front of him. However, he also saw clearly that the Shield Spirit of the Shield God only had a 1% chance of triggering. He did not believe that the other party would still be able to touch this chance if he attacked again! He spent three seconds to mentally prepare itself. Finally, it gathered the courage and charged at Lu Chen again. Shield Spirit activated! [Shield Spirit: You have a 1% chance to be immune to all damage!] The Golden Dragon was stunned. He was already lucky enough to have a 1% chance of touching it once. How could he trigger it twice in a row?! Suddenly, it raised his head and saw Rollie, who had yet to make any threats. The charmingly naive Rollie was still waving at him with his furry little hand. However, there was a new title on top of its head. Luck Bonus! [Luck Bonus: With Heaven’s blessing, there is a high chance of avoiding disaster, turning a bad situation into a good one, and averting a disaster! Provides a Luck buff for 60 seconds. Has a certain chance to be immune to all negative effects and damage.] It was actually this unremarkable little guy who activated the skill! The Golden Dragon was so angry that it roared loudly. The man in front of it was too despicable. He actually had so many methods to dodge its attacks. What made it feel the most helpless was that it did not really want to provoke this Rolling panda who inherited great luck. Rollie’s skill only had a certain chance of being immune to all negative effects and damage. Increasing its master’s luck value did not mean that it would be able to do it every time. The Golden Dragon understood that as long as it tried a few more times, it would definitely be able to break Rollie’s heaven-sent great fortune skill. However, at this point, the Golden Dragon was really not in the mood. It did not even have the courage to fight against Lu Chen. Especially after such a long, high frequency and intense battle, it was already somewhat exhausted. With its huge body and the natural attributes of this species, three attacks per second was definitely considered a high frequency attack. This also caused a certain burden on its body. After every second of relaxation, Lu Chen’s HP would be restored to full health under the buff for being the City Lord of White Fog City. Facing Lu Chen who was still in good condition, he decided to use the last attack. He was going to run away. Looking at Lu Chen, who was still waving at him from afar, the Golden Dragon was really angry, but it was also very weak in its heart. Let alone a human, even if it had suffered such a long and high-intensity attack, it would probably die more than once. What was the situation with this man? Could it really beat him? This time, its eyes revealed a deep fear. After calming down for more than ten seconds, it made his second attack. -25,000! -25,000! -13,030! His HP was completely depleted! This time, his HP was truly depleted! Looking at Lu Chen’s empty HP bar, the Golden Dragon was overjoyed. Then, he looked at Lan Weiwei in the distance again. Her HP was not enough for Lu Chen to recover. Once Lu Chen exceeded Lan Weiwei’s HP, both of them would die. This was exactly what the Golden Dragon wanted! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The Golden Dragon’s move was brilliant. As expected, Lu Chen did not receive HP from his pet and allowed himself to die. At this moment, the audience exploded! [F*ck, could it be that Morning Mist has gone too far?] [His f*cking HP bar is already at zero. What should we do?] [It can’t be, it can’t be, the number one expert of the Second World died just like that?] [The Golden Dragon is terrifying!] [This is simply a hellish level of difficulty that even we can defeat! Who else can kill this boss if not him?!] .. In the high-level meeting room of the Dragon Country. A group of high-level leaders were sitting in the meeting room and watching Lu Chen’s battle carefully. The conference room was more than five times bigger than the previous one. Besides the leaders who were sitting in the front, there were hundreds of top warriors standing behind them. Some of these warriors had been watching right from the start, but most of them were called out of the game pod at the last minute to watch and learn from Lu Chen’s battle in the conference room. Lu Chen’s battle was not only extremely powerful and fierce, but it was also full of tricks and skill. It was definitely worth it for all of them to imitate such steps. Although they could watch the live broadcast on their phones and television, there was the first elder of the Dragon Group here to explain it personally. This was absolutely incomparable. Stroking his beard, his gaze was deep. “I think everyone knows the name of the man in front of us. “If there’s anyone who doesn’t know, you can leave this place. “You may not know me, but you definitely must have known about Lu Chen, because he’s a man who stands at the top of the Second World! “According to the information we currently have, his title is Sword God, Shield God, Bow God, and he’s also proficient in assassination. It seems that he also has superb medical skills. “And you’ve all seen the equipment on him. The lowest level is silver, and there are even epic and legendary levels. “It’s no exaggeration to say that all of you combined aren’t even enough to defeat him with one hand.” The first elder’s words were very hurtful, but no one dared to refute it. Because it was absolutely true. Even the five-man team under the first elder of the Dragon Team, who had just been woken up, was huddled in a corner, shivering, afraid that they would attract the first elder’s attention and be scolded. However, the more they feared, the more they would be scolded. The first elder’s sharp gaze quickly swept across the entire scene and fixed on these five people. “Li Xiaotian, your team is called the Dragon Slaying Team, but this time, you’re just a useless dragon, and you’ve all been defeated. It’s too embarrassing to even look at you!” Li Xiaotian lowered his head and kept silent. He just wanted to find a place to hide. However, he also muttered in his heart, ‘You were the one that gave us that st*pid title!’ However, this matter of naming them had been long given. Who would have thought that one day they would really meet these legendary creatures? However, he only ridiculed them in his heart. He dared not to say it out loud. If he said it out loud, he would definitely be scolded again. Seeing that they did not answer back, the first elder continued to lecture, “I know that all of you here are veterans who have been on the battlefield for years, and even decades. “Now that you see a brat who is inexperienced and has surpassed all of you by so much you will definitely feel uncomfortable. “However, all of you have witnessed his fighting strength. Even my Elite Dragon Slaying Squad could not withstand a single move from the Golden Dragon. “Lu Chen, on the other hand, faced the Golden Dragon with an endless barrage of attacks. “He even looks practically at ease.” At this moment, there was finally a warrior who felt unconvinced, he opened his mouth and said, “First elder, I admit that Lu Chen is stronger than us, but I don’t think he’s at ease. His HP is about to be depleted. “I don’t believe that the Ancient Panda’s bloodline is so powerful that it can protect him every single time! “According to the current situation… “The Golden Dragon will be able to kill Lu Chen after a few more hits.” Although the other warriors did not say anything, their eyes revealed a hint of dissatisfaction. It was obvious that they agreed with the warrior’s words. No matter how they looked at it, Lu Chen was in imminent danger. The first elder did not answer directly. Instead, he said, “Li Xiaotian, you can answer this question for me.” When the members of the Dragon Slaying Squad heard that they had been called out, their hearts skipped a beat. They had already felt very embarrassed when they had failed the mission, but now that they had been called out repeatedly, they immediately felt ashamed. However, now that they had been called out by the first elder, they had no other choice but to cough under everyone’s watchful eyes. “Everyone, my current level is level 28.” The moment Li Xiao Tian introduced himself, everyone was shocked. The warriors in front of him were all at least level 10 and above. Some of them were even close to level 20. They were already the cream of the crop among humans. However, the members of the Dragon Slaying Squad were actually able to reach level 28. How did they do it? Li Xiaotian was very satisfied with everyone’s reaction. The shame he felt had somewhat recovered. “It can be said that my previous level was about the same as Lu Chen’s before we defeated the Fire Tiger’s. “Moreover, our group has always acted together. In order to get rid of that silver boss, we had made a lot of preparations and spent a lot of effort to do it. “I used to think that Lu Chen might not be stronger than us, but now, I feel that Lu Chen is definitely the strongest in existence. “In addition, Lu Chen is definitely not going to die. When he defeated the Ancient Fire Tiger, Lan Weiwei’s condition was already on the verge of death. If only a day had passed.. it would probably be very difficult for Lan Weiwei’s HP to recover to full health. “However, what he did was just as miraculous. After defeating the Ancient Fire Tiger, Liu Yang’s livestream room had already opened up, and Lan Weiwei’s HP had already returned to full health. “This meant that Lu Chen might have healing skills as well! “In addition, let’s look back at the time when Lu Chen subdued Lan Weiwei. Although the video at that time was extremely blurry, we could see that one time, Lu Chen’s health bar had also dropped to zero. “However, for some reason, it was as if he had been resurrected and was still full of health! “Finally, two of the buffs in White Fog City’s information had already turned gray. “I don’t think this is a limitation of White Fog City. I’m more inclined to think that this is a backup plan left behind by Lu Chen. He’s prepared to give the Golden Dragon a blow at the most critical moment should he need to. “However, his plan is to completely subdue the Golden Dragon!” After Li Xiaotian finished speaking, everyone had a clearer understanding of Li Xiaotian’s strength.. At the same time, everyone once again had a new view of Lu Chen. This man’s strength was definitely something else! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Even though Lu Chen’s strength had been acknowledged by everyone, there were still people who expressed their puzzlement. “Captain, if what you said was true and Lu Chen is intentionally suppressing his strength to deal with the Golden Dragon, then why didn’t he display his combat strength from the very beginning and directly suppress the other party?” Li Xiaotian was no longer as embarrassed as before. He regained his demeanor and slightly narrowed his eyes. He cautiously looked at Lu Chen in the video and said, “If I’m not wrong, what Lu Chen is trying to achieve is through some psychological tactics. “Someone had said this in the livestream before. “Here, I’ll tell you in more detail. Lu Chen wants to get the Golden Dragon to build up confidence again and again, and then repeatedly destroy its confidence. “This kind of feeling may be hard for you to understand. In the three kingdoms period, in order to make the barbarian race submit, Zhuge Liang made them fight harder and harder, finally, he let the other party understand Zhuge Liang’s strength and kindness for them to truly submit. “And now, Lu Chen wanted to use this method to completely destroy the other party’s psychological defense line. If the Golden Dragon had 100% trust in its own strength before, then it would be defeated by Lu Chen now. The Golden Dragon would definitely only feel anger and unwillingness in its heart. “But now, there is fear and panic in the Golden Dragon’s eyes. If it wanted to subdue now, the possibility of success would be far greater than at the beginning. “But now was not enough. “Because even though the Golden Dragon had lost the courage to fight, it still believes that there is still a chance for it to escape. “If this continues...; Even if Lu Chen could defeat him, the other party’s heart would often think of escaping. “Even if it did turn into his pet, if its master’s loyalty is not enough, it would probably devour its master or throw it away. That would not be worth the loss. “Therefore, Lu Chen’s real thought should be to first establish his undefeatable image, and then let the Golden Dragon know that there is nowhere to run. “Finally, Lu Chen would use his powerful strength and overwhelming aura to attack the other party until they are left with little or no more fight in their soul! “At this time, the Golden Dragon would voluntarily submit to Lu Chen. After all, as an ancient creature, his survival instinct has never been weaker than a human’s. “Moreover, under such circumstances, it will be very difficult for the mutant?to escape, because it has already lost the courage to do so. As for devouring the master, it would know it is impossible.” Li Xiaotian’s words were reasonable and easy to understand. Not only did it make all the soldiers present nod their heads, but even the first elder beside him was also satisfied. However, he still opened his mouth to refute, “Li Xiaotian, what you said was right, but there is one thing that is wrong.” Li Xiaotian quickly cupped his hands and lowered his head to ask, “Please enlighten me!” First Elder stroked his beard and said slowly, “Your current level is not level twenty-eight, but a level one.” At this moment, the air was completely silent, and a loud slap had appeared in Li Xiaotian’s face. In an instant, his face turned completely red. This slap to the face was too ruthless. He felt that he could not take it anymore. Seeing the other party’s embarrassment, the first elder actually smiled with some evil intent. “Alright, you can leave now. Later, I will ask the logistics department to provide you with a batch of basic equipment. With those equipment, you must work hard to raise your own strength. “If possible, I hope that you can defeat those bat monsters! “As for the Mass Grave, the name of this place sounds extraordinary. I suggest that all of you go around it instead of in it.” The bats that the first elder mentioned was one of the territories of the silver bosses. Attacking the Bat Cave would probably not be easier than attacking the Snake Pond. After all, the other party had air control, and humans were very passive when attacking from the ground. If they wanted to attack that place, they would have to raise everyone’s level to at least level 20. They just did not know if Lu Chen would give them that much time. … There were two sides to the story. Lu Chen’s battle situation seemed to be getting worse. At this moment, Lan Weiwei was already out of HP. Lu Chen had already suffered two consecutive devastating attacks. He had relied on Rollie’s good luck and his special shield skills. However, he was not so lucky in the following attacks. After all, even Rollie himself could not be immune to every attack. Another three consecutive attacks in a second, each of which dealt real damage! This damned human should be dead this time, right? The Golden Dragon panted out long breaths as it stared at Lu Chen. However, its intuition told it that something was not right. The other party would definitely not die so easily. However, that was impossible. It had already attacked him so many times, and he had used all sorts of methods to avoid it previously. This time, his health bar was reset to zero again. How could he still be alive? However, reality proved that the Golden Dragon’s feeling was correct. When Lu Chen’s health bar was reduced to zero, he was resurrected with full health in the next second! Undead! [Undead: Your understanding of death has reached an unfathomable level. When you die in battle, there is a 50% chance of resurrection. You can be resurrected up to three times in a row. Your skills will increase as the player’s level increases!] The f*ck! If the previous attacks had failed to kill Lu Chen, then this time, it had absolutely destroyed the Golden Dragon’s confidence. Was this still a human? Was this human a cockroach that could not be killed? It was one thing to be resurrected before, but now, there was actually a special resurrection skill that could resurrect him up to three times in a row! He had been fighting for a whole day, and had not officially died! If it continued fighting, it would probably die of exhaustion. Fear spread in the Golden Dragon’s heart, and at this moment, it finally reached its limit! The dignity of a gold boss and the dignity of an ancient mutant?were all thrown to the back of its mind! Facing this man, it no longer needed to be shameless, and saving its life was the only thought in its mind! Thinking of this, it did not even give itself the time to roar. It only rushed straight into the Snake Pond. The Snake Pond was its territory. No matter how strong Lu Chen was, he could not be bested in the water! The audience in the livestream were stunned. What the f*ck! What an awesome level 40 gold boss. Did the boss only react like this because it was fighting Lu Chen? This mutant?was amazing! It could bend and break others, and leave as it pleased. It could be as fierce as it wanted to be, and knew when to leave. Lu Chen finally smiled when he saw the Golden Dragon’s confidence had finally been destroyed. ‘You want to run? Dream on!’ Lu Chen threw a glance at Lan Weiwei, and she immediately understood. “Frost Domain!” Bouts of ice instantly covered the entire Snake Pond! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lan Weiwei’s reaction was very timely. Just as the Golden Dragon was about to enter the Snake Pond, she instantly used her Frost Domain to cover it up. Caught off guard, the Golden Dragon crashed directly into the ice. For a moment, countless pieces of ice were sent flying in all directions. A two-meter-deep crater was created. After all, Lan Weiwei had the Ancient Ash Wolf King’s bloodline and was in the process of evolving. The Frost Domain she controlled could not only slow down the enemy’s speed, but also turn the surrounding water into ice. The strength of this ice was extraordinary. Even a gold boss like the Golden Dragon was stunned by the impact. The Golden Dragon was both shocked and angry. It could never have imagined that such a situation would occur in it’s very own Snake Pond. Most importantly, it realized that this powerful skill actually came from the Ancient Ash Wolf King, who had never made a move beforehand. At this moment, the golden title above Lu Chen’s head changed again. The word Medicine God appeared above his head! In the next moment, a scene that left the Golden Dragon dumbfounded appeared once again. The Ash Wolf King, which was originally only left with low HP, had risen it’s bar by 15%! After the increase, not only did it not show any signs of stopping, but it continued to increase continuously for a full 30 seconds. After 30 seconds, Lan Weiwei’s HP was almost fully replenished once again! [Continuous Healing: The effect of your healing is outstanding. When you use your skills, you can cast a continuous healing on yourself. The healing time is 30 seconds. The healing effect is to recover 2% to 30% of your HP every second! When you use it on others, the effect will be reduced by half.] What kind of godly skill was this?! Even as a gold boss, the Golden Dragon was a little envious. If only it had this skill as well! At this moment, the Golden Dragon once again realized how powerful Lu Chen was. Originally, it had planned to wait for Lu Chen’s HP to be very low before using Water Control to drain 30% of the opponent’s HP. Then, it could easily kill the opponent. Now, it seemed that the opponent’s HP kept increasing. Not only did he share HP with Lan Weiwei, but he also shared HP with the entire city. One had to know that White Fog City’s HP and defense combined was seven to eight times more than the Golden Dragon. Coupled with the title of the Medicine God, his Water Control’s lifesteal skill had no effect on them at all! However, now was not the time to think about this. He only wanted to escape now. However, the water in the Snake Pond had already turned into ice. Its boss could only control the water to attack, but it could not turn the ice back into water. This time, it felt like it was at the end of the road. It was helpless. If it were any other time, the Golden Dragon would have roared and charged towards Lan Weiwei and Lu Chen again. However, it no longer had the courage to face Lu Chen. He could only try his best to beat the ice surface of the Snake Pond, trying to get into it. However, Lan Weiwei’s Frost Domain covered an area of a thousand meters deep into the Snake Pond. Even though the Golden Dragon’s attack power was powerful… it would be impossible for it to return to the bottom of the pond. Right now, the Golden Dragon had nowhere else to go besides the Snake Pond. The powerful defense of the entire White Fog City made it impossible for it to escape. At this moment, Lu Chen finally revealed a satisfied smile. The golden title above his head changed once again — Sword God! [Void Sword: The speed of your sword attack has reached an unfathomable level. There is a 10% chance of triggering this effect. Deals 20% maximum HP damage to the target. When this skill is triggered, you will be in an invincible state.] Lu Chen raised his greatsword and slashed at the Golden Dragon. “-547,200!” The Golden Dragon’s HP instantly decreased by 18%. This attack was high! The Golden Dragon roared and rolled on the spot. He had never imagined that such a weak human could actually deal such explosive damage. If the other party had such a powerful ability, why did he not use it in the beginning? If it had known that he was so powerful, it would not have fought Lu Chen at all! This was something that the Golden Dragon was beginning to regret. In the beginning, if it had not prepared to ambush the enemies on the surface of the Snake Pond, no one would have noticed it. The Golden Dragon would have been able to survive. However, now, it would be very difficult. No matter what attack the Golden Dragon shot out, Lu Chen dodged everything. Lu Chen’s basic attack was 78,860, with a maximum attack speed of 29. After the enhancement of the Sword God title, his maximum attack power was enough to reach 18,000,000 points! This kind of attack power was enough to take away this Golden Dragon with a single strike! Lu Chen knew that the maximum attack speed the boss could endure was simply not this high. If he had not received the boost from the White Fog City Lord title, his maximum attack speed per second would not be that high. Of course, Lu Chen would not use such a high critical strike. After all, he wanted to subdue the Golden Dragon, not destroy it senseless. Therefore, he controlled his attack power and raised the sword again. If the Golden Dragon could sense the danger from theVoid Sword skill just now, then at this moment, he could completely sense the aura of death. He could clearly feel that this sword had locked onto his aura. He could not dodge it no matter what. A huge sword light shot out from Lu Chen’s hand and headed straight for the Golden Dragon’s head! A painful roar came from the Golden Dragon’s mouth. The Golden Dragon, which was originally 100 meters tall, suddenly collapsed. “-2,492,799!!” This sword directly cut off the Golden Dragon’s 2,490,000 HP. The opponent only had 1 hp left! This was ruthless! With such HP, any person who could break through his defense would be able to kill him! At this moment, the Golden Dragon’s control over Lu Chen had reached its limit, and its psychological defense had finally completely collapsed. The Golden Dragon no longer struggled. The originally high head was lying flat on the ground, as if the Golden Dragon had submitted to Lu Chen! Seeing this scene, the entire livestream was once again in an uproar! [What the h*ll, what did I just see? This is a gold boss, a freaking gold boss! It actually submitted to Morning Mist already?!] [I’m already level 18. I’ve killed so many monsters, but I’ve never seen anyone submit to me. Morning Mist is awesome!] [What happened with that sword attack just now. That was amazing! 2,490,000 HP gone, just like that?! How did Morning Mist do it?] [To Morning Mist, obviously it would be easy.. All he needed to do was slash his sword and call it a day.] <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation [Morning Mist’s precise control is really awesome. How did he manage to leave his opponent with only a little HP after one slash?] [Haven’t you guys noticed? Morning Mist still has many skills that he hasn’t used before. Just based on the title of City Lord, there are two skills that are always hidden.] [I’ve noticed them all long ago. I think that Morning Mist is hiding those two skills on purpose because he’s afraid that his combat power will be off the charts and hurt the Golden Dragon’s pride…] As if to confirm the audience’s guess, Lu Chen directly activated the last two skills that were originally in a gray state. [In White Fog City, all damage caused will be increased by 100%. Attributes will be doubled.] [In White Fog City, the City Lord will be 99% immune to all damage!] Lan Weiwei launched her powerful attack at Lu Chen, a total of 50,000 points. However, Lu Chen only lost 500 HP at this moment! One had to know that this was before Lu Chen activated his shield. If Lu Chen had activated his Shield God title, this attack would probably only deal 50 points of damage. It could be said that this attack was extremely humiliating! At this moment, the Golden Dragon had already given up on its final struggle. It did not even have the thought of using its strongest attack. Even if it used its strongest move to allow Lu Chen to freeze, its attack three times per second would only be able to deal 750 damage to Lu Chen. What use was this? [Morning Mist’s skills are off the roof!] [This is too much! Before, I thought he was going to die countless times. He keeps coming back stronger and stronger!] [I can’t watch it anymore, I’m too jealous. When will the next city open? Who else has a teleportation scroll? I want to buy one.] [I’m so jealous. I want to be the City Lord too. There’s so many benefits.] [I advise you to give up on this idea. If you’re weak, you Ll probably die from the trial.] [Even if you do become the City Lord, you won’t be as strong as Morning Mist. He might even kill you in an instant.] [Even if Morning Mist lets you off because you’re all from Dragon Country, Xiao Bai will be the first to attack you when he comes back one day. Think about it. Can you do it?] [That’s right, I agree with what you said. Even if you become the City Lord of White Fog City you’d still get crushed.] [I think that even if you wear the City Lord set, you won’t be as strong as Morning Mist.] [You’ll be nothing more than putty in his hands…] [D*mn, your words are too hurtful. I can’t be a City Lord. Now I’m being compared to putty?] [I hope you know your limits. Even if you’re a City Lord and your combat power is too low, what’s the point?] [Just look at Morning Mist’s mysterious assassination skill. Can you withstand it?] [Once Morning Mist’s Shield God is activated, you won’t even be able to break through his defense.] [Alright, alright. You’re all telling the truth. However, the battle just now was too intense. Lu Chen’s act of pretending to be a wolf in sheep’s clothing was simply too awesome!] Just as all the livestream viewers were ready to see how Lu Chen was going to tame the Golden Dragon, the livestream came to an abrupt stop and was immediately shut down by Liu Yang. [What the h*ll? I haven’t even seen the ending yet. Why did he stop the stream?] [Don’t be like that. How could you miss out on the most exciting part?] [Hurry up and open the live stream. I have more gifts to give.] [I want to see how he tames this Golden Dragon!] The livestream was filled with desperate cries. Some people begged, while others cursed. However, Liu Yang ignored them all. This was because the less secrets about Lu Chen were exposed, the better. Perhaps some people with bad intentions would collate Lu Chen’s information into a book and start to target him in the future. When Lu Chen had used the title of Medicine God to restore Lan Weiwei’s health, Liu Yang had deliberately aimed the camera at the Golden Dragon. Everyone only saw that Lan Weiwei’s health had recovered a lot, but they were not sure what exactly had happened. Moreover, the Taming God title had never been exposed by Lu Chen as well. As Lu Chen’s underling, he could be said to be quite qualified. When Lu Chen saw what Liu Yang did, he too was also very satisfied with this new underling. [Taming God: Your understanding of taming and calling has reached an unfathomable level. When you try to capture and tame a target, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with the level of the target!] [Top-tier Capture: You can capture a target regardless of the level. Forcefully changing the target will take up a pet limit. Current slot — 2/3.] [Top-tier Domestication: When you communicate with your pet and feed it, there is a high probability of increasing intimacy and favorability.] [Dominator: Your pet will not be able to resist your orders.] [Ding! You have identified a pet that you can capture. Do you wish to have it?] “Yes!” Lu Chen answered without hesitation. One had to know that this Golden Dragon was a top-tier mutant. The ability and potential it had were definitely immeasurable. Although he had the support of the City Lord benefits, that was an external force after all. Now, the contract mutant could be his closest support. If one day he broke away from the title of City Lord, then he could rely on the powerful contract mutant. It seemed that his three pets had their own uses. Rollie belonged as a support element, providing him with luck bonuses. Lan Weiwei belonged as a semi-support and semi-damage class. Although her combat power was no longer strong enough, under the moonlight, she could increase her combat power by a lot. The combat power of the Golden Dragon in front of him could even reach 250,000 points, which was a real flat-a critical hit! In addition, it also had Water Control and Crazy Dragon’s Breath, which were super powerful AOE damage abilities. As well as Golden Gaze, which was a super skill! This kind of all-rounded help would definitely make him unstoppable! Following Lu Chen’s decision to keep the Golden Dragon as his pet, a new system notification rang. [Taming God: Your understanding of taming and calling has reached an unfathomable level. When you try to capture and tame a target, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with the level of the target!] [Top-tier Capture: You can capture a target regardless of the level. Forcefully changing the target will take up a pet limit. Current slot — 3/3.] [Top-tier Domestication: When you communicate with your pet and feed it, there is a high probability of increasing intimacy and favorability.] [Congratulations, your capture has reached its upper limit. You will now be rewarded!] <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation [All pets are rewarded with a 10% bonus to all attributes!] [Congratulations to the Golden Dragon for obtaining a reward. It can freely enlarge and shrink its own body.] [Congratulations to Lan Weiwei for obtaining a new skill — Moonlight Shield.] [Congratulations to the Ancient Panda, Rollie, for obtaining a new skill — Invincible Golden Body.] [Congratulations to the player on improving the Taming God title. New skill is now being rewarded — Bloodline Enhancement.] The series of rewards was so wonderful that even Lu Chen felt amazing! He immediately checked the situation of himself and his three pets! [Name: Morning Mist] [Taming God: Your understanding of taming and calling has reached an unfathomable level. When you try to capture and tame a target, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with the level of the target!] [Top-tier Capture: You can capture a target regardless of the level. Forcefully changing the target will take up a pet limit. Current slot — 3/3.] [Top-tier Domestication: When you communicate with your pet and feed it, there is a high probability of increasing intimacy and favorability.] [Dominator: Your pet will not be able to resist your orders.] [Bloodline Enhancement: You can sacrifice treasures and equipment you obtain to increase your pet’s bloodline. The higher the level of the bloodline, the stronger the pet’s attributes and skills will be.] … [Ancient Ash Wolf King] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Lan Weiwei] [Intimacy: 170] [Level: 33] [Attack: 30,800 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff)] [HP: 165,000 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff)] [Defense: 1,200 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff)] [Magic Defense: 1,320 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff, totalling to 1,600)] [Skills: Demonic Flame, Frost Domain, True Form Transformation, Ash Wolf’s Fury, Moonlight’s Blessing, Ash Wolf’s Howl, Soul Tracking, Moonlight Shield.] [Demonic Flame: The Ancient Ash Wolf King spits out terrifying demonic flames, causing 18,000 physical and magic damage per second to the enemy in front of it.] [Frost Domain: Creates a frost domain, slowing down the enemy’s attack speed and casting speed by 50%.] [True Form Transformation: When transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf King, all attributes increase by 50%.] [Ash Wolf’s Fury: The Ancient Ash Wolf King awakens the sleeping bloodline in its body, greatly increasing its own attributes, and has a chance to obtain an additional skill!] [Moonlight’s Blessing: Under the moonlight, all attributes increase by 50%.] [Soul Tracking: When this skill is used, it can leave a mark deep within the target’s soul. It can track up to three people. The mark will remain for three months. This skill can be shared with the owner.] [Ash Wolf’s Howl: The exclusive skill of the Ancient Ash Wolf. It will have a different effect as the bloodline awakens. When the Ash Wolf howls at the moon, it will deal 12,000 magic damage per second to enemies under the moonlight for 60 second!] [Moonlight Shield: Under the moonlight, it can continuously add a personal light shield to teammates and the pet. It can reduce 50% of the damage. Lasts for several seconds, reducing HP by 5,000! With every additional light shield gained, the cost will be doubled.] … [Ancient Panda] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Rollie] [Intimacy: 140] [Level: 15] [Attack: 2,750] [HP: 132,000] [Defense: 22,000] [Magic Defense: 22,000] [Skill: Luck Bonus, Invisible Golden Body] [Luck Bonus: With Heaven’s blessing, there is a high chance of avoiding disaster, turning a bad situation into a good one, and averting a disaster! Provides a Luck buff for 60 seconds. Has a certain chance to be immune to all negative effects and damage.] [Invisible Golden Body: There will be a chance to cast this skill for each battle. When casting the skill, it will not be able to move for three seconds. However, it would be immune to all damage.] … [Golden Dragon] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Unknown] [Intimacy: 65] [Level: 40] [HP: 3,344,000] [Attack: 275,000] [Defense: 180,800] [Magic Defense: 144,584] [Skills: Water Control, Crazy Dragon’s Breath, Golden Gaze, Body Shrink.] [Water Control: The exclusive skill of the Golden Dragon. It will have different effects depending on the awakening of its bloodline. It creates a water domain and controls the water within the domain. It can control the blood in the body of a living creature! There is a certain chance to directly extract the enemy’s HP and replenish it on one’s own body. At most, it will be one-third of the enemy’s total HP. It can only be used once in a single battle! There is even a chance to awaken the bloodline in the body and complete the transformation!] [Crazy Dragon Breath: Spits out a dense fog filled with poison, covering an area of 1 square kilometer. Any enemy who inhales the poison would lose 1,000 HP every second, this lasts until the enemy dies.] [Golden Gaze: The Three-eyed Golden Dragon is an ancient mutant. It was originally a Three-eyed Golden Python. A few hundred years ago, it received the heavenly tribulation and became a Three-eyed Golden Dragon. Its third eye was the horn of a dragon! When the giant Python uses this skill, it could freeze the opponent for one second! Within that one second, all of the opponent’s defense will be lost! Can only be used twice per day!] [Body Shrink: Can change its own size within a certain range, has no effect on combat strength and speed.] It had to be said that although Lu Chen’s strength did not increase through this battle, not only did his pet have a 10% increase in attributes, each of them had gained an additional skill. To Lu Chen, this was equivalent to having three more amulets. In particular, the Taming God battle strength was the biggest reward in itself. Compared to getting gold-tier equipment, this made him even happier. Moreover, the skills these three pets obtained were very bountiful. The skills that the Ancient Panda obtained could protect him for three seconds, and made him immune to all damages. Lu Chen could just hold Rollie up and use him as a shield. It was even more powerful than the Shield God’s effect as well! In the distance, Rollie was originally eating bamboo shoots, but for some reason, his body suddenly felt a chill, and he suddenly shivered. He looked around doubtfully, but he did not find anything unusual, so he buried his head and continued to munch on his meal. The new skill that Lan Weiwei had obtained did indeed cost her HP. However, her skill was also extremely powerful. It could filter out 50% of the enemy’s damage. One had to know that if the enemy was as terrifying as the Guardian General in White Fog City back then, and the enemy could deal over a hundred million critical hits, then the Moonlight Shield of the Ancient Ash Wolf King could filter out 50,000,000 damage. Even if it consumes 5,000 HP in one second, this skill should not be underestimated! The skill that the Golden Dragon obtained was just as powerful as well. As an Ancient Mutant, the probability of him transforming into a large dragon was very high. Although this skill did not have a direct combat effect, it could be used as a daily support. It could be used as a scout or a form of transport! In the future, if there was a place that was too small, the Golden Dragon could turn into an extremely tiny snake and enter. If there was a place that was too high, it could turn into a giant pillar and carry him up! It would definitely help him in his journey! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation This was definitely a great harvest for Lu Chen. Now that he had three pets, he could also improve their bloodlines. Right as Lu Chen was feeling pleased with himself. The Golden Dragon that was lying on the ground suddenly shrunk to only 30 centimeters long. It was shining with a golden light and looked small and cute. The miniature Golden Dragon slithered to Lu Chen’s feet with a fawning expression. It stretched out its petite and cute head and gently rubbed against Lu Chen’s feet. Then, it climbed up along the leg of Lu Chen’s pants and climbed into Lu Chen’s palm. This made countless girls behind the livestream room melt. [Wow, it’s so cute! It’s so beautiful!] [How could such a ferocious giant mutant become so small and cute? This is such a big contrast!] [Morning Mist, can you let this little dragon breed more so we each can have one? I’ll give you 100 million dollars for it!] [What a joke! This is a gold-tier boss! The one it gives birth to must be at least a silver-tier boss, and it also has the bloodline of an Ancient Mutant. You want to buy it with 100 million? I’ll give you 1,000 million!] [Are you kidding me?! What’s the point of giving so much money? Right now, the Second World’s shops only allow players to buy silver-tier equipment with money.] [Morning Mist, if you’re willing, give me this Golden Dragon. I’m willing to give you some epic equipment!] [Holy sh*t! Epic equipment?! Where did this person come from? That’s crazy!] [Where did this high-ranking official come from to give epic equipment? As far as I know, even the White Alliance didn’t have such amazing things.] [That’s right, that’s right. Not to mention the Xiao family, even the Gu family and the Xu family don’t have any epic equipment. Who’s the person that said that?] [Hehe, you people are really short-sighted. Who is the Gu family and Xu Family? Who is the Xiao family? I am an existence that you will never be able to look up to. Not just one epic piece of equipment, but we can even take out two or three of them.] [It’s obvious that these two are not the same person. However, both of them seem really arrogant. They actually said that they can take out more than one epic equipment.] … Lu Chen would definitely not change his equipment. His White Fog City equipment set was at least an epic equipment. Meanwhile, this gold-tier boss was definitely more valuable than anything anyone would offer. However, their offers made the players somewhat suspicious. Could it be that there were still many unknown powerhouses in the Second World? Were these powerhouses originally in the Second World, or did they grow especially fast after entering the game with everyone else? Who were these people? Why had there not been any news about them before? Countless mysteries revolved around these people’s short speeches. Their speeches had caused a ripple effect on the calm and still water. Everyone was questioning their existence. … The three-eyed Golden Dragon comes first to Lu Chen because it?was indeed very powerful. This strength was far beyond his imagination. Secondly, because it had trained for hundreds of years, only then did its level and combat ability improve a little. However, as soon as it became Lu Chen’s pet, it immediately increased it’s attributes by 10%. This level of growth would take at least thousands of years to improve, but Lu Chen only used one minute to do it! In an instant, its approval of Lu Chen increased rapidly. Unfortunately, it did not have an ability to turn into a human form. Otherwise, it would probably be pulling Lu Chen and acting coquettishly. Although its lifespan had already reached thousands of years, as a snake that was about to become a dragon, it was still considered a child. Lu Chen looked at the Golden Dragon in front of him and was also very fond of it. “I hope that you can transform into a dragon as soon as possible in the future. From now on, I’ll just call you Little Golden Dragon.” When the Little Golden Dragon heard the new name that Lu Chen had given, it instantly fell in love. After all, becoming a dragon was its greatest wish, and it was also the greatest wish of all the snakes in the world. In the distance, Lan Weiwei also transformed into her human form once again. She leaned over and stretched out her hand, aggressively patting the Little Golden Dragon on the head. Lan Weiwei was taking revenge for the previous battle. Although she could not defeat it, she still had to take revenge for the Little Golden Dragon’s current state. Of course, Lan Weiwei only gave the Little Golden Dragon a welcome slap. Not only did the Little Golden Dragon not dodge, it turned its head and continued to rub against Lan Weiwei’s palm. It was quite cute. Only Rollie, who was looking at the Little Golden Dragon from afar, rolled his eyes. Why did everyone else have such a nice name but himself? Feeling sad, he could only hold the bamboo shoot in his hand and walk further away, leaving behind a fat and lonely figure...; Fortunately, Liu Yang comforted him, and after a while, Rollie returned to his playful nature. The Little Golden Dragon was intimate with Lu Chen for a while, and then he began to shake his head. Lu Chen was a little confused. The Little Golden Dragon shook its head and pointed in a certain direction. Seeing that Lu Chen did not understand, the Little Golden Dragon was a little anxious. It quickly climbed down Lu Chen’s pants and pulled Lu Chen’s pants toward the center of the Snake Pond. The Little Golden Dragon was only 30 centimeters long and did not look big, but it was strong enough to drag Lu Chen forward. The Little Golden Dragon kept dragging Lu Chen into the Snake Pond. When they reached the edge of the Snake Pond, it even signaled Lan Weiwei to remove the Frost Domain. The Little Golden Dragon had just joined their team, so Lan Weiwei was still worried. She glanced at Lu Chen. Although Lu Chen did not understand what the Little Golden Dragon was saying, he knew that the other party did not mean any harm. Moreover, he had signed a pet contract, so the Little Golden Dragon would never disobey his orders. Lu Chen nodded at Lan Weiwei, indicating for her to remove the ice seal in the Snake Pond. In the next moment, a blue halo covering an area of 1,000 meters instantly returned to Lan Weiwei’s body. The Snake Pond, which had been frozen solid, turned into water again, and no traces of the fight could be seen anymore. The Little Golden Dragon was a little envious of the scene. At the same time, it sighed in his heart. If the other party had not used this skill, he might have been able to escape. Of course, this was just what it thought. The Snake Pond had already merged with Lu Chen’s White Fog City. No matter how deep the Little Golden Dragon escaped, it would still be within the White Fog City’s borders. However, the Little Golden Dragon did not regret it at all. In fact, it even felt like it made the wisest decision of all! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Although the Golden Dragon is an ancient mutant, it had a unique advantage over ordinary creatures. However, this was also a disadvantage. After all, it was a mutant, and it had three eyes on its head. If an ordinary snake wanted to turn into a dragon, they only needed to go through the tribulation step by step. However, if it wanted to turn into a dragon, even though it could tremendously grow in the beginning, it would be extremely difficult in the later stages. It had to refine the eye on his forehead in order to succeed. Otherwise, it would only be a demon dragon and not a true dragon. It knew how difficult it would be. If the Golden Dragon was not careful, it would die and disappear into ashes. The reason why it did not attack Rollie earlier was that the other party had extremely strong luck. If it killed Lu Chen, the Golden Dragon would think of a way to keep Rollie to have an abundance of luck. During the battle, the Golden Dragon even thought that Lu Chen was constantly taking advantage of Rollie’s heaven-sent good luck. Otherwise, he would have died long ago. However, now, it saw things differently. Rollie was an Ancient Panda protected by a heavenly blessing. How could that little fellow be easily subdued by a random person? It was clearly Rollie’s luck that allowed him to become Lu Chen’s pet! That was why the Golden Dragon felt that if it followed Lu Chen, the probability of it evolving into a dragon would increase greatly! If the Little Golden Dragon had refused to become Lu Chen’s pet, it would have refused to do so. Right now, it was already thinking about how to compete with the other two pets to display its greatest value. Seeing that the Snake Pond had turned into a pool of water again, the Golden Dragon directly dived into the water. Then, it poked his head out to signal for Lu Chen to follow closely. Lu Chen thought for a moment and waved at Liu Yang. Liu Yang walked over and very consciously gave him a diving suit that suited Lu Chen’s figure. After Lu Chen put it on, he immediately jumped into the water. Immediately after, Lu Chen’s powerful physical fitness and combat standards were revealed. Back then, Hou Zi, who was a member of the Dragon Team, had swam for nearly an hour. Lu Chen, on the other hand, had only spent less than 20 minutes to get into the place where Hou Zi was, that was where the silver boss had been. If Hou Zi had been here to witness it, he would have been dumbfounded. The place where the silver boss had been was not the deepest part of the Snake Pond. Without the silver boss covering the place, one could see that it was dozens more meters deeper. Lu Chen swam through the hole. It took him nearly half an hour to reach the deepest part of the Snake Pond. This was the Golden Dragon’s territory, the deepest part of the Snake Pond. After swimming in the dark for nearly an hour, Lu Chen could not tell when he entered the Golden Dragon’s territory! Here, countless gold coins were piled up into a small mountain, shining with a dazzling light. At the highest point of the pile of gold was a huge luminous pearl, and it emitted a light that illuminated the entire cave! On top of that, there were not only countless gold coins, but also countless kinds of rare treasures. The impact this brought to Lu Chen was far more shocking than the scene in the silver warehouse when he first arrived at White Fog City. This was the bottom of the Snake Pond. No one would come here. Where did the treasures come from? It was unlikely that the two bosses had looted these items from the players outside because the current players were all very poor. Suddenly, Lu Chen thought of a possibility… The Little Golden Dragon had lived here for thousands of years. If it had been collecting these items for thousands of years, then it was not impossible! However, this also meant that there were definitely older players in the Second World! Moreover, the strength of these older players would definitely be high. If they were just ordinary players, they would definitely not come to a place like the Snake Pond, which was deep down under. One had to know that the Little Golden Dragon had already been a gold boss over a thousand years ago. Those who dared to come here were all experts! Even if they could not defeat Lu Chen, they were still experts who could rival the Dragon Slayer Team. In addition, Lu Chen had long since guessed that there used to be people residing in White Fog City. However, they were just not there now. This meant that the city was a ruined city. Who were the people who had come to this ruined city? The low-level refugees?! The low-level criminals?! The possibilities were endless! How high was the overall combat strength of the Second World’s original players? And how many experts had come here? If they were all like him, people from the original world. Did they harbor strong enmity? Once the Second World and the original world truly merged, would the original world collapse? This series of thoughts flashed through Lu Chen’s mind like a movie. It made him extremely terrified. At this moment, Lu Chen suddenly realized that there was an ancient scroll buried in the gold coins. He curiously walked forward and took out the scroll. When he opened it, he saw that it was a skill. [Water Avoidance: By cultivating this skill, one could be like a fish. Players can freely swim in the water without needing air to breathe.] When Lu Chen saw this skill, he was delighted. “I want to learn this!” In the next second, the scroll disappeared. Following that, a light green light surrounded Lu Chen. Three seconds later, the light disappeared. Lu Chen tried to remove the oxygen mask that was stuck to his mouth and slowly breathed. At this moment, he actually felt as if he was on land. He was able to absorb the oxygen in the water and convert it to breathable air for his lungs! He even felt that his breathing at this moment was even more comfortable than in the air, as though he had been a fish all along! It was too strange! This skill was absolutely practical! If the Little Golden Dragon had hidden at the bottom of the Snake Pond and Lu Chen wanted to defeat him, the only way was to use the White Fog City Lord’s special effect to directly teleport to the bottom of the Snake Pond to eliminate him. However, once the other party was not in White Fog City, this method would lose its effectiveness. Fortunately everything was different now. No matter how deep the other party swam in, he could freely fight underwater! He carefully looked at the surroundings of the gold piled mountain. There were at least five to six skill scrolls in his field of vision. Lu Chen opened them one by one. As he expected, the skill scrolls here were all the most basic skill scrolls. This proved that none of the players who came here were experts. However, these things could be of value to some other people. He continued to search for more skill books. The remaining skills were not worth the time for Lu Chen, so he did not learn them. Now, another question arose. How should he take away all these things? The Golden Dragon who was being triumphant at the side seemed to know what Lu Chen meant and slipped into the mountain of gold. After about five or six seconds, a little golden head popped out again, and there was a ring in his mouth! Lu Chen’s eyes lit up. It was an Interspatial Ring! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Little Golden Dragon was smart! Lu Chen rubbed Little Golden dragon’s head happily, then took the Interspatial Ring. The ring was bronze in color, and there was a dark blue gemstone inlaid on it. There were specks of stars within, and it was unknown what flickered inside. It looked like a brilliant starry sky, deep and mysterious. Inside, it felt like one was looking at the milky way from far away. Lu Chen quickly checked the information on the ring. [Name: Interspatial Ring] [Rank: Silver] [Size: 200m] [Remark: Able to store inanimate objects (can be upgraded).] Seeing this, Lu Chen’s mood lightened up. The 200 cubic meters of gold coins in front of him should be able to fit in this ring! Even if there was some surplus, he had long thought of what to do with it. Little Golden Dragon had given him such a big surprise, so he had to properly reward him. Then, he put the gold coins into his Interspatial Ring. The rest of the rare treasures, such as the bones of various beasts, were left. Then, Lu Chen’s Little Golden Dragon ran over with a puzzled but happy face. The next moment, a title appeared above Lu Chen’s head. [Taming God] [Bloodline Enhancement: You can sacrifice treasures and equipment you obtain to increase your pet’s bloodline. The higher the level of the bloodline, the stronger the pet’s attributes and skills will be.] Then, Lu Chen picked out something that looked like a snake scale from the pile of beast bones. This scale looked extremely huge. The size of this scale was dozens of meters wide. It was a Dragon Scale. A true dragon scale could nourish dragon-type creatures and increase their strength. Little Golden Dragon tilted its head and looked at Lu Chen. It did not understand why Lu Chen stood beside this scale. The reason why it evolved so quickly was because of this Dragon Scale. The next moment, something appeared. Lu Chen waved his hand, and the Dragon Scale that was more than a hundred square meters melted. It was like a liquid, condensing into a ball. Then, there was something inside that kept peeling off and splitting apart. That feeling was as if impurities were being removed. Even so, the ball was the size of a room. Then, this liquid-like scale that flickered with golden light spun rapidly. As it spun, it threw out all kinds of impurities from it. It took half a minute before it stopped. At this time, the Dragon Scale had turned into the size of a fist. This was simply too magical to Little Golden Dragon. It had tried countless times to refine this scale before, but no matter what it did, it could not cause any damage to the scale. However, Lu Chen had condensed it into its purest form in less than ten seconds. The rich nutrients inside had already made the Little Golden Dragon drool. It was sure that it contained a pure dragon bloodline inside! However, Lu Chen made Little Golden Dragon wait a while longer. He turned his head and purified the other treasures. All of them had been purified by the Taming God’s Bloodline Enhancement skill. Then, with a bunch of items in his hands, he brought the Little Golden Dragon back to land. As soon as Lu Chen went ashore, he threw the diving suit to Liu Yang. The audience had sharp eyes, so they analyzed the diving suit. [Why does this diving suit look familiar to me?] [I think I’ve seen it somewhere before.] [Oh right, the badge on the chest of the diving suit seems to be the serial number of a party.] [D*mn, that looks like it’s from the Dragon Slayer Team. Isn’t that the symbol of the Dragon Team?] [So, the person who killed the silver boss boss before was a member of the Dragon Team?] [That’s awesome. I’m impressed!] [Awesome my *ss. Didn’t you see the equipment dropped by the Golden Dragon?] [What equipment? The Golden Dragon was killed by Morning Mist!] [How tragic! How easy was it for Lu Chen to kill the Little Golden Dragon? I think it must have been as easy as the Dragon Team getting killed!] [I don’t know if you guys saw it clearly, but there were five pieces of equipment on the ground. In other words, there were probably five of them that got killed.] [That’s right! There are also five backpacks. It seems that the members of the Dragon Team aren’t that good either. They’re far inferior to Morning Mist.] [Morning Mist is not a person, he’s a god! Think about it, are there any ordinary players who can even kill a gold boss?] [No one would!] [Even if they send 10,000 players over, they’ll still be sending their people to death. 50,000 of them would not even be enough to win.] [Hey! Watch it, the Dragon Team is very strong!] [That’s right. The Dragon Team is very powerful. It’s just that Morning Mist is even stronger.] In the meeting room of the high-level officials of the Dragon Country. Everyone watched the live stream while comments flashed past. The meeting room was the opposite of the livestream, it was extremely quiet. The members of Li Xiaotian’s Dragon Slayer Team were shivering and dared not to speak. All the high-level officials of the Dragon Country were sitting in their seats with extremely gloomy faces. “First elder, I think we’re just unlucky...;” “Shut up!” First elder interrupted a member of the Dragon Slayer Team, “All of you, remember, luck is also a part of strength! “If you’re not convinced, then raise your level, raise your combat strength, and beat up Lu Chen! “Go and farm a monster stronger than his pet! “Otherwise, shut up! “I won’t allow any of you to be jealous and say something out of spite.” Then, the first elder raised his head and slowly glanced at the senior leaders. He said, “I think it’s time to start that plan.” When the other senior leaders, including the chief third in charge, heard the first elder’s words, they could not help but be shocked. The chief third in charge frowned and thought for a full three minutes before asking, “First elder, are you confident in that? Won’t there be too many casualties? “These people are all elites of our Dragon Country. I don’t want them to have any mishaps.” The first elder took a deep breath and said with a solemn expression, “They’ve been living a comfortable life for too long. It’s time for them to learn. “They won’t be able to grow quickly without experiencing violent storms. “It must be known that the other countries have long sent their elite soldiers to the most dangerous places to train. “Although Lu Chen is the hope of our Dragon Country, people will sometimes fail. If one day Lu Chen really fails, what will our Dragon Country do? “At that time, who would we turn to? If they don’t train now, they will die in the future. “Therefore, we must cultivate more talents like Lu Chen. In order to achieve this goal, even if there are sacrifices to be made now, it will all be worth it.” The chief third in charge was silent for a long time, but in the end, he agreed with a sigh. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Then, he looked up at the hundreds of soldiers in front of him. His eyes betrayed a trace of reluctance. Then, he averted his gaze, not daring to look at them again. In the end, the chief third in charge got up and left. When he reached the door, he seemed to have suddenly remembered something. He turned his head slightly and spoke to the rest of them in the room. “Then… let’s do as the first elder says. However, I don’t want unnecessary sacrifices to occur in Dragon Country. “First elder, you must give me the best equipment for these soldiers. “There’s no need to ask for approval, just take the money and use it directly.” The other senior leaders of the Dragon Country followed the footsteps of the chief and left the conference room. For a while, the entire conference room was filled with the warriors of the Dragon Country. The warriors looked at each other, not knowing what had happened. The first elder cleared his throat slightly, then looked at all the warriors with a serious expression. “I think you should know about Li Xiaotian’s Dragon Slayer Team. Their goal was to go to the Snake Pond to defeat the silver boss. “But that was not their final goal. “The Snake Pond was only the first step of their training. “According to their original plan, they wanted to kill the silver boss of the Snake Pond, upgrade their equipment, and then go to another place to improve their strength. “When that happens, they were even going to bring all of you along. “Destroying the Snake Pond was originally part of their plan. If it weren’t for the appearance of a gold boss like the Golden Dragon, the Snake Pond would have been destroyed long ago. “Moreover, there wouldn’t have been any casualties. “The place that you guys are going to next is a place where you will have a slim chance of survival! “If any of you guys want to quit now, you can tell me. I know that it’s not easy for you guys to reach your current level. “But I have to say, if you guys go to that place, your strength will definitely improve by leaps and bounds!” All the members of the Dragon Slayer Team looked at each other. They were not prepared for this at all. They had never heard of what the first elder was talking about. Only the members of the Dragon Slayer Team looked at each other with a hint of worry in their eyes. Although the warriors did not know what the first elder was talking about, they were all well-trained top-notch warriors who had participated in the battle for many years. They would never back down knowing what was going to be in store for them. After a few seconds of doubt, they looked at the first elder with determination again. There was no fear or cowardice in their eyes. The first elder looked at them and revealed a satisfied expression. “Alright, then I’ll cut to the chase. The place you’re going to next is the Mass Grave!” As soon as he said this, the entire place was in an uproar. There were six silver territories around White Fog City. Among these six, the strongest were the Ancient Ash Wolf King and the Ancient Fire Tiger. Of course, the Golden Dragon in the Snake Pond was not included. After all, it was not supposed to be there. If one counted the Little Golden Dragon, it would definitely be the strongest of these territories. There was only one exception, and that was the Mass Grave. According to the Dragon Country’s statistics, the number of players that went to the Mass Grave was the lowest, but the death rate was definitely the highest. Some people even claimed that they had discovered existences as powerful as silver bosses even on the outskirts of the Mass Grave. Moreover, according to different players, they had not seen the same silver lord twice. This also meant that the bizarre existences in the Mass Grave were far stronger than the other five domains. After a long period of time, the Mass Grave had become a forbidden area for players. However, there were also many players who had picked up extremely powerful equipment inside. Some players had even picked up legendary equipment, becoming the strongest batch of players. Even so, everyone knew that these opportunities were hard to come by. If anyone went in, they would definitely die. Even those who got lucky in the Mass Grave kept a tight lid on the situation inside. From this, one could see that the danger inside was beyond people’s imagination. What was ridiculous was that the first elder of the Dragon Team dared to give such an order. It definitely took a lot of courage to say this. The first elder was extremely satisfied when he saw that none of the Warriors had a hint of cowardice in their eyes. He raised his hands high and continued. “Originally, we planned to let the Dragon Slayer Team return from the Snake Pond and lead everyone into the Mass Grave. “With the five of them leading the way, the dangers involved would be much less. “However, as you can see, the existence of the Golden Dragon has caused the entire Dragon Slayer Team to be annihilated. So I temporarily transferred the Soul Slayer squad back from abroad to carry out their mission here. They will lead the charge in the Mass Graves for you! “You are all heroes of the Dragon Country. I will be here to look forward to your triumphant return.” Hearing the words Soul Slayer Team, the eyes of all the warriors suddenly lit up. If they were determined to serve their country with their lives, then at this moment, they really lit up with hope. This was because the Soul Slayer Team was one of the few existences in the Dragon Team that could be compared to the Dragon Slayer Team. More importantly, the Soul Slayer Team often carried out missions in the country, dealing with extreme emergencies in a dangerous environment. This was similar to the situation in the Snake Pond. Only the final destination would have a boss. The Soul Slayer squad fought in foreign war-torn places all year round, where danger was everywhere. They would not know when someone would fire at them with a heavy weapon, so they had to have constant vigilance. Their alertness and sensitivity to danger were far greater than anyone else’s. The situation in the Mass Graves happened to coincide with their usual environment. With their leadership, their chances of survival would be greatly increased. Although the Dragon Slayer Team and the Soul Slayer Team were rivals, they were constantly competing with each other in the open and in the dark. They were unwilling to admit that the other party was stronger than them. However, under the circumstances that they were going to the Mass Grave, even the members of the Dragon Slayer Team had to admit that the Soul Slayer squad was more fit to lead them. … In the livestream. Finally, some sharp-eyed viewers noticed that Lu Chen was not wearing a diving suit when he left the Snake Pond. [What’s going on? Why wasn’t Morning Mist wearing a diving suit when he came out?] [Could it be that he can hold his breath forever?] [That’s unlikely. If he can hold his breath, why did he wear a diving suit when he entered the Snake Pond?] [Morning Mist seems to have a lot of secrets.] [If Morning Mist didn’t have this many tricks up his sleeve, he wouldn’t have survived until now.] [The f*ck! What was that thing that Morning Mist threw on the ground like a piece of trash?] [That seems to be a skill scroll?] [No way, no way. Morning Mist actually has dozens of skill scrolls that he just threw like trash?] [Why did he throw it away? Don’t break it.. It makes my heart ache just looking at it.] [Is this the strength of White Fog City? This is insane!] [Morning Mist is awesome. I want to be his fan!] [I’m in White Fog City now. Where can I buy these skill scrolls? I want to buy them!] [Something’s wrong. Morning Mist has never taken out this item before. It seems that these skill scrolls were obviously fished out from the bottom of the Snake Pond!] [It’s over. The gap between the rich and the poor has widened. We will never be able to catch up to Morning Mist in this lifetime.] Lu Chen gave Liu Yang a look. Liu Yang immediately understood and directly pushed the focus of the phone camera towards the dozens of skill scrolls on the ground. This made all the viewers in the livestream room feel as if they could get their hands on them easily. [I can’t, I can’t, I have to buy it, I have to buy it, I have to buy it! Is it too late for me to sell my house and buy it now?] [I see it, there’s a Fireball spell, d*mn! A freaking Fireball spell!] [There’s also a Holy Light spell! I want to change my job to a Light Mage, I want that!] [There’s also a cultivation technique in there! All kinds of cultivation techniques to strengthen one’s physique, those are used by people who want to improve on their physique!] [Not only that, I think there are sword techniques, blade techniques, and fist manuals inside!] Seeing that the effects had been achieved, Lu Chen no longer kept them in suspense, he directly said to Liu Yang, “Take these skill scrolls to White Fog City. Someone will take care of them. Tell them to have the craftsmen do their best to copy these skill scrolls. Set a normal price for them to be sold to the public.] As soon as these words were said, the livestream room immediately went into an uproar. This would benefit the public. [He is such a good person. Such a man would live a peaceful life!] [Before, I was still hesitating whether I should enter White Fog City. Now that I see the scrolls, I have to go even if I have to sell everything I own!] [You’re all fools if you don’t want to get into the city now, you know that right? If you don’t change your class, your combat power will be greatly reduced!] [I have to change my class for these skill books! I originally wanted to exchange the gold coins here for money and take them to the main world to have fun. Now it seems that I can’t do this!] [Everyone, pay attention. I think the main world and the Second World seem to be a little similar now. I suggest for you to not excessively spend your money. In the future, they might be of great use in the Second World.] Although the high-level officials of the Dragon Country had been keeping the news under wraps, there were always some smart people who would discover the problems in the Second World being transferred to the real world and even feel that the Second World might be merging. The Dragon Country did not even try to reject the idea because everyone would know about this sooner or later. The earlier they knew, the better the overall strength of the Dragon Country would be. … In the Western Castle, Xiao Bai watched the scene of Lu Chen reaping a bountiful harvest. He snorted coldly and threw a punch at the television in front of him. The speed of his fist directly compressed the air in front of him. Then, the television exploded into pieces across space. Xiao Bai gritted his teeth so hard that it made creaking sounds. He knew that Lu Chen would definitely be able to defeat this gold boss. They were both City Lords now, he knew how powerful being a City Lord could be. However, he never thought that the other party would actually be able to take the Golden Dragon as a pet and obtain so many benefits at the same time. Lu Chen was even scheming, he used just a few dozen skill scrolls to capture over a million viewers to come to White Fog City. One must know that the greatest influence of a city’s strength was its population. Whoever could have more city residents would have a stronger city. However, Xiao Bai was not afraid at the moment because the quality of the city he obtained was far better than Lu Chen’s. This was because when Xiao Bai faced the challenge of the Guardian General that he was in, his strength was far stronger than what Lu Chen had shown back then. Therefore, the Guardian General had specially upgraded and strengthened the city before he left. Therefore, in terms of the strength of the city, Xiao Bai was enough to crush Lu Chen. If it were not for the old fellows in the Western Castle who did not agree with him bringing the city to fight, he would have come to the Dragon country himself to fight Lu Chen to the death. “D*mn it. If I can’t get rid of those old fellows, this Lu Chen will continue to grow. “This group of old fools. They don’t know how big a threat Lu Chen is. “Perhaps they are thinking that after Lu Chen kills me, they can support other puppets to ascend to the throne and become the City Lord of Giant Lizard City. “If Lu Chen was really defeated, would they think I’d give them a chance? How naive. “It seems that in order for this city to truly be used by me, there are some people that I have to get rid of.” Xiao Bai’s expression was uncertain at first, then, he finally revealed a fierce expression. … In Frost Country, many people were watching Lu Chen’s new loot in the livestream room. It was one thing for Lu Chen to defeat the Golden Dragon, but it was another for him to take it as a pet. Not only did he increase the strength of his pet, but he even obtained so many scrolls. This made them so jealous that their teeth were grinding against each other. [Those skill scrolls clearly belong to our country. Look at the words on them. Aren’t they similar to our country’s ancient characters?] [Stealing is shameful. Morning Mist, please return our country’s things to us.] [I specialize in studying ancient civilizations in the Frost country. In our ancient legends, there is indeed a snake with three eyes, so this Golden Dragon is very likely to be our guardian. Please return it to us!] [Please don’t touch the harvest in the Snake Pond. Our country will have people specialized in retrieving it.] The people of the Frost Country in the livestream room refreshed everyone’s worldview. How could the others tolerate this? [This is too shameless. What else belongs to Frost Country?] [Just say that our entire Dragon Country belongs to your country and be done with it!] [Why didn’t you say anything before Morning Mist defeated it? Why didn’t you come? Why are you pretending it belongs to you only now?] [That’s right. A few days ago, you guys had a livestream. You guys defeated a silver boss, and a lot of people died.] [If you guys had told Morning Mist to stay still before he defeated this gold boss, I would have respected your decisions!] ]Now that the Golden Dragon has been tamed, don’t you feel ashamed to say something like this?] The Koreans did not seem to feel embarrassed at all. They insisted that the entire Snake Pond belonged to them. There were even some shameless people who asked Lu Chen to hand over the method to tame the Golden Dragon.. Of course, these people were immediately blocked by Liu Yang. Lu Chen then said to Liu Yang in front of millions of viewers, “Take these skill scrolls and send them to White Fog City.” Liu Yang was a little shocked. After all, these skill scrolls were priceless. Lu Chen had given him this task because he trusted him. More importantly, he did not even have that much confidence in himself.. What if he was robbed of such a valuable item? The items that Liu Yang obtained were not only priceless, they could not even be bought with money. Not to mention the envy of the other foreign players who were watching the stream, even the ordinary players of the Dragon Country would be envious. Lu Chen saw his worry and said with a smile, “Don’t worry, no one will dare to steal my things. If someone steals them, I will make sure that they will be respawned a hundred times at the Resurrection Point!” Originally, some people still harbored evil thoughts in the livestream. However, when Lu Chen said these words, they suddenly felt a chill on the back of their necks! This was because they could tell that Lu Chen was not lying. This was something that Lu Chen could do, and he had done it before. The last time it happened, the direct descendant of the Xiao family, and even the future leader, Xiao Chuan, had threatened Lu Chen to attack his family. Lu Chen had really been waiting at the Resurrection Point and killed him a hundred times. Xiao Chuan did not dare to go online anymore, and because of this, he had been feeling weak. This also meant that he had lost the opportunity to lead the White Alliance to rise, and he had lost his position in the Xiao family. If the Xiao family could still endure this, then so be it. Facing the disaster of the destruction of the Dragon Country, this was something that no one could bear. Even a behemoth like the Xiao family had vanished into thin air. Who among the ordinary people would dare to bear the misfortune of Lu Chen? In particular, everything that Lu Chen did was in line with the interests of the Dragon Country and the interests of millions of players. If someone really went to deal with Lu Chen, the country probably would not have to do anything, those millions or even tens of millions of players would be at the Resurrection Point, waiting for the thief. Liu Yang made his way knowing that he is protected. Then, Lu Chen received a call. It was from the first elder of the Dragon Team. “Kid, you did well just now. If I were to farm that gold-tier boss in real life, it would be very difficult for me to finish it off in a short period of time.” Lu Chen smiled faintly. “I used a trick. If it wasn’t for the title City Lord of White Fog City, it might not have been so easy.” On the other end of the phone, the first elder raised his eyebrows slightly. Lu Chen’s words were very particular. Lu Chen only said that it would not be so easy to defeat the Little Golden Dragon, but he did not say that he defeated it. This meant that the first elder was far from seeing through Lu Chen’s methods. He definitely had other trump cards. When he thought of this, the first elder could not help but narrow his eyes slightly. This Lu Chen, who had once shocked them countless times, was practically the strongest player in the Second World. Just how many more tricks did he have hidden behind his back? If he really displayed them, just how powerful could he be? “Kid, the Dragon Country needs someone as powerful as you to appear. “I understand the meaning of your livestreams. Only by properly displaying your strength will more people be willing to follow you and listen to your orders. “You must also remember that people must learn to hide their strength and also have a trick up their sleeve. “You’ve done a good job till this point, but I still have to remind you that other people will only respect and fear you when they can’t figure out your strength. “When you reveal your true self, no matter how strong you are, your shortcomings will be discovered by new people. “However, don’t be afraid. The Dragon Country has your back! “If you have any problems that you can’t solve, feel free to contact me!” Lu Chen felt a surge of warmth in his heart when he heard the first elder’s words. At the same time, he was also a little surprised. According to what he knew, there were not many experts in the Dragon Team anymore. The only one who could be considered as an expert was probably the first elder. However, the first elder’s current strength should be similar to his own. What kind of confidence did he have to dare to say this? Lu Chen was also clear that the vast history of the Dragon Country was 5,000 years. The foundation of this 1,000 year old ancient country was indeed not to be underestimated. In these 5,000 years, the Dragon Country had not only accumulated resources and money, but also many unknown forces. Although he had been the one who had destroyed the Xiao family, Lu Chen believed that there must be some trump cards that had not been used in the Dragon Country. Especially a few hours ago, the team leader of the Dragon Team, Liu Changping, had mentioned to him that the other ancient civilizations discussed in the high-level meeting of the Dragon Country had already entered the Second World long ago. Lu Chen absolutely did not believe that the Dragon Country, which had maintained its culture for the longest time and was once the largest country in the world in terms of size and strength, would really lag so far behind in the exploration of the Second World. One had to know that since ancient times, the Dragon Country had been a powerful country that was worshiped by all nations. Whether it was the easterners or the westerners, they all came to the Dragon Country to worship them.  Therefore, how could such a powerful existence have fallen so much during the last few hundred years. Perhaps it was a time node. Something must have happened during that time period to cause the country’s strength to rapidly decline! Moreover, the first elder might not know all of this. Even if he knew, this was probably the highest-level secret of the Dragon Country. If he wanted to understand all of this, he still needed to slowly explore it himself. At this time, the words of the first elder once again disturbed Lu Chen’s thoughts. “Kid, I have an idea. I wonder if you are willing to listen to it?” “If you have something to say I will listen.” “You should be clear about the Mass Grave in the silver-rank territory, right? I want to let the warriors of the Dragon Country go in and farm monsters, but I’m afraid their strength is far from enough.” Lu Chen was a little puzzled. “Oh? As far as I know, the warriors of the Dragon Country are all top-notch talents that are one in a thousand. “Anyone who can enter the Dragon Team is one in ten thousand in the army. “Their military quality, especially in team battles, should be no problem. Even a silver-tier boss can be killed. First elder do you think that there’s a gold-tier boss in the Mass Grave?” “I’m not sure, but I think there must be one. “According to the information we’ve gathered, there are at least 10 silver-tier equipment and silver-tier monsters in the Mass Grave. “The real question is, who is controlling all of them? “How terrifying can such an existence be to control so many silver monsters? “You should know that even the Golden Dragon in your hand only has one silver-tier female snake as its subordinate. “The Mass Grave has been nurtured for countless years, and all sorts of strange monsters have already appeared. “If there weren’t gold bosses in the Mass Grave, I’m sure that there would have been all sorts of riots. “Although the level structure of the Mass Grave isn’t as orderly as the other five territories… “I believe that there are very likely to be some unique existences in it. “And these things are very likely to cause heavy casualties among the warriors of the Dragon Country, and it could cause the strength of the entire Dragon Country to drop. This is something I don’t want to see.” Lu Chen nodded slightly. Indeed, the Dragon Country was using him as a shield. He did not want any accidents to happen to the Dragon Country. It was his home ground. Moreover, the silver equipment in the Mass Grave was no longer of any use to him. If he was only farming monsters, there was no point in farming silver monsters anymore. He might as well find some goons to help him clear a path. After pondering for a moment, Lu Chen directly asked, “I’ll do it, but what would I gain from this?” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation After hearing Lu Chen’s words, the first elder was not displeased at all. On the contrary, he was very satisfied. If anyone else heard that Lu Chen was a citizen of the Dragon Country and wanted to be rewarded for doing something for the Dragon Country, they would definitely think that Lu Chen was asking for too much. He had no patriotism and was only interested in profit. However, as a top-notch master and a high-ranking member of the Dragon Country, the first elder had a strategic vision. Although everyone was equal in this world, the strong always had special privileges. Lu Chen dared to propose conditions. Firstly, it meant that he had enough confidence to go through with the plan. At least, he had enough confidence to protect these people from the Dragon Team to go into the Mass Grave. His strength itself was incomparable, and this point of value was also enough. Moreover, although Lu Chen was a citizen of the Dragon Country and was in the Dragon Team, he was completely different from the other members. The other members of the Dragon Team were carefully nurtured by the country, and they had paid a huge price. However, Lu Chen had been forced into the group by the country to monitor him. The Dragon Country did not help him in any way. Even the matter of eliminating the Xiao family was done with Lu Chen as the vanguard. To be precise, the most important person in the entire process was Lu Chen.  If it were not for Lu Chen, the country would not have rashly attacked such a colossus family. After all, there were still experts from the Xiao clan who had entered the Second World ruins. As a national treasure, the Dragon Country had to consider the overall situation. It was impossible for then to act rashly against the Xiao clan. If it were not for Lu Chen taking care of Xiao Bai, the Xiao clan might not have been able to be eliminated so smoothly. Now, he would have to bear the responsibility of eliminating the Xiao clan. It could be said that the Dragon Country owed Lu Chen a huge favor. Now that Lu Chen had made his own request regarding the matter of leading the team, the first elder would not feel too guilty toward Lu Chen. This was also why the first elder was satisfied with his request. The first elder laughed and said, “Haha, you brat! I knew you would say this. But don’t worry, I’ve already made preparations for it. “I’ll provide you with three silver treasures and one gold treasure.” When the first elder mentioned the equipment he had prepared for himself, Lu Chen was slightly surprised. Silver treasures could only be dropped by silver bosses. The chances of obtaining one silver treasure by killing weak monsters were very low. Silver treasures could only be obtained by killing millions or even tens of millions of small monsters. As for gold equipment, one had to obtain some hidden maps, hidden monsters, and special monsters to obtain them. Since the first elder had been able to collect these treasures and obtain these items, it meant that these treasures were only a small portion of the first elder’s wealth. They were not enough to deal any damage to the Dragon Country. Moreover, if nothing unexpected happened, these treasures would have been given to the Dragon Country’s warriors. Only the warriors of the Dragon Country could have such high awareness and hand over such a top-tier treasure to the kingdom. Otherwise, if it had been an ordinary player, they would have kept it for themselves long ago. Of course, it was possible that some of the equipment was also obtained by ordinary players, and they would auction it on the dark net in exchange for money. After all, it was impossible for ordinary players to keep a piece of top-tier equipment without being hunted. Not to mention, the Second World was extremely difficult for ordinary people. If they were not careful, they would die and return to the Resurrection Point and lose their equipment. Most importantly, one should never underestimate the charm of top-tier equipment. Unless one’s level was very high, it would attract the covetous eyes of countless people. Therefore, placing it on the dark net was the best choice. These equipment would be collected by the country through various means and channels on the dark net, becoming the country’s reserve. Although Lu Chen had long understood that the country’s reserve was far beyond his imagination, he would never have thought that the first elder would actually take out a piece of gold-grade equipment as a reward for him. Could it be that for the Dragon Country, gold-grade equipment could be given away at will? If the first elder knew what Lu Chen was thinking, he would definitely be laughing. Not just gold-grade equipment, even silver-grade equipment was extremely rare. The gold-grade equipment he will be giving would be enough to make the first elder’s heart ache for a very long time. However, the first elder knew clearly in his heart that if one gold-grade equipment and three silver-grade equipment were added together, it would be worth it even if it is just one step closer to keeping Lu Chen by the Dragon Country’s side. This was especially so for the members of the Xiao family who had been locked up by the country. Because of the existence of Xiao Bai and the people who had entered the ruins, it would be impossible for them to be dealt with casually. It was very likely that Lu Chen would have to deal with all of this in the future. Now that Lu Chen had made a request, the first elder was absolutely confident that Lu Chen would definitely be interested in the equipment that he had prepared. “The first silver-tier treasure is called the Swift Boots. When you wear it, your movement speed will be doubled, and at any critical moment, you will be able to increase your speed by twentyfold. “The distance you can maintain can reach up to one hundred meters. I think you should know the importance of this critical moment in a battle.” The first elder deliberately put on a casual tone. However, when he heard the reward, Lu Chen’s heart was slightly delighted. In the world of martial arts, speed was the only thing that could not be broken. Even in the online gaming world, this was an eternal law. The importance of the Swift Boots was not only to be one step ahead of the enemy when facing them, but to strike first and put the enemy down as soon as possible. More importantly, if there was a critical situation at the critical moment, they could also quickly retreat. This kind of treasure was definitely a top-notch weapon that could combine both offense and defense in a battle. Although Lu Chen did not say anything, the first elder on the other end of the phone could definitely imagine how shocked Lu Chen was at this moment. When the first elder thought of Lu Chen’s shocked look, he secretly laughed in his heart. He happily continued to explain the other equipment to him. “The second piece of silver-tier equipment. To be exact, it’s not silver-tier. In fact, it’s not even considered to be an original product of the Second World. “There was an expert from the Beauty Country who farmed gold equipment. “After that, the Beauty Country paid a huge price to obtain the research rights for this equipment.” When Lu Chen heard this, although he did not comment on it, he silently compared it to the soldiers of the Dragon Country. The soldiers of the Dragon Country had discovered so much top-tier equipment, but they did not take it for themselves. Instead, they handed it over to the country with a collective consciousness. Because they knew that without the training and help of the country, they would not have achieved what they had today. However, Beauty Country was completely different. In their eyes, individual heroism was far more than collectivism. Those top-tier treasures were just obtained, there was no need to hand them over to the country. Even if the country wanted to study them, they would have to pay a high price. The first elder continued, “The Beauty Country gathered countless top-notch researchers to conduct day and night research on this gold-tier flying equipment, and finally, they have created an Exoskeleton Wingsuit!” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation After the first elder brought up the concept of the Exoskeleton Wingsuit, he continued, “The Exoskeleton Wingsuit would not allow you to fly freely in the air… “However, with this Exoskeleton Wingsuit, you can glide in the air. On the other hand, humans can rely on their amazing jumping ability to jump into the air and glide to battle. “Moreover, it’s equipped with some high-tech propulsion technology, so it could fly and stay in the air for a short period of time. Acceleration is also possible with this suit. “The most important thing is that ordinary equipment from the main world could not be brought into the Second World, but this Exoskeleton Wingsuit is completely different. “It could be freely brought into the Second World. It was said that it was because the Beauty Country had obtained a special rare crystal. “That’s why there are only ten Exoskeleton Wingsuits in the entire world. Our Dragon Country also spent an extremely high price to obtain one of them.” This equipment was too important. With it, it could be said that they had gained the right to control the air. Lu Chen’s eyes flickered slightly. Although this equipment was not a top-tier gold-tier equipment, it was still very useful. The greatest weakness of humans was that they could not fight in the water or fly in the air. Therefore, when humans were in the sea, their strength would be greatly reduced. However, Lu Chen had already found a solution in Little Golden Dragon’s cave. However, there was no effective way to attack other creatures in the air. In the real world, humans could use cannons and airplanes to attack. However, in the online game world, once a monster could fly, other than players like archers, no one else could do anything. They could only passively take a beating. Even archers had a high casualty rate. After all, not everyone had the title of Bow God like Lu Chen. Not everyone could hit every target. However, now that he might have the Exoskeleton Wingsuit, he could be invincible now. Even if he was attacked by flying monsters, he would not be afraid. This was also one of the reasons why Lu Chen did not go to the Bat Cave. If he had this item, he would be able to fight with the Ancient Ash Wolf King and the Little Golden Dragon. It would be like adding wings to a pig! The first elder continued, “The third item is a Disguise Mask. The only effect of this mask is to change a person’s appearance. It can even change a person’s figure to a certain extent. “This kind of mask was collected by the Dragon Team from an elder when they besieged the Xiao family. “Logically speaking, you should have rights to this mask in the first place.” It had to be said that this Disguise Mask could be really important to Lu Chen. Lu Chen was now too famous. He was a top player in the world and also the City Lord of White Fog City. In the Dragon Country, only he could let players change their class. Moreover, in the region that the people of the Dragon Country could enter, only White Fog City could accept trade. Because at present, the various game regions were not connected to each other, only in the real world could players enter other countries to enter the cities outside of White Fog City. In particular, Lu Chen’s all kinds of battle achievements, defeating the strong with the weak, and even killing the strong with instant kills were shared everywhere. This extraordinary battle record made countless people worship him. His appearance was now also remembered by everyone. No matter where he went, others would look at him with admiration, fanaticism, and envy. As his popularity increased, his reputation value also underwent a huge change. This was very important to Lu Chen. He needed to use his fame to increase his reputation value and use it to expand his city. Moreover, Lu Chen believed that the importance of reputation was not just to allow more people to enter the city and increase the city’s level and parameters. If he guessed correctly, it would definitely involve the Battle of Faith in the future. This also had some drawbacks. It was too ostentatious and made him into an easy target. There was no way to do something that could only be done by concealing one’s identity. Moreover, after such a long time, whether it was Lu Chen’s identity in the main world or his identity in the Second World, everyone could now recognize him at first glance. Ordinary players could also go to other countries in the main world and then travel to other Second World territories. However, it was absolutely impossible for Lu Chen. He was like a mobile missile. Wherever he went, he was the greatest threat. No country or power dared to let Lu Chen enter their Second World territory. If Lu Chen went crazy, it might cause a riot, and no one could stop him. Even if Lu Chen continued to farm monsters… if he continued to farm monsters, he might as well destroy them. If the monsters were gone, what would happen to the normal players’ growth? However, if Lu Chen had a Disguise Mask, no matter if he went abroad in the main world or traveled around in the Second World, it would not cause too much of a problem. It would be very convenient for him to move around. In fact, the importance of this item was even greater than the Swift Boots and Exoskeleton Wingsuit from before. At this moment, Lu Chen’s heart was no longer calm. Even though he had seen high-level equipment before, he knew in his heart that the three pieces of silver-tier equipment before him were definitely top-tier among the support equipment. The first elder had definitely chosen them for him with care. This was because normal silver-tier attack equipment was not that important to him. His combat power was enough to close the gap between the two equipment. He was grateful for the first elder’s kindness. He would definitely think of a way to repay him in the future. At the same time, he was a little surprised. If the three pieces of equipment before him were only silver-tier equipment, then how powerful would the last piece of gold-tier equipment given to him be? Even the experienced and knowledgeable Lu Chen finally raised his curiosity at this moment. Finally, the first elder spoke slowly, “Although the fourth piece of equipment is gold-tier equipment, none of us can use it, even you.” The old man was a little embarrassed when he said this. Because no one can use this third piece of equipment. “Even if I don’t give it to you, I won’t have any use for it. If you don’t want it, you can go to the national treasury and choose any other gold-tier equipment.” As soon as the first elder said this, Lu Chen’s curiosity grew. What kind of equipment could make the first elder feel this helpless. The first elder paused for a moment before continuing, “This last piece of gold-tier equipment is an item, Elf Egg.” Elf Egg! Hearing the word Elf Egg, Lu Chen was extremely shocked.. He had thought that the first elder would give him a very good piece of equipment, but he had never thought that it would be an Elf Egg! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation There were also legends about creatures like elves in the main world. That was something that only appeared in Norse mythology. They were often depicted as creatures with slightly long pointy ears, holding bows and arrows. They have blonde hair and blue eyes, and a taller and slimmer figure compared to humans. The little elf who had just hatched from the Elf Egg was short, but only a dozen centimeters tall. He was very small and cute, and looked unusually holy. In the legends, their surroundings always emitted a pale golden light. It was an especially beautiful sight. It was a symbol of purity and justice. Lu Chen could not help but have a deeper understanding of the Dragon Country’s style and heritage. He did not believe that this Elf Egg had been spawned from the Second World game. Back when Lan Weiwei was only an Ancient Ash Wolf, she was once an egg. However, when she finally became a human, her level was far inferior to this Elf Egg. At the same time, Lu Chen also somewhat laughed at Xiao Bai’s overestimation of his own abilities. Back then, Xiao Bai thought that he could rely on the strength of a spiritual master to become the ruler of the Dragon Country. However, now, it seemed that a vast country that spanned thousands of years across this continent could not be easily toppled by one person and one family! At the same time, when the Elf Egg appeared, Lu Chen also thought that if the elves in Norse mythology existed, then it meant that the legends would be linked together… Was the snake that could encircle the entire planet, Jemengard, also a real existence? One had to know that Jemengard was an extremely long existence that could encircle the entire planet. If such an existence really existed, then what living creature in the world could contend with his power? Where was Jemengard hiding? If one were to think further, if all the myths were not fabricated, then the gods in ancient China, as well as all kinds of rare and exotic beasts, and all kinds of unusual creatures in the mountain and sea scriptures… could be real too? If it was a few months ago, Lu Chen might have insisted that those were all fake, but now he was not sure. He even preferred that those creatures had really existed, but now they were hidden. There was also a possibility for higher-ups of the Dragon Country also knowing about these existences as well. Thinking of this, Lu Chen’s eyes suddenly widened. If those rare and exotic beasts really existed, then did it mean that creatures like dragons and these rare and exotic creatures had existed for thousands of years, right? Then, did these creatures disappear because most of them went to the Second World, or did the Second World itself separate from the main world and just happened to take them with it? How many dangers were hidden behind his game? He was now the top existence in the entire Second World, but he could only see the tip of the iceberg. Perhaps the truth of the world would be gradually unraveled by him. As Lu Chen was deep in thought, the first elder coughed lightly, he interrupted his thoughts. “Kid, to be honest, this thing looks like a useless egg in front of me. I’ve also consulted the Europeans. “However, the method of how to hatch and wake up the Elf Egg has long been lost for thousands of years. “After all, this is something from the myths. “If you accept this thing, it is very likely to be an egg forever. At most, it is only a little bigger than an egg and has a little more nutrition inside if you want to have it scrambled.” Hearing the first elder’s teasing, Lu Chen could not help but feel a chill in his heart. The egg turned into a meal in the first elder’s mouth. However, when Lu Chen thought about eating it, it made him think he would be eating a person inside. However, what he did not know was that the first elder’s heart was bursting with joy. In the entire world, who else could make Lu Chen suffer, other than him? Although it was disgusting, how could Lu Chen give up on this Elf Egg that he was about to obtain? If this thing really cracked, it would be far more important than any other equipment. One had to know that an elf’s initial level was already gold-rank. Then, even if it had just hatched, it would at least be on the same level as the Three-eyed Golden Dragon. When it grows up in the future, would that not be amazing? Only a fool would not choose to say yes to the egg. As for the question of hatching the Elf Egg, Lu Chen did not think too much about it. He was the City Lord of White Fog City, and his progress in the Second World far exceeded that of anyone else. If nothing unexpected happened, he would have no problem finding the secret to hatching this Elf Egg. In addition, he also had the help of Rollie, the lucky one. Hatching this Elf Egg was probably only a matter of time. “First elder, I’ll take this Elf Egg. I’ll remember your favor.” Lu Chen quickly agreed, afraid that the first elder would go back on his words. At the same time, he knew very well that he would be bringing many warriors from the Dragon Team. This dungeon probably did not need or deserve this many things from the first elder of the Dragon Team, the other party was obviously going to do him a favor. And this favor was accepted by Lu Chen with a peace of mind. “Good, very good!” The first elder was overjoyed and kept laughing. Lu Chen’s agreement was also within his expectations. He believed that his sincerity and friendly attitude towards the other party was something that Lu Chen could sense too. Lu Chen immediately spoke again, “I don’t know when the Mass Grave mission will start. I plan to clear the Bat Cave first before going to the Mass Grave. I don’t know if there’s enough time.” “Kid, you don’t have to go to the Bat Cave.” “What do you mean? Is it because your Dragon Team is going to clear the Bat Cave?” “Well...;” The first elder laughed heartily and then denied, “Someone already cleared the Bat Cave.” “What? Who? Which warrior from the Dragon Team did it? Could it be Liu Changping?” In the Dragon Team, although Liu Changping was the team leader, he was not the strongest. The special combat squads under the first elder were the strongest. An existence like Liu Changping was only pushed to the surface because of his strong leadership ability. However, no matter how strong Liu Changping was, perhaps one person would not be able to farm a silver boss. However, if the entire team or a large number of experts were gathered, it would be completely possible. Unexpectedly, the first elder once again denied, “We did not farm the Bat Cave, but the ancient martial families did.” Ancient martial families… Lu Chen silently repeated it. This was the first time he had heard about the ancient martial arts aristocratic families. In his knowledge, the Gu, Xu, and Xiao families were already at the top of the Dragon Country. What kind of existence were the ancient martial arts aristocratic families? <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation At the mention of the ancient martial arts aristocratic families, the originally playful expression on the first elder’s face completely disappeared. Instead, it was replaced with a solemn expression. “Everyone in the world knows that our Dragon Country is the largest of the ten great aristocratic families. They jointly control this country. “However, are these ten great aristocratic families really the strongest? “Actually, that’s not the case. “Above the ten great families, there are many ancient martial arts aristocratic families, and these families don’t care about the affairs of the world. “To be exact, they don’t care about competing for power and benefits in the world. Everything in the world is as insignificant as a grain of salt to them. “What they pursue is supreme strength, as well as the ability to reach the heavens, as well as eternal life.” Eternal life! Lu Chen had received too much information today. When he heard about eternal life, he was surprisingly not shocked. Instead, he was somewhat used to it. However, he opened his mouth and asked, “Eternal life? Can you really achieve that?” “There’s no such thing as real eternal life, kid.” The first elder denied it flatly, “The so-called eternal life is just to extend one’s lifespan. Among all the people in those types of families, the longest lifespan is only a few hundred years.” Lu Chen asked, “Then how long has the longest lived in history?” “We’re unsure about that.” The first elder said indifferently, “History says that Pengzu lived to eight hundred years old, but that is far from the limit of the existence of the ancient martial arts aristocratic families. “At present, among all the people I know who have practiced ancient martial arts, the oldest has already reached a thousand years old.” Lu Chen had certainly heard of Pengzu, but in the textbook, Penzu was a figure from 2,000 years ago. Moreover, according to the conjectures of some modern archaeologists and historians, Pengzu’s so-called 800 years of life was actually due to the difference in the methods of ancient and modern historical chronology. If converted into the current method of calculating the years, Pengzu actually only lived for more than 100 years. However, from the tone of the first elder, it could be deduced that Pengzu was the real deal. He had lived for 800 years. However, he realized that there seemed to be some problems with what the first elder had just said. Among the ancient martial arts aristocratic families, the oldest had only lived?about 100 years. Then, in history, if the oldest was 800 years old… Who was the 1,000-year-old? Could that person be from the ancient martial arts aristocratic families? When Lu Chen raised this question, the first elder meaningfully acknowledged his thought process, “That’s right. Not everyone is from those kinds of families. In this world, there are still some unaffiliated cultivators.” Lu Chen’s eyes slightly widened. Unaffiliated cultivators that could allow their lifespan to exceed the ancient martial arts aristocratic family’s existence that had a thousand-year legacy?! How much luck did one need to achieve that?! Where exactly was that person right now? Even the ancient martial arts aristocratic family might have entered the Second World ruins long ago. This kind rogue cultivator must have entered the Second World ruins earlier than others. The first elder continued, “Remember, if you encounter people from ancient martial arts aristocratic families, do not clash with them. “Although they might not be able to defeat you in the Second World, if you come to the main world, they will have many ways to suppress you. “Moreover, some people had already entered the Second World long ago. Some of them increased their strength in the ruins, while others became closed beta players before the game was officially announced. “If you really provoke these people, even with your status as the City Lord of White Fog City, it would be difficult for you to withstand them.” Lu Chen nodded slightly. He was not someone who wanted to make enemies wherever he went. The reason why he had a conflict with the Xiao family previously was because the other party had provoked him first. Lu Chen did not want to become everyone’s public enemy. However, although Lu Chen had promised him well, he knew in his heart that if there were some ignorant people who took the initiative to provoke him, then he would not mind letting the other party’s ancient martial arts aristocratic family disappear just like the Xiao family. However, at this time, he also understood that if he did not want to be bullied, then he had to become the strongest person there is. The only reason why others bullied him was because he was too weak! Although the first elder did not say anything, he seemed to have understood Lu Chen’s thoughts on the other end of the phone and continued to persuade him to not fight back. “Don’t think that the ancient martial arts aristocratic family is an existence like the Xiao family and can be destroyed just like that. “The strongest people in the Xiao family are only experts like Xiao Bai. However, if you go to an ancient martial arts aristocratic family, some of the ordinary disciples and family members are all in the acquired realm. The true core members are at least in the acquired realm.” “They are even of the Golden stages in the realms.” These words really surprised Lu Chen. This was the first time he heard the term Gold stages. Lu Chen asked curiously, “If that’s the case, why didn’t these experts enter the ruins of the Second World to explore it themselves? “I heard that the various aristocratic families had sent quite a number of people to enter the Second World, and the strongest among them was only at the spiritual stage.” Once these words were said, the first elder was somewhat displeased. What did he mean by only at the spiritual stage? Now, even spiritual masters had to be described as only being that? However, he really could not say anything. After all, Lu Chen’s leveling speed was incredible! The first elder’s tone was filled with underlying meaning as he said, “Kid, there are some things that you shouldn’t believe just because you hear it. “On the surface, those with names were indeed at the acquired stage at the highest. However, many people sneaked in when no one was paying attention. “Who had entered the ruins when the ruins were first discovered? No one could say for sure. After all, these ancient martial arts aristocratic families were the ones who discovered the ruins first. “Moreover, a long time ago, there were people who entered and then came out. “These people were also the first to discover that once they entered the Second World, they would become ordinary people, which was the so-called level 1 newbies in online games. “Their strength continues to increase, and by now, it could be very high. Moreover, they were recognized by the Second World. “Even if you were the City Lord, you might not be a match for them. “As for a few years ago, the experts from the various aristocratic families and the Dragon Country entered the Second World and saw historical remains.” Speaking up to this point, the first elder suddenly changed the topic. “Alright, kid, I’ve said enough for today. “You’ve already been in the Second World for a long time. You should come back to the main world and have a good rest. “Then, prepare to bring the members of the Dragon Team to the Mass Grave to train.” After saying that, the two of them hung up. Lu Chen also exited the Second World at the first possible moment. After returning to the main world, a deep sense of exhaustion welled up in Lu Chen’s body. Before this, he had been fighting non-stop, he had not felt the exhaustion in the game. In a high-tension situation, Lu Chen’s adrenaline was soaring, and he was constantly in a tense state. His fatigue had long been suppressed by his body’s functions.. Until now. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Especially with the game’s blessing, Lu Chen had even forgotten the concept of time. Therefore, he did not notice the discomfort in his body at all. Instead, now that he had relaxed, Lu Chen finally understood how much pressure he had just experienced. The moment he woke up and left the game pod, Lu Chen hurriedly returned to his bed. It was late at night, and the moonlight shone on Lu Chen’s bed through the huge floor-to-ceiling window. The moonlight seeped into Lu Chen’s body, constantly nourishing and restoring his condition. It even relaxed his exhausted body and mind. If it was anyone else, after experiencing such a level of battle, they would at least need to sleep for two or three days, and they would also need to rest for another week or two. For Lu Chen, one night was enough. It had to be said that the Moon Goddess had really given him a great gift back then. Not only Lu Chen, even Little Golden Dragon, who had just returned from the Second World after being subdued by Lu Chen, slipped into a guest room and lay on the bed, preparing to sleep. Everyone felt tired. However, the only difference was that before Rollie went to bed, he went to the bamboo forest in the manor and ate a big meal. This scene also shocked Liu Yuan in the manor. One had to know that the amount of food Rollie ate just now was more than three times his usual amount. Moreover, this little fellow did not participate in any battles. Was he really exhausted from just strolling around? After rolling around in the bamboo forest, he slept comfortably as if he had a fun time in the forest. He rolled around and fell asleep. After a night, when everyone woke up the next morning, it was already close to noon. At this moment, the bright sunlight had already completely shone in. After Lu Chen woke up, he stood in front of the window and looked at the lush green scenery in the manor. Regardless of whether it was the various trees, flowers, or plants, they were all taken care of very well by the Gu family. It was obvious that they had taken care of them meticulously. It had to be said that when Lu Chen saw the scene in front of him, he was in a great mood. At this moment, someone suddenly knocked on the door. Lu Chen opened the door and saw that it was the young master of the Gu family, Gu Yiming. At this moment, Gu Yiming’s face was covered in sweat. He was in a hurry. It was obvious that he had something urgent to attend to. Lu Chen understood that as a cultivator, especially after being strengthened by the Second World, Gu Yiming’s physical strength far surpassed that of an ordinary person. No matter how hard he ran, he would not have sweated this much. The only explanation was that he had encountered a very challenging problem. Thinking back, when he was not rich, the other party had given him such a large manor for half price. It was indeed very generous. Lu Chen had received such a huge favor from the other party, but he had not given the other party any benefits. The only benefit he had was the super VIP passage, which allowed them to enter the city first. However, the money saved was nothing to these big families. Thinking of this, Lu Chen said, “What happened?” Gu Yiming hurriedly wiped the sweat on his head and said breathlessly, “Lu Chen, you might be in trouble.” Lu Chen was slightly startled. Then, he seemed to have thought of something and narrowed his eyes slightly. Gu Yiming continued, “Just now, a few young men came to the entrance of your manor. They directly attacked and injured the security guards. “Even if those security guards were put together, they could not compare to those attackers, so they hurriedly called me over to deal with it. “They claimed to be from the Wu clan of the ancient martial arts aristocratic family. Even though they didn’t look very old, their skills were very impressive. “I didn’t want to hide it from you, when I looked at their imposing manner, even if they were compared to Xiao Bai back then, they weren’t much inferior. “To be precise, those few attackers were the same, and their skills were about the same as Xiao Bai’s. “And the person in the lead had never made a move from the beginning to the end. “Moreover, when I rushed over, I could clearly feel that their aura was much stronger than the other followers.” The manor that Gu Yiming had given Lu Chen was very vast. Especially the gate of the manor. Li Lu Chen’s location was very far away, so it was impossible to see the people who were coming clearing. In addition, Lu Chen and the others had been sleeping, so they did not know about this matter. However, when Lu Chen heard the words ancient martial arts aristocratic family...; His pupils constricted slightly. He did not expect that trouble would come to him voluntarily when he did not want to find trouble. At the same time, Lu Chen was a little embarrassed. Not only did he enjoy such a large manor of the Gu family at a low price, but he also brought trouble to the other party because of his status. One had to know that the ancient martial arts aristocratic family was not something that big families like the Gu family could afford to interfere with. The existence of the ancient martial arts aristocratic families in the Dragon Country was very mysterious. Basically, no one knew about it. However, Gu Yiming was different. As the eldest son of the Gu family, he was the future successor. He was very familiar with these things, so he knew very well how terrifying the ancient martial arts aristocratic families were. Whether it was himself or the elders of his family, they were unable to settle this matter. Especially the young man who was the leader of the other party. His strength was really too powerful. Lu Chen pondered for a moment before saying, “Gu Yiming, let them in.” Gu Yiming’s eyes revealed deep worry and worry. “Lu Chen, although I don’t know how powerful that person is, I’ve seen the first elder of the Dragon Team once before. That person’s strength is probably not below the first elder’s.” Lu Chen nodded slightly to show that he understood. “It doesn’t matter. No one can stop those who want to come, and no one can hide from them. Let them come up.” Gu Yiming’s brows were tightly knitted. Then, he probed, “Then, should I call all the elders in my family who have high levels over?” Lu Chen shook his head slightly. He knew that even if he called all those people over, it would be useless. If those experts of the Lu family were placed in the main world, they would be able to dominate their power over others. However, when faced with a behemoth like the ancient martial arts family, especially experts of the acquired realm or above, many people would just be sending themselves to their deaths. It would not be of any use. Moreover, he was also confident that he might not necessarily be weaker than the other party. Not long after, Gu Yiming brought a group of middle-aged men dressed in luxurious ancient clothing and walked in. The person in the lead was around 30 years old. His breathing was steady, and the temples on his forehead were high and bulging. When he walked, he walked like a tiger, giving off an imposing aura. His chest and sleeves were loose, and they fluttered even though there was no wind. It was obvious that he was an expert among experts. The person in the lead, whose face was full of stubble, walked in front of Lu Chen and laughed heartily. “Little boy, I am Wu Tian from the Wu family of the ancient martial arts aristocratic family. “I heard that you got a Little Golden Dragon in the Second World, and it even has three eyes. I am very curious as to what it looks like. I wonder, do you think you can show it to me to broaden my horizons?” Although Wu Tian seemed to be asking Lu Chen, his tone was unquestionable.. It even sounded like an order. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Wu Tian and the others wanted to see the Golden Dragon the moment they barged into the room. It was obvious that they had come with ill intentions. As soon as Wu Tian’s words came out, the manor’s main security guard who had followed them up was slightly relieved. It turned out that they had only wanted to take a look. That would be easy to talk about, right? However, Gu Yiming clearly knew that the other party did not hesitate to reveal their identity as an ancient martial arts aristocratic family at all. It was clear that they were not here to only take a look. It was likely that the other party had come to take Little Golden Dragon away. Gu Yiming thought to himself that expecting Lu Chen to not let Little Golden Dragon out. Instead, he would directly order him to leave. However, what surprised him was that Lu Chen did not directly chase the other party away. Instead, he whistled towards the house in the manor. In the next moment, a little snake with three eyes flashed with a golden light. It obediently climbed out of the house and climbed onto Lu Chen’s arm. Lu Chen understood that the other party was coming at him aggressively. How could he not let them see Little Golden Dragon? If he did not even dare to let everyone see Little Golden Dragon’s appearance… that would just show everyone that he was afraid of the other party! At that time, the other party was bound to push their luck in forcing him into a tight situation. At that moment, Little Golden Dragon could clearly assess the situation. Wu Tian and the others were clearly coming at him aggressively with bad intentions. Little Golden Dragon did not act kindly. It directly stuck out its tongue and continuously hissed. In the eyes of outsiders, it looked fierce and menacing. When Little Golden Dragon appeared, Wu Tian’s eyes instantly lit up. He had indeed seen the appearance of Little Golden Dragon when it was shrinking in the live broadcast. However, seeing it in the video was one thing, but seeing it in reality was another. Now, it looked like this little Golden Dragon was a rare top-tier rare beast, regardless of the thickness of its scales, the brightness, and the state of its entire body. Even his family’s guardian Divine Beast, the Flood Dragon, which had lived for tens of thousands of years, was far from being as pure as this Little Golden Dragon in front of him. At this moment, Wu Tian was even more determined to take this Little Golden Dragon away. He had a simple and honest smile on his face, but there was indeed a hint of craftiness in his eyes. “My friend, how about this? Name your price, and I’ll buy this Golden Dragon off you.” Lu Chen’s face was expressionless and full of indifference. His mouth was neither hostile or kind as he spat out three words, “Not for sale.” Even the Golden Dragon on his arm had a human-like expression, full of disdain when Wu Tian asked. Little Golden Dragon could indeed see that the other party’s power was slightly stronger. Whether it was attack or defense, he was much stronger than other humans of the same level. Moreover, no matter how powerful Wu Tian was, could he evolve the Golden Dragon’s bloodline? Could he improve its strength? It would be a huge loss for the Golden Dragon to follow him. How could Wu Tian know what Little Golden Dragon was thinking? He only felt that this little Golden Dragon looked much stronger than when he was on the live broadcast. However, he did not see the true reason for the Golden Dragon’s increase in strength. It was the result of Lu Chen using the Taming God’s skill to increase Little Golden Dragon’s strength. Although he was rejected by Lu Chen, Wu Tian was not angry at all because in his eyes, Little Golden Dragon was already his. “Don’t be in a hurry to reject it. I’d be willing to give you a lot of money. What I want to give you is not just any ordinary money. Instead, it’ll be a treasure that can truly increase your cultivation. “According to what I know, you should be an acquired realm level expert now, right? “It won’t be long before you’re ready to enter the golden stages. “However, it’s not that easy to enter the golden stage. If you don’t have the assistance of the Thunder Core, with your current state, you won’t be able to form the Golden Core. “I believe that with your talent, you can completely become stronger through your own continuous efforts in the Second World, and even gradually surpass me in strength. “But once you return to the main world, you will at most be an acquired realm master with limited health and limited physical strength. “There is no way to advance to the later stages, and it will be impossible to increase your strength. “The current main world is not as rich in spiritual energy as it was a few hundred years ago. “At that time, as long as one’s cultivation reached the level of being tempered, they would be able to condense the cores after being tempered by the Heavenly Thunder. “But now, due to the thin spiritual energy, the places in the world where you could cultivate your powers have long gone. “Even the Thunder Core that was stored thousands of years ago has slowly depleted. “If you don’t have the aid of medicinal pills, you would never be able to reach the golden stage. This also means that you wouldn’t have the ability to protect yourself in front of the ancient martial arts aristocratic families in the main world in the future. “Perhaps you didn’t know that you are not only famous in the Second World, but also between the ancient martial arts aristocratic families. “You might have had some ability in the past, but it was not enough for the ancient martial arts aristocratic families to take notice of you. “However, the being the City Lord of White Fog City and owning a Golden Dragon were two hot existences. You’re not the center of attention. “I may be the first person to come now, but there will be countless people coming after you later. “If you know what’s good for you, then hand over the Golden Dragon. I’ll give you a Thunder Core so that you can cultivate your powers. At the same time, the Golden Dragon can grow with me. “This is the best outcome for all of us.” Regarding the matter of the golden stage, it was also Lu Chen’s first time hearing about it. He did not expect there to be such a step. However, it was absolutely impossible for him to hand over Little Golden Dragon. He said slowly, “Whether or not I can enter the golden stage is my business. You won’t have to worry about it. In addition, it’s not certain who Little Golden Dragon will grow faster next to. Don’t try to disregard my capabilities.” Wu Tian was a little displeased when he saw that Lu Chen did not think highly of him. After all, he was the one looking down on Lu Chen in the first place. It was just a stroke of luck for him to become an acquired level City Lord. Wu Tian did not consider that skill, it was all luck. As long as he was not in White Fog City, Lu Chen was not a match for him at all. The only one who could be considered a match for him was the Golden Dragon. However, considering the existence of the Golden Dragon, Wu Tian still forcefully suppressed his anger and said, “Everyone has their own path to take. “You don’t need the chance to form a Golden Core, but you shouldn’t stop the Golden Dragon from taking a path that is more well suited for it to grow. “It should make its own decision. You and I can’t force the Golden Dragon. You are just the city lord of White Fog City. “I, Wu Tian, may not be able to resist your battle strength in the city, but as an elder of my Wu family, I do not care if you are the City Lord of White Fog City. I will not hesitate in retaliating. “Therefore, I advise you to obediently hand over the Golden Dragon. I’m sure they will be willing to go back to the Wu family with me. After all, My Wu family has the dragon bone of a Flood Dragon. “This is definitely something that can greatly increase the strength of theGolden Dragon!” At this point, Wu Tian’s face was full of confidence. He looked at Little Golden Dragon with a smile and said, “Little Golden Dragon, you should know how important the bone of a Flood Dragon is, right?” No one expected that the Wu family would have the bone of a Flood Dragon. Wu Tian continued, “Although you are an ancient mutant, you have just turned into a Flood Dragon not too long ago. “The bone of our Wu family’s Flood Dragon has been over ten thousand years old. It was discovered by our Wu family after exploring an ancient ruin. “Moreover, after our investigation, this bone shows that the past beast had already reached the half-step dragon transformation stage when it was still alive. It contains a lot of pure spiritual energy for you to absorb. “If you can absorb this energy, then you will be one step closer to breaking through to the next realm!” After Wu Tian said this, his face was full of confidence as he raised his head and looked at Little Golden Dragon. He was full of confidence that Little Golden Dragon would definitely not reject his offer. This was because for a snake, to be able to transform into a dragon, every step was extremely difficult. It could be said that there would be a lot of trials and tribulations. A snake had to go through countless years of cultivation before it could become a Flood Dragon. A Flood Dragon would go one step further than becoming a dragon. A Flood Dragon would go one step further to become a Horned Dragon. After the Horned Dragon would be a Rain Dragon, and after the Rain Dragon would be a top-grade Golden Dragon. In the real world, let alone a Golden Dragon, even a dragon, or even a Flood Dragon, had not appeared for a thousand years. The spiritual energy in the real world was simply too scarce. Moreover, even if one wanted to transform into a dragon in the Second World, the difficulty of it would be extremely high. If one advanced, one would live, if one did not advance, one would die. There was no way out. Every transformation meant that there was at least a ninety percent chance of death. One had to know that the Guardian Divine Beast, the Dragon, had lived for thousands of years. It went to the Wu family in order to absorb the energy from the 10,000 year old Flood Dragon’s bone. This Flood Dragon had guarded the Wu family for a thousand years, but it could only absorb a tiny bit of it every year. After all, once the energy from the Flood Dragon’s bone was completely absorbed, the Wu Family’s Guardian Divine Beast would probably take the opportunity to leave. Now, in order to rope in the Golden Dragon, the Wu family was actually willing to take out the entire 10,000 year old bone for Little Golden Dragon to absorb. This kind of treatment was something that the Wu family never dared to think about. If that Divine Beast knew about this, it would probably curse and leave. Moreover, Wu Tian was not the slightest bit worried that Little Golden Dragon would leave after absorbing the energy from his Flood Dragon bone, because they had already found the true dragon’s corpse! As long as they had the true dragon’s corpse, they would be able to treat Little Golden Dragon like how they treated their Guardian Divine Beast. Providing it power in succession. It could be said that the Wu family’s plan was closely linked, without a single flaw. After absorbing the Flood Dragon’s bone, he believed that the other party would not be able to resist the temptation of the true dragon’s corpse. As for his Guardian Divine Beast, before he came out, the Wu family had already made an agreement with the Guardian Divine Beast to absorb the true dragon’s corpse together with the Golden Dragon. This would be beneficial to both of them. The Flood Dragon could see through the Wu family’s plan. However, this was what it expected. After all, the Flood Dragon would not be able to absorb any more power from the bone as it already reached its limit anyways. It would be better to let the Golden Dragon absorb the true dragon’s corpse. This way, the Wu family, Little Golden Dragon, and the Guardian Divine Beast would reach a three-win situation. At least, that was what Wu Tian thought. Who knew that in the next moment, Little Golden Dragon, who was still hissing, would actually stretch out its tongue to its maximum length. Then, it narrowed its three eyes and hissed in denial. Then, Little Golden Dragon made another vomiting gesture. Anyone who saw this scene thought that it looked almost comical. No one knew who was the first to burst into laughter. Soon enough, everyone was laughing. Even in the end, a few of the Wu family’s attendants began to laugh out loud as well. In a flash, a loud slap directly landed on the smiling attendant’s face! The attendant staggered and took five to six steps back before he finally stopped. In an instant, a huge five-finger mark slowly appeared on his face. A few teeth in his mouth flew a few meters away and dropped to the ground. “What are you all laughing at?!” Wu Tian cursed angrily and all the attendants immediately put on a stern face. This time, even the members of the Gu family dared not to laugh anymore, because they clearly knew that Wu Tian’s followers were all extremely powerful, far beyond their imagination. Even when their young master, who was here, dared not to make a move. This meant that the other party was at least an Earth grade or even a Heaven grade expert. The leader, Wu Tian, was actually able to slap an attendant’s face so hard that his face started to swell up. Who would dare laugh at such skill? In the end, only two people were left laughing. One was the heartless Lan Weiwei, who had regained her senses, and the other was a little silly, Rollie. Rollie’s laughter was especially exaggerated. The entire panda was glued to the ground, hugging some bamboo shoots and rolling around. This little fellow’s four legs were facing the sky, and he kept kicking his legs. Wu Tian was so angry that his teeth were itching. However, the important deal had yet to be concluded, so he could not turn hostile now. He could only suppress the fury in his heart once again. He opened his mouth and said to Little Golden Dragon, “Our Wu family’s Guardian Divine Beast is also a Flood Dragon. This Flood Dragon has a lifespan of several thousand years. I’m sure it’s not much different from yours. “If you can submit to our Wu family, we can give that Flood Dragon for you to absorb as well, helping you become a dragon as soon as possible! “In addition, we will find a true dragon’s corpse in the near future, and you can also absorb it then!” After these words were said, Lu Chen and the people of the Gu family did not show any unusual behavior. On the contrary, the faces of the followers of the Wu family revealed extreme panic. It was not because they could find the true dragon’s corpse, but because they never expected Wu Tian to offer his own Guardian Divine Beast to the Golden Dragon. They knew that the Flood Dragon had stayed in the Wu family for many years, and its strength was extremely high. It had helped the Wu family many times through huge tribulations. If not for the Guardian Divine Beast, the Wu family would have long been annihilated. Moreover, the Wu family’s Guardian Divine Beast was extremely strong. Even Little Golden Dragon would find it difficult to kill it. If the Wu family made this decision, it meant that the experts of the Wu family would have to kill the Guardian Divine Beast! After all, no one wanted the Wu family to fight a gold-tier beast. However, the problem was that this Flood Dragon was definitely a savior in the Wu Family! It had made a huge contribution to the Wu family.. It’s contributions were even greater than that of the current ancestors of the Wu family! They all stared at Wu Tian’s face, but he did not seem to have any signs of hesitation. It was as if he had made this decision long ago. All of the Wu family’s followers immediately understood that this decision must have been discussed with the elders of the family before Wu Tian arrived here. For a moment, all the attendants felt their scalps go numb and their backs go cold. The Wu family was really ruthless. Wu Tian could see what they were thinking from their faces, but his expression did not change in the slightest. If a family wanted to rise, there would definitely be bloodshed and sacrifices. Not to mention a Guardian Divine Beast, even he, or even the patriarch, would have to stand up when it was time for sacrifices. Wu Tian stared at Little Golden Dragon, thinking that it should be tempted now. The bone of a Flood Dragon that had lived for thousands of years, and the corpse of a true dragon would be given to the Golden Dragon just like that. This was something that all snake-type creatures wanted very much. However, Little Golden Dragon’s expression made him extremely furious! This was because Little Golden Dragon’s originally disdainful expression had now turned into a gaze that looked at him like he was a fool! It was as if the Golden Dragon was asking Wu Tian if he was either st*pid or d*mb. Wu Tian was so angry that he directly cursed at them, “You’re just a tiny beast that has just transformed into a tiny dragon. “Don’t you dare refuse such a good offer. If it wasn’t for the fact that all the elders of our family are in seclusion, you would have gone back with me today. Even if you didn’t want to, we would’ve taken you by force!” It would have been better if he did not say this. Once he said it, Little Golden Dragon rolled his eyes once again and that nearly tipped the anger scale for Wu Tian. Little Golden Dragon was not a fool. Who would be willing to go to the Wu family anyways? Today, Wu Tian said that he was willing to kill his very own Guardian Divine Beast. If another true dragon appeared in the future, would the Wu family hesitate in killing the Golden Dragon? Moreover, Little Golden Dragon knew which was more important. Little Golden Dragon had seen it with its own eyes. Lu Chen had purified the Dragon Scales that he could hardly absorb into a highly pure bloodline essence. There were even other types of demon beast corpses that Lu Chen had used to help Rollie and Lan Weiwei raise their bloodline levels. After all, those things were not creatures with the same bloodline as Lan Weiwei and Rollie. Staying with Lu Chen would definitely bring the Golden Dragon more benefits. Compared to Lu Chen’s immortal level ability, what was the use of a mere Flood Dragon bone that had yet to transform into a true dragon? Even if he added a Guardian Divine Beast as a form of incentive, what use would it be? Compared to Lu Chen, it was trash. Moreover, Lu Chen’s extraction of bloodline was not as simple as extracting the bloodline of a living creature. Little Golden Dragon could clearly feel the purity of the bloodline extracted from the Dragon Scales, it was even far beyond the purity of what it could initially provide. When Little Golden Dragon was very young, it was fortunate enough to meet a legendary Horned Dragon once. That was also the only encounter it ever had. At that time, it felt the suppression of the purity of the bloodline from the Horned Dragon, it was not even as high-level as the one that Lu Chen had extracted back then. Lu Chen definitely had a god-like ability. Following such a person could not be compared to following the Wu family. However, even though Little Golden Dragon trusted Lu Chen this much. It might even have underestimated Lu Chen’s ability. Not to mention the remains of creatures, even some treasures could be converted into bloodline power by Lu Chen. It was just that the quality of spiritual energy would not be as high. It might sound ridiculous, but Lu Chen had indeed done it for Lan Weiwei and Rollie. As long as Little Golden Dragon was with Lu Chen, it would be equivalent to having at least a Horned Dragon’s bloodline ready for it to devour anytime and anywhere, right? If Little Golden Dragon knew that Lu Chen had this ability, it would not have fought as hard as it did. At this moment, Wu Tian was about to explode. As a member of an ancient family, when had he ever been humiliated like this? He had come to recruit an Ancient Mutant into his home. Not only did he get rejected from Lu Chen, he was even despised by the Golden Dragon. He angrily roared back, “Little Golden Dragon, do you really think that you’re untouchable? Do you really think that just because you are powerful, our Wu family doesn’t have the strength to destroy you?” Wu Tian did not come empty-handed. Little Golden Dragon’s strength was obvious to everyone. Therefore, he also brought his own treasures as a backup. They were specially designed to counter creatures like the Golden Dragon. Lu Chen gave the Gu family members a look for them to run away, and then he and his pets prepared for battle. Lu Chen, Lan Weiwei, and Little Golden Dragon looked as if they were facing a great enemy. Even Rollie, who was usually joking around, had a serious look on his face at this moment. If it was anyone else, Lu Chen would not have to be this nervous. He could easily kill the other party just by relying on his attack power as the Sword God. However, as a member of an ancient martial arts aristocratic family, he would have to be extra careful. Moreover, White Fog City had already been summoned once and was temporarily in a dormant state. There was no way to summon that a second time. In addition, Lan Weiwei’s strength was still in a recovering state. Therefore, the only one who could fight with him now was Little Golden Dragon. One had to know that Wu Tian had a few acquired realm experts by his side. This lineup was absolutely too powerful. Wu Tian took out a small porcelain bottle from his pocket. The thing in this porcelain bottle was soft dragon powder. This soft dragon powder was a secret recipe exclusive to the Wu family since ancient times. Once this soft dragon powder is released, all snake-like creatures would be weakened and their combat strength would drop. Their condition would continue to drop for at least two hours. Not to mention Flood Dragons, even if a true dragon came, they would still be weakened by this! Therefore, the place where the Wu family was located was a mountain range filled with pythons. That was why the Wu family was able to survive for a long time. Bringing along the soft dragon powder was a strategy that he had thought of before coming here. After all, it would not be so easy to change the owner of a pet. With the help of the soft dragon powder, Little Golden Dragon was no longer a concern. Lu Chen would not be able to summon White Fog City a second time! However, at this moment, a female voice suddenly came from afar. The voice was not loud but everyone was able to hear it. “Hey, isn’t this Wu Tian? The Wu family is really amazing. “They couldn’t survive as an ancient martial arts aristocratic family in the Second World. Now, they’ve already fallen to the point where they came to the real world to bully an ordinary person and snatch his pet away? “They really bring shame to the other martial arts aristocratic family’s statuses!” Once these words were said, even the arrogant and angered Wu Tian stopped what he was doing. His expression suddenly froze. Then, he looked at the person who came, and his expression was very cold, but there was a hint of fear in his voice as he said, “Tang Xiaoqing, are you here to make fun of me? Our Wu family is only here to take the Golden Dragon. We didn’t take White Fog City that you are eyeing for. We each take what we want, and we don’t interfere with each other’s businesses. If you are here to take the White Fog City, then I suggest we work together for now..” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation When Lu Chen heard Tang Xiaoqing’s voice, he immediately looked in that direction and felt that the voice was somewhat familiar. She was dressed in a pair of jeans and had a high ponytail on her head. Her delicate and playful facial features were very enticing, and her bright eyes were especially eye-catching. It was as if he had seen this girl before… When Wu Tian called out Tang Xiaoqing’s name, Lu Chen’s eyes widened in disbelief. How could it be her? Was this not the girl who was often bullied by her classmates in primary school? When Tang Xiaoqing was in the second grade of primary school, she transferred to another school. At that time, he only heard from his teacher that Tang Xiaoqing was not a local student. Even Tang Xiaoqing did not know where she came from. Instead, she stuttered and often said that she came from some mountain. Therefore, her classmates often laughed at her and bullied for being from the mountain. At that time, Tang Xiaoqing was thin and small, and she was often bullied. Many people in the class bullied her, but Lu Chen was different. He could never stand these bullying behaviors, so he helped Tang Xiaoqing out of trouble. Because of this, he had his own fair share of fights with the boys. Everyone knew that when they were young, the boys and girls would always be on opposite sides. As a result, Lu Chen angered the bad boys who bullied Tang Xiaoqing. In addition, Lu Chen was alone, and he often could not beat the bad boys. Instead, the bad boys bullied him together, often cornering and bullying him as well. Every time Lu Chen was covered in bruises, Tang Xiaoqing would take the initiative to come over and comfort him. From then on, Tang Xiaoqing grew to have a good relationship with him. Moreover, when he was young, Tang Xiaoqing always comforted himself by saying that when there was an opportunity, she would call her brothers at home to take care of these bad guys together. Tang Xiaoqing also boasted that as long as one of her brothers came, it would be enough. Even if all these bad guys came together, they would be no match for her brother. Lu Chen was not a fool. He did not believe these lies! If she really had those brothers, why haven’t they shown up? Lu Che was the only one that suffered from the bullying all day long. Just like that, the two young children built a good relationship since they were young. However, for some reason, before they graduated from primary school, Tang Xiaoqing suddenly disappeared without a word. The teacher only said that she had transferred to another school. As for where she went, no one knew. Tang Xiaoqing’s disappearance was just like when she had arrived. There was no trace of her. However, the strange thing was that the people who had previously bullied her were all badly beaten the next day when they came to school. Many people were so scared that they were trembling when they saw Lu Chen’s appearance. They kept pleading, “Don’t hit me…” Lu Chen only felt that it was strange. There were even a few parents who came to his house and said that he had hit their child and asked him to pay for it. If the teacher had not locked him up to memorize the essay that day, he might have really been blackmailed by these students. However, after that, no one dared to bully him anymore. Even when he was in middle school and high school, the legend of him defeating twenty people spread like wildfire in school. No one dared to provoke him ever again. Back then, Lu Chen became invisible, and he had felt very happy from it. Now, Lu Chen finally understood what happened. It was likely that Tang Xiaoqing had been taken away by her family back then. Thinking back, it was likely that Tang Xiaoqing’s older brother had disguised himself and taught those children a good lesson. Those were just a group of ordinary brats. How could they compare to people from ancient martial arts aristocratic families? They were definitely taught a good lesson. Now that he thought about it, if he was exposed for using the Tang family’s name to go around the school, he would probably die on the spot! After sme consideration, Lu Chen even wanted to play dumb and not acknowledge Tang Xiaoqing. However, it was obviously not possible. Because in the next second, Tang Xiaoqing narrowed her crescent-shaped eyes and smiled sweetly at him. “Hi! Long time no see, Chenchen!” When these words were said, everyone’s jaws dropped. This was Lu Chen! The legendary Morning Mist, such an existence, was being called Chenchen?! Why was there such a cute name for such a terrifying person? The originally hostile atmosphere was instantly disintegrated by this name calling. Even Wu Tian and the others began to panic. Lu Chen felt even more embarrassed and wanted to dig a hole on the spot. However, since the other party greeted him, he could not pretend that he did not know her. He directly forced up the corners of his mouth and revealed an embarrassed smile. “Qi…Qingqing, long time no see...;” The moment he called out this name, his entire face flushed pink and his whole body heated up from the embarrassment. Goosebumps even appeared all over his body Everyone felt that the tension in the air had changed. The original life-and-death situation had become a place for the couple to flirt. At a certain moment, Wu Tian even felt that he should not have been here. Tang Xiaoqing then looked at the pets standing beside Lu Chen. “This young lady should be...;” Lan Weiwei came back to her senses and quickly said, “I’m Lan Weiwei!” Lu Chen looked at Lan Weiwei in shock. What the f*ck! Tang Xiaoqing was stunned for a moment. Then, she squinted her eyes and stretched out her hand again. “Hello, Weiwei!” The Golden Dragon on Lu Chen’s body also said in a muffled voice, “Little Golden Dragon...;” Rollie followed suit, but when it reached him, no one could hear what he was saying. However, Lu Chen, who shared the same thoughts as him, understood that this fellow was definitely saying, “Rollie! I’m Rollie!” What the f*ck was happening?! Lu Chen had experienced so many battles and encountered countless death-like situations. Even when he was facing Lan Weiwei or the Ancient Ash Wolf, he had never felt this hopeless. This was probably the most socially deathly situation he had ever experienced in his life! At this moment, Wu Tian looked at this group of people for a long time before he finally reacted. He was actually being ignored! Although Wu Tian did not know what was happening. At this moment, he could not hold it in anymore. He was originally the strongest existence here, but now he was watching the show like a monkey. He felt disrespected. Moreover, he could clearly feel from their conversation that Tang Xiaoqing definitely knew Lu Chen. This was going to be even more troublesome. If Tang Xiaoqing wanted to protect Lu Chen, he did not seem to have any other way. The Tang family was much more powerful than his Wu family. Plus, Tang Xiaoqing was a naturally born genius between the families.. Although her cultivation seemed to be similar to his, her strength was already much higher than his. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Wu Tian looked at Tang Xiaoqing in front of him and his blood boiled. The situation was fine just now, why did this have to happen to him? It seemed that it was obviously impossible to force things into his hands now. However, his mind spun quickly, and it did not take long for another plan to come to fruition, and he began to sow discord. “Tang Xiaoqing, everyone in this ancient martial arts aristocratic family knows what your family is after. “Even if you know this kid, I’m afraid you won’t be able to stop your family’s plan. “Why don’t you and I persuade this kid, Lu Chen, together? When the time comes, we can still fight for more benefits from him. “Otherwise, if our family really forcefully snatched him away, this kid wouldn’t be able to withstand it. “No matter how powerful your Tang family is, will you be able to stop all our ancient martial arts aristocratic families from coveting him? “Unless Tang Ling appears, who else can resolve this matter? “Moreover, will your Tang family’s grand elder always be by his side?” Lu Chen somewhat understood what he meant. This Tang Xiaoqing had appeared in front of him because of the White Fog City incident. However, he believed that Tang Xiaoqing would definitely not do anything bad to him. Moreover, she had deliberately appeared when Wu Tian was here. It must have been to protect him. He could feel that the strength of the woman in front of him was simply unfathomable. Although on the surface, his strength and Wu Tian’s were both acquired realm experts, for some reason, Tang Xiaoqing always gave him a very mysterious feeling. If the feeling that an ordinary person gave him was superficial, then the feeling that Wu Tian gave him was that the spiritual energy in his body was very condensed, and his strength was abnormally huge. However, for Tang Xiaoqing, besides having the same feeling as Wu Tian, she also gave off a feeling as if she was gazing into an abyss. It was a very strange thing to try to explain to others. If Lu Chen were to sum it up, he would say that it was as if she was facing a black hole, being bottomless and unfathomable. Even when Lu Chen’s strength was low, he had never felt this kind of feeling from anyone. Wu Tian then added, “Our Wu family must get our hands on this Golden Dragon.” Hearing this, Tang Xiaoqing, who had been smiling and chatting with everyone, suddenly turned to look at Wu Tian. Her expression became abnormally cold, and she said softly, “It’s none of my business.” This sentence made Wu Tian almost choke to death. His face was red with anger, but he still suppressed his anger and replied, “But your Tang family also wants to take White Fog City. Shouldn’t you think about your family?” The coldness in Tang Xiaoqing’s demeanor became even more obvious. It was almost as if she wanted to stare him down until he turned into ice. Once again, she said emotionlessly, “It’s none of your business.” This time, even Lu Chen’s jaw dropped in shock. When did the little girl become this tough? Was this still that delicate and weak little girl from back then? Did she still need him to protect the little girl who followed behind him all day long? Now, he had actually understood the true meaning of life. After all, 80 percent of the troubles in the world could be solved by either telling people it is none of my business, or it is none of their business. “What?!” Wu Tian felt his blood boiling, and in the end, he directly spat onto the floor out of anger. This day is becoming more and more depressing! He was too angry, and he could not be reasoned with. He was not even in the right state to fight property. When had he ever suffered such grievance? One had to know that although his status in the Wu family was not that high, he was still one of the direct descendants of the Wu family. This Tang Xiaoqing had simply gone too far. Tang Xiaoqing’s strength was much higher than his. Moreover, she was the pearl of the Tang family, a true Tang ancient martial arts aristocratic family member. She was the youngest daughter of the Tang family. It was said that a few years ago, the Tang family even sent an expert to the school to beat up a group of children to vent Tang Xiaoqing’s anger. Although it was not publicly announced, it had always been a rumor. If it was him now, even if Tang Xiaoqing killed him here, no one would avenge him. The Wu family would not fall out with the Tang family just because of him. On the contrary, with the degree of protection the Tang family had, it was possible that they would even accuse the Wu family to demand an explanation. At that time, his death would be in vain. “Good, good, very good!” Wu Tian said three good words in a row, “Since you think so, let’s meet again in the future. I don’t believe that you can protect this kid for his entire life! “One day, he will die by my hands. “I don’t know what you, Tang Xiaoqing, are thinking. If you want to protect this kid, I think you’re overestimating yourself. “Your Tang family will definitely not give up on White Fog City. When that time comes, without the protection of White Fog City, I want to see how this kid can protect himself with all his equipment. “Lu Chen, take good care of the Golden Dragon for me. Sooner or later, he will be mine! “The wind will blow and the sun will rise once again. It may take a while, but it will happen!” After saying that, he left the manor with his entourage dejectedly. Tang Xiaoqing shot a cold glance from behind. “Oh, he left? Why was he talking nonsense?” Coincidentally, Wu Tian heard this and almost tripped on his steps! However, he still had the support of his entourage, so he quickly staggered out. Although Wu Tian did ont manage to complete any of his official tasks, he was really good at making vicious remarks. He clearly did not manage to complete any of his official tasks, yet he still managed to display the demeanor of a king. Even Lu Chen could not help but sigh. What an interesting man. After Wu Tian left, the members of the Gu family were also very tactful and quickly left. Gu Yiming cupped his hands and exchanged a few pleasantries before leaving the manor. Even Little Golden Dragon, Lan Weiwei, and Rollie had tactfully hidden away. Lan Weiwei even winked at Lu Chen before leaving. Only Lu Chen and Tang Xiaoqing were left standing at the manor’s entrance. At this moment, Tang Xiaoqing’s cold and aloof image, which she had only displayed in front of Wu Tian, disappeared in an instant. The expression on her face, which was like an ice-cold beauty, completely melted. She pounced on Lu Chen and shouted excitedly, “Chenchen, I can finally see you again!” Lu Chen stretched out his hands helplessly. For a moment, he did not know whether to hug Tang Xiaoqing tightly or to stand like a log. It was not that he did not want to hug her back, nor was it that he was embarrassed. Instead, he could feel that somewhere around the manor, there was a faint killing intent aimed at him. It was obvious that this person was most likely Tang Xiaoqing’s protector. Of course. Lu Chen understood that this person hiding in the dark was definitely not a love rival. Otherwise, he probably would have been killed on sight… The other party’s strength was clearly much stronger than his. At the same time, Lu Chen also thought that since Tang Xiaoqing had a protector around, then Wu Tian must also have a protector himself. After all, with his strength and being only about 30 years old, he was probably a person with authority in the Wu family. However, now, Wu Tian knew better than to even breathe in the same direction as the Tang family! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Even as an ancient martial arts aristocratic family, Wu Tian believed that he was definitely a peerless genius. However, in front of Tang Xiaoqing who was not even 20 years old, such a peerless genius was actually made him scared sh*tless. Even in the end, he only spoke harshly to Lu Chen and dared not say anything nasty to Tang Xiaoqing. Wu Tian was so angry that his whole body was so tense. Lu Chen did not expect the little girl who only knew how to hide behind others and cry to have an extraordinary identity. Lu Chen could only stretch out a hand and pat her body awkwardly. “Alright, alright. Now that they’ve all left, you can tell me why your Tang family wants White Fog City.” After she said this, Tang Xiaoqing reluctantly released her hand. Back then, she had left without saying goodbye. Tang Xiaoqing had even caused a ruckus in the Tang family for a while. All these years, she still thought about her only friend that protected her back then. Tang Xiaoqing really missed Lu Chen. Now that she heard Lu Chen say this, she hurriedly released her hand. Just as she was about to open her mouth to explain, she suddenly stopped. Then, she pouted. “About that… Previously, when you were the City Lord of White Fog City, the various ancient martial arts aristocratic families had been thinking about how to obtain it. Our Tang family also wants it, so I’m here as a representative.” Tang Xiaoqing said it lightly, but Lu Chen was not a fool. There were many problems involved. Since so many ancient martial arts aristocratic families wanted it, why should the Tang family get it? Wu Tian came and arrogantly insisted on taking Little Golden Dragon away. However, he dared not to even mention taking White Fog City away. All of this showed that the Tang family had more power than the Wu family! Moreover, he knew that Tang Xiaoqing had a close relationship with him, yet she was still here. Lu Chen thought for a moment and asked, “How many ancient martial arts aristocratic families are there?” Tang Xiaoqing thought for a moment and pointed at her lips. “One Qin, two Tang, three Liu, four Yang, five Li, six Wu, and there’s also Sima!” Lu Chen’s eyelids twitched. The Tang family was actually ranked second. No wonder this little girl in front of him was bold and did not care about the Wu family. However, this time, it also gave Lu Chen a horrifying reminder. The Wu Family, which was ranked sixth, already had such a powerful expert. Then, the people from the other families should not be underestimated either. As the first elder had said, these ancient martial arts aristocratic families were not people that he could provoke. Originally, Lu Chen had felt that after becoming the City Lord of White Fog City, he could do whatever he wanted in the world. Now that he looked at it, not only were there many forces overseas eyeing him covetously, even the ancient martial arts aristocratic families in the country were also keeping tabs on him. His strength had to be raised quickly. Lu Chen looked at Tang Xiaoqing. “Then did you come this time to make me give up the being the City Lord of White Fog City?” Tang Xiaoqing was so frightened that she hurriedly waved her hand and immediately clarified, “I’m not! I didn’t say that! Don’t spout nonsense! “It was my father who told me to bring you back to talk about the matters of White Fog City. I just took this opportunity to come and see you! “After all, I haven’t seen you for so many years, and I never forgot you...;” At this point, Tang Xiaoqing’s face actually turned a little red. Even Lu Chen was a little stunned by what he saw. It had to be said that this little girl was as thin as a bean sprout back then, but now she looked slim and graceful. Not only was her appearance outstanding, she was no weaker than Liu Yuan and Lan Weiwei, and her figure was even more curvaceous. Her curvy appearance was definitely not inferior to the stunning celebrities on screen. Her entire temperament was very graceful under the education of the ancient martial arts aristocratic families. Even those top models were not in the slightest bit inferior to Tang Xiaoqing. If this kind of existence was placed in the school grounds, she would definitely be the top school belle! However, it was this kind of existence that had actually become Lu Chen’s little fangirl! Lu Chen did not know why, but he could faintly hear someone sighing.. Lu Chen felt his scalp go numb when he thought of the hidden expert glaring at him. “Qing… Qingqing, let’s go inside and talk.” As he spoke, he pulled the bouncing and ecstatic Tang Xiaoqing into the room. He directly pulled Tang Xiaoqing into his room and quickly closed the door. Of course, they spoke and talked about the old times… Liu Yuan, Lan Weiwei, Rollie, and Little Golden Dragon who had been lying by the door were all chased away by him. Lan Weiwei stretched out her hand and slapped Little Golden Dragon on the head. She scolded him, “If you hadn’t stuck out your tongue and hissed, we wouldn’t have been discovered!” The Golden Dragon lowered its head with an aggrieved expression.. Lu Chen and Tang Xiaoqing chatted in the room for the entire afternoon. For a moment, laughter filled every corner of the manor. Lu Chen also lost track of time as he chatted about his childhood. They talked about when they were young, they used to go to the grass to catch insects together. When they went to the playground together, they brought Tang Xiaoqing and the boys to play football together. There were also two people who played hide-and-seek together, and when they were bullied, they hid in each other’s homes to comfort each other. He also remembered the pinky promise that he would let Tang Xiaoqing’s brother teach these bad children a lesson in the future. These past events were still vivid in his mind. Lu Chen felt as if he had really returned to his childhood. If the sleep he had last night could be said to have alleviated the mental and physical stress he had during the game. Then, the conversation he had with Tang Xiaoqing today allowed him to completely relax. It could be said that this had been Lu Chen’s most relaxed and happiest day he ever had. The two of them chatted until it was dark before they had no choice but to stop the story short. Lu Chen finally got to the main topic. “So… You’re here to bring me to your Tang family. What are your Tang family members thinking about?” Xiaoqing’s expression turned very complicated. She was even a little conflicted. Her two fingers fiddled with the corner of her clothes. Her index finger was still drawing circles back and forth. From Lu Chen’s perspective, she looked very cute. She wanted to say something, but she took a glance at a certain spot outside the window. Then, she retracted her head: “It’s hard for me to say these things. After all, I’ve been studying and cultivating myself since I returned to the Tang family for so many years. “As for whatever business that happens in the Tang family, I don’t care about it. “Let’s go back to the Tang family together. When the time comes, I’ll let my father explain it to you.” Lu Chen nodded slightly, then brought Tang Xiaoqing and the others to the living room for a meal. During the meal, everyone introduced each other and got to know each other. Tang Xiaoqing quickly became good friends with Lu Chen’s pets. Especially with Liu Yuan, they even took photos together. They discussed where to buy clothes, what to do with their nails, and how to style their hair… These were all topics discussed between women, and Lu Chen could not get into it at all. Whether she could say it or not, even though Tang Xiaoqing was talented and powerful, her years in the Tang family were not as interesting as compared to when she stepped outside into the real world, the one with Lu Chen in it. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation How could a girl not love beauty? Tang Xiaoqing had always lacked in this kind of beauty-loving and fashionable experience. It was not easy for her to leave the Tang family and come to the outside world on her own. Now that she had come into contact with so many exciting things in life, this little girl’s eyes were always shining with a want to know more. She pulled Liu Yuan and asked about everything and anything. She even made an appointment to have her hair done the next day. When Lu Chen reminded her that she still had to go to the Tang family the next day, Tang Xiaoqing’s face was filled with disappointment. However, she immediately pulled Liu Yuan along and requested to have her hair done tonight instead. Moreover, Tang Xiaoqing even looked through a magazine and told everyone that she wanted the dreadlocks that the people had in the pictures and strongly requested to have it done! Everyone was so scared that they almost spat out their food. Everyone tried their best to persuade the little girl to give up the idea. However, the decision to go shopping tonight still did not change. Lu Chen was really stunned by this operation. A woman’s love for beauty could not be underestimated. Lu Chen fell asleep very early that night. Lan Weiwei, Liu Yuan, and Tang Xiaoqing held hands and went to do their hair, nails, and clothes together. When they returned, it was already past five in the morning the next day. Fortunately, they were in the metropolis. Otherwise, they would not have had anywhere to go that night. Although the three of them had gone shopping this late, Lu Chen did not have to worry about their safety at all. There was an Ancient Ash Wolf King, a top-notch special forces expert, and a golden stage ancient martial arts aristocratic family genius. If they were in danger, even if he went, it would not mean much. Moreover, Tang Xiaoqing had an extremely terrifying expert hidden by her side tailing her. The next morning, Lu Chen received the things that Liu Yuan had sent as soon as he woke up. Inside were clearly a few pieces of equipment that the first elder of the Dragon Country had given him. One was a pair of Swift Boots, one was an Exoskeleton Wingsuit, and there was also an Elf Egg that faintly shone with a holy light. Lu Chen looked at the egg and could not put it down. The size of the egg was about 30 centimeters long and 20 centimeters wide. It looked crystal clear on the surface, but there was clearly something growing inside. Lu Chen touched the egg. The surface of the egg was extremely smooth. At this moment, a chubby, furry black hand reached out and snatched the egg away! It was the foodie, Rollie! Rollie snatched the egg and brought it to his mouth. He opened his mouth wide and took a bite! This caused everyone’s scalps to go numb! This bite was so bold. It was no longer a matter of nobility or inferiority. After all, there was no such thing as that for Rollie! However, no one had the time to react. Even Tang Xiaoqing did not expect this to happen! That gluttonous fellow was so greedy! When Rollie opened his mouth, Lu Chen’s heart was about to break. This was something that he had just obtained from the first elder. In the blink of an eye, it had already turned into food before he could keep it for a day? The first elder was really a jinx. At first, he had said that it was useless, then, he said that it could become breakfast. The problem was that he had not eaten it yet! With a crisp cracking sound, everyone thought that it was the end for the egg. However, the next moment, everyone was stunned. Rollie actually threw the egg to one side, covering his mouth and rolling on the ground. No one knew what had happened. Lu Chen hurriedly ran up to pick up the Elf Egg and carefully examined it. He found that not only was there no damage to the egg, there was not even a scratch on it. He then went to check on Rollie. Rollie lay on the ground and rolled around for a long time. From time to time, it would make baby crying sounds. After a while, when he opened his hands, a pure white tooth actually fell off. This scene really shocked everyone. One had to know that this was Rollie! He had the bloodline of an ancient beast. This kind of creature’s bite force was strong, and its teeth were supposed to be strong. It was not something that ordinary creatures could compare to. Moreover, he had good fortune. Under such tyrannical luck, he actually could not cause any harm to the Elf Egg. It had to be said that this Elf Egg was really a treasure. At the same time, this also proved that this Elf Egg was more complicated than expected. No wonder the entire Dragon Country could not break it. Lu Chen immediately put on the Swift Boots. When he put it on, Lu Chen felt his body suddenly become much lighter. He jumped slightly, and immediately jumped more than a meter high. He did not even feel that he had used much strength! When he ran out, he felt that his speed had even surpassed Lan Weiwei, who was the Ancient Ash Wolf King. In a short sprint, he left a mirage in his path. Tang Xiaoqing even tried to compete with him. After all, Tang Xiaoqing had surpassed Lu Chen by a whole level. Under such circumstances, she was barely on par with Lu Chen’s speed. When Lu Chen had a speed burst, he was able to directly shake off Tang Xiaoqing in her tracks. Even Xiaoqing was envious of his speed. Then, Lu Chen put on the Exoskeleton Wingsuit. It looked very unique. It was white, but there was a faint metallic glow. It was unknown what material it was made of. Moreover, when this Exoskeleton Wingsuit could shrink to the size of a phone. However, when it was fully unfolded, its wingspan was four meters wide and its height was more than one meter high. The best thing was that it was as light as a feather. This kind of weight felt like it weighed less than one kilogram. To have this kind of large-scale equipment to achieve such a degree was commendable. It had to be said that the Beauty Country that prioritized technology definitely had its own unique points. To be able to become one of the strongest countries in the world, it should not be underestimated. When Lu Chen put on this Exoskeleton Wingsuit, it was almost as if it had become one with his own body. It was amazing! With a thought, the entire Exoskeleton Wingsuit opened up, and it looked as dazzling as the end of an angel’s wing. Lu Chen quickly folded the wings to the smallest size, then half-squatted down and jumped up. Accompanied by the assistance of the Swift Boots, his entire body suddenly rushed into the sky dozens of meters high. In the next moment, Lu Chen spread the wings to the maximum length, and directly glided in the air. When everyone on the ground saw this, they were all amazed. He looked like an angel! Lu Chen glided in the sky, his movements were incomparably smooth and swift. At this moment, he really felt like a falcon, gliding freely in the sky.. He did not feel out of place at all. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Not only did he not feel uncomfortable, but he also glided for a minute without having the need to descend. How did the Beauty Country achieve this ability that seemed to resist gravity? It was strange! It seemed that the Beauty Country had always been hiding their unique top-notch technology. Lu Chen tried to gently wave his wings again, and his height rose by a little. This was something that the first elder had not mentioned before. The first elder had previously said that this equipment was not meant for flying, only gliding. However, if this equipment was equipped with a state that was close to anti-gravity, even if it could not go by leaps and bounds, it should be no problem for one to stay high in the sky for a few hours! Lu Chen could not help but exclaim in admiration. Although this Exoskeleton Wingsuit could not fly freely in the air like real gold-tier equipment, its effect was far beyond his imagination. Lu Chen only jumped up a few dozen meters in the air, and the flapping wings allowed him to stay in the air for ten more extra minutes. This level was comparable to a god-tier equipment. However, Lu Chen did not receive the Disguise Mask, which made him feel that something was not right. He asked Liu Yuan directly, “These were all brought here by the first elder, right? Why is there another piece of equipment missing? Did the first elder say anything about that?” Liu Yuan nodded slightly and said, “The first elder only gave me these three items in total. Oh right, he told me that if I still need other equipment, the equipment is in the Tang family.” Hearing this, Lu Chen’s face instantly fell. The Disguise Mask was actually in the Tang family! Since yesterday, Lu Chen had always had an ominous premonition in his heart. At this moment, it finally came true. D*mn it, he felt as if he had been cheated! He hurriedly called the first elder. As expected, the other party hung up as soon as the phone rang! Lu Chen finally put the pieces together. Although this Disguise Mask was from the Dragon Country, it had somehow fallen into the hands of the Tang family. Perhaps the first elder had always wanted it back, but how could he so openly tell Lu Chen this shameful truth? It just so happened that the first elder realized that he needed this kind of thing, so he might as well give it to him. Instead, Lu Chen just ended up doing him a favor instead. It had to be said that the first elder’s move was really cunning! However, Lu Chen was still a little apprehensive. After all, the reason why he was going to the Tang Family was because the other party wanted his White Fog City. If he was willing to give up White Fog City, he should earn more than just a disguise mask as a benefit. However, why would he give White Fog City away so easily? He would rather reject the entire Tang family and then still ask for the Disguise Mask. If he really did that, it would be good enough if the Tang family did not kill him. The Tang family, which ranked second in the ancient aristocratic family, would not be able to stand such disrespect. Ever since yesterday, Lu Chen had a bad premonition in his heart. At this moment, it finally came true. However, no matter how awkward it was, there was nothing he could do, because he had to make a trip to the Tang family now to resolve the crisis in front of him. The few of them packed up and set off. Everyone’s luggage was kept simple. Liu Yuan said to Lu Chen, “The Dragon Team has already prepared all the necessary materials for the journey. Wherever we go, the hotels have already been prepared. “The game pod and the security personnel have also been arranged. “Today, we will take a plane to the city. We will go to the Mass Grave with the soldiers of the Dragon Team tonight.” Lu Chen frowned slightly and asked, “Why so soon?” Liu Yuan was wearing a black leather coat, which outlined her figure. It had to be said that even Lu Chen could not help but sneak a glance. Her eyes were watery, but they were full of thought. “The situation in the Dragon Country had gotten more severe. If you want to be ahead of other countries, you have to seize every second you have. “In addition, the first elder is doing this for your own good. You should know what kind of situation you are in now.” Hearing this, Lu Chen took a deep breath. He knew that he was facing a lot of hardships right now. Even the foreign forces were still eyeing him like a tiger eyes their prey. The Western Castle and Xiao Bai had long targeted him, while the other forces had also targeted the Dragon Country. After all, it was because of his existence that the Dragon Country had become the target of public criticism. Therefore, once a force attacked the Dragon Country, Lu Chen could not sit idly by. Otherwise, when he is alone and helpless, he would really be finished. Lu Chen nodded slightly and immediately boarded the bus to the airport with the others. On the way, everyone was tacitly silent and closed their eyes to rest. It was very quiet in the carriage. Even Tang Xiaoqing, who had not seen Lu Chen for many years and missed him very much, was sitting by the side obediently and occasionally glanced around. Everyone knew that tonight’s battle at the Mass Grave would definitely not be any easier than the previous battle at Snake Pond. This was definitely an unprecedented battle. The scale of this battle was no less than a medium-sized battle. When Lu Chen and the others arrived at the airport, they did not line up together with the ordinary people to wait for their flight. Instead, they walked directly to the VIP area. Those who could walk here either had a very high status or were carrying out top-notch special missions. Coincidentally, Lu Chen fit both rgw criteria. One had to know that even ordinary special forces soldiers would not use this pathway when carrying out missions. Along the way, the general manager of the airport accompanied them, afraid that some ignorant airport personnel would neglect these people. Although the general manager did not know who these people in front of him were, there was one person he knew, and that was Lu Chen. Whoever provoked him would die a thousand times. If someone provoked him, then the entire airport would be destroyed, including him. Therefore, all the relevant personnel of the department along the way had long been dismissed. The fewer people who knew about such a top-level operation, the better. Even the general manager did not ask a single question, and waited on them carefully throughout the whole process. When they entered the airport, all the planes that were waiting for the flight had stopped taking off and were waiting. As for Lu Chen’s plane, the crew had already arrived on the plane and were waiting to take off at any time. This plane was specially chartered by the Dragon Country to send them. On the way, no one disturbed the various services, and everything was ready. When their plane took off, the general manager stood under the plane and looked up to see them off, wiping the sweat from his head. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation After going through this whole process, even Lu Chen could not help but sigh. The world had really changed. When he was just an ordinary person, he never even sat on a bullet train. Now, all his trips were chartered flights. Sure enough, there were always people in this world who had special privileges. The life he was living now was a life he had never dared to imagine before. However, he had to admit that the pressure he was facing now was also much higher than before. If he was not careful, he would fall into a land of eternal damnation. On the plane, Lu Chen seemed to have thought of something. He asked Tang Xiaoqing, “Previously, they said that they found the corpse of a True Dragon. Where did they find the corpse?” Although Lu Chen did not need the corpse of a True Dragon, Little Golden Dragon needed it very much. If a Flood Dragon wanted to become a True Dragon, or even a higher level existence, it had to constantly increase the purity of its bloodline. Otherwise, it would not be enough to just increase its strength. It could very well turn into ashes during the tribulation. Tang Xiaoqing also understood Lu Chen’s meaning. She turned her head to look at Little Golden Dragon that was still wrapped around Lu Chen’s arm and replied. “That dragon’s corpse has been known to the ancient families for a long time. It has been a long time. “However, no one has ever brought it back. The reason is that the True Dragon’s corpse is located at the Mass Grave.” When Lu Chen heard this, his pupils constricted. He had long heard that a True Dragon had descended from the sky at the Mass Grave and never appeared again. He had never thought that the ancient martial families would actually know about this news. This meant that it was most likely true. “Why have the families never made a move? Is it because the True Dragon’s corpse has become a powerful existence in the Mass Grave? Why is the Wu family the only one preparing to retrieve it?” Lu Chen asked a few questions consecutively. Yuqing explained, “The True Dragon’s corpse is indeed a treasure, but the problem is that not everyone has the opportunity to enter the Mass Grave. “Out of the six silver territories, the other territories are relatively weaker. Only the Mass Grave is incomparably more powerful. “Moreover, even freelance martial artists have the opportunity to enter. Only the ancient aristocratic families are absolutely not allowed to enter.” Although she said that the other silver territories were relatively weaker, and it was said in front of Lan Weiwei, Little Golden Dragon, Rollie, and Liu Yuan, no one questioned it. If it was another territory, they would still have the courage to challenge and fight. They would even be familiar with many of their opponents territories. However, the Mass Grave was an exception. They knew how terrifying it was. Many of them had heard about it. Even though the bosses of the other territories were powerful, none of them dared to contend it. Unless they were about to die, they would never feel such a palpitating aura. All of this started from the fall of the True Dragon. Lu Chen was puzzled, “Could it be that the Mass Grave has a taboo against the people of the ancient families?” Tang Xiaoqing nodded slightly, “The ancient families aren’t afraid of the True Dragon’s corpse, because it was only an epic-level existence when it was alive. A mere soul stage True Dragon is nothing to the ancient aristocratic families. “However, the problem was that the True Dragon was originally the mount of an expert. However, that expert was besieged by the aristocratic families and died in the Mass Grave.” Hearing this, Lu Chen, Lan Weiwei, Liu Yuan and the others’ faces were filled with shock. Even Little Golden Dragon and Rollie did not move. They looked at Tang Xiaoqing in disbelief. The amount of information contained in these words was too much! The golden stage was already a powerful existence. Who would have thought that a True Dragon was actually equivalent to a human’s soul stage. How powerful could that be? Lu Chen could not imagine. Right now, he was already the most powerful being in the real world. Of course, this was under the premise of excluding the ancient martial arts aristocratic families. Now, the ancient martial families had actually killed the True Dragon in the Mass Grave. Even the master of the True Dragon was unable to escape the fate of death. The True Dragon was already at the soul stage. How powerful was the master of the True Dragon? How powerful were the entire ancient martial families to be able to kill such an existence? Lu Chen was even extremely baffled by this. “Since that expert and the True Dragon were both killed by the ancient martial families back then, why haven’t the ancient martial families gone to the Mass Grave to directly collect the True Dragon’s corpse?” Tang Xiaoqing continued to explain, “Because this Mass Grave has existed for countless years. The aura of death and resentment in it is already too dense. “Originally, there weren’t any particularly powerful existences here. There were only a few silver bosses, so they were all independent creatures. No one could truly unify the entire Mass Grave. It was like a pile of loose sand.” Hearing this, Lu Chen’s eyelids twitched slightly. A silver boss’s existence in the other territories was already considered a wild concept. Of course, Little Golden Dragon was an exception. After becoming a gold boss, it temporarily stayed behind to wait for the female snake. However, there had been many silver existences in the Mass Grave since a long time ago. This was not strange. After all, every silver boss would rush to the Mass Grave before they died. After so many years of nurturing the aura of death, even if they could not recover their strength when they were alive, it was not impossible for them to reach the silver level. If it was some creatures that had a lot of energy, they would probably be even stronger. Tang Xiaoqing continued on, “The True Dragon and his master were extremely powerful. Especially after being attacked and killed, the resentment in their bodies grew each day. It just so happens that it can be combined with the aura of death in the Mass Grave. “It was precisely because of the obsession of that wandering cultivator that there was a certain degree of rejection towards the people from the ancient martial arts aristocratic families. There was no way for the experts to enter. “If they wanted to enter, they could only be people below the gold stage. However, it was still challenging to get in. Once they reached the soul stage, they would be instantly strangled to death. “If they wanted to send other experts of a higher level, they would at least have to be the heads of the various families, or even existences above the grand elder level. “However, to these people, there was nothing that they needed in the Mass Grave. On the contrary, the danger was far greater than the opportunity. “Therefore, the Mass Grave had been shelved for so many years. “As the Wu family was the weakest existence among the ancient martial arts aristocratic families, and their family’s guardian Divine Beast was a Flood Dragon, they had not given up on bringing the True Dragon’s corpse back from the Second World for so many years. “Even those people who had entered the Second World had wandered around for a long time, but they had not been able to find this place. “It wasn’t until the entrance of the Second World did the families find out that the True Dragon was here.” Tang Xiaoqing looked at everyone and continued to explain patiently, “Ever since the Second World appeared, the Wu family has been preparing to enter the Mass Grave. “The first elder of the Dragon Country should have told you that the Bat Cave has already been cleared, right?” Lu Chen nodded slightly, and Tang Xiaoqing continued, “The person who cleared the Bat Cave was the Wu family. “At that time, Wu Tian brought the Wu family’s people and directly went into the Bat Cave, killing all the creatures there. “Therefore, the Bat Cave is now the only place in the six territories where there are no monsters.” Hearing this, Lu Chen did not react. On the contrary, his three pets only felt a chill down their spine. The Wu family was too vicious. They had actually slaughtered all the bats in the entire cave. Tang Xiaoqing continued to advise him, “So if you and Wu Tian meet head-on, you must be careful. Because other than Wu Tian’s offensive moves, no one knows what else he got from the Bat Cave.” Hearing Tang Xiaoqing’s words, Weiwei narrowed her beautiful eyes and echoed from the side, “That’s right. I’ve fought with the previous Bat King a few times. His offensive moves are very unique. “It’s like he can emit sound waves, and even if I cover my ears, I can’t defend against it. “I’ve even killed him a few times before, but it wasn’t long before he reappeared. This kind of undying ability is really strange.” Lan Weiwei’s words had caught Lu Chen’s attention. If the other party was only in the aurous stage, then Lu Chen had the confidence to win. It would even be easier if he had the help of the Little Golden Dragon. However, if the other party still had the ability to resurrect, then it would become very troublesome. Not long after, everyone got off the plane and went to the hotel that the first elder had booked for them in advance. There were the gaming pods for Lu Chen and the others. At the same time, they were placed in a huge conference room. The entire hotel had long been reserved by the high-level officials of the Dragon Country. Countless soldiers were acting as guards around the hotel. There were armed security guards everywhere, and every one of them was equipped with a miniature walkie-talkie. Because of their arrival, the Dragon Country had increased the number of security in the entire hotel by threefold, and all kinds of military protection measures were being executed. They were building a fortress-like existence regardless of the cost. However, it was all worth it. After all, the people who appeared here were all the top warriors of Dragon Country. Then these people in front of them were the true peak strength of the Dragon Country. Their existence was the pillar of the Dragon Country. Their value could no longer be measured by money. If their bodies and game pods are damaged during the time they were in the Second World, the Dragon Country would definitely not be able to bear such losses. When Lu Chen entered the conference room, the moment he entered, the hundreds of warriors who were originally sitting in the conference room all stood up at the same time. They did not salute or greet him. They just looked at Lu Chen with a pair of determined eyes, which were filled with perseverance, determination, confidence, envy, and worship. None of them had doubts or even jealousy. Although Lu Chen did not say anything on the surface, he was still praising them in his heart: the soldiers of the Dragon Country might not have a strong individual strength, but their faith and their togetherness… were incomparable to any other country in the world… This togetherness was the strength that pushed the Dragon Country to the peak of the world. The Dragon Slayer team below the stage looked at Lu Chen with fervent eyes, but they had mixed feelings in their hearts. When they saw Little Golden Dragon, they no longer had the slightest bit of dissatisfaction in their hearts. However, the feeling of wanting to compete with Lu Chen and compete with him did not subside. It was their ego holding them back. However, everyone present recognized Lu Chen’s strength. Even though many of them were acquired stage experts like Lu Chen, none of them thought that they could defeat Lu Chen single-handedly. Lu Chen’s strength was obvious to everyone in the room. Lu Chen’s battle record was incomparable to anyone else’s. On this point, the ordinary warriors of the Dragon Team were convinced, and the members of the Dragon Slayer squad were convinced. Even the Soul Slayer squad — which had never interacted with Lu Chen before — also had a sense of approval for Lu Chen. This was because the strong would receive respect wherever they went. The scene in front of him shocked Lu Chen and made him very satisfied. He thought that he needed to do something to establish his prestige here, but he did not know what to do. Just by relying on his prestige and the orders of the first elder, he could make the entire squad listen to his commands. This made Lu Chen even more confident with the Mass Grave mission. “Hello, I’m Lu Chen.” Lu Chen gave a brief opening and then went straight to the main topic. “Tonight, we are going to enter the Mass Grave. I think you know the difficulty of the Mass Grave better than I do. “Because you have a large amount of information to learn, the first elder should have prepared enough powerful weapons for you. “I have one thing to say here. I don’t want anything that you have obtained. “As long as it’s equipment that you gain, I won’t accept it no matter how precious it is. “But the only thing I want to emphasize is-” At this point, Lu Chen paused for a moment. His gaze slowly and seriously swept across each of the warriors as he said word by word, “The only thing I want is for everyone to survive.” When everyone heard Lu Chen’s words, their expressions were slightly shocked. They had thought that Lu Chen would say that he would work hard to lay down more treasures for the country, and they had also thought that Lu Chen would let them do their best to complete the mission. It did not matter how many sacrifices they had to make. The only thing they had never expected was for Lu Chen to say that. Because in their hearts, after so many years of training, their only goal was to complete the mission no matter what. As the top special forces of the Dragon Team, the purpose of their existence was to complete the mission. If others could complete it, they could also complete it. If others could not, they would vow to complete the mission to their deaths. Their only purpose was to complete all kinds of missions assigned by the country. Ever since they joined, starting from the moment they entered the special forces, all the instructors and all the leaders repeatedly told them to complete the mission at all costs, even if it meant death! This was the first time someone had told them that their lives were very important and that they should not sacrifice themselves for the greater good. This not only allowed all the soldiers to feel a trace of warmth, but it also allowed all the soldiers to reorganize their views on the world. For a moment, the countless soldiers felt an array of emotions they could not comprehend.. At this moment, a very young warrior finally raised his hand timidly and cautiously asked, “Report! From the day I entered the special forces, everyone told me that my first goal was to complete missions, and that it was my duty to obey orders. “And that’s what I did. “I’ve carried out twenty one missions in China, and sixteen missions abroad, and I’ve successfully completed all of them. “I’m a little confused. “Isn’t it more important to complete the mission no matter what? “Besides, we still have a chance to resurrect.” Lu Chen looked at the young soldier. His sincere look touched his heart. He was originally just an ordinary person. Every day, he lived a normal life. It was only when he became the top player of the Second World that he understood. There was no such thing as a peaceful life. It just meant that someone else was carrying the burden for you. Many people risked their lives to fight for the boring life that citizens could live in every day. He patiently explained, “I know what you’re thinking. You’re thinking about the time when you were on a mission in the real world. You would have risked everything. No matter what your life meant, you would have charged forward with all your might. “To become the bravest person, no matter how great the sacrifice becomes, or even if the entire army dies, as long as you complete the mission, it would still be worth it. “Moreover, in the Second World, even if we die, we won’t really die. It’s just that our equipment will be reset to zero, and our levels will be restored to level one. Everything will begin from scratch.” Many young warriors nodded slightly. Only those who had been in the army for a long time could understand Lu Chen’s deep meaning. Lu Chen continued, “What’s the most important thing in this world? Is it money? Is it power? Or are there all sorts of precious treasures to keep?” Lu Chen looked at the hundreds of soldiers waiting for their answers. Some of them were deep in thought, while some were muttering to themselves. No one spoke. Lu Chen continued, “All of these mean nothing! “What is truly important is talent! It is warriors! And you are all top-notch warriors! “Most importantly, it is the kind of warriors who can fight a city or even a country alone. Such a person is a strategic talent! “They are the treasures of the country! “You people are the most crucial factors that could determine the outcome of the battlefield. “Perhaps it might be impossible in the main world. “”The main world needed special forces to infiltrate and cooperate with each other. It even needed hundreds of thousands or millions of troops to carry out attacks. Only by killing could victory be achieved. “But please remember that we are now in the Second World. I know that some of you will be entering this world for the first time. “You can seal your strength and then unseal it in the Second World. “So you have to pay more attention! You can only gain strength this way once. Once you get killed, your level will be reduced to one, and you will really become a fresh new player. “You have to know that the country has trained you to be such top experts in the main world. In order to let you pass this dungeon smoothly I believe that the Dragon Country will absolutely not allow you to fight this war unprepared . “You should also be clear about what kind of existences once existed in the Mass Grave.” The soldiers below the stage either remained silent or nodded slightly. Lu Chen continued, “So the main purpose of the first elder calling me here is not to kill such a powerful existence, but to protect the safety of all of you. “To let you, the future hope of the Dragon Country, the future guardians of the Dragon Country, to pass through this stage smoothly and become the guardians of the world as soon as possible.” Hearing Lu Chen’s words, all the warrior’s suddenly stiffened. “You should know that although I, Lu Chen, am the first person to become the Second World’s City Lord, the speed of other countries’ progress does not lag far behind. “In the past, the ancient martial arts aristocratic families have already extended their power throughout the Second World. “If we can’t grow as quickly as possible, how can we face so many aurous stages, soul stages, or even higher level experts? “They have thousands of years of inheritance, but you only have a few years, or even a few months, to surpass them. “Remember, you only have this one chance. The Second World will not give you the chance to die and be reborn in the state you are in now. It’s the same for you and me!” After listening to Lu Chen’s analysis of the current situation, all the warriors understood Lu Chen’s intentions. At this moment, in addition to completing the mission, they also had another belief in their hearts, which was to protect themselves well. Seeing that everyone had listened to his words, Lu Chen did not say anything more and directly led everyone into the game pod. The moment they entered the game pod, the security personnel around the hotel doubled again. The helicopters that were originally far away from the base were now closely patrolling the area. The satellites in the sky temporarily changed their trajectories and carried out reciprocating monitoring of this area. It could be said that the current hotel was more strictly guarded than many military bases. It was already on the same level as the defense of the residences of the high-ranking officials of the Dragon Country. At this moment, the first elder was in the capital. At this moment, even though he was thousands of miles away, he was still watching the meeting hosted by Lu Chen through the livestream. What Lu Chen said was exactly what he was thinking. Seeing that all the soldiers were listening to Lu Chen’s words, he was quite satisfied. The third in charge chief said from the side, “It seems that it was a wise choice for you to find this Lu Chen kid.” The first elder nodded slightly, “I’ve brought forward the plan to enter the Mass Grave, this is to increase their strength and enrich their combat experience. I hope that they can return safely.” The third in charge chief was very supportive of the first elder’s decision. He smiled and nodded, “Previously, when I saw you giving him so many rewards, I felt that it was a little too much. Now, it seems that it is absolutely worth it. About that mask…” Speaking up to this point, he wanted to say something else but hesitated. He did not continue. When the first elder heard the other party mention this, his expression immediately changed, he spoke with a heavy heart. “What’s the big deal? Back then, the Tang family’s brats swindled an old man like me into taking the Disguise Mask. I was too embarrassed to take it. Can’t I just send someone from our Dragon Country to take it back? “Anyway, Lu Chen is also a member of our Dragon Team now. Plus , Lu Chen will most likely be with that little girl from the Tang family. “Thinking about it this way, the Tang family won’t have much of a loss. “What can the Tang family say about me? Nothing!” When the other man saw that the first elder was actually smiling foolishly, he was also a little dumbfounded.. After so many years, he had never seen the other party act this mischievously! Despite the first elder’s wishful thinking, the chief third in charge was still a little worried, “I’m not worried about the Tang family. After all, they won’t go so far as to shed all pretense of cordiality. But… What if Lu Chen investigates the later stages?” The first elder was slightly startled, “Investigate? What does he want to pursue me for? I’ve given him many things. It’s just that I left them in the Tang family. If he wants to take them back, then he should go and get them himself. If he’s not in a hurry, then he should just wait for me to give them to him. What’s the big deal about that?” The chief third in charge silently applauded in his heart. He had been in a high position for so many years, but he never had as many tricks up his sleeve as compared to the first elder. He was not born yesterday, after all! … In the Second World’s Mass Grave. A group of westerners with puffed chests, deep eye sockets, and exceptionally fair skin appeared on the hillside of the Mass Grave. They were either wearing suits or loose missionary clothing, but all of them were carrying crosses, bottles, jars, and all kinds of magical equipment. At a first glance, these equipment looked quite different from the players in Dragon Country. In other words, the players in the Dragon Country were more inclined to be warriors, archers, assassins, and other professions, while those in the west were more inclined to become mages. These people were obviously not ordinary players who had been in Dragon Country. This was because they were all extremely talented experts, regardless of whether it was their equipment or their levels. The weakest one was also in the acquired stage, and even had faint signs of breaking through to the spiritual stage. One of them even had the cultivation of the golden stage. However, even that top-notch expert in the golden stage looked like he was sweating buckets, and the few hairs on his head were also soaked through by the sweat, sticking onto his head. He could be seen cursing loudly, “Sh*t! What kind of place is this? Why are there all these damn things everywhere! Are you sure that we can meet Lu Chen here?” Another person quickly went forward and echoed, “Pastor James, don’t worry. We stole the plan of the Dragon Country. Lu Chen will definitely appear at the Mass Grave. Moreover, among the six silver territories around White Fog City, only the Mass Grave has not been cleared.” Hearing this, the aurous stage expert James became even angrier, “How did you guys get the information? You guys didn’t even know that the Bat Cave had been cleared. We went to the Bat Cave for nothing and gained nothing from it. “This Mass Grave seems even more ridiculous. They said that it was a silver level territory, but in the end? “We’ve already met three silver existences along the way. We’ve only gone up the mountain for less than half a day. “Even just now, I could faintly see a golden light flickering in the distance. I’m afraid that this battle will not be an easy fight to surpass. “I just want Lu Chen to show up right now. Otherwise, I’m sure that all of you will die here. I’ll probably be the only survivor left.” James was not exaggerating at all. If there really was a gold boss, he would be in danger. Not to mention these ordinary acquired bosses! It had to be said that even in the Second World, they had already begun to surpass humans. There were already many experts. Based on ranking it would be yellow, gold, earth, heaven, acquired, spiritual, aurous, and finally soul. Although there were still levels above them, many had already surpassed Lu Chen by a lot. Originally, if one was a heaven stage, they would already be considered a high level person. Now, even if it was the spiritual stage, in front of this silver boss, it would still not be enough. Moreover, with the ancient martial arts aristocratic families joining, other countries also upgrade their forces. The spiritual stage had already become the standard. When the others heard this, they were even more afraid that what James said would come true. Then, one of them hurriedly replied, “James, don’t worry. As far as I know, Lu Chen and the others have already entered the game pod. It shouldn’t be long before they enter this place. Plus, we didn’t expect that the Mass Grave would be this dangerous.” These people were from the Western Castle. The group who came this time could be said to have a powerful lineup. Not only did a few elders come here, but even the castle lord had joined. They were able to come to the Second World where the Dragon Country was located precisely because they had spent an extremely high price to exchange for an ultra-long-distance teleportation scroll. Otherwise, they would not have been able to pass through the Second World’s blockade on the region. It must be known that this teleportation scroll was priceless. When Lu Chen had three teleportation scrolls, they had already been hyped up to a price of at least 200 million dollars. At their peak, it was sold for 2,000,000,000 dollars each. This was because these items were simply too rare. It could be said that the Western Castle had spent a huge amount of money to obtain these scrolls. However, they firmly believed that this purchase would be definitely worth it. If they could kill Lu Chen, his entire set of legendary or even epic equipment would belong to them. Even White Fog City, which could not be measured with money, would belong to the Western Castle. With such a huge temptation, itit made sense that the higher ups of the Western Castle wanted to mobilize such an opportunity. They had even invited an expert, James, from the western families to support them. As they spoke, they did not stop what they were doing. They were on constant vigilance and readied their offensive stances. It had to be said that their experience points had increased far more compared to in their own territory. Even spiritual experts like them were at least level 20 or above. Killing ordinary monsters was of little value to them. Moreover, they never had a place like the Mass Grave. Simply put, the Mass Grave was a bug in the game. It was impossible for such a place to have that many silver bosses inside living together. To ordinary players, this was a land of death. When it comes to things like these, there should only be one silver boss. However, when they arrived at the Mass Grave, they were stunned. The monsters here come one after another, densely packed together. Moreover, unlike ordinary silver territories, which were supposed to be filled with level 2 or 3 monsters, the monsters here were at least level 10 and above. In just half a day, they had already killed several silver bosses. They even felt a little regretful. If they had come to the Mass Grave earlier to grind for a few more days, their levels could have soared from it. After all, in the few minutes they were chatting, even the weakest among them had risen to level 30 and above. It could be said that they were both happy and annoyed at the same time. This was definitely a place where danger and opportunity coexisted. The leader of the group, James, looked at the few old men following behind him and felt a little dissatisfied. “I’m starting to doubt your information. You said that the Bat Cave had not been cleared, but we verified that it had already been cleared. We wasted a lot of time getting there, and there wasn’t even a single monster left..” It was obvious that James did not trust them. He was still questioning them as much as he could, “You said that the Mass Grave is a silver territory, but I’m starting to suspect that there’s a gold boss inside. “This kind of place is definitely not something that you can easily enter. “So regarding Lu Chen’s strength, have you guys studied it? “I’ve heard that he has subdued a gold boss before.” James was not a fool. Although he was at the golden stage, his level was the same as a gold boss. However, he did not think that he could easily kill a gold boss, let alone take it as a pet. After all, monsters had high attack and defense, while humans were just made of skin and bones. If Lu Chen could easily kill a gold boss, then even if he was at the golden stage, he would not be able to defeat Lu Chen. The other spiritual experts hurriedly explained, “James, don’t worry, this won’t happen. “Lu Chen relied on his identity as the City Lord of White Fog City to subdue the Golden Dragon. Otherwise, he wouldn’t have been a match for it. “And that White Fog City has already accompanied Lu Chen in battle once. Right now, it won’t have the ability to appear again. It will be closed for a period of time. “This will be the right time to do so.” James still did not believe them. He continued to ask, “Where did you get all this information from? Is it reliable?” The leader of the experts was red-faced, fat, and the strongest. He opened his mouth and said, “This is the news I heard from Xiao Bai who came from the Dragon Country. “You must know that Xiao Bai has always been thinking about how to take revenge. Killing Lu Chen is definitely a good thing for Xiao Bai. “Don’t worry, this news will definitely not go wrong.” Xiao Bai? James knew about Xiao Bai. As a rising star within the Western Castle’s strength range, Xiao Bai’s reputation precedes him. Especially after he became the City Lord of the Giant Lizard City, he became even more famous. His popularity was even higher than that of the people in the Western Castle. After all, when Lu Chen obtained White Fog City, all the countries in the world were panicking. Xiao Bai was recognized by the Giant Lizard City, and he was even recognized by the Guardian General with his strength of the spiritual stage. He was even rewarded handsomely from it. For a time, many people began to become fanatical toward Xiao Bai. Some of the discordant voices even felt that Xiao Bai should become the leader of the Western Castle. This was something the Western Castle could not tolerate. The meritorious service overshadowed the master! Therefore, even though Xiao Bai had always proposed to attack White Fog City, the people of the Western Castle had never agreed. Moreover, the people of the Western Castle felt like they were just inviting a wolf in sheep’s clothing. The castle lord of the Western Castle and the various elders had always been forcing Xiao Bai to give up his position as the City Lord of Giant Lizard City, but it was to no avail. In fact, they had no way of doing anything to Xiao Bai. After all, if they really provoked Xiao Bai, the other party would summon the entire Giant Lizard City to the real world for battle, and the Western Castle would most likely have to kneel down out of fear! Yet, the descendants of the Xiao family were still locked up by the Dragon Country. For a time, the Western Castle was actually somewhat passive. If it was not for the fact that Xiao Bai had no foundation in the Western Castle and wanted to slowly expand his own power, he would probably have rebelled long ago. This also gave the Western Castle a chance and time to react accordingly. They had invited James over in order to get rid of Lu Chen, seize White Fog City, and at the same time, kill Xiao Bai. In this way, even if they gave White Fog City to James, they could at least gain control of the Giant Lizard City. The Western Castle decided that it was not at a loss. Moreover, it was a bloody profit to gain James’s friendship! Xiao Bai’s final value had been completely squeezed dry, so they had no need for him anymore. … While everyone in the Western Castle was calculating the benefits, Lu Chen and the others had already arrived at the foot of the mountain. At the foot of the Mass Grave, chilly wind blew in all directions. The Mass Grave was the only place that was pitch-black no matter what time it was. The chilly wind blew, and the forest let out ghostly wails and howls, mixed with the howls and wails of all kinds of supernatural creatures. It was an extremely horrifying place to be. Even Liu Yuan, who had been in the Dragon Team for many years and often did missions, was trembling all over as she moved closer to Lu Chen. Although the other warriors had been through hundreds of battles, it was impossible for them not to be nervous. Amongst everyone, Lu Chen’s three pets were the calmest. Little Golden Dragon and Lan Weiwei were not afraid at all. Although they were a little flustered, they were silver bosses after all, and their strength was tyrannical. They had played around here since they were young, so they were relatively familiar with this place. Lan Weiwei was still young, so she had some psychological trauma from this place. However, Little Golden Dragon was different. It had lived for a longer time, and had come here before the Mass Grave became this terrifying. Naturally, Little Golden Dragon did not feel too afraid. As for Rollie, he was truly big-hearted. He was eating the bamboo shoots by himself, not observing the Mass Grave at all. The Mass Grave was located deep in the mountains and forests. The tall trees were not only very thick and strong, but they were also strangely twisted, forming an unbelievable angle, it was an extremely horrifying atmosphere. Bones of all kinds of creatures could be seen everywhere. There were even some human-like corpses, but the bodies were very huge. The bones of many creatures twitched from time to time, as if they were recovering from the trauma. Obviously, these were creatures that had just entered the Mass Grave and had not been here for many years. Under the nourishment of the death aura exuded by the Mass Grave, they showed signs of recovering, but they were not fully recovered yet. Some curious soldiers threw a few stones at them and a shrill cry ensued. A strange green light spread out from the corpse, and the corpse stopped moving. -500! The half-dead corpse stopped moving. This refreshed everyone’s understanding. This corpse had yet to fully resurrect, yet it was considered a small monster by the Second World, and it had a mark of damage. The senior players and newbie players were both very curious. They had just released their strength. The lowest level was a heaven rank and above. If converted to the Second World, they were already over level 10. As well-trained warriors, they were also very cautious with their surroundings. However, seeing that the first monster was killed by their teammates, they also picked up the stones around them or threw branches at some of the corpses that were twitching on the ground. Streaks of red appeared above the corpses. -300! -900! -500! -200! … This may be a game, but it felt like an extremely real experience, arousing the curiosity of all the warriors.. For a moment, everyone wondered if this place was heaven. It looked like there was no danger here at all. As long as one was willing, they could easily kill a group of monsters with a flick of their wrist. One had to admit that this place was quite confusing. Obviously, players liked places where they could easily farm points and level up, such as throwing rocks to undead unmoving monsters. One had to know that when everyone was a newbie, they could not even kill a level 1 monster. Some people were even killed by wild rabbits… Although this place looked like a great place to level up, no one dared to let their guard down. According to what they knew, they were about to face a real battle! As expected, the warriors realized that as the half-dead monsters around them were being killed, the surrounding environment seemed to have become more eerie. The wails and howls of ghosts and wolves in the Mass Graves also became more intense. “Stop!” Lu Chen shouted. All the warriors immediately stopped their probing and stood on their spots. Even if some of the half-dead monsters that could only move their upper bodies crawled towards them and even launched attacks, these warriors did not hesitate and finished them off with one quick slash. Among them, the Soul Slayer Team tightly surrounded Lu Chen and the others, forming a defensive formation. On the other side was the Dragon Slayer Team. The Soul Slayer Team guarded Lu Chen’s side in order to be Lu Chen’s bodyguard, while the Dragon Slayer Team became the target of protection… Because after they were killed by Little Golden Dragon, their levels became level 1, and their combat power rapidly dropped. Although they did not focus on anything else except farming monsters in the Second World to increase their levels, they only managed to reach around level 10. This kind of combat power was truly a drag to the team… They could not even be compared to the slightly higher-leveled players that came with. No matter how strong their combat awareness was, they would still not be enough to deal with the difference in strength. They were clearly a party with top-tier combat power, yet they had become the weakest link here. Even the cute Rollie could kill them with a single light slap. It could be said that they were feeling rather sullen now. That was why they were the happiest when they threw rocks at the monsters just now. After all, this method of earning points was extremely suitable for them. Plus, they had also made up their minds about this mission. As long as there were no silver monsters appearing later, they would definitely fight to their deaths and try their best to raise their levels to the level that they should be. Now, they looked at the warriors who were originally inferior to them in the real world, but had become gods in the game. Their hearts were filled with grievance. The moment Lu Chen shouted for them to stop, the entire team of several hundred people stopped moving. It was as if everything had become still in an instant. The originally chaotic team had formed different tactical formations in an instant. This kind of well-trained formation made Lu Chen feel even more powerful. He kept looking around to see if there were any changes in the surroundings, and at the same time, he listened carefully to see if there were any strange sounds. To his surprise, the sound of drums seemed to faintly appear in the distance. It was originally just a faint appearance, but after more than ten seconds, it became clearer and clearer. In the forest, all the trees were faintly trembling from the sound, and the withered yellow and decaying leaves were slowly decomposing. Even the ground was shaking, as if the earth was crying and the mountains were trembling. This feeling was as if thousands of soldiers and horses were rushing at them from all directions. If it were not for the hundreds of soldiers here, many people would not be able to bear it. After all, this kind of imposing manner was so overwhelming that even well-trained special forces warriors could not guarantee that they would not panic. What happened next shocked everyone even more. Countless mummies and undead monsters attacked them all in one go. There were definitely thousands or even tens of thousands of them rushing forward. There were Ancient Ash Wolves with broken legs, Ancient Fire Tigers without tails, Giant Pythons with only half of their bodies left, and all sorts of undead creatures with illusory bodies. Their strength was at least at level 15, and some of them were even close to being level 30. Although those mutilated corpses had lost limbs and were staggering, their movement speed was far beyond their imagination. They seemed to be risking their lives as they swarmed toward the warriors like crazy. Even the Dragon Slayer Team and the others who had once charged into the Snake Pond felt their scalps go numb, and they all simultaneously shouted, “F*ck!” The female python that they had tried to kill in the Snake Pond back then was only level 30. It was 100 meters long and as thick as a giant steel. Although the Dragon Slayer Team had expended a lot of effort to kill that silver boss, they were not too worried. After all, they had prepared themselves well back then, and it was a five man team against one silver boss. At that time, they had an absolute advantage in terms of planning. However, what were those things in front of them?! They were densely packed. Even the lowest-leveled monsters were over level 10, which was higher than the current Dragon Slayer Team. Even if they were weaker than the other warriors, there was a limit to how weak they were. Even the top-tier warriors in the Dragon country could not help but sigh. How were they supposed to fight this mob? The appearance of this scene made Li Xiaotian, the captain of the Dragon Slayer Team, feel a lingering fear. He thought back to when he thought of coming to the Mass Grave after clearing the Snake Pond. If he came to the Mass Grave, it would probably leave a psychological scar for the rest of his life. Everyone felt it when they saw the scene in front of them. Adrenaline rapidly pumped through their veins but a sense of fear kept seeping in. Everyone even held brave complex emotions on the surface… Secretly, they trembled in their minds. At this moment, none of them refused to back down. Lu Chen let out a loud laugh. All the teams followed the original plan. Each team formed a tactical formation, they stood not too close to each other. At least 10 meters and not too far away. This was to ensure that each team could stay as far as 50 meters away from each other. “Dragon Slayer Team, you are slightly weaker. You guys are not responsible for facing the enemy head-on. You guys have to wander between each tactical team. Provide support at any time.” “Roger that!” As Lu Chen gave the order, everyone readied themselves for battle. Lu Chen was not clear about the specific tactical matters, so he left everything to the Soul Slayer Team to arrange the warriors. The groups that were originally fighting for themselves were now arranged in a new formation. Lu Chen was a little surprised by how quickly they arranged themselves. He did not expect the Dragon Team to be so well-prepared in order to conquer the Mass Grave. Facing the overwhelming monsters, the Spellcaster was the first to bear the brunt. In mid-air, he made gestures with his hands and chanted, releasing one long-range attack spell after another. At the same time, the Archers also began to use their long-range attacks. These warriors of the Dragon Team were not ordinary players. During Lu Chen’s rest time, the first elder had spent a lot of money to let these warriors use the super VIP channel to change their class! The Dragon Country was definitely a big spender! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The Dragon Country’s foundation and confidence were undoubtedly revealed at this moment. The Dragon Team only took less than two hours to accomplish something that would normally take a few days for others to accomplish. During these two hours, most of the time, they were still looking for players to cut the queue and quickly change their class. Other players needed to spend several hours, or even a few days, to queue up to change their class, but these warriors paid their way through to the start of the queue. Wherever there was a queue, they would charge money to the players to cut the queue! If White Fog City did not allow them to give bribery money, then they would spend money to find the people in front of them to change their positions. This kind of exorbitant money — which did not care about the cost — instantly raised the equipment of the entire Dragon Team to the peak of normal players. No seats? Bribery money will do! No equipment? Bribery money will do! No potions? Bribery money will do! No… Don’t ask, just give them bribery money!! If 50,000 dollars did not?work, then maybe 100,000 dollars will. If 100,000 dollars did not work, then maybe 1,000,000 will do. There would always be someone willing to take up on this offer. For ordinary players, it was just a matter of a day or two later to wait in the queue. It did not matter at all. For ordinary players, the most important use of equipment was to sell it for money and improve life in the main world. Even if they kept their equipment, they could not guarantee that they would be dropped. Under the powerful incentive of money, all the warriors completed their class change at the first possible moment. Although there were all kinds of equipment, they were absolutely excellent and convenient! With the support of all kinds of equipment, everyone’s combat strength had been greatly improved. The Mages were the first to bear the brunt of the attack, and they immediately began their first attack! Countless fireballs exploded in the midst of the monster crowd like stars falling from the sky, and the gorgeous magic bombarded the monster’s body into pieces. Strings of red numbers floated up from the countless corpses. -5,000! -8,000! -3,000! -10,000! -600! -5,000! -4,000! … With just the first long-range confrontation, they had achieved a huge victory. The first round of attacks had caused the deaths of dozens of monsters. Some powerful Mages and Archers could even kill five or six enemies in one hit. A victory of this level would definitely be a huge win in front of ordinary players. However, this was nothing to the Dragon Team. There were simply too many monsters making their way here. These attacks were like a drop of water in the ocean. They were not of much use. However, they did not rest at all. Following which, the second and third round of long-range attacks were consecutively launched. Some advanced Dragon Team warriors could even launch three or four attacks per second. After a few seconds, hundreds or even thousands of monsters died under their merciless attacks. However, it was also in such a short time that these Archers, Mages, and long-range attack warriors consumed a lot of stamina. The monsters also took advantage of this time and arrived in front of the warriors. The real close combat began immediately. However, the close combat warriors did not make a move. Instead, a group of highly defensive warriors formed a shield wall and stood at the front to block the first wave of monster attacks. Strangely, the defensive shields of these warriors instantly turned into huge shields that spanned a hundred meters when they came into contact with each other. The originally pale yellow shields were visible to the naked eye after they were connected to each other. Their thickness had increased by more than tenfold. Their color had also changed from pale yellow to dark brown. Their defensive power had increased significantly. Moreover, when the monsters collided with the huge shields, many of them were greatly knocked back. The powerful monsters lost a lot of HP colliding with the barrier, and the weak monsters were directly shattered by the impact! Even Lu Chen’s eyes lit up from this stunt. He did not expect the equipment from the Dragon Country to have such a miraculous effect. Not only could they connect with each other, but they could also form a huge area of defense. There was even a powerful rebound effect. This kind of rebound attack was different from Lu Chen’s Shield God title. Lu Chen’s attack did not matter how strong the monster’s attack was, it would always reflect 50% of the damage. The shield that the Dragon Team possessed was not as powerful as Lu Chen’s shield, which could ignore the opponent’s attack limit. However, it could directly kill weak monsters. This was quite useful in group battles. The damage caused by the rebound of the shield this time was even more than the number of enemies killed in the long-range attack. In an instant, more than 1,000 monsters were turned into ashes! Countless flurries of red numbers appeared in the sky. There were as many as thousands of them! It was such a spectacular scene, even when the White Alliance was attacking Bear Ridge, the 10,000 White Alliance warriors could not achieve such a shocking effect. In just two exchanges, 30% of the warriors had been killed, and nearly 3,000 monsters had disappeared. Only about 7,000 monsters were left charging forward. At this time, the warriors who were close-ranged readied themselves to attack. The Mages who were good at long-range attacks were still changing formations to attack the ones at the end of the monster tide. The Mages who were good at teleportation formations were constantly teleporting the densely packed monsters to the farthest end to relieve the pressure on the close-range warriors. At the same time, they moved the monsters on both sides to the front, which was more conducive to the warriors’ attacks and could also prevent the warriors from being barged from both sides. As for the close-combat Mages, they kept casting spells and launched gorgeous spells. The Ice Mages kept forming ice thorns that shot towards the monsters. The Earth Mages drew magic arrays. Large hands protruded from the ground and soared the monsters into the sky. Then, they quickly closed up and slapped countless monsters to death. Among them, the Fire Mages and the Light Mages were the most effective. To these undead, they were the most lethal. Fire and light could easily burn the undead to ashes. Some undead did not even let out a single cry when they died. The Wind Mages and the Archers combined and lifted the arrows shot up one by one. They stood in the air and aimed at the monsters that were good at sneak attacks to ensure the safety of their companions. On the other hand, the warriors slashed horizontally and vertically. Wherever they passed, they could deal extremely powerful critical damage to the monsters. It had to be said that although the level of the swords in the hands of these warriors was not too high — it was far from reaching the level of silver — they were still far from being comparable to ordinary iron swords. Based on their lethality, they could at least deal both physical and magic damage. Hence, even against the countless undead in the air, they were still able to kill them all. However, even though 30% of the undead died in just two slashes, the ones that died were all weak, low-level mummies and undead. The true high-level monsters did not receive any damage. They only lost some of their HP. As time passed, the pressure on the undead became more and more intense. Almost every warrior had to deal with monsters that were 10 or even 20 times more powerful than them. If it were not for the fact that these warriors had formed a tactical team, they would probably have lost at least 20% of their strength already. The entire Dragon Team was fighting the horde of monsters with all their might. Although no one died, everyone felt a huge pressure weighing on them. It was as if they were dancing on a tightrope. Of course, this was under the pretense where Lu Chen and his pets were not making a move. If they did, obviously, the pressure on the warriors would be greatly reduced. However, Lu Chen understood that he should not be spoon feeding them every step of the way. Lu Chen and the others were scattered in different areas of the team. They were guaranteed to pull the warriors back when they were about to die. They were even prepared to help them block the attacks, giving them time to recover their health. After all, the warriors here were like what Lu Chen had mentioned. Every single one of them was very precious, and they could not die so easily. Right now, Lu Chen was trying his best to create opportunities for everyone to enrich their combat experience in the Second World and increase their courage in the Second World. One had to know that Lu Chen’s role as a nanny could not last for too long. It was likely that he would only be able to do this once in the Mass Grave. In the future, if these people’s strength increased quickly, they could become his helpers. Otherwise, they would have to fight on their own in the future. Lu Chen’s current task was arduous, and he had to face many dangers. It was impossible for him to always be their nanny. However, Lu Chen still believed in his heart that this experience was absolutely enough for these warriors to gain something from it. Their combat strength, combat awareness, and adaptability were all top-notch in the world. All the warriors understood Lu Chen’s good intentions. They were also constantly honing their combat experience. Although they were all top-notch warriors in the main world, many of them were still newbies in the Second World. On one hand, they had the excitement of playing online games. On the other hand, they had a sense of mission and danger. After all, this was not just a game. This could determine the position of the Dragon Country in the future world, and even determine the fate of the entire world. They were all clear about the fusion of the Second World and the fact that the Second World had asked for help from the main world. After seeing Lu Chen’s super field-controlling ability, many wind and nature element warriors began to learn one by one to control the field. Any warrior who was in danger was lifted into the air by a Wind Mage or pulled back to the nearest place by a vine created by a Nature Mage to escape the battlefield. This way, the chance of all the warriors getting injured became even lower. Although the battle was extremely difficult, no one died. Facing the scene before them, if it was an ordinary player fighting to such an extent, they would probably think they would be able to survive. Seeing the monsters being eliminated one by one while their side did not suffer any losses… They would definitely feel that victory was within their grasp. However, the dragon warriors here did not think so. Lu Chen, in particular, had long since frowned. This was because there were a few extremely high-level monsters at the rear of the horde. The monsters there were clearly different from ordinary monsters. If they were only in the territory of the other five silver bosses, no matter how high the monsters’ levels were, they would only be fighting on their own. Low-level monsters and high-level monsters carelessly charged forward. There was no hierarchy system. Unless the only king in the territory appeared, only then could the other monsters be suppressed. However, in this Mass Grave, one had to know that the highest existence here was at least the fallen true dragon. When he was alive, he was at the legendary level, which was equivalent to a human’s soul stage existence. After he died, he would probably be at least an aurous stage monster, perhaps even more powerful than Little Golden Dragon. He was an existence above the soul stage that was besieged and killed by the ancient families. Logically speaking, even if a gold monster was here, there should not be any level suppression. However, such a strange scene appeared. The army of thousands of ordinary low-level monsters in front of them kept disturbing Lu Chen and the others. The ten silver bosses that were charging at the back of the group remained unmoving. They only steadily sat at the back, constantly giving out commands. Some gave out loud roars, while others gave out low-pitched grumbles. This allowed the ten low-level monsters that were charging at the back of the group to have a vague pattern of attacks. Moreover, many of the monsters were looking for opportunities to attack the humans. It was as if the monster horde had a formation as well, while the bosses at the back behind them were like commanders. This strange phenomenon was like a haze that shrouded everyone’s hearts. With the command of these ten silver bosses, the Dragon Team’s warriors’s battle stance became even more difficult. Quite a few times, some of the warrior’s HP bars were almost hit to zero. This made many of the warriors very worried. Many of the monsters even learned how to create a diversion. One second, they were fighting the warrior in front of them. The next second, the monsters behind them from the corner of their eyes would casually swipe their claws at the warrior with low HP. This kind of tactic far exceeded the warrior’s understanding of monsters. They almost brought many of the warriors back to the Novice Village. Fortunately, due to Lu Chen’s previous command, many warriors were already familiar with this kind of tacit cooperation in battle. After all, these Dragon Team warriors originally fought as special forces in small groups. They were like a sharp knife, good at sneak attacking, ambushing, and scouting. At times like these, warriors at their level were no longer enough to carry out such commands in the Mass Graves. They could only band together and become a medium-sized army, awaiting orders. In the face of a group battle, their cooperation was not that harmonious. Due to Lu Chen’s good commands, their cooperation became more and more tacit. This allowed the entire team to maintain zero casualties. After the monsters gained a tacit understanding of the battle. The entire team felt the pressure multiply. The most obvious ones were the control and support system warriors. Originally, they only needed to give all the members the same amount of buffs and support. Now that these monsters knew how to cooperate, the situation completely changed. They needed to constantly pay attention to certain subtle changes on the battlefield. Which one had less HP, which warrior was injured, which warrior did not have enough equipment buffs, which warrior did not have enough help in time. They could either replenish their HP, increase their status, pull them back to the center of the battlefield, or withdraw from the battlefield. At the same time, they had to focus on their original tactical gaps to prevent the monsters from taking advantage of them. Although this kind of battle environment raised their battle awareness to the extreme, and the mental pressure kept piling on. In the Second World, if a player’s HP continued to drop, it would not affect their battle status. However, if the mental pressure was too great, the environment would become more challenging for them, this would directly affect the mental state of the players. This way, the player would become more and more tired, which would then cause the player’s consciousness in the Second World to become more and more blurry. Their reactions would even be slow, causing their state of minds to be faltering or their combat power to drop.. The battle situation in the Mass Grave was far beyond everyone’s imagination. No one had thought that there would be so many monsters appearing in the Mass Grave at once. They had barely caught up with the organized horde of monsters. Most importantly, they had only just entered the outer perimeter! It was such an arduous battle, not to mention the ordinary members of the Dragon Team, even the Dragon Slayer squad had never experienced something like this before. Even the Soul Slayer Squad that was stationed overseas all year round had never encountered such a troublesome situation. In just three hours, more than half of the monsters had been killed or injured. At this time, there were also some warriors who were in a trance. Their reaction speed became extremely slow, and each of their movements became randomized. This meant that the intensity of the battle that this warrior had endured before had already exceeded his limit. If he was not allowed to leave the battlefield now, Lu Chen was afraid that he would only be killed and resurrected to become a level 1 newbie again. This was not worth it, so Lu Chen said loudly, “All warriors, listen up. Those who have reached their limit, immediately exit the game and return to the main world to rest.” Even though Lu Chen said so, the warriors were not willing to listen obediently. After all, in the main world, the warriors would be willing to not close their eyes for ten days and ten nights, they would be willing to be in a high-intensity trek for a long period of time, and they would never back down from a fight. However, the Second World was completely different. Not only were there a lot of monsters, but the monsters were also very powerful. More importantly, they understood that whether or not they died in the main world was not that important to the mission. However, if they died in the Second World, as Lu Chen had said, it would bring great losses to the country. This was something that they would never allow to exist in their minds. However, as warriors, they would not allow themselves to give up so easily. If anyone were to be the first to retreat, they would be laughed out of their mouths. Therefore, everyone mustered all their strength and carried on fighting. At this moment, the support and control system players felt even more pressure. Although Lu Chen frowned, he did not say anything. His legs bent slightly, and he suddenly kicked out. Under the effect of the Swift Boots, he immediately shot out a distance of dozens of meters, directly carrying a warrior who was about to be killed by the monster and leaving the battlefield. Lu Chen threw the warrior to a safe place, and then shouted, “Go back to the main world.” The warrior’s face was red with embarrassment. However, facing so many warriors and so many teammates who were still persisting, it was absolutely shameful to ask him to leave the battlefield alone. Therefore, his face changed several times, but he still could not make up his mind. Lu Chen seemed to have seen through his thoughts, and then his footwork changed again and again. His figure flashed repeatedly, and he threw the other warriors who were on the verge of death out of the battlefield. Without waiting for these warriors to get up to return to the battlefield, Lu Chen once again shouted loudly, “Your condition is no longer enough to support this battle. Immediately return to the main world. Don’t drag your teammates down. Your departure will allow your teammates to perform better.” Hearing these words, the warriors looked at each other, their eyes somewhat dazed. However, after a short period of adjustment, they looked at each other. For the sake of the mission, for the sake of making the entire team stronger, it seemed reasonable to withdraw from the fight. Looking down, there were several monsters in the circle that had already turned their gazes towards them. They took out their equipment and were ready to pounce on them. They kept making noises, attracting many monsters to turn around and glare at them. However, the other warriors continued to attack the powerful monsters from afar, as if they were not afraid at all. One of the archers aimed his arrow at a silver boss far away. The silver dragon boss was stunned. It had never occurred to him that someone would dare to provoke him under such circumstances. With a long howl, hundreds of monsters immediately turned around and retreated from the battlefield. When the few warriors saw that the archer’s attacks were effective when the monsters were attacking them, they all aimed their attacks at the few silver bosses at the back row. Although their attacks were not damaging enough to harm the bosses, they succeeded in angering many silver bosses. They all issued orders, and for a time, thousands of ordinary monsters pounced at these warriors, baring their teeth. Seeing that they had achieved their goal, these warriors ran away as if they had gone mad. Their actions had attracted the firepower of many monsters. The pressure on the entire Dragon Team was now greatly reduced. The few warriors used all their physical strength to run. When they ran until they were completely exhausted or were about to be caught by the monsters, they immediately exited the Second World game and returned to the main world to rest. When they woke up in the gaming pod, their expressions were very complicated. They could not imagine what kind of criticism they would experience when they stood up to face the high-level officials of the Dragon Country. After all, they were the lowest level and weakest existence in the entire Dragon Team. It could be said that their evacuation was in a sense a desertion. However, they would not be able to escape this kind of criticism. They gritted their teeth and pushed open the gaming pod. Then, they stood up one by one, and they all went to the meeting room. At this moment, the projector in the meeting room was showing a clip. In the air, a three-dimensional human figure faintly appeared. This person was none other than the third in charge chief. The third in charge chief’s gaze was gentle as he looked at the helpless warriors. He encouraged them, “You guys have done well. Thank you for your hard work. I thank you on behalf of all the citizens.” As soon as he said this, the warriors who had been prepared to be criticized were instantly stunned. The next moment, they understood what the third in charge chief meant. Their eyes instantly turned red, and the rims of their eyes were slightly moist. In their dreams, they had never thought that they, as warriors, would be the first to withdraw. Not only did they not receive criticism, but they also received encouragement and praise from the high-level officials of the Dragon Country. One of the warriors could not hold back his tears and said, “Chief, we know that our combat strength is weak. I didn’t want to withdraw either, but I really have no choice.” As he spoke, he could not continue, and his throat was somewhat choked. If it was the main world, they would rather die in battle than take a step back. However, in the Second World, in order to preserve the strength of the Dragon Country, they had to make this kind of retreat, which they regarded as a disgrace.. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation This feeling of humiliation had always lingered in the hearts of the warriors. This was because, on the battlefield, as long as there were still people fighting and as long as they did not retreat together, no one was allowed to be a deserter, even if their condition had deteriorated tremendously. The third in charge chief, however, shook his head. He smiled and explained to them, “No, there is nothing wrong with what you did. “In the tragic situation just now, your retreat was a protection of the country’s resources. “It was the same situation as when a pilot had to take the initiative to jump out of the plane when it was about to crash. “The most important thing now is to improve your strength as soon as possible and hone yourself into a national treasure. “During normal times, all of you would do your own things to increase your strength. However, at the critical moment of the country, we’ll need you at your peak. “There is no need to make unnecessary sacrifices, it’s absolutely irrational if we were to do that. The best thing you can do is to retreat in times like these. “At the same time, you even managed to shift the pressure of your teammates onto yourselves to pin down the enemies on the battlefield. All of you have done well. I have high hopes for all of you.” These words made all the warriors feel even more at a loss. They were used to too many life and death departures. On the battlefield, they preferred to engage in close combat. The scenes they faced were all death and only death. Their philosophy was to not give in even an inch, to fight till the end of time. This was the first time someone had told them something else. They were told to protect themselves as they were important… How could they not be moved? After being moved for a short while, they quickly adjusted their condition and immediately ran forward. They returned to their resting rooms and began to catch up on their sleep to prepare for the next battle. In the Mass Grave of the Second World, the tragic situation on the battlefield had exceeded all the warrior’s expectations. Many of the warriors here, to be exact, most of them had experienced countless battles. They had even survived for several months in the Second World. Even some of the members of the Dragon Team had fought silver bosses before. However, this silver territory was far more dangerous than the other silver territories. Not to mention the thousands of monsters in front of them, this silver boss exuded the kind of oppression that other silver bosses did not possess. Even though they were thousands of meters away, many warriors could barely breathe from the pressure. Even the Soul Slayer squad, whose average level was over level 25, felt immense pressure. Only Lan Weiwei, who was from another silver territory, looked at the silver boss with disdain. This was because she had been a silver boss when she was still an Ancient Ash Wolf. After that, she fought many battles with Lu Chen. Her level had risen to over level 30, far beyond what an ordinary silver boss could compare to. At the very least, she could take on three silver bosses by herself. Meanwhile, Little Golden Shield stuck out its tongue and hissed as it looked at the silver boss with disdain on its face. Even if all of these silver bosses were added together, they would not be enough to defeat Little Golden Dragon. At most, it would be a little troublesome. However, under Lu Chen’s probing, none of them attacked. Even if a warrior was in danger, Little Golden Dragon would use brute force to push the monster dozens of meters away. It would not really hurt them. This was because these were the Dragon Team warriors. Depending on how they handle the situation at hand, it will play a decisive role in the future of the Dragon Country. On the vast battlefield, countless warriors and monsters were fighting desperately. For a time, the corpses of monsters flew everywhere, and many monsters were scared out of their wits. Hundreds or even thousands of red dots would often appear on the entire battlefield at the same time. Some of them were monsters, and some were warriors. Fortunately, with Lu Chen’s signal and the previous few warriors taking the lead, many of the warriors of the Dragon Team felt the pressure on their hearts lighten a little. A few warriors who could not hold on any longer tried to attract the aggro of the monsters, increasing their anger, and then leading them far away from the battlefield. Afterward, they would the Second World game and return to the main world to rest. This operation was a little confusing to the monsters. However, the silver boss was the most annoyed because all the players realized that if they attacked the silver boss, their anger would soar. At the same time, they could mobilize more ordinary monsters to run toward them. This way, the warriors would not need to expend as much energy. This method of luring the monsters away greatly reduced the pressure on the battlefield. This was especially true for the distant silver boss, who was also howling in anger. They had never seen such a battle before. These players were truly crafty! Usually, they would not engage in a dogfight. Instead, they would fight like assassins and run far away before disappearing on the spot. This confused the ordinary monsters. Although the silver boss faintly felt that something was off, they could not do anything about it. After all, although they had always wanted to attack, the distant Lan Weiwei and the gold monster, Little Golden Dragon, were still giving them a strong pressure. This made the other silver monsters not want to act rashly. This was also something that Lu Chen had deliberately done. Otherwise, once these silver bosses made their move, not only would they destroy the warriors… it was very likely that the confidence of the warriors would be destroyed as well. This blow to their confidence would be far greater than the physical and mental pressure that it brought to the warriors in battle. It was definitely not worth getting into it. This battle lasted for a full day and night. Nearly 80% of the warriors had returned to the main world now. Fortunately, after the warriors returned to the main world for a short period of rest, as long as they recovered to a certain level of mental state, they would immediately return to the Second World and continue to participate in the team battle. Thus, even though 80% of the players had returned to the main world to rest, the number of players in the entire team remained above 50%. In addition, the combat experience of the warriors was constantly increasing. In comparison, although the monsters would cooperate with each other, their intelligence did not increase with it. Therefore, although this battle was exceptionally difficult, they still maintained an astonishing zero loss result. This kind of battle situation, through the miniature cameras carried by the Dragon Team warriors, was transmitted to the Dragon Country’s conference hall where the hotel was located in real time. This made everyone very excited. The first elder and the third in charge chief were especially happy when they saw what was happening in front of them, and their eyes kept flashing with golden light. They had thought of finding Lu Chen to take everyone to clear the Mass Graves.. This map was a wise choice, but they had never thought that it would play such a big role in terms of gaining strength. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The battle at the Mass Grave was in full swing. As everyone was watching with great interest, a secretary suddenly came to the first elder’s side with a worried expression and said a few words in a low voice. When the third in charge chief heard it, he frowned from the news After thinking for a moment… He hushly spoke to the first elder, “Someone has infiltrated the Western Castle, should we ask the warriors to stop fighting and attack there after? This way, we can catch them off guard.” If the most important thing for the Dragon Country was the bows and arrows of the Dragon Team, after this battle, they realized the power and importance of Lu Chen for the Dragon Country as well. That was why this person had to be kept alive and well. Even if the experience in the Mass Graves was a little short, the importance of the WEstern Castle was more of a serious matter. Not only would this help the Dragon Country eliminate the threat, but it would also spread the prestige of the Dragon Country and let the world know that they are not afraid to make a move to protect themselves. However, once someone plans on attacking the Dragon Country, they would still be killed with their famous bows and arrows. The first elder looked at the state of battle on the screen, and there was a look of interest in his eyes. He said indifferently, “There’s no need for defeating these monsters. Let the soldiers come back after they’re done farming.” The experience gained from the Mass Grave was enough for them to level up greatly. If they continued to train, many soldiers would probably be unable to bear the mental pressure. “It’s time to bring them back to have a good rest and recuperate.” The third in charge chief stared at Lu Chen’s expression for a while. When he saw that Lu Chen was still calm and collected, he had a slight understanding in his heart. He opened his mouth and said, “First elder, do you think that Lu Chen and his leaders are sufficient to deal with this crisis?” The first elder opened his mouth and said, “The attacking methods of the west and the east are vastly different. Moreover, these old fellows have lived for so many years and have controlled the Western Castle for so long. They must have many trump cards in their hands. “I’m sure that these old fellows aren’t easy to deal with. They aren’t something an ordinary spiritual realm expert can compare to. And that James is a member of an ancient clan overseas. “He himself is an existence like the red-robed cardinal. “The Golden Dragon might not even stand a chance against him. “Moreover, since they were bold enough to invade us, they must have long prepared and thought of a way to restrain Lu Chen and the others. “This battle will probably be very difficult for Lu Chen.” Hearing the first elder’s words, the third in charge chief’s brows were tightly knitted together. “If that’s the case, then does Lu Chen really not need our help? First elder, where does your confidence in Lu Chen come from?” The first elder looked at Lu Chen with a wise gaze. “I don’t know where my confidence in him comes from, but I don’t think this kid will lose to those old guys. “His strength has grown immensely. I believe that he must still have his own trump card that he hasn’t used yet. “Every time when he’s in a desperate situation, he would always have a new trump card to catch his opponent’s off guard. “Perhaps my confidence comes from his countless and endless tricks and trump cards.” They looked at the projection again. Although the battle in the Mass Grave was intense, Lu Chen remained calm. The enemies before him were far from enough for him to make a real move. Plus, Lan Weiwei and Little Golden Dragon were beside him, even if they were not here, a silver boss would not pose a fatal threat to him. They fought from night to day, and the cycle kept repeating itself. By now, there were only a few hundred monsters left in the Mass Grave. Fortunately, their combat power had already reached level 20 and above. This was especially true for the silver boss here. After being nourished by the energy around the Mass Graves for a long time, their levels were even stronger than the Ancient Ash Wolf. Although the warriors were constantly returning to the main world to rest and replenish their stamina and mental strength, this kind of high-intensity battle that far surpassed the main world still made it difficult for them to recover quickly. The more intense the battle, the harder it was for them to recover even when they were asleep when they returned to the main world. This was especially so when they were faced with extremely valiant attacks and extremely strange monsters with wild attacks. Their fighting style had gradually become complacent to these monsters. It was not just because of the intensity of the battle and the length of the battle; it was also because the monsters of this Second World had surpassed the knowledge of all warriors. This knowledge required time for them to adapt and recover as quickly as possible. As time passed, the duration of the battle lessened. In the end, only 100 monsters and 200 exhausted warriors were left in the battle. In the end, the 100 monsters and the warriors of the Dragon Group were stuck in a stalemate for nearly seven hours before all the monsters were eliminated. At this time, the warriors were all exhausted. Even the Dragon Slaying squad, which was extremely experienced and had a high level of strength in the main world, had finally reached their limit. The clothes on their bodies had long since been tattered, and they had lost their ability to defend themselves. The swords and shields in their hands were also badly damaged, and they could not continue fighting. Their captain, Li Xiaotian, could only let out a bitter laugh to cover up the sorry state on his face. He felt sorry for Lu Chen. “We have reached our limits, we’ll have to return to the main world. I’ll leave the rest to you.” The other warriors’ battle consciousness had also become numb, and they could no longer guarantee success in this state. They all returned Lu Chen an apologetic gaze, and then returned to the main world. In this way, close to 200 warriors instantly disappeared from the battlefield. Only the Dragon Slaying squad was left, and at this time, all the members of the dragon Team had risen by at least level 10 after experiencing such a high level of battle. Even the Soul Slayer squad, which was already very high in rank, had risen to over level 30. In fact, the captain was now three levels higher than Lu Chen. Such strength was definitely not to be underestimated. As the members of the Dragon Slayer squaD disappeared one by one into the Second World as well, only the Soul Slaying squad remained beside Lu Chen and the others. At this moment, if it were not for his presence, the Second World’s Dragon Team probably would not have been able to hold on. The Soul Slaying squad had not reached their limits yet, so they looked at Lu Chen with determined eyes and said, “Lu Chen, let us fight the silver bosses on our own.. We’ll leave the rest to you.” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation When they asked for this, they actually felt their faces heat up. Lu Chen was only an 18-year-old teenager. A few months ago, he was only a commoner, yet he had to bear the burden of a battle with a silver boss that surpassed their entire team. The few people in his team were not low-leveled, especially the captain. His level was even higher than Lu Chen’s. However, even if the entire team was added together, they were still far from being as powerful as Lu Chen. One had to know that Lu Chen was still in a weakened state. If the other party fought as the City Lord, it would be as easy for him to destroy others with a flick of a wrist. During the battle just now, even the Soul Slaying squad had returned to the main world and rested for two hours. Although Lu Chen did not fight as much, he had been coordinating and controlling the battle from different corners. The pressure he faced would definitely not be any lesser than the warriors, yet Lu Chen was able to maintain his state of complete victory, and there was not a trace of fatigue in his eyes. The entire Soul Slaying squad could not help but sigh in admiration. If they were in the main world, even in a region where war was raging, they could maintain a high state of readiness for a month. However, in this Mass Grave, they had only fought their first battle. In less than 48 hours, they were already in an overstimulated state of mind. This contrast made them feel the terror of the Second World, and it also gave them a deeper understanding of Lu Chen’s strength. They also understood that places like the Mass Grave, where powerful monsters emerged in waves, were enough to challenge their mentality. There were not many places that gave them such great pressure. Therefore, they had to strengthen their mindset in such a place and get used to fighting a silver boss as soon as possible. At this moment, other than Lu Chen and his pet, the only people left in the Second World were Tang Xiaoqing, the Soul Slaying squad, Liu Changping, and Liu Yuan. Throughout the entire process, Tang Xiaoqing and Little Golden Dragon did not make any moves. Their purpose of making a move was only to prevent their members from being sacrificed. Meanwhile, the Soul Slaying squad had always used their tyrannical strength to sweep away all the domineering and powerful monsters on the battlefield. At the same time, they helped their other teammates clear the obstacles and face the powerful enemy head-on. As the captain of the Dragon Team, Liu Changping must have his own unique points. After all kinds of dirty development and flashy operations, he was actually able to hold out until the end. In fact, his condition was even better than the members of the Soul Slaying squad. Compared to Liu Changping, Liu Yuan’s development had been much more stable. The main reason she was able to live until the end was by taking many enhancement items. Obviously, Liu Yuan’s preparation before coming to the Mass Grave was more adequate than everyone else’s. The potions and pills she took out were several times more powerful than the other members. With the support of all sorts of supplementary medicines, although Liu Yuan’s condition was not as good as Liu Changping’s, it was commendable. Especially when Lu Chen observed that the equipment on Liu Yuan’s body was much stronger than the equipment of ordinary soldiers. If he was not mistaken, the necklace on Liu Yuan’s neck could resist the impact of spiritual power and strengthen her own spiritual power at the same time. How could Liu Yuan have such a treasure? Although Lu Chen did not ask, he knew that Liu Yuan was not a simple girl. He then turned his gaze to the Soul Slaying team again. After confirming that the five members of the team were in good condition, he gave everyone a mission. “Liu Changping, you’re responsible for defeating a silver boss . Liu Yuan, you’re also responsible for a Soul Slaying team.” Hearing Lu Chen’s arrangements, no one had any objections, even though there were still six silver bosses left. However, with Lu Chen’s team, just having Little Golden Dragon or Tang Xiaoqing could defeat the other six silver bosses in one sweep. However, Lu Chen’s next words stunned everyone. “I’ll take care of five of the remaining six silver bosses.” Liu Yuan, who was currently dressed in leather clothing, looked at the five other bosses worriedly. Her face was flushed, and she was panting slightly. “Are you sure you can take on five? Not only are these monsters powerful, but their attacks are also very strange...; “Especially those souls. It’s very likely that they’ll turn their bodies into a few parts to dodge the attacks before recovering.” Lu Chen nodded slightly. He did not say too much and only said three words, “Don’t worry, I’ll be fine.” At this time, Tang Xiaoqing was excited and eager to give it a try. She asked, “What about me? What about me? Should I take care of the remaining one?” Lu Chen smiled and reached out to rub Tang Xiaoqing’s head. This caused Tang Xiaoqing’s hair to become a little messy. However, Tang Xiaoqing did not care at all as she looked at Lu Chen with a smile on her face. Lu Chen smiled and said, “Xiaoqing, you, Lan Weiwei, and Little Golden Dragon can watch from the side. The one will be left to Rollie to deal with.” Upon hearing Lu Chen’s arrangements, Rollie, who had just ended the battle and was taking out bamboo shoots to replenish his strength, immediately collapsed. Ever since he was born, he had never gone through such intense battles. He had been pampered this whole time. If it was a low-level monster in another territory, he could kill it with a slap. High-level monsters already had intelligence and knew how to avoid him. Moreover, the monsters here were undead. Their intelligence was not very high, so they would blindly attack him. If not for his high magic resistance, physical strength, and defense. In addition to his heaven-defying luck, he probably would not have been able to survive this long. It was not easy for him to survive this long. Why was he forced to fight this one? He ran to Lu Chen’s side and hugged his thigh tightly. The silver bosses on the other side were different from ordinary monsters. Apart from some of the original creatures’ behavior, there were also some foreign additional items they held. Under this strange aura, they gave off a strange and terrifying feeling. Not to mention Rollie, even the Soul Slayer squad, who had been fighting for two days and two nights, felt their scalps go numb. The appearance of these things had already surpassed the understanding of humans. Seeing the strange-looking silver bosses one by one...; Rollie hurriedly looked at Lu Chen, his eyes filled with grievance. He even tried to look cute to avoid fighting. Lu Chen could not hold on any longer but shake his head as he squinted at Rollie’s feeble attempt. This disappointing little thing! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation “You’re already level fifteen. Your attack power is close to three thousand, and your defense is over twenty thousand points. You’re already stronger than some of the silver bosses here. What’s there to be afraid of?! “Moreover, you have the bloodline of the Ancient Iron Beast. The Ancient Iron Beast is no weaker than the four great divine beasts. What, is your only ability acting cute?” Even though Lu Chen was ridiculing Rollie, Rollie still hugged Lu Chen’s pants tightly and refused to let go. He kept rubbing her big head against Lu Chen’s pants. Tang Xiaoqing, Lan Weiwei, and Liu Yuan, who were facing such a cute Rollie, had already succumbed to the cuteness. They all pleaded with Lu Chen. “Why don’t you just leave? I’ll fight for him.” Lan Weiwei opened her big, watery eyes. Lu Chen was a little speechless. Lan Weiwei used to be the most vicious one back then. She was such a powerful presence in the Wolf Valley. She had even defeated the Ancient Ash Wolf King in one fell swoop and obtained the Ancient Ash Wolf King’s bloodline. How did she get so compassionate towards others now? Tang Xiaoqing’s two eyes curved into two crescent moons. She stretched out her hands and stretched out her ten fingers warmly. She ruthlessly rubbed Rollie’s chubby face a few times. She looked at Lu Chen and said, “Let this cute little guy go. I’ll even help you beat the other five bosses myself. What do you think?” Lu Chen looked straight at her. Tang Xiaoqing had always stood on his side. Now, she was being fooled by this Ancient Iron Beast’s foolish behavior as well. Liu Yuan reached out and rubbed Rollie’s head as they kept bargaining. “If it does not work, I can help fight two silver bosses.” Lu Chen was at a loss. Forget Lan Weiwei and Tang Xiaoqing, was he clear about Liu Yuan’s abilities? Fighting one silver boss was enough for her. If she fought a second one, Liu Yuan would die. Sure enough, no one could resist the charm of a fluffy animal. Facing the three beauties, Lu Chen was helpless. He lifted Rollie up slightly and threw him forward. Rollie, who had been hugging Lu Chen, was thrown off, leaving a beautiful arc in the air. When he landed, he was set in the middle of the 10 silver boss. In fact, Rollie landed squarely on one of the silver bosses. Rollie was a pet that could not keep his mouth shut all the time. Since he only knew how to eat and not train, his weight had long surpassed that of a normal silver boss. Under the impact of this fall, he directly smashed half of a silver boss’s body into smithereens. -36,000! In an instant, a huge flash of red appeared in the sky. “What the f*ck!” When Lu Chen saw Rollie — which had been thrown over 1,000 meters — directly smashing into a silver boss and shattered half of its body, he could not help but swear. “Holy sh*t!” “Holy sh*t!” “Holy sh*t!” “Holy sh*t!” This scene stupefied the other people around, successively the innumerable swearing happened in one go as their jaws slackened. Even if Rollie were to be thrown into a gold boss’s lair, he would not be fatally injured, much less a silver-rank boss to withstand his attack. After all, this heaven-sent good fortune was equivalent to heaven’s blessing. However, he had never expected that a casual throw would cripple a silver boss. Rollie might even be the word luck itself! Rollie descended from the sky and smashed the silver boss onto the ground. The boss’s remaining two claws struggled to stand up, but he was not as strong as Rollie. Rollie was also stunned. He used his hands and feet to struggle as he tried to run towards Lu Chen again. -12,005! -2,564! -1,267! -23,419! Every time he tried to run, he managed to hit the weak point of the broken silver boss. He even managed to land a few critical hits! In less than three to five seconds, the other half of the monster’s body, which was still intact, was shattered by Rollie! The entire process took less than ten seconds. The other nine silver bosses had yet to react. Dumbfounded that their companion was killed by a fluffy animal. Moreover, it seemed so easy. The silver bosses, which had gained sentience, were momentarily at a loss. They were too stunned to react. Taking advantage of the moment when all the silver bosses were still in a daze, Rollie ran 1,000 meters toward Lu Chen. In less than ten seconds, he had arrived in front of Lu Chen. Rollie’s next move was to reach out with both hands and fiercely hug Lu Chen’s thigh once more. From the moment Rollie flew into the air to the moment he landed, to the moment he killed the silver boss for no apparent reason, to the moment he ran back to Lu Chen’s side, he trembled. The entire process was as smooth as flowing water. There was nothing that caused Rollie any problems at all. This set of actions truly shocked everyone present. No one had expected that the first to kill a silver boss could be done by Rollie. Tang Xiaoqing came from an ancient martial arts aristocratic family. When faced with Rollie’s extraordinary actions, she naturally understood that Rollie’s actions were understandable. However, although the Soul Slayer Team had long heard of Rollie’s existence, this was the first time they had seen such an existence. For a moment, they simply could not accept it. They were even thinking of other ways to solve other problems now. If they had known that Rollie was so heaven-defying, they should have just kicked him into the battlefield at the start of the war. If they used Rollie to attack the beasts, these monsters would have been wiped out within a few hours, right? However, they were only thinking about it. After all, they were not Lu Chen. Lu Chen was the one that kicked Rollie. Not only was Rollie not angry, but he even came back shivering and hugging his thigh. However, if it was a kick from the Soul Slayer Team, they would probably suffer from the backlash of fate. If it was a kick, before Rollie could take off, their leg would be broken. Liu Yuan saw the scene in front of her in awe. She carefully moved closer to Lu Chen’s ear and asked tentatively, “This time, can Rollie be considered to have completed the mission?” Lu Chen looked at the three girls next to him, then looked at the trembling Rollie beneath his feet… His eyebrows scrunched up in annoyance. Even the Soul Slayer Team, who had fought for half their lives, was shocked by Rollie’s inexplicable victory, not to mention Lu Chen. To be precise, Rollie had indeed accomplished it. Lu Chen’s goal for him was to kill a silver boss. However, this process was completely different from what Lu Chen wanted to achieve. Lu Chen’s goal was to increase Rollie’s combat experience and strength, not to let his luck play its role time and time again/ This time, not to mention increasing his combat experience, even Rollie’s courage had been destroyed. Moreover, he had killed a silver boss with just a few casual strokes. If ordinary players were to hear about this, how low would their self-esteem drop? Lu Chen looked at Rollie carefully, and an even more shocking scene happened! The information on Rollie’s interface had actually changed! [Ancient Panda] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Rollie] [Intimacy: 135] [Level: 20] [Attack: 4,350] [HP: 192,000] [Defense: 25,000] [Magic Defense: 25,000] [Skill: Luck Bonus, Invisible Golden Body] [Luck Bonus: With Heaven’s blessing, there is a high chance of avoiding disaster, turning a bad situation into a good one, and averting a disaster! Provides a Luck buff for 60 seconds. Has a certain chance to be immune to all negative effects and damage.] [Invisible Golden Body: There will be a chance to cast this skill for each battle. When casting the skill, it will not be able to move for three seconds. However, it would be immune to all damage.] Other people had only increased their levels by a few levels after fighting to the death, but Rollie had actually risen by 5 levels just like that? Was the system being unfair? Moreover, this time, whether it was HP or defense, the increase was very obvious. His attack power had almost doubled! What surprised Lu Chen the most was that Rollie’s intimacy with him had actually decreased. Although it was only a drop of less than 2 points, this was the first time Lu Chen had experienced a drop in intimacy! After all, intimacy was a key factor that determined a pet’s loyalty and combat power. A drop in intimacy was not a small matter! In addition, under the hopeful faces of the three women, Lu Chen felt that he could not go back on his word. He could only wave his hand at Rollie and ask Rollie to move aside. When Rollie left, Lu Chen thought for a moment, took out more bamboo shoots from his backpack and stuffed them directly into Rollie’s arms. This time, Rollie’s originally frightened expression suddenly became joyful! He then ran far away from the battle to munch on his new snacks. Lu Chen had asked Rollie to leave not because he was afraid that he would be injured in the upcoming battle, but because he was afraid that the other players’ training opportunities would be canceled along with Rollie’s existence. If Rollie accidentally knocked down a few more silver bosses, the others would not have to fight anymore. At the same time, Lu Chen had also specifically asked Little Golden Dragon and Tang Xiaoqing to guard Rollie and prevent the silver bosses from approaching that little fellow. Otherwise, these bosses would be played to death by Rollie in just a few moves. Looking at the six silver bosses in the distance, they looked at Rollie with fear in their eyes. They clearly could not sense any terrifying aura from Rollie’s body, but also could not explain why Rollie’s combat power was ridiculously high. They could faintly feel that Heaven was protecting Rollie, but they were still confused as to what exactly was going on. After all, as undead, they were no longer as highly intelligent as they were when they were alive. Hence, it was very difficult to understand how an existence like Rollie, who was greatly blessed, could be this powerful. Little Golden Dragon, Tang Xiaoqing, and Lan Weiwei slowly made their way over. These silver bosses immediately grew bolder. After all, they had been most afraid of these three existences. In particular, Tang Xiaoqing and Little Golden Dragon gave them the feeling that the other party could kill them with a casual blow. Although Lan Weiwei was not as powerful as the other two, the suppression from their beast-type bloodlines made them feel incomparable. Thus, after Tang Xiaoqing and the others left, the nine silver bosses let out a long howl and charged towards Lu Chen. Each of their roars caused the entire forest to shake violently. As they ran, even the ground gave off an ear-splitting rumble. Even if the countless bullet trains of the main world whizzed past, it would still be difficult for them to give off such a powerful pressure compared to these bosses. Even Lu Chen had never felt such an earth-shaking feeling before. One had to know that every silver boss was the size of a small mountain. If one looked closely, their legs were like giant pillars that could support the sky. They were even thicker than a 100 year old tree. At that moment, Lu Chen almost wanted to cower in fear. However, this thought was too absurd for someone of his characteristics. In just a few minutes, he tossed this feeling to the back of his head. To a silver boss with such a body, a distance of 1,000 meters was fleeting. Even though there was an extremely powerful pressure, none of the warriors on Lu Chen’s side retreated. Lu Chen was the first to bear the brunt of the attack. The sword in his hand flashed, and he directly blocked the five monsters with his strongest combat power. He split the nine silver bosses into three and blocked them from the middle. This way, the Soul Slayer Team would surround Lu Chen from the left flank and charge forward. They blocked the two monsters that were about to attack Lu Chen. Meanwhile, Liu Yuan and Liu Changping were also fighting with a silver boss on the right flank. This kind of battle, which had a huge difference in size, looked a little like a baby ant attacking an elephant. However, the combat power of these ants could not be underestimated. Every ant had the same strength as an elephant. This was especially true when Lu Chen, who was in the lead, faced the five silver bosses alone. He was not at a disadvantage. Originally, the five silver bosses had wanted to spread out their combat power and wipe out the other four groups. However, Lu Chen had successfully held them back by himself. The bosses had no choice but to finish Lu Chen off first. This operation relieved the pressure on the other teams. After all, Liu Yuan, Liu Changping, and the Soul Slayer team were all very nervous when faced with a silver boss. This was because the number of silver bosses they were facing had already reached their limits. If another silver boss attacked them head-on, even if they only split up a little of their strength to launch a sneak attack, it would be enough to deal a fatal blow to them. On the Soul Slayer Team’s side, they were indeed under a lot of pressure fighting against the two silver bosses. If they were confident in winning, they would not be trembling as hard as they should be right now. However, after dozens of hours of fighting, their condition had already deteriorated considerably. If not for the fact that they had been working together all year round and were extremely well-coordinated, it was likely that they would not be able to hold on for more than a few minutes before someone would be heavily injured or even die. Fortunately, they did not come up empty-handed during their previous fights.. Not only did they gain battle experience, but more importantly, their levels had all risen by a lot. Each of them was even stronger than the two silver bosses they had surrounded. This made them slightly more relaxed in this battle against the two silver bosses. Zhou Zhenyang, the team leader of the Soul Slayer team, immediately charged forward. As the main attacker, his combat power was the strongest among all the Soul Slayer team members. Even when compared to Lu Chen, he was three levels higher, reaching level 38. An existence of this level could be said to be comparable to a level 40 gold boss like Little Golden Dragon. If it was an ordinary silver boss, he could easily kill a silver boss by itself. After fighting for dozens of hours, coupled with the unique physical characteristics of the monsters here, Zhou Zhenyang was able to kill a silver boss with ease. As a result, when the attacks landed on these monsters, they were weakened to a certain extent. However, with his powerful combat power, Zhou Zhenyang managed to attract most of the firepower of the two silver bosses. Meanwhile, in the distance, there was a high-level marksman, Lin Feng, who had extremely high attack power and had been continuously firing shots throughout the entire battle. Lin Feng held a machine gun by his waist with both hands and continuously adjusted the direction of the muzzle. The barrel of the machine gun continuously rotated and shot out countless bullets. The bullets directly charged at the two silver bosses, and the speed of the bullets reached several thousand rounds per minute. This was common when Lin Feng was in the main world. He was a machine gunner, and his heavy firepower suppression techniques were extremely skilled. In this Second World game, he became even more proficient. The muzzle of his gun was pressed extremely firmly. All the bullets in his gun poured down like a torrential rain. They directly charged towards the eyes of the two silver bosses. These monsters were already somewhat difficult to deal with against the powerful Zhou Zhenyang. Coupled with Lin Feng’s heavy firepower, the two silver bosses had no choice but to divert their attention and use their claws or backs to block more bullets to prevent them from receiving serious damage. Whenever they were about to aim their attacks at the distant linfeng, Zhou Zhenyang would find an opportunity to launch a heavy blow. The enemy had no choice but to focus their attention on Zhou Zhenyang once more to block his killing move. However, despite Zhou Zhenyang’s powerful attack power, there was a natural gap between the combat power of players and monsters. In terms of defense and HP, human players were far inferior to monsters. In particular, silver bosses with hundreds of thousands of HP were far superior to ordinary players. Even if a silver boss stood still and allowed Zhou Zhenyang to slash it, the team would take a long time to kill it. Moreover, these silver bosses had been very powerful when they were alive. Although they were not as fierce as they were when they were alive, they still had their own unique fighting strength that added to their combat power. In addition to defending, they launched all kinds of powerful attacks that Zhou Zhenyang had no choice but to dodge. One had to know that even for Zhou Zhenyang, a few hits from a silver boss like this would kill him. Fortunately, the warriors of the Dragon Team had powerful supplies, especially after the other warriors left. They handed over their supplies to the Soul Slayer Team and the others. As long as they did not die immediately, they could replenish themselves with potions and pills. Apart from the main attacker, Zhou Zhenyang, and Lin Feng, who was in charge of covering the area with heavy firepower, a black shadow often shuttled through the air and disappeared without a trace. However, every time it struck, it would hit the boss’s vital point. If the others were like ants, then this black and swift shadow was an extremely fast fruit fly that zoomed in the air. Perhaps each move was not fatal, but it was painful and unbearable. Every sting was real and could take away a considerable amount of HP. This person was the original president of the Night Union, Hei Yu. At this time, his level had already reached 32 levels. Even compared to Lu Chen, he was only three levels lower. One had to know that he was only a heaven rank expert in the mainworld. However, ever since he had handed in the ultra-long distance teleportation scroll, in exchange, he had spared no expense and used all his resources to pile it up into a spiritual realm expert. Everyone knew that the thing Hei Yu wanted to do the most was to go to the Western Castle to avenge his daughter. However, he knew that he could not go against a force just because of one person. Such a method did not meet the needs of the entire country. Once the Dragon Country used the force of the country to intervene in private grudges, it would quickly lead to the retaliation of the hostile forces. At that time, not only would the power of the Dragon Country be damaged, even the ordinary people of the Dragon Country would be in deep trouble. Such an outcome was unacceptable even for Hei Yu, not to mention the high-level officials of the Dragon Country. However, to put it in perspective, the reason why Hei Yu left the Dragon Team in the first place was because he wanted to avenge his daughter. After so many years, the Dragon Country not only did not avenge Hei Yu, he did not receive any compensation for help. Now that he had taken the initiative to hand over priceless equipment, the Dragon Country could not let him down, much less let the other warriors of the Dragon Team feel disappointed. It was precisely because he had offered the high-level teleportation scroll, which was priceless and could not even be bought with money, to the Dragon Country that the Dragon Country had spared no expense to raise his strength to the spiritual stage. Coincidentally, a member of the Soul Slayer Team had died while carrying out a mission some time ago. Therefore, Hei Yu had been added to the Soul Slayer Team. At this time, Lu Chen was watching the battle from the side. Hei Yu looked excited and did not dare to make the slightest mistake. One had to know that he was a person favored by Lu Chen. If he made any mistakes at this time, it would simply be a disgrace to Lu Chen. Even when the warriors were facing the horde of monsters, Lu Chen was constantly giving Hei Yu tips on how to attack and dodge, which greatly increased Hei Yu’s combat experience. However, Lu Chen’s operation also surprised everyone. This Lu Chen was clearly only an 18-year-old teenager, and his resume did not have any past experience in anything. He was just an ordinary student. Why was his combat experience so much better than the warriors who had been on the edge of life and death for many years? However, no one knew that the reason why Lu Chen could have today’s achievements was precisely because he had lived in the Novice Village’s outside cave for nearly a thousand years. The mountain-like hare corpses that he had captured were proof of that. The three members of the Soul Slayer Team were not the only ones with outstanding abilities. There was also a member named Gao Shen, who also made everyone’s eyes light up.. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The fourth member of the Soul Slayer Team was not to be underestimated. He was a warrior who specialized in defense. His defense was completely different from the defensive warriors in the Dragon Slayer Team from before. His profound ability was not only to stack his defense against himself, but he could also share his defense among his teammates. He could even switch the defense of his teammates back and forth to achieve the effect of group defense linkage. To be precise, this ability was a bit like the ability of a control system. This move was very similar to the ability that the Ancient Fire Tiger’s had. Once a?Fire Tiger was injured, it would be evenly distributed to the others. However, Gao Shen’s ability was even stronger than the fire tiger. Back then, once the intensity of the attack exceeded the Fire Tiger’s own health bar, it would immediately be cleared to zero or even die. However, this was not the case for Gao Shen. If a certain person received a powerful attack, then with the help of the group defense linkage mechanism, the defense of that member would instantly increase to an extremely high level. Simply put, it was to let all the members work together to reach a level where they would rise and fall together. Let alone others, even Lu Chen was envious of this skill. This was definitely a godly weapon in team battles. There were only five people in the Soul Slayer Team, so naturally, the power of this skill would not be obvious to others. However, if this profound could continuously increase his strength and control more people to defend, then this skill would be really awesome. If Gao Shen could connect the defense of an army of a million people, then no matter how much damage he received, no one would die. Especially in the Second World, what kind of existence would be able to break through everyone’s defense in one go and directly destroy the health bar of a million people? It was simply impossible to think of such a thing. In this way, as long as all the warriors replenished their health, it would be equivalent to an army with unlimited health. They can be a true immortal army. This ability was very similar to the HP binding between Lu Chen and his pets. However, there was a limit to Lu Chen’s ability. Firstly, it had to be a pet, and secondly, there was a requirement for the number of pets. Currently, it seemed that he could only bind three pets. However, if Gao Shen’s level continued to rise, and his group defense and control ability did not have a limit, he would definitely become a killing machine in the army. Who did not want an army that would never be defeated and would never die? When Lu Chen looked at the last person in the team, he was shocked by the opponent’s smooth operation. All the members of the Soul Slayer Team had their own unique strength. Zhou Zhenyang became the team leader because he had the strongest combat strength. Hei Yu was able to join the Soul Slayer Team because of his first-class assassination skills and the super high strength that the dragon country helped him to improve. Lin Feng joined the Soul Slayer Team because of his unparalleled sense of marksmanship. This kind of effect of using the machine gun like a sniper rifle was definitely a talent. Gao Shen’s specialty was to have a group defense joint skill that others could not have, this kind of godly weapon that even Lu Chen envied. Then the last person who existed in the Soul Slayer Team, although he was not the captain, was definitely the soul and leader of the entire team. The last person was called Liu Xin. He had a frail body and did not have the muscles of a typical warrior. At the same time, he did not even have any special weapons or guns. His only skill was signal transmission. To be exact, he could use this skill to connect to anyone he wanted. This skill was too useless. Simply put, it was a human phone. A walkie-talkie could replace it. However, what this really reflected was Liu Xin’s brain’s electromagnetic wave strength. Not only could he control himself, but he was also powerful enough to affect others. If signal transmission was just a normal skill, then the shock he gave others was his unparalleled analytical ability and brain. Although the other four members of the Soul Slayer Team were constantly attacking and dodging, everyone was communicating with Liu Xin. Liu Xin would accurately analyze the ever-changing situation on the field, find the monster’s weakness at any time, analyze his state of implementation, and predict the monster’s next move and make everyone move in advance. After he had integrated all the data he had obtained through his brain, he accurately assigned each person’s next task to the team members. If the other members of the team were like a person’s hands and feet, then Liu Xin was the team’s well-deserved brain. Although he did not have strong attack power, it could even be said that he was relatively weak. However, as the existence of a strategist on the battlefield, he was the top commander among thousands of soldiers and horses What the soldiers needed to do was to charge into the battlefield and bravely fight the enemy. What the commander needed to do was to guard the rear of the battlefield, strategize, constantly analyze the situation on the battlefield, and determine victory from thousands of miles away. The position that Liu Xin occupied was also very special. He stood close to Gao Shen. Gao Shen was also being very vigilant. Every time a monster moved toward Liu Xin, he would instinctively move toward Liu Xin and block the monster with his shield. During critical moments, he would even use his body to block the monster’s attacks. Only Gao Shen would dare block a silver boss’s attack head-on. If it were any other warrior, one-third of their HP would be gone. If the monsters dealt a critical hit as well, they would die. Among the two bosses the Soul Slayer Team faced, one was a tiger, which was also known as a Bone Tiger. The other was a Goshawk that had long since turned into an undead. Originally, these two pairs had both offense and defensive skills. Not only was one of them a ground attacker, but the other possessed control over the air. Such a combination was undoubtedly powerful. Originally, these two monsters thought that although there were five players here, with their combination, they would definitely be able to instantly destroy the Soul Slayer Team. However, when they truly started fighting, they instantly discovered that they did not gain the slightest advantage. In fact, they were already on the losing side. Originally, the monsters thought that killing these players would be as easy as stepping on an ant. However, they did not think that these ants would actually be incredibly hard. They even felt as if their feet were being pricked when they stepped on the ants. The frustration of stepping on a nail made them complain endlessly. However, they could not do anything about it. The other monsters were so entangled in the mess that they did not have any extra energy to help themselves. From far away, Tang Xiaoqing and Xiao Jinlong were a little surprised when they saw the performance of the Soul Slayer Team! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation One had to know that although Zhou Zhenyang’s level was higher than Lu Chen’s, Lu Chen would be considered more powerful. Lu Chen was a complete freak. He was someone that could solo a silver boss, no one else could. After all, Lu Chen’s combat power could no longer be measured by ordinary levels. The titles he obtained after maxing out his level gave him a huge boost. It was no longer something a few levels above could make up for. To Lu Chen, fighting above his level was as easy as breathing. Similarly, although Zhou Zhenyang’s level was higher than the monster before him, the monster’s HP and defense were incomparable to that of a human. Its attack power was also stronger than a human’s. Not to mention Zhou Zhenyang alone, even if there were 10 of them altogether, their combat power would still be inferior to these two silver bosses. However, with the team’s precise coordination, they were actually able to gain such an advantage. They were even able to defeat the two silver bosses unscathed. Even if the monsters launched a powerful attack, they would easily dodge it. Especially Liu Xin, who had been commanding the team from afar. He wore a pair of glasses and had a gentle expression on his face, he was commanding the entire team to attack in an orderly manner. The scene changed and came to Liu Changping’s side again. In the previous two days of battle, Liu Changping’s operation was completely different from the Soul Slayer Team. The Soul Slayer Team seized every opportunity to fight to the death and used all of their strength to fight. They did not hesitate at all. They had this confidence precisely because they were strong enough. Liu Changping was very familiar with his own strength. He was originally only a heaven-tier master. After cultivating in the main world, he finally became a spiritual master and faintly touched the barrier of the acquired stage. He knew that if he fought like the Soul Slayer Team in the past two days, his condition would rapidly decline and directly collapse. Hence, he had adopted a strategy of fighting steadily and not advancing rashly. He would rather retreat in advance than attack the monsters forcefully. Even before his condition had completely deteriorated, he had taken the initiative to return to the main world to rest. Moreover, he had rested longer than the other warriors. This kind of operation looked very sneaky. Many of the warriors around him could not understand what Liu Changping was trying to achieve. However, at this moment, his ability was finally revealed. His condition was very well-preserved because he had set his goal to challenge a silver boss from the very beginning! At this moment, the monster he was facing was an Ancient Ash Wolf King! Judging from its body and the remaining fur on its body, this Ancient Ash Wolf King was also Lan Weiwei’s ancestor. Lan Weiwei could not bear to see the fight go down, so she turned her head away. This boss was close to a gold boss when it was alive. Although this Ancient Ash Wolf King had taken care of her when it was alive, she could not do anything about it now. However, when it was reduced to a corpse, its strength had already fallen to an ordinary silver-rank strength. Even the memories it had when it was alive had long been forgotten. He was just a beast that only knew how to kill. No matter how close they had been in the past, at this moment, they were now eternal enemies. The only thing this Ancient Ash Wolf King needed to do was to kill these players before him. Although this Ancient Ash Wolf King’s strength had dropped drastically, it had managed to preserve most of its skills when it was alive. It was currently dark in the sky, and a bright moon hung high in the sky. The moonlight sprinkled down, greatly increasing the power of this Ancient Ash Wolf King, increasing its strength. Even the broken limbs on its body could be faintly seen, slowly recovering. The remaining fur on its body also gradually recovered some luster. In particular, its originally slow and stiff movements gradually became flexible at this moment. Sharp and powerful claws swung left and right, constantly blocking Liu Changping’s path of retreat and carrying out powerful attacks on him. Fortunately, Liu Changping was in good condition. He repeatedly jumped horizontally under the attacks, continuously dodging everything. Meanwhile, the large weapon in his hand accurately slashed at the Ancient Ash Wolf King’s legs. One had to know that the Ancient Ash Wolf King was dozens of meters tall. Its legs were like a giant pillar that supported the sky. The hardness of its legs was so strong that even if Liu Changping’s long weapon chopped at it, it would only leave a mark on it, not causing any serious injuries. Each time the knife hit the Ancient Ash Wolf King, it would only drop a few thousand points of HP. This little injury was gradually recovering with the help of the moonlight. Therefore, the battle between Liu Changping and the Ancient Ash Wolf King was different from that of the Soul Slayer Team. The two sides were in a stalemate, and it had been a long time since an overwhelming situation appeared. Fortunately, Liu Changping was an excellent warrior. He was not like the others who would become anxious after a long time of failure. Instead, he continued to attack steadily, trying to wear down the Ancient Ash Wolf King’s enormous health bar bit by bit with his own strength. Fortunately, his attacks were effective. Although the Ancient Ash Wolf King had a strong recovery ability, Liu Changping’s persistent attacks were also very effective. After an hour, the monsters on the Soul Slayer Team’s side had almost half of their health left, while the Ancient Ash Wolf King on Liu Changping’s side had only lost one-twentieth of its health. However, this was a huge victory for Liu Changping. He was even a little proud of himself. This was because the Soul Slayer Team was in a 5-on-2 state, while his side was at the limit of one-on-one. Thinking of this, Liu Changping even secretly gave himself a thumbs up. Liu Yuan’s situation was much more serious than Liu Changping’s. She was also facing an undead, but this monster was an undead scorpion. The Scorpion King’s combat power and threat was obviously stronger than the Ancient Ash Wolf King. As the Scorpion King was a creature with an exoskeleton, from the outside, other than its eyes turning into two black holes, it looked no different from when it was alive. Although it was only a few meters tall, it was not as large as the other silver boss. However, the sense of danger it gave off was not any lesser than the rest. Its shiny black outer shell looked extremely sturdy. Its two huge pincers kept swinging, and its movements were extremely agile. In particular, the stinger behind its body was a jade-green needle, constantly swaying left and right, launching rapid attacks. From time to time, some venom would drip down. When the venom fell to the ground, the ground would quickly be corroded into a bottomless hole. On the ground, white smoke would rise up, and even the trees that had been smoked by the white smoke would quickly wither. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation This scorpion was simply too powerful. It had high agility, high attack, high defense, and high poison! It was simply an all-rounded bug-like existence! However, in the face of such a dangerous monster, although Liu Yuan had difficulty dodging and was faltering, she did not suffer too serious of an injury. This was especially so when Lu Chen discovered that this little girl had an incredible amount of high-level equipment on her. Judging from the quality of the white-colored flexible sword in her hand and the strength of its attack, he could tell that the equipment was definitely silver grade. Previously, the Scorpion King had stabbed her in the chest with a stinger, but Liu Yuan did not receive any damage. Her clothes were only slightly torn, and there was a silver light spot inside. Liu Yuan’s HP did not even drop. She was only sent flying. Lu Chen did not see any signs of her being poisoned. This meant that either she had consumed a treasure that prevented the poisonous gas from entering her body, or she had a piece of silver grade equipment with extremely high defense. Judging from the faint silver light spot, the possibility of the latter was extremely high. One had to know that there were not many silver grade defensive treasures. Turns out, Liu Yuan actually had two of them. This was especially true for the soft armor. It was a treasure that could ignore a silver monster’s attack. Other than the one that Xiao Bai had dropped and Lu Chen had picked up. Only Liu Yuan had such a treasure. Moreover, logically speaking, Liu Yuan’s level should be much lower than his. After all, Liu Yuan was only an ordinary dragon warrior. Even as a female player, her body’s basic attributes should be far inferior to a male’s. Hence, her combat level should be around level 20. However, at this moment, Liu Yuan’s level had already reached level 29. Even the Dragon Slayer Team had yet to reach that level. Even in the Soul Slayer Team, she could not be considered a pushover. If it was said that Liu Yuan did not have a deep background, it was impossible for her level to be raised so quickly. The person behind her must be a high-ranking official of the country. Otherwise, what kind of person would have such a huge amount of money to pile her up into such a top-notch expert? However, there was another possibility. That was that Liu Yuan was a genius herself. She had her own unique talent in martial arts. However, these things were things that Lu Chen did not understand. Lu Chen’s specialty was fighting in the Second World. As for those in the main world, especially the cultivation system of the ancient martial arts aristocratic families, he did not understand them at all. If Liu Yuan was not a true genius, it would be impossible for her to advance by leaps and bounds. Otherwise, if she forcefully raised her strength, there would be side effects, and it would only discourage her. No rich family would choose such a method. Even the direct descendants of the ten great clans would find it difficult to reach Liu Yuan’s level. Moreover, when she used her soft sword to attack the Scorpion King, each and every move she made seemed very methodical. Unlike other players, she did not casually attack with agility and strength. It was obvious that Liu Yuan’s skills and sword techniques were inherited. Not only were each and every move extremely beautiful, but their attack power was also shocking. In order to give this silver Scorpion King a more accurate and effective attack, Liu Yuan had specifically targeted the joints to attack. With this, almost every move of the Scorpion King could reach critical hits. However, this Scorpion King’s only weakness was that, unlike other silver bosses, its health bar was relatively low. After such a long battle, this Scorpion King actually only had two-thirds of its health remaining. This progress could be said to be very impressive. After all, the five members of the Soul Slayer Team had only managed to attack half of the two silver boss’s HP. On the other hand, Liu Changping had only slowly lost one-twentieth of his HP. In comparison, Liu Yuan was half a step ahead of them. Of course, this was only under the circumstances that Liu Yuan had additional equipment. After all, the members of the Soul Slayer Team did not have top-tier equipment like hers. Even so, Liu Yuan’s performance was far beyond Lu Chen’s expectations. Initially, he was still wondering if Liu Yuan would not be able to hold on at all. Lu Chen was still thinking about when he could go and help him to prevent her from dying in the Second World. Now, it seemed that he was worrying too much. … At the top of a deep mountain in a Mass Grave far away. A man whose entire body was emitting a golden light. It seemed that the light from his back directly illuminated the surrounding hundred meters around him. There were only a few gold monsters lying around him the entire time. They did not walk around randomly, nor did they dare to approach him casually. It was obvious that these gold undead or gold mummies had a very high respect for this person. However, this was clearly a silver territory. How could there be so many gold monsters? It was precisely this man’s handiwork. He showed a calm expression and a slight smile, he seemed to be muttering to himself, “I didn’t expect that the granddaughter of that old fellow to have grown so big. He had clearly gone to the depths of the ruins, yet he was still able to nurture his granddaughter.” As soon as he finished speaking, another voice came from the ground. This voice was like thunder, shaking one’s soul. “Yes, so many years have passed. How old do you think he is now? How did his strength decline to such an extent?” The eyes of the man who was emitting a brilliant golden light flashed slightly, as if there were thousands of stars hidden within. That kind of aura seemed to be the combination of all the good fortune in one’s body. Anyone who looked at it could be deeply immersed in it. The man said, “You’re mistaken. How could an existence that has lived for a thousand years decline in cultivation? “It seems that his strength is still above mine. “His methods are not something I can predict. “It’s just that we haven’t been updated on them. This little girl is clearly such a good person, but she has been taught to be like this. “Forget it. On account of the fact that I once knew him, I will take this little girl as his disciple.” The thunderous voice from underground appeared once again, “Isn’t that kid even more powerful? “Why didn’t he take her as his disciple? “One must know that it’s too difficult to face an ancient martial arts aristocratic family head on. “I’m afraid that it’s not something that that little girl can solve.” The man who was emitting golden light slowly shook his head and said softly, “That kid’s fate is too complicated. I can’t see through it. “Moreover, if I want to take revenge, you’ll have to rely on yourself. “However, the energy in this place is too heavy. I don’t know how long it will take for my cultivation to recover.” The voice that came from the ground was obviously very surprised. “What? Even with your strength you can’t see through that kid’s fate? What kind of existence is he?” The man slowly said, “It’s not important. If he can’t see through the direction of his future life, then we won’t be able to either. “However, there are countless lines connecting the fate of this kid and that girl. It can be seen that the relationship between them is fated to be unbreakable. “Therefore, as long as this girl enters the game, that kid probably won’t leave either. Moreover, this girl is that person’s granddaughter.. When that time comes, that person will have no choice but to act.” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The man’s words were indeed a little far-fetched. Although he was currently somewhere far away, he still insisted on playing a big game of life chess. Everything was a game of chess for him, and he plans on coming out on top. When the voice below heard his words, it was silent for a long time before it said, “We have already reached this stage, yet you are still being this calculative. “It’s no wonder the ancient martial arts aristocratic family decided to kill you. “What right do you have to complain about the energy in the Mass Grave?” As soon as he said this, the man who was emitting golden light all over his body suddenly lost his composure. The golden light on his body even flashed a little from it all. He opened his mouth several times to refute, but in the end, he could not think of any words to retort such a statement. … The battle on Lu Chen’s side continued. Compared to the other three groups, Lu Chen was definitely under the greatest pressure. The others were fighting one-on-one, or even five against two. Meanwhile, Lu Chen was fighting five silver monsters on his own. This was an unprecedented pressure that he gave himself. The monsters he had to face on his side were a bear, two bats, a python, and even a panda. Although Lu Chen had already reached level 35, he still found it difficult to face five silver bosses on his own. Since these monsters were already dead, they did not feel any pain. They did not even feel fear. Hence, they often attacked Lu Chen without caring about their own safety. However, their attacks were not enough. The strength of these monsters was also their weakness. These monsters were already skeletons or spirit bodies, their movements were considered slow. Moreover, their intelligence was relatively low, which also hindered their ability to display their strength. In addition, they were only level 20 or so. The highest level was only level 30, which was lower than Lu Chen’s level. Therefore, Lu Chen did not suffer much damage after moving around. With the help of the Swift Boots given to him by the first elder, Lu Chen’s speed had already reached several times more than his usual speed. With this kind of speed, even if those monsters kept waving their sharp claws and even thought of ways to form a dense and airtight attack, they still could not catch Lu Chen. Finally, Lu Chen was able to hold his ground to take a breather. He felt that his movement technique had been honed. This battle should be over soon enough! He immediately jumped out of the battle circle. The title above Lu Chen’s head suddenly lit up, and the word Blade God appeared. [Blade God: Your understanding of the blade has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a blade-type weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with your level!] [Frenzied Blade: When you transform into the Blade God, your attack will definitely be a critical hit. You will have a critical hit immunity effect and receive a 400% critical hit damage bonus!] [Bloodbath Blade God: When your enemies exceed 100 amount, your attack will become an area-of-effect damage of 100 meters. 50% of the damage will be converted into your HP.]] With the buffs from Frenzied Blade, the original attack power of 78,860 instantly increased by four times, reaching over 300,000 attack power! In addition to Bloodbath Blade God’s AOE attack, all the monsters including the silver bosses suffered a blow at the same time! One had to know that Lu Chen’s attack speed had already reached 29 attacks per second. This also meant that Lu Chen’s attack could be enough to cause all the enemies within a 100-meter radius to lose close to 10,000,000 HP in one go! Although Lu Chen’s current body condition could not withstand such a powerful attack speed, he could at least unleash 20 attacks in a go! This was a total of more than 6,000,000 attack power! Even a gold boss like Little Golden Dragon only had around 3,000,000 HP. It?would be impossible to withstand Lu Chen’s attack now! Lu Chen left the battle circle, and the other monsters rushed towards him one after another. He slowly raised the long blade in his hand, and instantly, a soul-stirring aura attack emanated from his body! All the monsters instantly felt the impending danger. However, their intelligence was too low. They only hesitated for a moment before rushing forward again! Only the level 30 Ancient Panda had a vague feeling that something was wrong. Therefore, it immediately let out a long howl! Following that, another bat that was flying towards Lu Chen suddenly stopped. It lowered its head to look at the Ancient Panda and let out an extremely unwilling sharp howl. However, the Ancient Panda once again let out a long howl. This time, it howled even louder! The bat monster finally did not continue charging towards Lu Chen. Instead, it circled in mid-air and even pulled some distance away. The Ancient Panda also turned around and ran back, not daring to look back. Lu Chen’s aura gradually rose and finally reached a peak! At the same time, the other three monsters had also reached his side. He did not hold back anymore and directly unleashed his Blade God attack! In an instant, a destructive aura enveloped a distance of 100 meters nearby. The three monsters had not even touched Lu Chen when they were turned into three pieces of debris. The air was filled with bouts of aura slashes. There was even a faint explosion of whirlwinds that swept up the ashes of these monsters and flew into the sky. The bat did not have enough time to escape, it was instantly crushed into a black mist from its undead state. It turned into ashes and joined the others as it dispersed into the thin air. The area within 100 meters had turned gray. The Mass Grave was now filled with the aura of death. Under this critical attack, it was like a real purgatory on earth. Everything had turned into an eternal silence and haze. -231,5543! -121,5433! -131,5547! Three seven-digit flurries of red instantly appeared in the air! When everyone saw this, their hearts immediately went numb! Originally, when Little Golden Dragon saw Lu Chen preparing to attack, he knew that Lu Chen was going to release a complicated attack. Although Lu Chen had defeated him, he was sure that Lu Chen was more powerful than many others. However, Little Golden Dragon did not pay too much attention to it. The reason why he was defeated by Lu Chen back then was because Lu Chen had the title of White Fog City Lord. With the help of White Fog City, Lu Chen was practically immortal. Little Golden Dragon had always believed that he was the most powerful existence among Lu Chen and his three spiritual pets. Therefore, he thought that the reason why Lu Chen was not afraid of Wu Tian of the Wu family was because of Little Golden Dragon’s own strength. However, at this moment, when Lu Chen’s blade technique was unleashed, he realized that he was wrong. He was completely wrong. Only with the attack of the Blade God just now from Lu Chen was enough to kill him more than once. Little Golden Dragoon was even clearer that the power of the title of the Sword God that Lu Chen had once used was countless times more terrifying than that of the Blade God. The feeling of being slashed by a sword had long left a lingering fear in Little Golden Dragon’s heart. However, he had never thought that this was actually Lu Chen’s own strength and not the blessing of White Fog City. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Everyone on site was stunned. It was especially more so for Little Golden Dragon, he was extremely shocked, and at the same time, he felt a little guilty. Fortunately, he had admitted defeat quickly. Otherwise, he would have been reduced to a pile of ashes by now. It had to be said that Lu Chen’s move had shocked everyone, especially the five members of the Soul Slayer team. Initially, they had thought that their combat power as a team was considered to be very strong. However, when they saw Lu Chen’s move, their entire bodies went numb, and even their hands began to tremble. Even Liu Xin, the brain of the entire party, was momentarily absent-minded, almost causing problems for the entire party. Fortunately, the monsters they were facing were just as stunned as them. In fact, the spiritual impact they received was far more intense than those players! The monsters originally thought that Lu Chen would be the first to die. After all, no matter how they looked at it, five against one was a sure-win situation. At that time, they were even a little angry with their opponents. Why did they choose to fight more people instead of just fighting one person? If they did not have to face the Soul Slayer team and the others, they would not have fought so hard. Now, they thought that the monsters that Lu Chen was fighting were having the short end of the stick. They were actually killed in one move! At this moment, the bat that was lucky enough to be saved by the Ancient Panda also went numb. Originally, it had only retreated more than 100 meters. Seeing that Lu Chen had launched such a huge attack, and that three of its teammates had been turned into ashes, it suddenly flapped its wings and flew up into the sky. It was afraid that it would be caught in Lu Chen’s critical hit. The Ancient Panda had already been originally running with its life on the line. When it heard the explosion from the huge Blade God attack behind it, it was so scared that it immediately fell to the ground. In the end, it was the Luck Bonus that gave the Ancient Panda the ability to predict danger. If not for that, the five of them would have been wiped out in this wave. At the thought of this, the Ancient Panda trembled all over as well with the bat. He looked at Rollie, who was leisurely eating bamboo shoots behind Lu Chen, and actually felt envious. After becoming an undead, the senses and emotions in the Ancient Panda’s body had long since weakened. Now, such emotions have appeared. It was definitely incredible considering it was so overwhelming it began to feel emotions again. Even if it was dead, it would still be blessed by the heavens. Therefore, the Ancient Panda’s intelligence did not diminish much. However, upon experiencing this destructive power, even an experienced creature like the Ancient Panda was scared to death. That was because other than the two existences that had fallen a few hundred years ago, no one else had shown such power. However, how could this Lu Chen compare to such a heaven-defying existence? Those two had already far surpassed the realm of mortals. Lu Chen was clearly only at the same level as him, so how could he have such great combat power? In an instant, anxiety, fear, confusion, and countless other emotions interweaved in the Ancient Panda’s mind. There were only two emotions in the bat’s mind that were hovering high in the sky. The first one was to immediately fight Lu Chen. The second one was to run away knowing how strong Lu Chen is. The bat’s mind seemed to have two little bats fighting non-stop. Neither could convince the other, neither could win the other. For a moment, the bat actually circled many times in the air, not knowing what to do. Just as the bat was hesitating, the panda had already made up its mind. At this moment, fear had already overcome its mind to complete the mission. Without saying anything, the panda ran forward with no plan! What was the point of all this? Ancient Panda’s had never been known for their speed. Lu Chen stomped on the ground with all his might, and a faint hole appeared on the hard ground! In the next second, Lu Chen disappeared from where he was and suddenly appeared dozens of meters away! At this moment, the Ancient Panda running at full speed could be said to be like a turtle in Lu Chen’s eyes. In just a few seconds, the remains of the Ancient Panda were leveled! When Lu Chen ran in front of the Ancient Panda, the title above his head changed again. [Sword God: Your comprehension of the sword has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a sword-type weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow along with your level!] [Sword Intent: When you use a sword-type weapon, it will burst forth with sword intent, and your attack power will increase to 700%!] [Sword God’s State: Your attack swiftness will cause irreversible damage. Items damaged by the god of swords state can not be recovered. ] [Godly Speed: The speed of your sword attack is on a godly level. The attack interval will be greatly shortened. Attack speed has now increased by 800%. Limited to one attack once it reaches the speed limit. Immune to side effects. Lasts for one second.] One had to know that the power of the Sword God was much greater than the power of the Blade God. With just the attack power alone had increased by seven times. Moreover, the Sword God title would also bring a relatively high attack speed multiplier! Although Lu Chen’s current physical strength could not withstand the attack speed multiplier of the Sword God, just the sevenfold power alone was enough to kill the Ancient Panda in one go! The Ancient Panda did not notice Lu Chen’s arrival and continued to run forward. At this moment, Lu Chen’s sword had already slashed down! At this moment, the wind and clouds in the sky dispersed. Everything in the surroundings seemed to have turned silent. Like a whirlwind, all the fallen leaves in the vicinity were cut into two halves! Before the sword reached, the sword aura had moved first! A sword light with a majestic aura descended from the sky and suddenly chopped down on the Ancient Panda’s head! Lu Chen seemed to have seen millions of red numbers appearing on the Ancient Panda’s head! [Ding! The Ancient Panda has received Heaven’s great fortune. It is immune to this attack and has returned 50% of the backlash!] What surprised him was that his sword was actually bounced back! It seemed that the Ancient Panda’s body was completely unharmed! One had to know that Lu Chen’s attack was give by the millions Even if it was a 50% rebound attack, it was still enough to instantly kill Lu Chen. Although Lu Chen’s defense was moderate, compared to his attack power, it did not sum to much! F*ck! This time, Lu Chen was screwed! Lu Chen also never thought that the Luck Bonus could be so awesome to such an extent. Even though the monster was dead, the God of Fortune was still protecting the Ancient Panda. However, Lu Chen had no time to overthink this! Without any hesitation, he directly raised his Shield God title. The next moment, the tens of millions of attack power that he had just given was directly used on himself! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen’s attack power was too powerful. Even with 50% of the backlash, he still had a total of 5,000,000 attack power. Even though the attack was weakened by 90% by the Shield God, it still had a damage of 500,000 points. In an instant, Lu Chen’s HP bar was reduced to zero! Following that, Lan Weiwei’s HP bar was reduced to zero as well! Furthermore, Little Golden Dragon’s HP was also reduced by nearly half! This time, Little Golden Dragon’s face turned pale with fright! If it was not for Lu Chen’s Shield God’s effect, he might have also lost his cool this time! This time, everyone’s hearts turned cold. How were they supposed to fight such a person? This skill was awesome! At this moment, Rollie, who was at the side, suddenly stopped, and his chubby body jumped. [Ding! Rollie has activated the Luck Bonus skill, and will be immune to all damage received by the owner and pets!] This time, not to mention the others, even Lu Chen was in a bad state. Was Rollie’s luck really that amazing? So much so that even in duels this little fellow would not be affected? However, this duel had given Lu Chen some confidence. Since he would not be at a disadvantage in front of the opponent’s skills, then he did not need to worry about these menial things! It was an undead Ancient Panda against another Ancient Panda! Immediately after, Lu Chen looked at the undead Ancient Panda that had just run not far away and rushed over again. The title of Sword God instantly soared again! Lu Chen did not believe that this fellow could achieve an attack immunity effect consecutively. If it was a matter of luck, Lu Chen would consider his luck to be fair. After all, he had the help of Rollie, another Ancient Panda, and also the help of the Undead title. Even if it was just the amount of HP he would lose, Little Golden Dragon was still there. His HP bar had been emptied, and the Little Golden Dragon’s HP bar could tank a few more damage! After all, as long as he activated the Shield God title at any time, the damage received by his attacks would be reduced by 90%. If Little Golden Dragon knew that Lu Chen was thinking this way, he did not know how much the area of psychological trauma would be. Thinking of this, Lu Chen suddenly exploded a dash from his spot. In less than three seconds, he was once again next to the Ancient Panda. Under the title of Sword God, Lu Chen’s Sword Intent strike was once again unleashed. With the addition of 20 attacks per second, his attack speed instantly increased to over ten million! However, the next scene that left Lu Chen dumbfounded appeared. The Ancient Panda, seeing that it could not escape, actually stopped in its tracks, turned its head and knelt down towards Lu Chen with a plop! Seeing this scene, Lu Chen was stunned. He never thought that this fellow would do such a thing. If it was any other monster, it would rather die than beg for mercy, after all, this was the equivalent of a human online game world. No monster would take the initiative to beg for mercy. Even if their intelligence was slightly higher, they would still try their best to dodge attacks. At most, they would just admit defeat. It was the first time Lu Chen had seen a creature kneel down and beg for mercy. Lu Chen hurriedly tilted the sword in his hand to one side and unleashed a stored-up attack, shooting directly at another angle! In an instant, a sword aura?that was a thousand meters long, flew through the air. Along the way, everything that stood in front of the sword aura was destroyed! Trees, leaves, flowers, and everything else were instantly cut into two halves. Even the cross section was as smooth as a baby’s bottom! Liu Changping, who was originally dodging many things, kept slashing on, constantly grinding the Ancient Ash Wolf King’s HP down to one-tenth! -1,729! -1,394! -1,294! -3,920,46! “F*ck!” When Liu Changping saw the monster’s HP bar drop by hundreds of thousands, he jumped up! That was amazing! However, in the next moment, a few strands of hair floated down from the top of his head! At the same time, a thick shadow appeared beside him. It was over a thousand meters long and its depth was unknown! Following that, the bones that were originally connected together suddenly collapsed and scattered all over the ground! Today, he had seen many strange things. This Ancient Panda continued to kneel toward Lu Chen. At the same time, it made some very unclear sounds. It was clearly not a human language. How could Lu Chen understand it? He waved at Rollie who was in the distance to come over. Rollie, who was originally enjoying his meal, suddenly ran over unwillingly. As expected, they were of the same species. The moment Rollie came over, he started chatting enthusiastically with this monster. After chatting for a long while, Rollie turned his head towards Lu Chen again and started to share the conversation. As Lu Chen’s pet, Rollie had a telepathic connection with Lu Chen. Naturally, Lu Chen could understand what he meant. The general meaning was that this Ancient Panda was willing to give its luck in exchange for its life. Lu Chen was a little puzzled. This was the first time he heard that luck could be transferred. He said to Rollie, “If we kill him, not only will we be able to seize his luck, we will also be able to obtain his bloodline power. Wouldn’t that be better?” After hearing Lu Chen’s explanation, Rollie’s body slightly paused. Initially, he was still a little excited because he could obtain the luck of the Ancient Panda. He did not expect that in the time it took to turn his head… Lu Chen had already thought of getting everything he wanted. As expected, there were no multiple choice questions in the adult world. Lu Chen was a greedy human being. Rollie liked it very much. At the thought of this, Rollie immediately turned his head and placed his hands on his hips. He spoke to the Ancient Panda in a concise manner. The Ancient Panda-like body trembled. The originally loose bones seemed as though it was about to be shaken open. He hurriedly said a bunch of words to Lu Chen and translated them again. There was a hint of disappointment in Rollie’s eyes. He said, “The Ancient Panda said that if you kill him, you won’t be able to obtain the fate. The fate can only be transferred by the other party. Otherwise, there’s no other way to get it.” Lu Chen’s eyes turned slightly as he understood. He immediately asked again, “Based on what you said, why is it that Rollie’s level is not as high as yours, but he can completely cancel out your backlash attack? “After we were attacked by you just now, my combat strength was not affected at all because of Rollie’s immunity.” The Ancient Panda’s eyes paused for a moment, and its gaze landed directly on Lu Chen. As expected, he discovered that Lu Chen was almost at full health! After the backlash of the attack, Lu Chen would have definitely died. How could this be? His empty eyes seemed to be filled with disbelief. Then, he sniffed his nose a few times at Rollie before the hollowed out skeleton eyes showed signs of disbelief! The undead Ancient Panda nose kept twitching, trying to smell Rollie’s scent. On the other hand, Rollie looked at the undead and moved to the side with a look of disgust. Following that, the undead Ancient Panda looked shocked with an unbelievable pious look. Finally, it muttered something to itself. Then, Rollie repeated what the undead Ancient Panda had said, “He said it was because my bloodline purity is higher than his. “Therefore, under the suppression of the bloodline, the purity of the bloodline increases Heaven’s blessing.” In other words, under the blessing, Rollie’s purity was much higher than the undead Ancient Panda. The most obvious manifestation of this logic was that after the undead Ancient Panda was attacked, its backlash would affect Lu Chen and then transfer to Rollie. Not only did Rollie reflect the damage that it received, it was also immune to the damage that the owner received. In other words, Rollie’s level of luck was even higher than that of the undead Ancient Panda. Only Lu Chen knew why Rollie’s bloodline had become so strong. It was because he had found a large number of dead monsters’ bones and treasures in Little Golden Dragon’s lair. He had continuously refined and condensed them, condensing the bloodline of the Ancient Iron Beast. After transforming it into the bloodline of the Ancient Iron Beast, Rollie had successfully absorbed it to become stronger. In comparison to what Lu Chen did, the remains of the Ancient Panda did not seem to have much use. Because the things that Lu Chen casually extracted were purer than the undead Ancient Panda. When he thought of this, Lu Chen looked at the Ancient Panda with a kind gaze. He decided to do it anyway, for the sake of the undead Ancient Panda. When the undead Ancient Panda saw that Lu Chen had agreed to let it go, it immediately bowed to Lu Chen many times. Then, it stood up and pointed at the other Ancient Panda, Rollie. At the same time, Rollie also extended its finger. When their fingers were connected, there was actually a faint golden substance flowing within the undead Ancient Panda’s body. That golden substance filled every corner of the undead Ancient Panda’s body. Following that, it gradually purified and formed many material-like silk threads that rolled and flowed towards Rollie’s finger; it was then gradually transmitted to Rollie’s body. One could see that Rollie’s body had clearly grown in size. Rays of golden light that were like silk threads slowly appeared on his body as well. The golden light on Rollie’s body was absorbing the nutrients from the remains of the undead Ancient Panda. After that, it gradually became stronger and thicker. Only Lu Chen could see this scene. In the eyes of others, Rollie’s body had only grown a little bigger. He seemed to have become rounder and his fur had become brighter. However, his fangs and claws seemed to have become shorter. In general, the characteristics of a beast were gradually decreasing. The more he looked at it, the more adorable he became. The more he looked at it, the more he looked like a mascot. Clearly, this was a change of fortune bestowed by the heavens. Having the favor of the Heaven’s did not require one’s own combat strength to be strong. Instead, it required the favor of others. To a certain extent, the friendliness of others was also a kind of luck enhancement. This was just like how humans were good-looking. People who were cute were usually more popular. It was easier for them to succeed in doing things. It was easier for them to get help from others. It was also very rare for them to incur the hostility of others. In contrast to Rollie, the undead Ancient Panda was becoming more and more ferocious and terrifying due to the circulation and teleportation of the golden substance in its body. Its original temperament was not like other monsters. The skeleton was as sinister as a main boss. However, at this moment, after the exchange of the golden substance was completed, it had become no different from other monsters. What could be seen with the naked eye was that the ghost fire that had always been bright in the hollow eye sockets of the Ancient Panda had also started to flicker. It was as if his consciousness had been reduced by half. His expression began to change. At times, he begged for mercy. At other times, his eyes were filled with ferocity. Fortunately, even though he had sent his Heaven’s blessing to Rollie, there was still a trace of reason that forcefully suppressed his savage side. He had been mumbling all along, but at this moment, he did not dare to say a single word. He was afraid that he would not be able to suppress the killing intent and primitive bestiality in his body and attack Lu Chen. He then sent all of his luck to Rollie. The next second, he immediately ran into the depths of the Mass Grave without looking back. It had to be said that the undead Ancient Panda was indeed a creature favored by the Heavens and Earth. Even at this stage of the game, even though he had completely abandoned his providence skill, he was still able to retain some of his remaining rationality, just this alone was already considered stronger than the other silver bosses. Seeing the undead Ancient Panda frantically running toward the depths of the Mass Grave, Lu Chen could take advantage of the moment when the other party was escaping to kill it and use it to extract more bloodline power. One had to know that Lu Chen’s Bow God title was extremely powerful. [Shattered Stars: You can shoot a powerful arrow that ignores all the defense of the target, and it will definitely land a critical hit, causing 10 times the penetrating damage!] This critical hit was not something that the undead Ancient Panda could withstand. However, Lu Chen did not do it. After all, he had promised to let it go. However, Lu Chen did not expect that even if the monster died, its survival instinct would still exist. For example… the bat that was hovering above his head. In this way, there was only one of the five monsters left on Lu Chen’s side. The only remaining silver bat was hovering high above. This time, the Ancient Panda ran too fast. He did not have the time to react at all, nor did he have the time to tell the bat to run quickly. Therefore, this bat monster was obediently hovering in the sky. The bat was already deep in self-doubt and confusion. In addition, when he saw the Ancient Panda actually kneel on the ground without saying a word and then directly escape, he was even more confused. It looked very ridiculous. He did not understand what had happened. The undead Ancient Panda, an existence of a higher level than himself, had run away with its tail between its legs. The other monsters on the ground were desperately fighting, and he was the only one left on this side. This was very ridiculous! How was the bat going to defeat Lu Chen off ground! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The bat flying in the air was completely dumbfounded. Lu Chen was the first to be so powerful that even a silver boss would be terrified. No, to be precise, it was the third time it happened. That was because the two from a few hundred years ago were even more terrifying. Back then, those two heaven-defying existences caused a stir in the Mass Grave as well. The aura of that master and servant was simply too shocking, causing the entire Mass Grave to freeze. As soon as the Divine Dragon landed, the dragon breath alone made all the monsters not dare to move, and they lay on the Mass Grave to submit. They did not even dare to breathe loudly, but of course, these monsters did not breathe at all as they were dead. The master of the Divine Dragon was even more powerful. Although his life was on the verge of death, his aura had long been undetectable. Even in this state, he still stepped on the Divine Dragon’s head the moment he appeared. The Dragon did not complain at all, as if he was deeply proud of it. From all these, it was clear that even if that person was someone of power. Stepping on a dragon and flying in the face of a dragon, even an immortal would not have such an ostentation. However, it did not seem like the time to reminisce about those days. The bat in the sky flapped its wings a few times, and its wings flew up another hundred meters. With this flapping, it felt slightly more at ease. At this moment, it was already several hundred meters above the ground. At such a distance, it was impossible for players to attack, right? However, the next scene made the bat’s eyes turn completely green. The Blade God and Sword God above this kid’s head instantly disappeared, replaced by a new golden title. That’s right, it was a new golden title that appeared above Lu Chen’s head. Bow God! Once this title appeared, the bat’s entire body went numb. What it thought about came true! That was just sh*t luck! Moreover, why did this fellow seem to have no weaknesses? His HP was so high, and he even had three top-tier pets. The Ancient Panda that had just escaped seemed less miserable than this bat now. Not only did it not manage to kill Lu Chen with one of its ultimate skills, but it even had to give up its luck. Yet, the bat’s fate seemed worse. This Lu Chen was simply too god-like. He could kill three silver bosses with one strike. He could also use Blade God’s single target attack to unleash an extremely frightening combat power. When Lu Chen slashed out with his sword just now, the bat understood that even an ordinary gold boss would not be a match for him! It was already amazing that he was invincible in close combat. If it were any other player, they would have bragged about it for the rest of their lives. However, this Lu Chen seemed to have an endless number of tricks up his sleeve. Who would have thought that Lu Chen would have a long-range Bow God title as well! He was not an ordinary archer, he was a Bow God! This was the highest level of proficiency in the game! At this moment, the bat only felt despair and pain as it desperately flew higher into the sky. Fortunately, the bat was in spirit form, so the body was very light and could float very fast. If this bat had things like muscle and meat on it, it would have died long ago. However, this bat was so afraid that it used a lot of strength to flap its wings. Lu Chen watched as the wind generated by the flaps blew away the edge of its wings. It did not know that all its efforts were in vain. Lu Chen’s title of Bow God meant that as long as he set a target, he would definitely hit it. [Bow God: Your understanding of bows has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a bow-type weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with your level!] [Accurate Arrow: When you use a bow-type weapon, your attack is set to hit!] [Armor Breaker: When you use a bow and arrow type weapon to attack, you will dispel 90% of the target’s armor!] [Seven Star Succession: You can shoot seven arrows at once, and your attack power will be increased by 500%!] [Shattered Stars: You can shoot a powerful arrow that ignores all the defense of the target, and it will definitely land a critical hit, causing 10 times the penetrating damage!] Lu Chen reached into his backpack and took out a bow and arrow. Then, he pulled the bow and an arrow made of golden light immediately appeared on the bow. The golden light condensed into a solid golden arrow in an instant. Lu Chen raised the bow and aimed at the bat. He exerted strength in both his arms and pulled the bow back to its full size. Then, he suddenly let go! The golden arrow broke through the air at lightning speed. In almost an instant, it had reached a height that no one could see. The bat was flying too high. No one could see if the arrow had hit or not, and no one knew where the bat was. Even Lu Chen could not track the monster with his eyesight anymore when it rushed to a higher altitude. However, he believed in the power of the Bow God title. This time, Lu Chen used his Seven Star Succession skill. Each of the seven arrows would hit the monster with a 500% drop of HP! At this level, it could be said that the bat would definitely die! As long as Lu Chen kept thinking about the target monster, the Bow God’s arrows would definitely hit the monster. No matter how the bat tried, it would not be able to escape! Indeed, in less than three seconds, a sharp whistle came from the sky! -394,300! The first arrow had hit the target! In front of everyone, a critical hit immediately appeared! However, immediately after, everyone’s heads began to feel dizzy, as if someone had struck the back of their heads with a heavy hammer! To be exact, they had received a sound wave attack. When this sound wave attack entered everyone’s ears, everyone’s ears rang. Their minds seemed to be in a trance, and all their determination began to ripple. Lu Chen was no exception. The bat that was originally running away was unable to hold on at that moment. Lu Chen panicked as to what went wrong. Logically speaking, when the seven arrows were shot out, close to three million critical hits would explode on the bat’s body. Not to mention the bat, even Little Golden Dragon would have to kneel to the power! Now, Lu Chen’s mind was affected, and there was no way to regain his senses to lock onto the bat. If that were the case, the bat might actually be able to escape. -394,300! -394,300! As expected, after two more red dots appeared in the sky, no more red dots appeared. At the same time, there was no system notification that he had killed the enemy. The bat managed to escape! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen could only blame himself for being careless. After all, bats in the main world also had sonar abilities. That was why they were able to fly freely in the dark cave without injuring themselves. It was not strange that the bat that had just flown away had such an ability, but how did Lu Chen get this careless? With his feet on the ground, he suddenly leaped up to a height of 100 meters. Then, the Exoskeleton Wings on his back suddenly spread out to a length of more than four meters. Everyone on the ground saw a figure that looked like a god rising from the ground as that figure soared into the sky. Then, he spread out his wings. He looked like an angel in western mythology, giving people a sense of inferiority. Then, the wings on Lu Chen’s back suddenly rose up, and with a fierce flap, his entire body rose up nearly a hundred meters into the air again! His speed was so fast that even some birds in the main world could not catch up to him! However, all Lu Chen could do was glide in this equipment. In the end, it was still a replica of wings that did not have full functions. Utilizing the air around him and getting a height advantage was the best he could do. At this moment, he could already see the bat. In the vast sky, it was as if there was only a small black dot left. There was no way for him to catch up to the bat that was escaping higher into the sky. The bat that was thousands of meters high in the sky was panicking. It heard the sound of something breaking through the air and hurriedly turned its head back. Seeing that Lu Chen had not caught up to it, it let out a long sigh. It had finally survived… At this thought, it turned its head and continued flying. It wanted to tell the two existences that there was some abnormal news here! However, a thousand meters behind it, a person with two wings on his body slowly drew his bow again… Shattered Star! This arrow, which had nearly 800,000 combat power, directly broke through the clouds and shot into the sky! Along the way, it faintly carried a violent tornado that swept everything in its way. Even the clouds in the sky were forcefully stirred into a big hole by the spinning arrow! The bat suddenly felt the sharpness and wanted to let out another long howl! It was about to make a turn. In front of this long howl, Lu Chen was indeed slightly absent-minded and almost lost his balance. His arrows had also lost the ability to track it. However, it was no longer important! Although the bat could interfere with Lu Chen’s mind, it had no time to make a turn! The body was blasted into pieces by the arrow that was charging straight ahead! -643,921! With that one hit, the bat died! In front of everyone’s eyes, the bat in the sky disappeared in an instant. Its spirit body fell to the ground and dropped several items. The members of the Dragon Team on the ground were all stunned. Even Little Golden Dragon swallowed hard. However, Lu Chen only sighed in his heart. If it was not for the Bow God title, he would have almost let this fellow escape! It seemed that he would have to obtain that gold Exoskeleton Wingsuit if he had the chance in the future. Another thought arose in Lu Chen’s mind. He only hoped that the foreign expert would one day seek him, so that he would not feel guilty for snatching the other party’s gold equipment. … At this moment, a golden-haired, blue-eyed top-tier expert far away from Beautiful Country was fighting a gold boss. For some reason, his entire body suddenly shivered, and the gold equipment on his back trembled slightly. This expert had almost faltered in his step. He rubbed his nose, his face filled with confusion. He did not understand what had happened… Following which, he continued to focus on facing the gold boss before him. … Lu Chen spread his wings and maintained his gliding posture. He drew a beautiful arc in the air and rapidly dived to the ground. Following which, he began to slow down once more, landing steadily. This series of maneuvers could be said to be extremely smooth. Not only was Lu Chen satisfied, even Tang Xiaoqing’s eyes were shining with awe. It was obvious that she was also very curious about this suit. By the time Lu Chen landed, all the monsters had already been killed. It was not because the others had moved faster, but because Lu Chen’s actions had indeed frightened the monsters away. Some of them did not even have time to react before the warriors saw an opportunity to kill them with a single slash. Several tens of thousands or even hundreds of thousands of damage suddenly appeared in the sky. After all, those who were able to remain in the Mass Grave at this moment were all experts. They all had some trump cards to win. The first reaction of some of the clever monsters was not to fight, but to turn around and run. The warriors saw it as a chance to strike. Taking advantage of the monsters escaping, the warriors sped up their attack instead. In this way, the progress of these monsters’ death was even faster. Although Lu Chen did not directly participate in their battle, it was precisely because of Lu Chen’s appearance that the entire battle process sped up and reached a quick conclusion. The others were all very happy, except for Liu Changping. Liu Changping had been sulking all this time because he had only managed to grind down 10% of its HP with great difficulty. In the end, Lu Chen had only used one move to kill it. This move had not originally been an attack on the Ancient Ash Wolf King. It had only accidentally injured it because it had intentionally missed the target. Liu Changping felt a little depressed. To be exact, he felt a little guilty. Back then, he was the team leader of the Dragon Team, and Lu Chen was still in high school. He did not expect that in just a few months time, Lu Chen’s combat power was already so much higher than his. Most importantly, Lu Chen’s unintentional action also took away the experience points that originally belonged to him. Lu Chen seemed to see the dejected look on Liu Changping’s face, so he hurriedly came over and explained with a smile, “Sorry, I didn’t mean to do that on purpose.” As soon as Lu Chen said this, Liu Changping’s face darkened even further. He felt as if he had been humiliated. Even the faces of the members of the Soul Slaying team beside him twitched slightly. Even the resourceful and calm Liu Xin, who was about to push her glasses up, stopped in her tracks. Lu Chen actually said that he did not do it on purpose! He had so many people fighting seriously for more than an hour, nearly two hours, before he managed to reduce these monsters to only half of their health within a few minutes. Especially Liu Changping, who had worked so hard but to no avail. He had killed them with a casual move, yet he still said that it was not on purpose. Where was the logic in this? Was he trying to insult them? “Take the equipment dropped by this Ancient Ash Wolf King for yourself.” The last sentence that Lu Chen said immediately made Liu Changping’s eyes light up. Liu Changping’s dissatisfaction had completely disappeared! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation When Liu Changping heard that the Ancient Ash Wolf King’s equipment belonged to him, he was overjoyed. After all, a silver boss would drop silver equipment or a decent skill at the very least. Plus, it was very likely that this equipment would be like Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei, who would receive moonlight’s support. Moreover, it would also have a certain HP recovery effect. Liu Changping had been envious of Lu Chen’s buff for a long time. Even if he could not obtain moonlight’s support skills, it would still be quite good if he could obtain other offensive equipment or skills. His efforts had paid out in the end. Thinking of this, Liu Changping’s previously unhappy expression changed. The corners of his mouth almost reached the back of his head, he hurriedly said to Lu Chen, “It’s alright, it’s alright. You were helping me. You did see that I almost killed the boss right?” Liu Changping’s forceful attempt to save his dignity left everyone speechless. No one denied his strength, nor his own battle speed. Even Liu Yuan would not use such a conservative method like him to prove something. However, it was not Liu Changping’s fault, because he was different from the members of the Soul Slayer Team, he did not want to lose out. However, Liu Changping and Liu Yuan’s strength were much lower. Their battle experience could not be compared to the Soul Slayer Team. In addition, Liu Yuan was not an ordinary person. Whether it was her talent or her background, they were far superior to Liu Changping. It could be said that in comparison, Liu Changping was on the short end of the stick in every situation. However, through his own hard work, step by step, he reached the peak and reached his current position. His steadiness was precisely the reason why he could survive through countless storms, even mountains of knives and seas of fire. It was precisely because of this characteristic of Liu Changping that he became the leader of the Dragon Team and was able to command so many members of the Dragon Team. It was precisely because of his existence that the casualty rate of the Dragon Team had reached an extremely low level. Even Lu Chen had thought that if he could have more experts under him in the future, then handing him over to Liu Changping as the commander would definitely be a pretty good choice. Next, it was time to harvest their loot. Everyone happily searched for equipment or skills among the corpses in the Mass Grave. Among them, the Soul Slayer Team was not easy to deal with because the two silver bosses had only dropped four pieces of equipment, but there were five people in the entire party. However, they already had high-level equipment. They had been fighting together for many years, so they would not let such a small matter ruin their relationship. Equipment was the most important thing for them. Whoever needed it would just take it. After all, there would be battles in the future, so it would be easy to make up for it. Liu Yuan was also counting her gains. The skill that Liu Yuan had obtained was Giant Scorpion’s Poison. This skill came from the scorpion’s tail sting. With this skill, Liu Yuan could bring the poison to any position on her body. Even if she just met an enemy, she could deal a fatal attack on them. When facing a low-level opponent, she could directly poison them to death. Even if she met a high-level opponent or an opponent with strong defense, she would at least get the chance to lower their HP bit by bit. At the same time, this skill also had a range attack. It could poison enemies within a 500 kilometer radius! This range was much larger than Lu Chen’s attack. One had to know that Lu Chen’s attack range was only 100 meters. It could be used in small-scale battles. Liu Yuan’s skill was definitely a war-type weapon. It was also effective in the face of hundreds of thousands of national level battles. With the numbing effect of the poison and the help of losing HP, the more enemies came, the greater the burden. Once this skill is used on the battlefield, it would definitely be a national treasure that would determine the direction of the war. The last person who had just received a silver reward, Liu Changping, was smiling even more abnormally. It was as if he had turned from a leader of the Dragon Team into a wretched man. Even Lu Chen and the Soul Slayer Team felt wretched, let alone Liu Yuan. Even Rollie and Little Golden Dragon could not help but shrink back, afraid that Liu Changping would do something to them. For a moment, everyone retreated 10 meters. However, Liu Changping did not know what had happened. He was ecstatic because he had obtained the thing he wanted the most — Mutated Moonlight. It was a continuous HP regeneration skill! Simply put, Liu Changping had obtained a simple basic HP regeneration skill, which allowed his HP bar to continuously grow. The basic level refers to a monster’s basic level. After all, a monster’s HP bar was extremely high. Therefore, this basic HP regeneration skill was like a heaven-defying item to a human player. If Liu Changping continued to farm monsters below silver rank, Liu Changping would not even need to defend himself. His HP would automatically recover at all times. If he were to fight a silver boss, he would also continuously recover his HP, increasing his combat endurance by several times. If he really encountered a gold boss again.. Then it was time to die, there was no chance of survival for that one. After all, a casual attack from a gold boss would not give him time to recover at all. It would directly kill him, sending him back to the starting point all over again. However, this was already a pleasant surprise for Liu Changping. After all, Liu Changping’s combat style was steady. In any case, his combat style was to grind his HP. This was, one could imagine how hard it would be now to defeat him. Perhaps this skill was not as powerful as Blade God or Sword God, but it was definitely the most suitable skill for Liu Changping. Moreover, it was already incredible that a mere silver boss could obtain such a powerful skill. Back then, Lu Chen had been trapped in the cave for a thousand years to obtain so many top-tier titles! Moreover, there was no such thing as the most powerful weapon in the world, only the most suitable weapon. It could be said that Liu Changping had chosen a stable path. This meant that he was a warrior that developed in all aspects. Whether it was attack power, sub-speed, or defense, he had no weaknesses, in other words, he was a well-rounded warrior. A weaker version of Lu Chen. Such a person could be a lean mean killing machine on the battlefield. If you asked him to lead, he could fight. If you asked him to protect everyone, he could protect everyone. If you asked him to move like an assassin, he could handle it. There was no such thing as having weaknesses. Such a warrior was destined to be suitable for both group battles and solo missions. He was definitely an expert among experts. It could be said that based on Liu Changping’s current speed, he would definitely be immeasurable in the Second World! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation If the main world merged with the Second World one day, Liu Changping would definitely become an expert. Logically speaking, a Dragon Team member like Liu Changping could be the pillar of support for the Dragon Country. At this moment, Lu Chen was the one who had gained the most. After all, he had single-handedly killed five silver bosses. Although he had given one of them to Liu Changping, the other three were enough for him. His level had risen four levels in a row, reaching level 39. At this moment, even Little Golden Dragon was only level 40. He had almost caught up with his pet. Lu Chen’s rapid progress this time could be said to have given Little Golden Dragon a sense of crisis. Originally, he had thought that he was the most powerful presence in the team. However, Lu Chen had killed three silver bosss in a row today, and he had launched several attacks that had frightened him. At that time, he had realized that he was no match for Lu Chen. Fortunately, he was still able to suppress Lu Chen with his level, which gave him some psychological comfort. However, at this moment, the little bit of psychological comfort he had left was dwindling. He used to be so strong back then, and Lu Chen was only a little over level 30. Now, in a flash, he was almost as strong as him. He could not accept it. The others did not have any reaction, because they were already used to Lu Chen’s overpowering power. For him, leveling up and fighting monsters was as easy as eating and drinking. If one day Lu Chen could not fight any monsters and would die in a second, everyone would find it incredible. It must be known that Lu Chen had been the ceiling of combat power since the beginning. At least in the Dragon Country, he was the absolute upper limit of combat power. Now, not only was he the benchmark of utmost power, his level was about to be just the same. They even wondered if anyone would ever surpass him. However, they knew that such a situation was unlikely to happen. An existence like Lu Chen was not someone that could be easily surpassed. Although they had heard that some people from Beauty Country had obtained gold Exoskeleton Wingsuit equipment, they were extremely confident in Lu Chen. Everyone believed that Lu Chen would definitely not be surpassed. Right now, the others were most concerned about how much good equipment Lu Chen and the other three silver bosses would drop. A white tiger’s corpse. A bear’s corpse. The equipment dropped by the bat that had died with them were all here. Only the bat that had been shot to death by Lu Chen’s arrow did not provide any equipment. However, no one would go forward to take a look because these were Lu Chen’s personal items. Who would dare to touch Lu Chen’s items? They were not crazy! No one wanted to be misunderstood by Lu Chen. For a moment, the members of the Soul Slayer Team and Liu Changping all took a few steps back consciously. At this time, Liu Changping suddenly realized that everyone seemed to be very far away from him. This made him somewhat puzzled, he did not know what had happened. However, taking advantage of the fact that everyone was not paying attention, he directly took a detour and entered the forest at the side. As everyone was tacitly keeping a distance from those treasures, a thin and small figure directly scuttled out, walked into those treasures, and directly began to pick and choose. Everyone’s hearts tightened at first, then they realized that this person was actually Tang Xiaoqing, and Lu Chen had no intention of stopping her at all. This was because Tang Xiaoqing had a very good relationship with him. Even if Tang Xiaoqing asked him to give her a piece, Lu Chen would not have any objections. Moreover, Tang Xiaoqing had the backing of the Tang family, an ancient martial arts aristocratic family. As she searched for treasures in the bones, she frowned and complained. “This silver Heaven-cleaving Sword doesn’t seem like much. That silver Flame Blade looks very ordinary as well...;” Then, she tossed it aside as if it was trash. Liu Yuan walked forward sensibly and picked up the weapons and equipment that were thrown out. The members of the Soul Slayer Team sucked in a breath of cold air and looked at each other. As expected of the little princess of the Tang family, she was rich and overbearing! How dare she treat this kind of silver equipment as trash? Especially when they looked carefully at the two weapons being thrown out, they were even more envious. [Heaven-cleaving Sword: Silver equipment, able to deal 10,000 damage to the enemy. At the same time, there is a certain chance to trigger a five-fold critical strike!] [Remark: There is an extremely low probability of triggering a Spatial Ceave. By using Spatial Cleave, the enemy will be dismembered and maimed, weakening the enemy’s attack power!] Everyone was envious. If it was not for Lu Chen being too powerful and a hero of the Dragon Country, anyone would have been tempted to snatch it away from him. This was especially so for the Soul Slayer Team. Although they were heroes of the Dragon Country, the warriors who had been in the war zone all year round had seen too many life and death situations. To them, the difference between right and wrong was not that big. Only children were separated into right and wrong, while adults only talked about the pros and cons. This was especially true for this person who possessed the spatial separation skill. If he were to come to the main world to fight, his combat strength would definitely be off the charts. Now,?everyone’s defensive strength has been greatly increased after receiving the support of the second world. There were even quite a number of people who had obtained treasures. For example, Xiao Bai had the Sky-piercing Mirror in his hands back then. The existence of such a treasure could withstand a great degree of attack. Even Lu Chen’s explosive attack back then could do nothing to him. However, it would be different if Lu Chen had the Heaven-cleaving Sword. No matter how strong the defense of the other party’s treasure was, it could only weaken and offset the attack. However, this sword actually had traces of the power of spatial laws. This kind of weapon could absolutely ignore the defense and cause real damage! If not for the fact that the probability of triggering Spatial Cleave was really too low, this equipment would probably be at least a legendary equipment! They were a little excited, and at the same time, their gazes were fixed on the second equipment. When they looked at the second Flame Blade they suddenly felt as if their souls were being burned. The pain was unbearable! This treasure actually had a magic attack attached to it! This was discovered from the bear’s body. When the bear was attacking Lu Chen back then, sometimes, it did not even touch Lu Chen’s body but he would lose some HP. At that time, Lu Chen had already felt that something was wrong. Moreover, the amount of HP lost was huge, and he would even continue to lose HP. It could be said that 90% of the damage that Lu Chen received was because of that bear! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation When Lu Chen was fighting the five monsters, the other monsters only needed to defend themselves or dodge the bear’s attacks. However, when Lu Chen was fighting the bear, he could feel the heat just by getting close to it. When Lu Chen was attacked by the bear, not only would the bear’s sharp claws hurt him, but there would also be burn marks that were left. This silver boss had an additional AOE attack as well. This weapon was definitely suitable for him. [Raging Flame Blade: Silver equipment. When using Raging Flame Blade, the attack range will automatically increase by tenfold. At the same time, an unknown flame will be generated on the enemy who is attacked. The flame will burn the enemy for three seconds. The HP loss per second will be 5% to 100% of the attack power!] Ever since Lu Chen obtained the title of Blade God, Sword God, Bow God, and so on, he had never obtained any supporting weapons. Therefore, no matter what kind of attacks Lu Chen launched, he would always use the most common sword or use slightly better equipment. Even silver weapons did not drop. However, the appearance of the Heaven-cleaving Sword and the Raging Flame Blade had just made up for Lu Chen’s weakness. At this moment, he could finally improve his two most commonly used offensive skills by leaps and bounds. To Lu Chen, these two pieces of equipment were like adding wings to a tiger. Currently, he had obtained a piece of equipment from the leader of the Dark Union while he was in his Asura mode. Meanwhile, Lu Chen had also obtained the Heaven-cleaving Sword and the Raging Flame Blade while he was in Blade God and Sword God mode. As long as he had another bow and arrow to drop, it would definitely be perfect for Lu Chen. While he was still calculating what equipment he still needed, Tang Xiaoqing, who was in the distance, suddenly shouted happily at everyone, “There’s an Interspatial Ring here!” Tang Xiaoqing excitedly searched through the three piles of large corpse fragments repeatedly. A moment later, her eyes narrowed into crescents. She stood up and shouted to Lu Chen in the distance, “Look, there’s an Interspatial Ring inside!” As she spoke, she sent her consciousness into the Interspatial Ring. Her willow-like eyebrows furrowed slightly, and her mouth became a little flat. She complained, “This Interspatial Ring is so small. It’s only one cubic meter.” Then, she rolled her eyes and said with a smile, “Next time, I’ll give you my grandfather’s ring. His ring is two hundred cubic meters wide!” Hearing this, everyone’s mind exploded. It was already very good that this kind of thing could be dropped. Now it was being despised by a brat! As far as they knew, there had never been a single Interspatial Ring in the entire Dragon Country. However, they did not utter a single word. They did not even glance at each other. They just looked at the sky and did not make a single sound, as if they had not heard anything. They were well aware of the identity of this young miss. Of course, they could not afford to offend her. This was the youngest daughter of the Tang family’s patriarch, who was also the princess. If they were to offend such a person, they would really be in deep trouble. However, they had also thought that they had seen a lot of fraudulent families. However, this was the first time they had seen a fraudulent second-generation martial artist like Tang Xiaoqing. Seeing that Lu Chen was picking up equipment and sorting them out, the members of the Soul Slayer Team were a little envious. Suddenly, they looked at the equipment in their hands and felt a little uneasy. After all, even if they only had one silver piece of equipment, they would treat it as a treasure. However, Lu Chen’s side had so many that they could not even begin to count their two hands. One had to know that Tang Xiaoqing had helped Lu Chen pick up the equipment. However, even in the entire Dragon Country, there was no such thing as an Interspatial Ring. The use of an Interspatial Ring was amazing. A low-level Interspatial Ring could be used to store one’s personal luggage, swords, and weapons. Medium-level Interspatial Rings could even be used to carry all sorts of strange and large-scale equipment. Even in extremely harsh environments where humans could not survive, they could also be used to carry all sorts of dry rations and water. At that time, it would be the most convenient thing ever. No matter how many people fought together, there would not be any problems with logistics. In ancient times, the most feared thing for humans in war was the lack of food supplies. If there were large-scale Interspatial Rings in ancient times, it would no longer be a problem. Perhaps the territory of the Dragon Country could at least double. There was another point that Tang Xiaoqing was very clear about. If it was a high-level Interspatial Ring, then even living things could be put in, or even people could be put in, and then they could be taken away regardless of life or death, this was equivalent to a large-scale teleportation array. There was even a legend that said that a top-grade Interspatial Ring could not only include everything in the world, it could even deduce a small world based on the changes in its owner’s strength. At that time, the owner of the ring would be like a god. In that world, the owner of the Interspatial Ring would be the only true god in this world. In that space, it would be an invincible existence. This was similar to Lan Weiwei’s Frost Domain. In the Frost Domain, Lan Weiwei would have a great boost to her body, which would reduce her enemies movements to a certain extent. However, if it was in the space of the Interspatial Ring, then the owner would have been an absolutely invincible power. No matter how powerful their opponent was, it would be impossible for them to defeat the owner of the Interspatial Ring. Unless one’s strength was strong enough to shatter an entire world, otherwise, they would only be suppressed. However, not to mention Tang Xiaoqing, even Tang Xiaoqing’s father and even her family’s ancestors had never heard of those things, much less seen them with their own eyes. Perhaps that kind of Interspatial Ring only existed in legends. However, at the moment, for all the other soldiers, including Lu Chen, to be able to possess this one cubic meter Interspatial Ring was already very satisfying. This was especially so when they saw that this interspatial ring could automatically level up according to the treasures provided by its owner, or when it could be combined with other Interspatial Rings to level up. Everyone was even more envious. This skill indeed surprised Tang Xiaoqing a little. This was because although her family had an Interspatial Ring, it did not possess the devouring ability. This Second World was actually so powerful to have such an ability. The members of the Soul Slaying Team were already drooling from the sight. The five members of this team had spent two days and two nights fighting with great effort before finally killing so many monsters and two silver bosses. The five of them still had to fight for four pieces of equipment.. Looking at Lu Chen’s effort, he had already obtained three pieces of equipment. Translator: EndlessFantasy Translation | Editor: Endless Fantasy Translation Lu Chen not only had the three pieces of equipment in front of him, but the bat that had shot down from the sky also had top-tier equipment. It was just that no one knew where the equipment had gone. As everyone was counting their loot, Liu Changping had run out of the jungle. When he appeared in front of Lu Chen again, he was holding two treasures high in his hands. He looked at Lu Chen excitedly. “Lu Chen, look! I picked up the equipment that the bat dropped. There are two of them in total.” He was smart enough to see that there were quite a number of people here, but he did not reveal the two skills. Liu Changping was not just anyone. He was very smart. Not only did he have a good understanding of battle, but he also had a deep understanding of the world, otherwise, how could he hold on to his position as the leader? When it came to skills, the more hidden they were, the more intimidating they would be to others. The more powerful they were, the more they would be able to deal a fatal blow at a critical moment. This was also why many people liked to pretend to be wolves in sheep clothing. Once they were seen through by others, it would be very easy for others to target them. They would become the target of public criticism. Countless people would try their best to catch their weaknesses, then, they would kill you. Liu Changping deliberately did not mention these two skills of Lu Chen. It was precisely because there were too many people and too many eyes. As for what skills Lu Chen had, the fewer people knew, the better. Liu Changping ran to Lu Chen’s side and looked around. After making sure that no one was watching him, he handed the two skill scrolls to Lu Chen. The Soul Slayer Team was cursing at Liu Changping. After all, other than Lu Chen’s trusted aides and spiritual pets, only Liu Changping, Liu Yuan, and the Soul Slayer Team were left on the battlefield. Liu Yuan and everyone else could see that even if she was not Lu Chen’s woman, at least she had a lot of feelings for Lu Chen. It was obvious that she Was not going to be Lu Chen’s enemy. So, who were they guarding against now? The captain of the Soul Slayer Team had already cursed Liu Changping in his heart. This kid had clearly called them family back when he was in the Dragon Group. Why would he want to learn some skills from him to fight? In the end, he sold himself out in such a short time as a favor. However, Lu Chen was naturally not worried because he knew that these people of the Soul Slayer Team would most likely work with him in the future. Liu Changping leaned over to Lu Chen’s ear and said carefully, “Don’t worry, I won’t say anything even if it’s the higher ups! Lu Chen, you have to be careful The elder is already so old, he has a lot of thoughts. As for Liu Yuan..” After saying that, he glanced at Liu Yuan beside him. The expression on Liu Yuan’s face tilted. At times, she was shy and at other times, she was angry. It was obvious that she wanted to say something, but in the end, she did not say it out loud. In the end, she stomped her foot angrily and reached out to pinch Liu Changping’s arm. Liu Changping quickly dodged the pain and let out a cry. The two of them had a good relationship when they were in the Dragon Team. Lu Chen saw the mischievous look on the two of them and smiled without saying anything. They had just experienceda two-day and two-night battle. Such a battle was a torment for everyone, and it was also a great test for their bodies and minds. Under such circumstances, the battle had just ended, and everyone was in an extremely good mood after receiving so much equipment. At this moment, everyone looked like they were playing around, but in reality, Liu Changping’s actions were especially annoying. In reality, he was trying to calm everyone’s nerves and ease the tense atmosphere. It was his presence that allowed everyone to gradually relax and calm down. This calm also made everyone feel tired, including Lu Chen. Although he did not fight much this time, killing five silver bosses in such a short time had definitely taken a toll on him. The most tiring thing for him was having to take care of many people. He had always been guarding the nearby warriors, afraid that anything could happen to them. Fortunately, Lu Chen did not fail his mission. He had completed this mission perfectly. Not a single warrior on the battlefield had died. Moreover, their levels had risen by more than five levels. This was definitely a huge reward for everyone. Raising five levels in two days, if word got out...; Many people would be envious. After the battle, Lu Chen was a little tired, especially when he saw that so many warriors had gone back. Then, he looked at the others who had been fighting, and his eyes were filled with exhaustion. He said, “This battle ends here. The Mass Grave’s territory is still very large. We have to maintain enough energy to continue gaining experience here. Everyone, return to the main world and rest for a while.” Just now, the others had been maintaining their own state. Even though they had fought for so long and were already very tired, in order not to leave behind the impression that they were weak in battle...; Their mental state was so poor that they had to persevere, making themselves appear a hundred times more energetic. It was not until Lu Chen said that everyone could go back and rest that they finally removed their disguises. Their stimulant-like state gradually calmed down, and waves of sleepiness hit their heads. They nodded slightly, and after thanking Lu Chen, they chose to return to the main world. The others did the same. The next second, everyone’s consciousness appeared in the game pod again. The entire conference hall was densely packed with hundreds of game pods, neatly arranged on the floor of the conference room. One of them was particularly eye-catching. Because the other games were all black, only the other one was pink, and the person in this game cabin was precisely Tang Xiaoqing. This game pod was different from the others. Not only was the exterior painted with cherry blossom powder, but all the packaging in the game cabin was made of latex imported from abroad. Lying inside, the body seemed to be in a zero-gravity state. It was generally very comfortable, and no matter how long one lay there, one would not feel tired or stiff. In particular, there were some strange stones inside that could constantly nourish Tang Xiaoqing’s body. It could be said that this kind of cheat code was absolutely very useful for players. It could guarantee a player’s endurance i the second world. It must be known that how long a player could fight in the Second World depended not only on their spiritual power, but also on the comfort level of the environment in the main world. As for Tang Xiaoqing, her gaming pod was to ensure his own condition to the greatest extent. Translator: EndlessFantasy Translation Editor: EndlessFantasy Translation Therefore, in addition to Tang Xiaoqing not participating in any battles at all. She looked to be in the best condition. Lu Chen stood up and saw that the entire conference room was densely packed with Dragon Country warriors. Some of them were full of vitality and energy, while others were tired and even had bloodshot eyes. Clearly, no matter what their condition was, they had always been guarding the conference room and had not retreated. They had always been here. What they had to do was to ensure the absolute safety of Lu Chen and the others. As long as Lu Chen was still in the game, no matter how powerful the enemy came to attack, they would have to go through the countless forces of warriors first. In the Second World, Lu Chen had once protected them. In the main world, it was their turn to protect Lu Chen. The warriors had indeed preserved. The scene in front of him made Lu Chen very moved. At this moment, Lu Chen felt the warmth of a home he had never enjoyed before. One had to know that when Lu Chen was very young, his parents had already passed away. From then on, Lu Chen had always been working and studying alone. When he was tired, no one would comfort him. When he was injured, no one would accompany him to see a doctor. He had no money, so he could only starve and freeze alone. No one would accompany him to cry when he was sad. However, in this huge meeting room, facing many soldiers whom he had only met for the first time, he felt the warmth of home and the concern of these people for him. Lu Chen was a little touched. His eyes were even slightly moist. He patted the one closest to him, whose hair was messy and his face was dirty, the soldier who did not seem to have rested said softly, “I’m back. Go and rest.” When the soldier heard Lu Chen’s voice, his body trembled slightly. Then, he turned around. At this moment, his eyes were also somewhat moist. In the Second World, this warrior was almost killed by monsters more than once. It was Lu Chen who flew over to save his life. He understood that if it were not for Lu Chen’s repeated help, he might have not made it out alive. At that time, no matter how strong he was in the main world, he would never have the chance to fight side by side with his comrades. As a soldier, his teammates were everything. His dignity would not allow him to fall behind. At this moment, seeing his idol standing in front of him and patting his shoulder, his body trembled slightly, as if he wanted to say something. Lu Chen just smiled and shook his head, indicating that he did not need to say anything, he understood everything. Then, Lu Chen turned around to face more warriors of the Dragon Country and said loudly, “You’ve all worked hard. Go and rest. This kind of battle will happen more than once. “This is the most dangerous place. I know that some of you may have come to the Second World for the first time, so you might have been overwhelmed. You may have encountered the most challenging situation in your life. “All of you deserve good rest after a long day.” Hearing Lu Chen’s heavy words, all the soldiers once again perked up. They stood upright like javelins. Their eyes were full of firm conviction and unyielding will. No matter how dangerous the Mass Grave was, they would fight to the end. At the last moment, even if there was only one soldier left, they would not be deserters. They only had two choices – to become stronger or to die. Lu Chen met all the soldiers’ unflinching eyes once again. He was very satisfied with their reaction. Although the eyes of these people were firm, there was a hint of confusion and novelty that came with it. At this moment, all of their emotions became stronger, and they had the courage to not back down. This was exactly what Lu Chen wanted to see. With a change in style, he smiled and said a few words of encouragement to everyone. “Perhaps this is the worst of times, but this is also the best of times. “Although danger lurks everywhere in the Mass Grave, you can see that this place is filled with treasures. Nothing can be compared to this place. “Therefore, your levels would be greatly increased here, and your battle awareness would also be greatly honed. “I believe that as long as we clear the Mass Grave together, not to mention the billions of players in the country, even in front of the billions of players around the world, you will be the best batch of warriors. And this is the reason why I brought you here!” Lu Chen’s words made all the warriors’ blood boil. It was as if the time had come for them to become stronger. Especially on the battlefield, when they saw Lu Chen being so valiant, shuttling through tens of thousands of monsters as if no one was there. Later, when he killed five silver bosss by himself and made an Ancient Panda kneel before him. All of this made everyone admire him more. The only thing that tickled them was that all the remaining warriors in the Second World had tacitly turned off their cameras when they counted the rewards. As a result, apart from the Soul Slayer Team in the second world, no one knew what Lu Chen had obtained. However, everyone was only curious. No one was unwilling to seek out for more. They knew that although Lu Chen was at the top of the world, he still faced problems and dilemmas that urgently needed his attention. For Lu Chen, at this time, he could not be too reckless. Moreover, Lu Chen had already done enough. If it were not for Lu Chen, they would either all withdraw from the Second World halfway through the battle and become the laughingstock of the entire world… Or they would all die in the Second World and return to the Novice Village. These two choices were impossible for them to accept, but these two were the only ones they were allowed to have. After that, Lu Chen said a few simple words and let everyone go to rest. Even these spirit beasts were no exception. Only Lu Chen and Tang Xiaoqing were left in the huge conference room. The camera in the conference room flashed again. In an instant, as a few lights in the sky continuously shone on the air in the conference room, a three-dimensional image of the first elder appeared. Other than the fact that his body was a little illusory, there was no sense of unreality. Even every minute expression and movement of the old man was revealed. It was as if he had really come personally. The first elder had a kind expression on his face. He looked at Lu Chen and revealed a satisfied smile. “I didn’t expect you to actually complete this mission and achieve zero death. “I expected a 10% death rate, but I didn’t expect you to be able to do this. “It seems that you’ve made great progress..” Translator: EndlessFantasy Translation Editor: EndlessFantasy Translation Lu Chen’s eyes were noncommittal. There was not even a hint of satisfaction in them. Instead, he looked straight at the first elder and slowly spat out a few words, “Where is the mask?” This first elder had actually secretly tricked him. Lu Che was not going to let this slide, he was going to make this old fellow embarrassed. Hearing Lu Chen’s words, the first elder’s body trembled slightly, and even the beard at the corner of his mouth shook. He could only pretend to cough twice. “You’re not injured this time, right? Why don’t you go and take a rest?” Lu Chen was not moved at all. Instead, he continued to look at the first elder with a somewhat speechless expression. He repeated, “Where’s the mask?” This made the first elder choke. He could only pretend to cough even more, “I… I can’t take it anymore. My health is not good after all! “I can’t be compared to you young people. I… I have to go offline. I need to rest!” As he spoke, he directly cut off the conversation between the two. The three-dimensional image turned into a room full of light spots and gradually disappeared. Lu Chen still had a stoic expression on his face as he took out his phone. He immediately sent out a message, [Where is the mask?] The first elder far away in the capital finally went offline after much difficulty. When he was actually facing Lu Chen, he was somewhat out of breath. Although he felt guilty towards Lu Chen, he did not think that Lu Chen would be so persistent to keep asking this question. At this moment, his phone rang. He took out his phone from his pocket and slowly brought it in front of him. He was so shocked by the four large words that he almost dropped his phone. After being stunned for three full seconds, he slowly shook his head and laughed. This kid really does not know when to give up. The third in charge chief carefully approached him from the side. “First elder, are you feeling a little guilty?” The first elder was holding his beard and looking at the phone in a daze with a smile. In his heart, he was satisfied with the kid’s actions. When he heard the third in charge chief’s words, his face turned black. He put one hand behind his back and puffed out his chest. “Hey! I said that he has ownership of the mask now. Who can blame him if he can’t get it himself? “Alright, let’s not talk about this anymore. I don’t owe him anything. You should leave quickly. I’m already very tired. I need to rest.” The third in charge chief had a helpless expression on his face. He looked at the first elder from the corner of his eyes for a long time. The first elder could feel the third in charge chief’s disdainful expression. He quickly raised his hand and pretended to hit the third in charge chief. “Get out of here quickly!” Although the third in charge chief was a little unconvinced, when he thought of the first elder’s profound strength, he did not say anything and quickly scurried out. However, when he walked out of the door, he kept muttering in a low voice, “He’s already a spiritual expert, yet he still pretends to be in poor health. He’s already so old, yet he shows no sign of remorse whatsoever…” Of course, he could only curse silently in his heart, but he dared not to say it out loud. Otherwise, the first elder would definitely skin him alive. In the Second World’s Mass Grave. A few foreigners with blonde hair and blue eyes, tall noses, and deep eye sockets were still fighting. They were constantly dealing with the various monsters in front of them, and at the same time, they heard the earth-shattering sounds of fighting in the distance. When they heard the sounds of fighting, their entire bodies went numb. This was because they had seen with their own eyes that the monsters that were fighting with them had abandoned them in an instant and charged straight towards the battlefield in the distance. At first, their faces were filled with confusion. However, they quickly reacted and realized that something big had happened! They quickly found a high place to overlook the area nearby. When they stood on the high ground and looked into the distance, they saw countless monsters in countless directions heading in the same direction. Moreover, their auras were ghastly and terrifying. They were at least level 10 monsters. They estimated that there were already thousands of monsters within their range of vision. Even though these people were the leaders of the Western Castle, they still felt a chill run down their spines. The leader, James, wiped the sweat off his forehead and said, “Oh my, who triggered such a huge battle? I’m sure these people won’t be able to survive, right?” The member of the Western Castle also swallowed a mouthful of saliva, his back turned cold as he said, “They’re most likely dead. Not to mention those ordinary players, even we probably won’t be able to survive. You guys look! There’s more than one silver boss heading over there!” “Sh*t! Who triggered such a huge tide of monsters?!” For a moment, their curiosity was piqued. They did not know what was happening in the entire Mass Grave. Previously, they were faced with a large number of monsters invading them. However, there were at most a dozen of them in a go. They have never seen such a state before. It was simply impossible for them to survive in such a state. If a player from a city came over, they would be pushed aside. However, they did not dare to go forward to check. In the face of such a huge beast tide, as long as they dared to charge forward, they could be accidentally swept into the tide. They would be trampled to death if they were stepped on just a few times. If they were to return to the Resurrection Point, they would be laughed at to death. After all, these were spiritual stage experts, and there was even a golden core stage expert. However, the amount of monsters there was insanely large! Moreover, if they could be resurrected near their Western Castle, it would be fine. If they were to be resurrected at the resurrection point of the Dragon Country, they might not even be able to make it past a day. One had to know that it was precisely because Xiao Bai had defected and was protected by the Western Castle that Lu Chen and the entire Dragon Country had gained a powerful enemy. All the Dragon Country people wished they could peel off his skin and eat his flesh. Under such circumstances, once the people from the Western Castle appeared in the hands of the players and became newbies, there was no need to even think about it. They would die a miserable death. They quietly moved through the Mass Grave, trying to find the best viewing position. First, they aimed at the highest point of the Mass Grave. However, they could only watch from afar and did not dare to go up. The periphery of the Mass Grave was already so dangerous. If they ran toward the center of the Mass Grave, they would most likely end up like the Dragon Slayer Team back then. They would not even know how they died. That would be too pathetic. After all, they were here for Lu Chen. If they were killed by the monsters before they even saw Lu Chen, they would become a complete laughing stock. However, after going through so much hardship, their efforts were finally not in vain. They finally arrived at a place with higher terrain and fewer monsters around. At this moment, the Western Castle’s members who were originally dressed extremely luxuriously were now dressed in tattered clothes. They even had a hat woven from tree vines on top of their heads. Their bodies were also covered with messy tree branches from having to disguise themselves.. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation <strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Looking at these once-mighty figures who were at the peak of their power turning into beggars, even they themselves found the contrast unbelievable. If they had known that the Mass Grave was so dangerous, they would not have come at all. At the very least, they had to find a good place to ambush Lu Chen! However, they still felt that it would be worth it. After all, they had never seen such a scene before their eyes. They saw many silver bosses standing guard at the rear while tens of thousands of monsters in front were fighting one after another. At this time, they realized that the opponents these monsters were facing were actually the warriors of the Dragon Country. The experts of the Western Castle were standing too far away. They could not see who the specific warriors were at all. They could only see the warriors arranging their troops and changing their battle positions, forming battle formations with powerful attacks and strong defenses, constantly depleting the monsters’ HP and numbers, in the end, only the silver bosses were left. However, the outcome of the few silver bosses shocked them even more, especially the first silver boss. Not only was it tragic, but it was also a little shameful for it to die that way. Such a powerful silver boss had actually been smashed in half by a panda that had descended from the sky. The remaining half of its body had been stomped into pieces by the said panda. Was that panda Lu Chen’s pet? Was that why he dared to throw the panda into battle? Thinking of this, the people from the Westem Castle felt their heartache. They did not dare to believe it. To be exact, they did not want to believe it. Such a powerful battle formation was enough to wipe out tens of thousands of monsters. This was something that even the people from the Western Castle could not achieve. These warriors were very brave. This kind of spirit could only be achieved by the ancient knights from the west. At the same time, they were a little afraid. What would happen if they waited for the others to face these warriors? If these Western Castle members found out that the warriors were charging at them, they would probably die here today. They could exit the game at any time because they covered each other and had enough time to exit the Second World Game. However, if they were the ones facing the warriors, the other party would not allow them to leave. Looking at their situation, even if they had to sacrifice hundreds of their lives, they would be dragged down by them! However, when there were only these silver bosses left, they were slightly relieved. Other than the silver boss that had mysteriously died, there were nine other silver bosses. Although Lu Chen had many experts on his side, it would not be easy to kill these nine silver bosses. They thought that once these silver bosses crippled these warriors.. at the very least, they would weaken their status to a terrifying level. When that time came, the few people from the Westem Castle would move together and descend from the sky like angels, dealing a fatal blow to these people. With that, they would be able to obtain any equipment from them. These people were truly counting their chickens before they hatched. Unfortunately, their dreams were dreams, and reality hit them like a truck. What they saw next had shattered their dreams into pieces. Not to mention how fast those warriors were fighting the silver boss, the most arrogant man in the middle was actually fighting against five silver bosses by himself. How crazy would such a battle be?! Even James who was in the aurous stage would not dare to be so arrogant! Although those monsters were only silver, they were much stronger than the players in the spiritual stage. Even James, who was in the aurous stage, could be killed by so many bosses if he was not careful enough. After all, the HP bars of the human players were too weak However, that arrogant player kept moving among the five monsters. Not only was he not injured, but he was also able to hold back these monsters to prevent the five monsters from causing trouble for his teammates This set of flashy moves was really awesome. It was not something that an ordinary person could do. On the surface, it seemed like this person was at a disadvantage by hiding everywhere. However, the laymen were just watching the show. The experts could tell at a glance that Lu Chen was definitely skilled. However, at this moment, they were not sure if the person below was Lu Chen. It was not until Lu Chen used his ultimate skill th golden title appeared above his head and instantly killed three silver bosses. Following this, he used another title and casually killed another silver boss. Only when the third title appeared and instantly killed bat –who was thousands of meters away-were they certain that this person was definitely Lu Chen! Although they could not see what the three titles on Lu Chen’s head were, there was never a person in this world who could have three gold-tier titles except Lu Chen! of course, this was only in the Second World. If it was in the main world, there would still be monsters that could size him up. In addition, if they looked carefully, there was a little golden thing in the distance. Although it was too far away, and it was not as big as a toothpick they definitely had reason to believe that it was the Little Golden Dragon fromn back then. When Lu Chen used his SworD God title, even James felt his scalp go numb. How the fck was he supposed to fight Lu Chen? If they dared to go forward at this time, would that be considered suicide If the people from the Western Castle had been able to accept the two days and two nights of battle, then the sudden change in less than two hours and the death of these nine silver bosses had completely stunned them. They had thought that Lu Chen’s strength would definitely not be able to defeat James. However, when James saw this scene, he became uncertain. He was completely shocked by Lu Chen’s abilities He had absolute confidence in himself that he definitely would not be able to defeat Lu Chen. At the same time, he was also glad that he was able to watch this battle when the tides of beast arrived. Otherwise, if he really did find Lu Chen in the Mass Grave, what difference would it be from dying? At the same time, everyone in the Western Castle felt a lingering fear in their hearts. Fortunately, the time they had wasted fighting the monsters was also fortunate for Lu Chen and the others. He did not discover them, or else they would have been dead for sure. At this moment, it was already late at night in the main world. When Lu Chen and the others woke up, it was already early in the morning of the second day. Although countless warriors were physically and mentally exhausted, they still woke up early to train. Translator: Endless Fantasy Translation Editor: Endless Fantasy Translation The soldiers of the Dragon Country were now filled with pent-up energy. Through this battle in the Second World, the first thing they felt was the low level of their strength. Of course, even though they were already existences whose combat strength was off the charts in the main world, it was only when they arrived in the Second World that they realized that the creatures that were much stronger than them in terms of combat strength. If it was a one-on-one fight… It was very likely that they would be instantly killed. If they wanted to become a top-notch existence and expand the territory of the Dragon Country as they did in the main world, then they would need to improve their strength. The second thing that they realized was that their bodies were still not good enough, so they had to do a lot of training to make their bodies stronger. It must be known that although these soldiers’ physical fitness was first-rate, they all had many hidden injuries on their bodies. The stronger the warrior, the more hidden injuries they would have. Thus, the more internal injuries their soldiers had in the main world, the more the condition of their bodies in the game pod would affect the battle situation in the Second World. Perhaps their willpower was strong enough to be able to forcefully hold on in the Second World and not appear for dozens of hours. However, this sort of hard resistance required the consumption of spiritual energy. This also meant that they would not be able to display their full strength in the Second World, every small movement or injury in the main world’s game pod could affect their condition in the main world. On the rapidly changing battlefield, any small distraction could cause them to make a fatal mistake, leading to large-scale casualties for themselves and even the entire team. This was absolutely unforgivable for a warrior. When Lu Chen saw the scene in front of him, he was immediately filled with respect. These warriors were already in the main world training themselves, sacrificing everything for the country and the people, sacrificing their own health, and even their own lives. At this moment, they chose to protect their bodies, thinking of protecting their families and their motherland. They were worthy of respect. When everyone was in the conference room, a beam of light appeared on the big screen on the television again. It gathered in the middle of the conference room and formed a three-dimensional projection. In a short while, the third in charge chief’s face appeared in the three-dimensional projection. His gaze was very gentle. He slowly swept his gaze from left to right. Each and every soldier made eye contact. When the both of them looked at each other, they were even more excited. Lu Chen was the top soldier in the country and their idol. The third in charge chief was the top existence in politics. For such a big figure to smile at them, it was also a great encouragement. The third in charge chief’s gaze lasted for a full 30 seconds. He looked seriously at everyone’s faces. It was not until everyone felt his encouragement that he turned his gaze to Lu Chen again. “Soldiers, you have worked hard! “Lu Chen, you have also worked hard. “Congratulations to all of you for triumphantly returning!” The third in charge chief’s words made all the soldiers even more excited. For them, life and death were not scary, and fame and fortune were not what they wanted, but the recognition from the people they admired was what they wanted to see the most. With the third in charge chief’s encouragement, everyone felt their blood boil. Except for Lu Chen, who only moved his lips. The third in charge chief’s expression froze slightly because he saw Lu Chen clearly ask again- where is the mask? However, the third in charge chief only panicked for a moment, but he quickly adjusted his expression, as if he did not hear anything. After all, the mask was promised by the first elder, and this pit was dug by the first elder, so it had nothing to do with him! That’s right, although Lu Chen was working for the Dragon Country and he was the top leader of the Dragon Country, he could only forcefully hypnotize himself to say that this matter had nothing to do with hinm. He decided to be shanmeless and continue on. The third in charge c?hief hurriedly changed the topic. “Lu Chen, as far as I know, people from the Western Castle have already arrived. I’m afraid that they have already been hiding in the Mass Graves, waiting to ambush you.” Hearing this, Lu Chen raised his eyebrows slightly but did not pay too much attention to it. The members of the Western Castle had long taken down the Giant Lizard City. Although this city was much stronger than White Fog City, Xiao Bai was already defeated by him. How could Lu Chen be afraid of him? He raised his eyebrows slightly and said, “Is that so? You mean Xiao Bai is here too? The third in charge chief shook his head slowly, “No, he isn’t here. But they’ve invited an expert from an ancient martial arts aristocratic family. His name is James. This person has long passed the aurous stage. “Moreover, some players have seen this group of blonde-haired and blue-eyed foreigners at the outskirts of the Mass Grave. “There were even people who secretly took photos. It was indeed James.” Lu Chen nodded slightly, but he was not afraid. The golden core stage was nothing to0 scary to him. Although he was only at the spiritual stage, if there were any ignorant golden stage cultivators who dared to provoke him, then Lu Chen would willingly take up that challenge. However, Lu Chen would not underestimate him too much. After all, there was a difference between domestic and foreign combat methods. The Western Castle, especially those from foreign countries, used crosses, holy water, and other magic attacks that he had never come into contact with before. This kind of thing was unknown to him. It was not something that ordinary people could come into contact with. If Lu Chen really dared to recklessly go up and fight with them, it was very likely that he would fail in the gutter. At the same time, Lu Chen suddenly thought of something. He opened his mouth and asked the third in charge chief, “How did experts like them enter the Dragon Country? “As far as I know, the Second World of the Dragon Country and the Second World of other countries are not connected. “Could it be that they secretly came to the main world? “Were they not stopped by the border when they wanted to enter?” This time, it was the other party’s turn to be troubled. He frowned. “From the looks of it, they don’t seem to have come from the border. “Moreover, ever since I found out that they had come to the Dragon Country, I’ve sent more people to continuously check if there were any foreign experts entering the country these days. “After searching for a full few days, I still haven’t found any clues. I’ve even used the spies from overseas. According to them, these people from the west didn’t leave at all, ‘James entered the Western Castle a few days in advance and didn’t come out after. Lu Chen nodded slightly. “Looks like they’ve teleported here.” Suddenly, one of the soldiers suddenly shouted loudly, “Lu Chen, if you need my help, 1, Liu Changping, am duty-bound to offer assistance!” Translator: EndlessFantasy Translation Editor: Endless Fantasy Translation When he heard that Lu Chen was in danger and that someone from the Western Castle was preparing to harm him, Liu Changping was the first to jump out to express his help. It had to be said that Liu Changping’s sucking-up attribute was exposed at this moment, without a doubt. He spoke so quickly that it made people wonder if he had planned it all along. Sure enough, his actions were not in vain. Lu Chen immediately looked at him and gave him a grateful smile. When everyone saw this, the second person jumped out and shouted, “I too am willing to fight against the Western Castle with Lu Chen! This shout was filled with passion. Anyone could hear that this voice was full of detemination. Everyone looked in the direction of the voice. It was actually Hei Yu from the Soul Slayer Team. Everyone immediately thought of Hei Yu’s encounter and understood that Hei Yu was taking the opportunity to take revenge for his daughter. Hei Yu was originallya member of the Dragon Team. He had once brought his daughter to the Western Castle for a trip. However, for some reason, Hei Yu’s daughter died in the Western Castle. Even her body was not seen. Some higher-ups of the Dragon Country even deliberately contacted the forces in the Western Castle. However, the other party’s attitude was hesitant, and refused to investigate further this. They even tried to cover up all the possible leads. In the end, Hei Yu never figured out how his daughter died, but he often dreamed that his daughter was calling him and telling him that she was not dead. This mystery kept Hei Yu awake every night. He had to find out what happened to his daughter, so now that there was such a good opportunity, Hei Yu was obviously not going to let it go. Following that, five other voices shouted in unison, “If there’s anything you need, we’re willing to help Lu Chen as well!” The ones who shouted were the five members of the Dragon Slayer squad. They were in the Mass Graves of the Second World, and Lu Chen had taken care of them during their battles. Especially when they left the Second World, they saw Lu Chen fight five monsters at once, forcing the monsters to flee in all directions. In the end, he killed five silver bosses in a short while. This scene made them completely convinced of his fiery povwer. One had to know that when they killed the initial silver boss in the Snake Pond, hey had also spent a lot of effort in crafting a plan to defeat it. However, to Lu Chen, it was as easy as him breathing air. They had to cling to sucha powerful person at all cost! With Liu Changping’s lead, they immediately stood out to express their attitude. After all, Lu Chen’s power was not an ordinary one. What they hoped for was to be able to follow by Lu Chen’s side. Even if they were despised by others, they would not hesitate in sucking up. Especially the leader of the Dragon Slayer Team, Li Xiaotian, who was shouting so loudly that his voice was a little hoarse. he shouted, “If Lu Chen needs us to lead the charge, we will not be afraid no matter how dangerous “We will be the first to charge forward. If Lu Chen is in danger, our Dragon Slayer Team will not retreat even if we have to fight to the end! “If anyone wants to hurt Lu Chen, then they’ll have to step over our dead bodies first!” These words were heartfelt to anyone and it even made some of them tearful. Some people even noticed that the eyes of several members of the Dragon Slayer Team were red. The only one who did not shed tears was Hei Yu, but he too faked a tear just to show everyone that he was on the same page as well. They were much too good at acting. If one did not know any better, one would have thought that Lu Chen was a God that needed to be worshipped. There were so many people present that internally sighed, not knowing how to react. Although the acting was awkward and even shocked everyone, the only thought in everyone’s mind was-they had acted too late. However, they still considered if it was inappropriate to act the same as the Dragon Slayer Team right now as well. It was especially more so for those people from the Soul Slayer Team, their guts were twisting and turning with regret. The Soul Slayer Team’s captain, Zhou Zhenyang, used his hands to continuously pat his thigh. His thigh had already turmed red from the hitting. However, he cursed in his heart, ‘1 can’t believe I didn’t think of that first. I was too late! If I knew I would’ve done it earlier! After all, compared to being led by Lu Chen, nothing else would matter! They were willing to throw away everything just to stand by Lu Chen’s side! They would have been willing to eat nothing just to stay with him! This was the consensus of everyone. Anything that Lu Chen would consider waste would be seen asa blessing to them! Obviously, after Liu Changping and the Dragon Slayer Team went through this ordeal, everyone had their heads turned around in shame. Why was Lu Chen allowed to have all these things in life?! People did not even fight as hard for treasures as compared to Lu Chen! Moreover, these soldiers of the Dragon Slayer Team sincerely wanted to follow Lu Chen. In their eyes, Lu Chen was the number one fighting force in the Dragon Country, and the forever-bright star of the Dragon Country. Seeing that so many people were helping him, Lu Chen felt very touched. Once again, he thoroughly felt the warmth of home. However, Lu Chen rejected everyone’s request. After all, he clearly knew that the combat strength of these members of the Dragon Slayer Team was not very high. Most of them were below the spiritual stage They were probably not going to be of much use when the time came to fight the people in the Western Castle. Thinking about it, Xiao Bai had stayed there for so long but was still unable to become the supreme leader. This meant that there must be someone who was restraining him in the Western Castle. At the very least, he was at the spiritual stage If it was someone below the spiritual stage who dared to come to the Dragon Country’s territory, they might be pressed to death at any time. That would be a really bad idea. Although the first elder was only at the spiritual stage in the Dragon Country on the surface, the Westem Castle still did not dare to act rashly. There must be something fishy going on. Lu Chen did not ask the first elder about anything else, but that did not mean that he was st*pid. Lu Chen’s face was full of gratitude. He said to the soldiers of the Dragon Team, “Thank you for your kindness, but I don’t need your help at the moment. If need help, I’ll only bring Hei Yu with me. “After all, the more people there are, the bigger the target. I’m not afraid of not being able to defeat them. Instead, Im worried that if they realized a big group, they would run away. If we really lose one or two people because of this, that would be a huge loss.” Everyone could not help but laugh when Lu Chen teased them. originally, everyone had thought that those people from the Western Castle were powerful imaginary enemies. However, when Lu Chen said this, it seemed that those people weren’t as terrifying anymore. That’s right. How could a powerful existence like Lu Chen be afraid of them? Not only was Lu Chen not worried about their combat power, but he was also even afraid that they would run away. This contrast made all the soldiers laugh. However, since Lu Chen said so, no one continued to insist. Translator: EndlessFantasy Translation Editor: EndlessFantasy Translation Everyone knew the purpose of Lu Chen bringing Hei Yu along was for. He wanted to help Hei Yu find the cause of his daughter’s death and avenge Hei Yu. At the highest point of the Mass Grave, there was a person who was glowing with golden light. He looked at everything that had just happened with an indifferent gaze. It was only when Lu Chen made his move that he looked at the younger man with interest. After looking at him for a long time, he finally muttered something out loud, “That’s right. This person is indeed a good seedling. I’m sure that his future achievements won’t be below mine.” However, the rumbling voice below the ground once again spoke in a dull tone, “Master, you might be flattering him too much by saying that. “He might be known as a favored child of Heavens. However, there are only two people who were able to survive and reach your level of cultivation.” The person whose entire body was emitting golden light looked at the vast Mass Grave. Then, he stared at the place where Lu Chen and the others had just left and let out a long sigh. “Since the ancient times, how many gorgeous and peerless favored child of Heavens have appeared in the Dragon Country? “Although my strength is reasonable, I won’t dare to say that I’m the second person favored by the Heavens. “Just like how the main world doesn’t know about the existence of the ancient martial arts aristocratic families, perhaps there are many experts that even I don’t know about. “However, what you said isn’t wrong. The so-called experts are only called experts when they grow up. If they don’t grow up, they will die prematurely. No matter how much of a genius they are, they will only be a nobody until they succeed.” Thinking of this, his eyes glanced in another direction. He was looking at those people from the Western Castle. He looked at the few gold stage people kneeling behind him and said indifferently, “San, go deal with those people.” The person called Xiao San was at the gold stage and was kneeling at the side, this very person was actually a peacock! This peacock had a pair of golden feet, and his feathers were colorful and gorgeous. The aura on his body was absolutely different from the aura of the ten silver bosses back then. This was such a powerful existence. At this moment, in front of this expert, his tail was tightly closed, not daring to be ostentatious. He acted very humbly and dared not to speak up. ‘When the expert called his name, his body first shivered in fear. Then, he slowly raised his head, and the joy in his eyes could no longer be suppressed. It was as if he who was emitting golden light gave him this mission as a great compliment. The peacock was obviously very happy for this given mission. He slowly took three steps back and bowed respectfully. Then, he suddenly spread his colorful wings and flew toward the people in the Western Castle. The other gold stage martial artist who were still kneeling beside this expert were filled with envy. They all secretly wondered why they were not the ones being asked to carry this mission out. They knew that they could handle those few street rats! They stood next to this expert, enduring great pressure and not daring to move at all. Logically speaking, for beasts, they could only feel the suppression of their bloodlines. That was why they were able to fight without fear, even when the other party’s combat power was very strong, it would not faze them. Of course, Lu Chen was an exception. That was why the silver boss bat was confused and fearful. When the bat was faced this man, the bat was completely pressured by the difference in strength. There was only despair in the silver bosses hearts that they could not resist. The pressure from absolute strength was something they could not fight back at all! The others did not even dare to casually say anything. Only the rumbling and vicissitudes of life voice underground said, “Master, why are you helping that kid? He can beat these people with his own strength.” The person emitting the golden light tured his gaze toward the people in the Western Castle in the distance. His eyes were indifferent, without a trace of emotion, as if he was looking at useless people, he said indifferently, “I’m not doing this for Lu Chen. That kid doesn’t need my help. “can’t stand these thieves. Since they’ve come to our Dragon Country’s territory, we might as well make them stay here forever.” The old voice below the ground was silent for a long time, only then did he open his mouth to retort, “Master, there are only a few of us here. Don’t pretend anymore. I think you’re just thinking about those old guys who bullied your little disciple back then. So you want to take the opportunity to strike back and take revenge.” Although this expert, whose entire body was glowing with golden light, had been teased by that existence underground, none of the gold stage experts kneeling on the ground dared to laugh. In fact, their bodies were even faintly trembling. The expert, who was glowing with golden light, let out a long sigh. “It’s fine that you think that way. Why do you have to expose me?” Following this, he extended his finger and pointed in the air. The surface of the ground actually emitted a muffled rumbling sound, and a small, deep, invisible hole appeared on the ground. That sound startled the fauna within a few hundred meters, and they fled frantically. The gold stage experts lowered their heads even more, not daring to look up. Some of them even wanted to bury their heads edep underground. In the vast expanse, there was actually a sound that sounded like a copper bell being struck by a finger. As for the owner of the old voice underground, it was as if he had received a huge slap. He hurriedly coughed a few times and begged for mercy, “Master, please be gentle.” The person who was emitting golden light glanced at a corner of the ground. “Next time, if you’re afraid, don’t you dare say such things ever again. Do you remember?” The voice below the ground was obviously much softer. “Yes, master.” Everyone in the Western Castle felt that they were in a difficult situation. Back then, they were so excited that they came here alone without Xiao Bai’s knowledge to seize Lu Chen’s White Fog City and take the title of White Fog City’s city lord. They had even thought of how to distribute the spoils of war and how to weaken Xiao Bai’s strength later on, forcing him to abdicate. However, when they make it there, they will realize sooner or later that Lu Chen is really too powerful. His strength was far beyond their imagination. Even though they had long been prepared to invite James over, even James felt a little numb at this moment. This kid could not be measured by the combat strength of an ordinary person. At this moment, they felt that they were a joke. The Lord of the Wester Castle, Alex, first coughed and then said, “Mr. James, if you have the confidence, take down Lu Chen next.” Although James did not say a word on the surface, he had already cursed in his heart. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation<strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation At this moment, no one was willing to admit that they were weak. It was impossible for them to admit that they could not beat Lu Chen as well. If they said that, it would mean that they would be destroying their own prestige. Although everyone understood in their hearts that Lu Chen’s combat strength was much stronger than theirs, one Lu Chen was able to sweep away all of them. Originally, they had already thought that they overvalued Lu Chen. However, at this moment, they finally understood that they had underestimated him. However, they have already gone too far to come back. If anyone took the initiative to say that they could not defeat Lu Chen, then they would really become a laughing stock when they went back. Did they really come all the way here just to get laughed at when they went back? The reason why the Lord of the Western Castle asked James was to force James to admit that he could not defeat Lu Chen. Then, everyone would feel embarrassed to return to the Western Castle. After all, even the aurous stage James had admitted defeat, that meant that they should return, right? However, James’s next words were not as expected by the Western Castle, he slowly opened his mouth and said, “When we came here, we already agreed that I would be in charge of fighting Little Golden Dragon, and you guys would be in charge of taking down Lu Chen. After observing the fiasco, I feel that I should have no problem dealing with Little Golden Dragon.” Hearing this, the people of the Western Castle were all stupefied. This was indeed what they and James had arranged back then. They thought that Lu Chen had relied on the title of White Fog City’s City Lord to get rid of Little Golden Dragon. They thought that Little Golden Dragon was the weakest link. Who would have thought that Lu Chen would be a serious menace to them before they got through his pets? If Castle Lord Alex was to make the decision now, he would rather deal with Little Golden Dragon by himself than face Lu Chen! James snickered in his heart. He knew that they did not have a high cultivation point, yet they dared to play tricks on him. There was no way he was going to admit defeat! This time, it was the Western Castle’s member’s turn to be stunned. They never expected James to respond in such a way! The scene turned cold and the atmosphere became a little awkward. Aloud and clear cry appeared from afar. Then, in everyone’s eyes, a colorful peacock the size of an armored vehicle flew towards them at an extremely fast speed. Although the d peacock was only running, it would occasionally flap its wings and glide over a hundred meters forward. Along the way, countless gold dust-like things fell from the peacock’s body. The dust was so small that it could not be seen with the naked eye. Moreover, it quickly spread in all directions in the air. When this happened, they were all a little stunned. This peacock was not coming for them. Instead, it was thousands of meters away from them and began to draw circles around them. For a moment, they did not understand what this peacock was doing. However, they were still shocked to find out that this peacock was actually a gold boss. They were not st*pid enough to think that this peacock was here to perform for them! Now, all of them were a little dumbfounded. It was as simple as watching Lu Chen fight a silver boss. However, five silver bosses and one gold boss had completely different combat powers. If this gold peacock ran toward them and really wanted to pick a fight, then the people in the Western Castle would only be able to cower in fear. They definitely would not be able to face it head-on. The only thing that would be effective… was James. Although this peacock had been drawing circles around them and had not attacked them, James still sensed a hint of danger.  “We’re not going to fight him head-on. Our goal is to get rid of Lu Chen. We don’t want any complications.” After James finished speaking, the Lord of the Western Castle, Alex, hurriedly nodded and replied, “That’s right. Well retreat right away. If we fight him, it’ll lower our combat power. It’s not in our interests to do so.” James had already started this process and told everyone to retreat. Everyone had to go down this step. Everyone hurriedly agreed. After all, they could not defeat Lu Chen in the first place. If they were to fight with a gold boss now, they would just be asking to be defeated. It was a good time to admit defeat and quickly leave. As for whether they would still fight with Lu Chen in the future, that would be a matter for the future. They could ask the higher-level experts from the Holy Seer to help them. When that time came, they would not have to worry about not being able to kill Lu Chen. No matter how powerful Lu Chen was, he was only equivalent to a golden stage expert. In reality, he was only a spiritual stage expert who could kill enemies of a higher level. How could he possibly be a match for a soul stage expert? At that time, the people of the Western Castle might have to pay a higher price. The Western Castle would probably have to pay a huge price, in fact. Thinking of this, Alex could not help but feel a pang of pain in his heart. They did not dare to waste any more time. With a quick thought, they prepared to log off from the Second World and return to the main world. However, the peacock did not let them off easily. The peacock, who had been drawing circles a thousand meters away, suddenly accelerated and dived forward. It aimed straight at the people from the Western Castle in the center and dived several hundred meters in an instant. However, the people of the Western Castle were a little relieved. After all, the distance was still quite far. By the time it reached here, they would have already left the Second World. However, the next thing that shocked them happened. ‘The peacock, which was seven or eight hundred meters away from them, suddenly disappeared. In the next moment, it appeared in front of everyone. At the same time, it opened its sharp beak and did not make any extra movements! At this moment, the peacock’s body had also increased by more than ten times! It was as if a mountain was pressing down on the sky, making everyone unable to breathe. In an instant, it began its reign of attacks! No one saw how peacock appeared. However, when they saw that the peacock’s beak was like a sharp sword falling from the sky, they could feel an incomparable danger from its beak. Even if they were lightly bitten by it, their entire body would definitely be pierced through. The people from the Western Castle hurriedly dodged the attacks, ignoring everyone else and scurrying in all directions. James, who was originally very far away from the others, was not targeted by this magnified peacock, so he managed to run unscathed. However, just as he was about to return to the main world, he was knocked away by two or three other people. James was preparing to return to the city, but he was interrupted by this collision, and he was left in the Second World. His eyes widened, anger coursed through his veins as he cursed, “What the f*ck are you doing? Why are you interrupting my departure? If we don’t leave now, we’ll be killed by that beast!” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation<strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Hearing James’s scolding, everyone could no longer care about the other party’s identity in the face of danger. They turned their hands and started scolding, “Are you an id*ot? The other party has already attacked us. If none of us leave, everyone will end up dead! “Who still has the time to care about whether you return to the city or not?!” James had never been bullied on the way here. Seeing that this person actually dared to talk back to him, he was instantly furious. Alex quickly came over to mediate the situation and explained, “James, please calm down. Now is not the time for internal strife. “Quickly finish off this peacock. We can discuss about the rewards later!” However, James’s face was full of confusion. He shook his head left and right and looked around, but he did not see the peacock at all. He was furious. He pointed to the distance and cursed, “Did you guys drink too much fake wine and lose your minds? “The peacock is still too far away? About four to five hundred meters away from us. What are you guys losing your minds for?!” ‘The people from the Western Castle hurriedly looked in the direction James pointed to. Sure enough, the peacock was still some distance away from them and continued to run toward them. Everyone was a little dumbfounded. If the peacock was still far away, then where did the enormous peacock that was just beside them and prepared to kill them come from? However, they did not have time to think about this and immediately prepared to return to the main world. However, the same scene played out once again. They had just begun the operation to return to the main world when another enormous peacock appeared in front of them. That peacock was dozens of meters tall and had already reached the height of the Ancient Ash Wolf King. James may have not realized the first peacock, but this time, it appeared right in front of him. The sharp beak of the bird was more than ten meters long. It was like the deathly scythe that hung high above everyone’s heads. It swung down abruptly, ready to take everyone’s lives! Seeing the huge beak aimed at him, James felt that his head was about to explode! He quickly took out the cross and aimed it at the peacock that was dozens of meters tall. Inan instant, the cross emitted an extremely dazzling light. It shot towards the peacock in the sky from the cross necklace that was less than 10 centimeters tall. During the launching process, the cross continued to grow. In less than a breath’s time, it turned into a cross that was dozens of meters tall, directly blowing the peacock that was hundreds of meters tall into pieces. The peacock turned into a sky full of starlight and disappeared into the air. Seeing the scene in front of him, James stayed true to his words and took care of the peacock, but he did not feel at ease at all. He felt that something was wrong, and that sense of danger was becoming more and more obvious. It was impossible for a gold boss to be defeated so easily, especially when he had just launched an ordinary attack… how could he have destroyed his opponent this easily? There was not even a tinge of red in the sky. What was going on? This was the Second World. Even if the monster was injured, there would still be a tinge of red. In the next moment, a crazy sense of danger flashed like a red warning light, constantly reminding him that life and death danger was coming! Relying on his many years of combat experience, he subconsciously jumped dozens of meters away and rolled around on the ground in a sorry state. ‘What happened next stunned everyone. On the spot, the leader of the Western Castle had a two-meter-long beak pierced through his body, from his chest to his back. The owner of the beak was the peacock that was standing behind James. -59,452! James felt a chill run down his spine. If he had not dodged the attack quickly, he would have been the one to receive the attack! Just the sight of the beak piercing through his body was enough to make one’s scalp tingle! At the same time, everyone heard a cracking sound. Everyone in the Western Castle felt their hearts ache because they knew that it was the sound of a miniature shield shattering. They had spent hundreds of millions of dollars to buy that shield. It was a piece of real silver equipment. Although the Western Castle was not short of money, no matter how big their business was, they could not help but ache for this loss! This piece of equipment was not a one-time use item! It was somewhat similar to Lu Chen’s Shield God. Each time, it could resist 90% of the opponent’s attack power. This also meant that the peacock’s combat power was off the charts. It was close to level 600,000 points. Who could withstand such combat power?! Even Little Golden Dragon back then only had an attack power of less than 300,000. This peacock’s attack power was already twice that of Little Golden Dragon’s. One had to know that a player’s HP was only in the tens of thousands. For people like the people in the Western Castle, their HP was at most 70,000 to 80,000 points. The elder who had just been pecked had only around 70,000 HP, the remaining HP was probably not enough for this peacock to kill him. Even a golden stage expert like James only had around 100,000 HP, let alone spiritual stage experts like them. How could he possibly defeat the peacock knowing this? Humans were originally beings with high damage, high agility, and low HP. Originally, that would be enough to kill a simple boss. Who would have thought that they would directly come into contact with the hidden ultimate boss! Were they going to die here? Just because Lu Chen was able to kill a gold boss and was uninjured did not mean that it was easy to kill a gold boss. However, that was not the case. After all, there was only one monster like Lu Chen among the billions of people in this world. Seeing that the Western Castle’s elder, who had his heart pierced through, was now only left with a bloody skin, although the others did not understand what was going on, they instinctively tried to save him. “Whoosh!” ‘The reaction speed of the peacock was much faster than everyone here. The peacock suddenly pulled back its bird beak, which was nearly one meter long, and poked the elder again. Then, the peacock poked the belly of the elder of the Western Castle, making the beak protrude out of his waist. ‘The others were so scared that they stopped in their tracks. They put their hands on the back of their waist and felt a pain in their kidneys. They understood that they would not be able to defeat this peacock at all! ‘They now dared not to act rashly. After all, if they rushed forward, not only would they not be able to save the other party, but their waists might even be pecked away by this peacock as well. Everyone stopped in their tracks. They had come to the Second World to kill the White Fog City’s City Lord. They were not here to get their waist pecked! -11,045! Not to mention the people in the Western Castle, even the elder who had been pecked to death by the peacock was stunned for a moment. Before he could even cry out, two streaks of red numbers appeared! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation<strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The peacock had only launched two attacks, and the elder had been pecked to death. This peacock’s combat power was much stronger than Little Golden Dragon’s. Although they were both gold bosses, it was clear that this peacock was much faster and more powerful than Little Golden Dragon. Previously, the peacock’s movement speed had been too fast, and the scene had been too chaotic. They had not seen the information panel of the peacock at all. At this moment, when they finally saw the peacock’s attributes clearly, their eyeballs nearly fell out of their sockets. [Name: Seven-colored Peacock] (Level: 55] (HP: 1,006,2000] [Attack: 594,520] (Defense: 290,800] (Magic Defense: 244,584] {Illusion Domain: An exclusive skill of the seven-colored peacock. It will produce different effects depending on the awakening of the bloodline. The seven-colored peacock is able to create an illusion domain. Within the domain, it can create all kinds of things. Everything in this domain is hard to distinguish between what is real and what is fake! It can create an existence that has a combat power to itself. At the same time, within the Illusion Domain, it would be immune to all damage. Has a chance to awaken the bloodline in its body and complete the transformation!) Seeing the Seven-colored Peacock’s skill made everyone shake to their cores. How was this a single skill? It was clearly three skills made into one! To create an illusion, be immune to damage, and create an expert of the same level is insane! Not to mention these ultimate skills, even the attack power of nearly 600,000 was not something an ordinary player could withstand! At this time, they finally understood that the peacock that appeared twice was definitely an illusion! This was because James’s level was relatively high, when everyone was in shambles, he was not affected that much. That was why he did not see the fake peacock that was created the first time. The second time it happened, James was deeply affected. That was why he discovered the fake peacock. It was because it was created by an illusion that it was so easy to break through to it. With this though, James felt a lingering fear. Right now, they were being served on a silver platter for the peacock — weak and easily manipulated. ‘The other party did not even bother to use their skills. The peacock could directly use an ordinary illusion to fool them! What the h*ll was that thing! ‘Was this really something that a silver tier territory should have? Little Golden Dragon appearing in the Snake Pond was already something that could not be comprehended. Yet, there were other things greater than that? James was not in a good mood when he saw the Seven-colored Peacock’s information panel. He knew what he was capable of. Facing such a big boss, his body probably would not be able to withstand a few hits at all. No wonder the ten silver bosses were so well-behaved. They even knew how to cooperate with each other to save their territory. It turned out that there was such a terrifying existence in this Mass Grave! Or so what James thought. If he did not run now, where should he go? However, James did not know that he was still underestimating the danger of this Mass Grave… While the Seven-colored Peacock was pecking at the dead Western Castle elder, James hurriedly opened his control panel and chose the button to return to the main world. While waiting, James continuously counted down the time to return to the city while his eyes were fixed on the Seven-colored Peacock. He did not dare to imagine what he would do if the other party charged at him at this time. His forehead was full of sweat that dripped down his face and neck and flowed directly into his collar. Two seconds passed. ‘The Seven-colored Peacock that was chasing after the others suddenly stopped and tured its head with a swish. Its eyes were fixed on James! At this moment, James felt as if he was facing a peerless beast. Under the overwhelming pressure, his consciousness was like a small boat facing a tsunami. It was swaying in the wind and rain, and he could be smashed into pieces at any time! He could not sit still and wait for death! If the Seven-colored Peacock really charged at him, which direction should he run to? James’s eyes kept looking around, trying to find a safe haven. Even if he had to drag his companions along with him, he would. Although he could not move now, James had already chosen all the possible directions to break out and escape. Three seconds passed. The Seven-colored Peacock moved! James’s body suddenly shivered, and goosebumps appeared all over! At this moment, what he wanted to do the most was to escape! He did not want to endure this gradually increasing sense of oppression anymore. Especially the Seven-colored Peacock’s beautiful feathers, which hid a pure golden beak and sharp claws made James’s entire body go numb. However, she still refused to budge! There was still a second left before he could return to the main world. At that time, he would be able to avoid this d*mned Seven-colored Peacock! The three seconds that were originally a snap of the fingers actually seemed to have passed a century at this moment. The Seven-colored Peacock stomped the ground, emitting a terrifying sound. The Seven-colored Peacock’s face was indifferent as it strolled towards him. Even its cold eyes were still flashing with mockery! ‘What was this Seven-colored Peacock trying to do! The three seconds ended! James’s heart seemed to have exploded as it pounded against his chest! He could finally go back! “Goodbye, you d*mned peacock!” James did not wait for the notification that he had been teleported back to the main world. The sound of the peacock walking was still ringing in his ears! James’s pupils kept flickering as he thought he successfully left. The Seven-colored Peacock’s figure still burned as an image in the back of his mind when he closed his eyes! To no avail, when he opened his eyes, it was of a different scene The other people from the Western Castle who had returned to the main world were also shocked and angry. They shouted loudly, “What’s going on? Why can’t we go back?” “It shouldn’t be. What’s going on? Could it be that the game in the Second World has failed?” “Could it be that the game pod has gone out of order? What the f*ck is going on?” “I’ve long said that Xiao Bai wouldn’t be so kind. How could he give them information for nothing? We’ve been scammed.” Seeing that the people in the Western Castle were getting more and more flustered, Alex shouted, “Shut it! “Back then, we were the ones who decided to come here to kill Lu Chen and seize his White Fog City. Now, we haven’t even seen Lu Chen. “This must be the st*pid peacock’s illusion skill. It must have tampered with the return to the main world panel that just appeared!” Although James was still shaking, he forced himself to calm down and stared at the peacock in front of him. There was actually such a monster that could prevent him from returning to the main world.. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation<strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The Seven-colored Peacock’s ability to create illusions was too powerful! James looked around, trying to find a way to break out of this situation. He looked around and found that the space within a few thousand kilometers was filled with dust that was faintly flashing with golden light. If one did not look carefully, one would not have noticed this! James immediately understood that this dust was what the Seven-colored Peacock had scattered earlier. The reason why it didn’t attack him and the others was because it was setting up this dust so that he would not be able to escape and return to the main world. This was probably what the other party needed to create an environment favored to them! However, James was still very shocked. Although it was normal for a gold boss to have such high battle awareness, this gold dust actually had a certain amount of spatial power that could prevent others from returning to the main world… or could it be that the peacock’s illusion had reached the stage where it could be mistaken for the real thing? Regardless of the reason, the strength of this peacock had already exceeded everyone’s imagination! The Seven-colored Peacock watched as everyone continuously tried to return to the main world, but there was no way to return. When the Seven-colored Peacock saw this scene, the ridicule on its face was not concealed at all. The people in the Western Castle gradually fell into despair and lost their composure. Among these people, only James and Alex remained calm. However, they had no choice but to force themselves to calm down. However, the others were in complete chaos. ‘There were even a few people who desperately attacked the Seven-colored Peacock. However, what shocked them, even more, was that the peacock just stood there and let the others attack. However, the peacock did not even look fazed at the sight of being attacked. Could it be that this peacock was so powerful that it could ignore everyone’s attacks?! One had to know that the players here were all above level 30. How could they not even be able to break through the Rainbow Peacock’s defense? If that was the case, a place like the Mass Grave was really a place that players could not survive in. Could this be the Second World’s bug-like existence, the tomb of newbies? Seeing this scene, the people of the Western Castle were even more devastated! It could even be said that they were in despair! It was such an unbelievable and illogical scene that appeared in front of everyone. The peacock was even using its mouth to draw and comb its feathers. The tail behind it, which was several meters tall, kept shrinking and opening up. Under the sunlight, its tall and beautiful tail was emitting a dazzling light. It was faintly discernible, and it seemed to be both real and illusory. It was a little mesmerizing. However, it was just an illusion! Under the influence of the illusion, they were not even close to touching the Seven-colored Peacock. That was why the other party was not injured at all! It was impossible for them to fight their opponent if they could not reach them! James felt that something was wrong and immediately shouted at everyone, “Everyone, listen to my command and run out in all directions! “I just want to see how big this barrier can be! “As long as we escape from the Seven-colored Peacock’s illusion range, we will definitely be able to get out! “When that time comes, I don’t think it’ll be invisible to our attacks!” At this time, Alex also discovered this strange situation as well. In the air, there was a faint golden powder that was like fine dust that filled the domain. He immediately recalled the previous unreasonable behavior of the peacock that kept circling around them. Thinking of this, Alex also hurriedly shouted at the others, “Listen to James. Everyone, choose a direction and quickly rush out. Don’t turn back. Once we escape this place, we will meet again!” Hearing James and Alex’s words, everyone became slightly clear-headed. Without needing a second reminder, they directly chose the direction in front of them. Without turning back, they rushed out. No one was sure if they would be the next to die if they continued to stay here. Before he could leave, something happened. Another elder from the Western Castle was pecked to death by the Seven-colored Peacock. The peacock even deliberately used its sharp claws to ruthlessly scratch his body a few times, directly killing him. One had to know that this elder did not have any defensive equipment on him, so he could not take a punch from it at all. Out of everyone’s expectations, this battle seemed pretty tricky for James. When they decided to run, James immediately chose a direction with his back facing the Seven-colored Peacock and ran. With his speed, he could definitely catch up to Lu Chen’s with his fast walking shoes. James kept calculating in his heart. The range that the peacock had drawn should only be a kilometer long. It would probably only take a dozen seconds, at most a few dozen seconds, to pass through. Even if the golden powder scattered by the peacock could spread in all directions, five minutes would be enough for it to clear. At that time, perhaps he was hoping that the strange ability of the peacock would disappear. At the very least, it would not cause him and the others to be so passive, and he would be able to return to the main world. ‘When he retums to the main world, he would think of a way to deal with this Seven-colored Peacock in the future. Even if he invited his own elder to come over and take him as his pet, he believed that there would be many people who would be willing to take it in. After all, the peacock’s level was so high… it was indeed rare to see a pet with such strong combat strength. Although this Seven-colored Peacock was in a post-death state, as a gold boss, the physical body had completely recovered. Although it was still different from when the peacock was alive… at the very least, it looked no different from a living peacock. Thinking of this, James once again increased his speed and ran towards the edge. After running for a full four minutes, he began to sweat. The priest-like robe he was wearing was soaked, and there were droplets of water staining the ground. However, he had no time to pay attention to his image. In front of such a terrifying monster, he had to run away as soon as possible to survive. Otherwise, once his strength was reduced to level one… He would have no such status in the clan anymore. Ina large clan, strength was the king. He knew that the Second World would one day fuse with the main world. At that time, if his strength was weakened, he might completely lose the right to have a say within the clan. Finally, after running madly for a few dozen seconds, he could finally see something clearly in front of him. The hazy and somewhat illusory world disappeared, and a figure was running toward him! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation<strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Seeing that there was actually someone running towards him would be a lie to say that he was not panicking. It was this kind of chaotic beast that made the Dragon Country’s warriors turn around and return to the main world. Besides the members in the Western Castle, who else would get themselves in such a situation? Moreover, he was in the middle of everything, so who else could it be that was running towards him? This was the Second World of the Dragon Country. If anyone else came toward him, they would most likely be his enemies. For a moment, James regretted agreeing to come here with those people from the Westem Castle. At that time, he had agreed to come here just so that he could get White Fog City. If possible, he would even take over the Giant Lizard City. At that time, he had fantasized that he would be the first person in human history to become the City Lord of two cities. Now, his whole perception has changed. Not only was Lu Chen terrifying, but the Mass Grave was also a place where he could not escape unscathed. He was prepared. The cross and holy water in his hands were already prepared. No matter who the person in front of him was, he had to teach them a lesson. It would be best if he could reduce the opponent’s HP by more than half with a single strike. That way, he would not be easily killed. However, five seconds later, he realized that not only was the opponent charging at him, there were also people running towards him from other directions. They seemed to be closing in on him as if they planned to ruthlessly end his life here. However, when he really the opponent’s appearance, he was instantly stunned. This was because the opponent looked exactly the same as him. Not only did they look the same, but the equipment in their hands was just the same, even their clothes and all the stains on their clothes were a mirrored version of him. Not only did the other party look no different from him, but even the people in all directions also looked the same. In total, there seemed to be four of them, including himself. This time, James’s heart turned cold. He felt a little creeped out. What kind of place was this? Right now, James was hesitating about what he should do, the person next to him, who looked exactly like him, suddenly attacked! He took out a knife and directly slashed at the other three people. He swept with great force, obviously including everyone in his line of attack! At the same time, the fake James on his right attacked as well. He took out a sword from under his clothes and directly stabbed him! Without a break, the person in front of him took out a silver dagger and slashed at his neck too! At this time, James could no longer sit still and wait for death. James instantly jumped and moved back by 10 meters. He took out the small cross in his hand and directly smashed it at the three people in front of him. The skill he used was similar to the one he used on the Seven-colored Peacock. The cross suddenly became bigger and was 10 meters tall. It directly covered the three people under it. With a boom, two lumps of flesh exploded, turning into a bloody mist. Immediately after, there was a shattering sound. A doll appeared on the ground, and the third person who had been hit instantly disappeared. James recognized this thing! It was a Substitute Doll! This was also an item in the Second World game, and this item was of a gold tier. This golden Substitute Doll’s skill was that when its master was hit by a fatal attack, the Substitute Doll could block one attack and let the master live. At the same time, the Substitute Doll was a one-time use item that ignored the enemy’s attack power. This Substitute Doll’s ability was too powerful. No matter how powerful the opponent was, the wielder would have a chance to save their own lives. If not for the fact that it could only be used once, it would definitely not only be a gold piece of equipment. James was a little stunned. He knew that this was a trap! That was because the only gold Substitute Doll in the world was in the hands of Alex in the Western Castle, the identity of the person who was killed by him was self-evident! It was the Castle Lord of the Western Castle. Everything is turning freakier and freakier! ‘At the same time, the other two bodies that were smashed into a bloody mess started to change. Their messed and mushed-up bodies slowly merged together to become a human-shaped body again. On that bloody face, one could vaguely recognize that it was the other two elders of the Western Castle! What was going on? ‘There were three people who looked exactly like him on the opposite side just now, but after they died, they became the higher-ups of the Western Castle. Doubt, fear, and confusion all etched into James’s heart. All kinds of complicated emotions flashed across James’s face. At this moment, he felt like he was turning slightly crazy. The Seven-colored Peacock had not even revealed its true form… Yet let had already used two elders and let the Lord of the Western Castle as a Substitute Doll. Moreover, all of them had clearly fled in different directions. Why would they come back and gather here in the end? No matter the reason, he did not have the luxury to overlook this matter. In the distance, he could faintly see an extremely huge war-chariot-like bird. It was the Seven-colored Peacock! As for the Seven-colored Peacock, other than the first two attacks, it did not attack any further. It had decided to leave James alone. At this moment, James was extremely terrified. He could not imagine what kind of fear he would experience if he continued to face the Seven-colored Peacock. This gold boss was very likely to become a recurring nightmare that he would never be able to face. At the thought of this, he did not dare to hesitate any longer. He knew very well that he did not possess the three-second luxury to return to the city. That would be impossible considering what the peacock has done when he tried that! He directly took out a scroll from his pocket. It was the ultra-long-distance teleportation scroll. If the other people in the Western Castle were still here, they would definitely be shocked by this item. Back then, they were able to come to the Second World of the Dragon Country because of this thing, but all the teleportation scrolls had been used up. Right now, James, who had taken out another one at the critical moment, was wary of his surroundings. After all, he had come to the territory of the Dragon Country, a foreign country. He did not know what he would face should he use it. What he was most afraid of was that the Dragon Country would not be able to kill him in advance and end up luring him into a trap. At that time, he would have no choice but to concede. He had thought that the worst situation he would encounter when he came to the Second World of the Dragon Country was that the great elder of the Dragon Country would take out a top-notch killing intent and kill him here. In order to prevent such a situation from ever happening, he had secretly prepared an extra ultra-long-distance teleportation scroll. However, he never expected himself to be forced into a situation where this item was desperately required.. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation<strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation In this silver territory, silver bosses were everywhere! Even gold existences were powerful! James even suspected that it was impossible for there to be only one gold monster here. ‘What the h*ll was this place? Why was this place called the six great silver territories around White Fog City?! How could there be a silver territory like this?! However, James had no time to think about these questions at this moment, because when he took out the ultra-long-distance teleportation scroll… The Seven-colored Peacock noticed his strange behavior and immediately cried out loudly. This cry made James feel a little dizzy, and his eyes began to glaze over. The movements of his hands stopped after the cry. At this time, the pure white jade plate on James’s neck suddenly emitted an intense light, and there was even someone singing a holy song, instantly waking James up from his confusion. James’s body suddenly trembled, and he instantly regained consciousness. At this time, the Seven-colored Peacock in the distance also noticed that James was awake, and directly rushed toward James. The distance between the two sides was less than 100 meters. Within a second, the peacock would be able to kill him here. James did not think that he could withstand the attack of the Seven-colored Peacock. He quickly tore the scroll, hoping for a quick escape. However, the Seven-colored Peacock did not stop in its tracks. It kept pouncing towards him, and its claws almost managed to grab onto his sleeve. Fortunately, at the same time, James’s body suddenly disappeared in the air. The scroll in his hand also turned into stars, carrying James’s body and floating into the distance. Only the Seven-colored Peacock was left, its face full of frustration. It continuously wailed and flapped its wings on the spot, as if it was expressing its anger. In the next moment, James’s body reappeared in the Western Castle. The sweat on his forehead fell like raindrops, instantly soaking the game pod under him. His face was even paler. In his game pod, facing the enclosed and narrow space in all directions, James’s anxiety caused him to suddenly punch out, directly knocking the game pod cover off the machine, then he heavily panted as he to the side. James panted heavily as if he had just experienced a nightmare. His body felt like jelly, and the game pod was broken. The wires were still emitting electrical sounds. Obviously, the game pod had been destroyed by his huge impact. However, James was not in the mood to care about this. His heart was filled with the joy of surviving a disaster. Unfortunately, James could still hear the echo of his people screaming and wailing for help. Not only that, the other people in the game pods were making whimpering sounds as if they were in a terrible nightmare. These people were the western elders. It was as if they had seen Hell on Earth. In his mind, some of them had been smashed into a bloody mist and some of them had been mercilessly pierced through their bodies. Although they only died in the game, it felt so real to them. At the same time, he could not firmly confirm that the Second World was slowly merging with the real world. Ina few days, the main world and the Second World might really merge. At that time, there would be no talk of resurrection. Out of the five game pods next to James, only one of them did not make a sound. It did not make a tragic scream, only a sigh. The person in the game pod slowly pushed open the door and sat up. He frowned and looked at the other game pods that were filled with whimpers. Then, he motioned to his followers. “Wake these people up. What the heck are you just standing there for?!” The servants did not dare to be negligent. They immediately went forward and opened the game pod doors of the other four people. A few people instantly sat up as if they had springs on their bodies. Then, they panted heavily, their faces were red, and their hair was a mess. It was as if they had just witnessed something indescribable in the game pod. It took five minutes for these people to gradually calm down. The reason why they had such a reaction was that they were different from ordinary players. Ordinary players played video games all year round, so they were not fazed when they died and resurrected in games. It was normal for them, but for these experts who had experienced life-and-death battles all year round, it felt completely different. This kind of state of being in a life-or-death situation made them feel suffocated. The Lord of the Western Castle did not pay attention to them. Instead, he turned to look at James with a hint of doubt in his eyes. “James, what did you see before you left?” James’s eyes turned several times before he finally decided to answer honestly. “I saw three people who looked exactly like me.” Alex was not as angry as James imagined after hearing this. He only nodded slowly. “Then it seems that the situation we encountered was the same. I saw four of me.” Two of the other four elders of the Western Castle did not understand what James and the other party were talking about. After all, when James killed the other three of them, they had already been pecked to death by the Seven-colored Peacock. The other two elders who were killed by James with the cross were still in fear of the peacock. However, it could be imagined that when they found out that the person who had killed them was James, they would be extremely bamboozled. They could not blame James at all. After all, the three of them had attacked first. Everyone in the Second World had encountered the same situation. They had all seen four of themselves appear in the Second World. This scene made many people lose their rationality, which was why they had attacked first. Under such circumstances, James had to make a move. The entire room was silent for a moment. In the end, it was Alex who spoke first. “James, if it’s possible, please return to your father and have a good meal with him. “The situation in the Mass Grave is far too complicated for us. It’s far from what you and I can handle.” James nodded slightly, indicating that he agreed with the other party. However, he did not immediately agree to his request. Instead, he asked, “If my father is here, I’m afraid that wouldn’t be possible.” Alex naturally understood this reason. This was because James’s strength was already very powerful, far above his own. Moreover, James’s father was an existence with extraordinary strength. Even as the Holy Seer of the west, his position was very aloof. The Holy Seer of the west was somewhat similar to the ancient martial arts aristocratic families in the Dragon Country. The ancient martial arts aristocratic families did not care about worldly affairs and focused on cultivation.. However, the Holy Seer controlled everything in their country in an all-rounded way! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation<strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Alex thought for a long time and seemed to have made up his mind, finally, he opened his mouth and said, “If your father can come over, not only will I give White Fog City to you, but I will also give all of Lu Chen and Xiao Bai’s assets to you! “Your father would only have to leave the Giant Lizard City to our Western Castle. “As for the Mass Grave in the Second World, your father can harvest them at will. If there is anything we need later, we will do it ourselves. “Naturally, we also hope that if some of them can be sold to us, we can also exchange them for something of equal value with you.” James nodded slightly. Obviously, he approved of what the other party suggested. Although the people in the Western Castle had always called James the Cardinal, his true identity was only that of a Deacon. It was only because of his father’s existence that everyone respected James. Otherwise, although James was in the aurous stage, the Western Castle, which had a deep foundation of power… would probably brush him aside. After all, fighting in a war did not necessarily require a one-on-one fight. James’s father was the true Cardinal. Among the red-robed main characters in the current world, his father’s strength could at least be ranked in the top ten. It was purely because of the existence of such a powerful father that everyone was sure that his son would also become a Cardinal in the future. After all, the west’s trust in bloodlines was far greater than the east’s. The east believed that kings and generals chose power over bloodlines. As long as you had the ability, no matter what your background was, you could eventually become a king and general. In the west, it was all about what family you were born into. If you had the bloodline of a knight, then you were born a noble. If you were the descendant of a slave, then you would be a slave for the rest of your life and would never be able to turn over a new leaf. Hearing Alex’s promise to him, James nodded slightly. He knew that Alex had already given him a huge concession. If it were not for the fact that Xiao Bai had the Giant Lizard City, he would have died a long time ago. Moreover, James’s father accepting this mission would probably benefit everyone. Any random existence in the Mass Grave would be a gold boss and not just any ordinary gold boss… If they really went into the Mass Grave, there would be far greater bosses inside that were full of bountiful items. James was sure that his father would be tempted in the loot. Even if there were only a few existences that were similar to the Seven-colored Peacock, it would still be an extremely glorious thing for his father to take them in as his spiritual pets. Although his father was far above the soul stage, he could not do everything himself. If he could even have one of those gold bosses as his spiritual pet… That would be astounding! His father would not even need to pick fights anymore, just one look at his pet would make people cower in fear. ‘When that time came, his father’s influence as the Holy Seer would definitely be greater. Thinking of this, James immediately agreed. “Don’t worry. I’ll definitely pass this matter on to my father. When the time comes, he should come and help. “However, how are you going to deal with Xiao Bai Now? I suggest that we let him do his own thing first. Don’t tell him anything that happened today.” Alex took a deep breath. His deep eyes revealed a hint of viciousness, “Xiao Bai tricked me. I can’t just take this loss. Didn’t he want to summon the Giant Lizard City to fight with Lu Chen? “We should let him go. Both of them will be badly hurt from the fight, and then we can reap the benefits.” James heard Alex’s words and did not know what to say. He opened his mouth a few times to speak, but in the end, he swallowed his words, leaving only a gaze of a fool. Alex tured around and noticed James’s expression and instantly understood what James meant. James’s eyes were clearly asking him if Xiao Bai could defeat Lu Chen. Alex was a little embarrassed by what he said… so he quickly defended his thoughts, “I know that Lu Chen’s strength is extraordinary, but the Giant Lizard City that Xiao Bai obtained is stronger than Lu Chen’s White Fog City. Moreover, Lu Chen is currently in a weakened state. “Tm sure that Xiao Bai has a chance of winning.” James slowly retracted his gaze. Although he still did not say anything out loud, he still muttered in his heart. ‘No matter how fast your HP recovers, Lu Chen can cut off your HP in one move. How are you going to recover from such an attack? ‘Xiao Bai might even be killed before he could take out his city.’ If it was just between Lu Chen and Xiao Bai, it would be fine. To him, it did not matter who won. However, the problem was that if Lu Chen won and his country was strengthened again, who knew what other tricks Lu Chen would play against them. This genius had gone from an ordinary high school student to the strongest existence in the Second World in just a few months. If Lu Chen developed further at this time, his father’s men might not be able to defeat Lu Chen at all! James understood that although Lu Chen’s resources were very powerful, it was far from enough to have his father to personally come and finish him off. After all, as a top-notch Cardinal, he was very busy. Moreover, many of his father’s men had already entered the ruins to explore. James was worried that his father might not be too interested in the White Fog City and the Giant Lizard City. However, on second thought, James did not want to bother trying to persuade that old man. If Lu Chen really killed Xiao Bai, then he would directly find someone else to deal with Lu Chen, and all the benefits would be enjoyed by himself. James had already made up his mind to ask his father to send a powerful expert over. If it was just an ordinary Deacon, they would probably have to put up a good fight Lu Chen. It would be very difficult for him to obtain an opponent that could suppress Lu Chen easily. Moreover, this id*ot from the Western Castle was still trying to get Xiao Bai to go against Lu Chen. Once Lu Chen’s power became stronger, who knew what kind of ridiculous skills he would use. Thinking of this, James immediately stood up and left as soon as possible. Although he did not get the majority of the benefits this time, he had fought for so long in the Mass Grave and killed many monsters. His level had increased so it was not a loss for him just yet.. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation<strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation ‘The Western Castle members and the others fled in a sorry state. It was not easy for them to return to the main world. It had to be said that they had been greatly scammed this time. At this time, in the Second World of the Mass Grave, a Seven-colored Peacock with an incomparably terrifying aura was kneeling in front of a human, trembling. It did not even dare to raise its head, as if it was waiting for the other party’s punishment. The person in front of it was a man who was emitting golden light. He looked at the Seven-colored Peacock and said, “Forget it, it’s not your fault that you let them go. “It’s not easy to kill people like them who hold high positions. You can only blame me for being too merciful. “Otherwise, those guys from the Western Castle would not have been this impudent.” Hearing the man’s words, the Seven-colored Peacock slowly stood up, and its body barely stopped trembling. Who would have thought that a gold prowess that was off the charts, a monster that almost killed six spirituals, and even a gold stage expert, would be so afraid of a human? The man looked at the Seven-colored Peacock in front of him and comforted it again, “You did very well just now. Your skills have been practiced to perfection. It was not in vain for me to have taught you well.” Hearing the man’s praise, the Seven-colored Peacock immediately chirped in response. One could feel the gratitude in its voice. Back then, it was not even an ordinary silver boss. After hundreds of years of practice, it had finally become a gold existence. It was a miracle that it could improve by this much, especially when it was already dead. No one had ever seen the man in front of them fight with his full strength, and no monster dared to disrespect him or ever find out. They only knew that when this man fell from the sky a few hundred years ago, his aura was already monstrous, and no one dared to provoke him. Moreover, the few who were defeated by this monstrous aura knew how powerful he could be. If it were not for the strong aura of death surrounding this place, the few of them might have come down and exterminated all the monsters here. The man stroked the Seven-colored Peacock’s head lovingly. “After those people from the Western Castle left, I’m afraid you still have things to do. “Tm sure that the hundreds of people at the foot of the mountain will come again. When the time comes, you might still have to go.” Thinking of this, the Seven-colored Peacock revealed a puzzled look, then realized that the man was talking about Lu Chen and the others. Thinking of the performance of those people, the Seven-colored Peacock’s expression became a little serious, but there was no fear at all. If there were no accidents, these people were no match at all. Moreover, Lu Chen had released a powerful attack, causing all of them here to be wary of it. It was already very impressive that he could release such a powerful attack at once. As for Little Golden Dragon, the Seven-colored Peacock did not even take him seriously. The little snake was much weaker than the peacock. The peacock was confident that it could fight at least ten of those in a go. The only thing that made them a little worried was that although Tang Xiaoging — who had stood beside Little Green Dragon — looked to be in the aurous stage as well, they did not know why she kept exuding a sense of danger. However, although this gold boss had already sensed Tang Xiaoging’s danger, this man’s order was unquestionable. Since he wanted to attack those people himself, no matter how powerful they were, every single one of them had to charge forward. Obviously, after becoming a gold boss, the peacock’s intelligence and attack power far surpassed that of a silver boss. However, the only difference was that its body size was far inferior to those silver bosses. One had to know that those silver bosses had bodies that could cover the Sun. Their burly bodies were either as tall as a building or as tall as a mountain. The pressure they gave off was something that ordinary monsters could not compare to. However, as a gold boss, this peacock’s body was only as tall as an armored vehicle. It was only five to six meters tall. Although it looked much larger than a human player, it could not compare to a silver boss in terms of size. ‘When monsters reached a certain level of training, their combat power would no longer be measured by their body size. Large meant that one was clumsy, slow, and an easy target. Therefore, when they reached gold rank, they could no longer use their body size to judge the strength of the monsters. The hotel where Lu Chen was in the main world emitted metallic sounds every day. That was because the warriors were training their bodies and mental state. In order to be able to better display their strength in the Second World, they had to make themselves stronger and their physical condition better. The training they were doing now was not a lethal method that focused on explosive force fighting, but a way to recuperate and regain their strength. At the same time, the Dragon Country had also provided them with a large number of weapons and invited many famous doctors from various countries to help them recuperate. With such assistance, the warrior’s bodies were improving at an extremely fast speed. The various internal injuries on their bodies did not have the time to recuperate in the past, nor did they have the opportunity to receive such treatment, however, in these few days, their bodies had greatly improved. However, they still needed a few more days before being ready. Only after the vast majority of their internal injuries were completely dealt with would they be able to enter the Mass Grave again. This break was crucial for them to grow better as a fighter. At this moment, Lu Chen was also prepared to take this opportunity to make a trip to the Tang family of the ancient aristocratic family. After all, the Tang family seemed to have always been concerned about his White Fog City. Moreover, he was also the creditor of the Tang family. That Disguise Mask was still hidden by them. Therefore, Lu Chen only rested for a day before he set off with Tang Xiaoging and the others on the road to the Tang family of the ancient aristocratic family. However, this time, he did not bring Liu Changping and Liu Yuan along, after all, he did not want the entire Dragon Team to be involved in the enmity between him and the Tang family. Tang Xiaoging lowered her head timidly along the way, occasionally raising her eyes to glance at Lu Chen a few times. She felt a little uneasy. In the end, she could not help but ask Lu Chen, “Will you blame our Tang family for trying to snatch your White Fog City away?” Lu Chen smiled slightly and raised his hand to pat Tang Xiaoging’s head. “Silly, you’re overthinking things. There are a lot of people who want White Fog City, not just your family. “At least your Tang family sent you here to speak, unlike the Wu family who directly seized it. “Twon’t be easily bullied, trust me on this.” Lu Chen knew clearly in his heart that although his strength was not strong enough to face such a colossus like the Tang family head-on, his strength was probably inferior to the Wu family’s. Did the Tang family really want to snatch White Fog City that badly? It was probably true. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation<strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation If it had been someone else who owned White Fog City, the Tang family might have made their move long ago. However, Lu Chen was known to have many tricks up his sleeves. Even if he really could not win, he still had a teleportation scroll in his hands. He could run to other places at any given time. Lu Chen even knew that he might not even need a teleportation scroll. This was because the first elder had once said that even if he were to meet with big trouble, there was no need for him to be shy and ask for help. Since the first elder had offered this, it meant that he would definitely be able to solve it. It was likely that the first elder’s ancient martial arts aristocratic family was of high status. The third in charge chief and the first elder were both civil and military officers. Although they were both in the upper echelons of the country, their responsibilities were different. Tang Xiaoging, Lu Chen, and their pets set off on the road to the Tang family. They drove their SUVs along the way. After taking a full day’s time, they finally arrived at the Tang family’s residence. The Tang family was located on a mountain. As soon as they reached the foot of the mountain, there saw a huge plaque. It spanned across the city walls on both sides. There were two lofty words written on it — Tang family These two words had an ancient and simple style of writing. These words were filled with a sense of power. It was as if they could break ten thousand laws with a single force. Lu Chen even felt that the power they possessed had already passed through worldly beings. That kind of attack did not mean that a fist was actually attacking Lu Chen. Instead, Lu Chen felt that his mind was enduring supreme pressure. That kind of attack that came from his mind made him feel extremely pressured. This mental punch had caught him off guard. In the face of such a powerful punch, Lu Chen did not choose to dodge. Instead, he controlled his mind power and formed a mental fist as well, clashing with the mental fist in front of him! However, this scene did not happen in the eyes of the others. Even Little Golden Dragon did not feel anything strange, let alone Rollie. Weiwei saw Lu Chen suddenly stop in his tracks as he closed his eyes and did not move at all. However, the robe on his body could not help but flutter backward. It was as if there was a strong gust of wind blowing in front of him. Lan Weiwei subconsciously wanted to protect him, at the same time, she prepared to wake Lu Chen up. However, this was stopped by Tang Xiaoging. “Don’t be nervous. It’s fine. He’s currently undergoing our Tang family’s test.” “What test?” Lan Weiwei was a little puzzled when she heard this because she did not see any elders appear to compete with Lu Chen. Little golden Dragon hissed when he heard the Tang family being mentioned. Lan Weiwei also looked at the words on the plaque, but she could not find anything wrong with it. They just looked like majestic words. “Does everyone who comes to the Tang family undergo this kind of test?” ‘Tang Xiaoqing’s eyes were complicated, and there was even a hint of envy in them. “It’s not like that. Most people who come to the Tang family won’t feel anything. The last person who went through this kind of test was a person from hundreds of years ago.” Little Golden Dragon tilted his head and looked at Tang Xiaoqing, waiting for her to continue explaining. “First of all, these two words are only targeted at people outside the Tang family. “Moreover, anyone who can sense this test and be targeted will definitely have a future achievement that will be much stronger than our Tang family’s ancestors.” It had to be said that although Tang Xiaogqing was a member of the Tang family, there was indeed a hint of envy in her eyes, but it was more because she was happy that Lu Chen’s future would reach such a high level. “The words on the plaque were written by the ancestors of our Tang family,” she explained to the others, her eyes shining with proudness. “These words contain a great essence. “If an enemy comes to the door, then the first thing the enemy must go through is the mental punch that comes from it. “This will not cause a substantial blow to the person physically, but a spiritual suppression. It could even cut off their martial arts path when a person’s faith is destroyed. “Everything they ever fought hard for will end here should they fail.” Lan Weiwei could not help but be a little shocked by Tang Xiaoqing’s statement. This kind of blow was even more severe than physical damage. Physical damage could be recovered, but once a person’s path of martial arts was completely destroyed, then their lifetime achievements would go astray. Hearing this, Lan Weiwei became a little nervous. “How will it turn out for Lu Chen now?!” ‘Tang Xiaoqing stared at Lu Chen and her heart fluttered. She smiled and said, “It’s okay. Chenchen didn’t come here to oppose the Tang family. He came here with good intentions. “Therefore, the Tang family’s ancestors wouldn’t make things difficult for him. “This mental fist would only help him improve. “Not only would it help him improve his fist technique, but it would also be of great help to his comprehension of other laws. “This fist intent will constantly test his limits and temper his will. Only then will it be able to better stimulate his potential.” Hearing this, Lan Weiwei was completely relieved. ‘When Little Golden Dragon heard Tang Xiaoqing’s explanation, he was actually eager to give it a try, but he still could not feel the fist’s intent. At this moment, in Lu Chen’s mind, a fist suddenly condensed from the Tang family’s plaque. Riding on the monstrous power, it whistled through the air and continued to expand. In the end, it filled Lu Chen’s entire consciousness. At this moment, in his consciousness, Lu Chen was like an ant trying to use all his strength to resist that huge fist. ‘The power of that fist was simply too overbearing. Even though Lu Chen used all his strength to attack with the fist condensed from his consciousness, he was still unable to stop the momentum of retreating. That huge being seemed to have an overwhelming momentum as it directly pushed the fist formed from his consciousness. It crushed his own fist and headed towards the tiny Lu Chen. Seeing that the huge fist was getting closer and closer to him, Lu Chen shouted, “Since you’re here, I’ll let you have a taste of my own!” After Lu Chen’s fist disappeared, the huge fist lost its resistance and charged towards Lu Chen. At this moment, Lu Chen suddenly withdrew his left fist from his waist. After taking half a step back, he exerted his full strength and charged towards the Tang family’s huge fist in the sky. Once again, they collided. This time, in the spiritual world, Lu Chen did not condense a mental fist. Instead, his own fist collided with the Tang’s. Although Lu Chen withstood the first wave of attack, the Tang’s strength was simply too powerful. Under the immense strength, his arms began to tremble and he was pushed backward! The strength of this fist was simply too great. One had to know that the owner of this fist was at least an existence that surpassed the original spiritual stage with ease. Even experts above the gold stage were far inferior to Lu Chen.. <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation<strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Faced with the fist’s intent left behind by the ancestors of the Tang family, Lu Chen had no way to block it! At this moment, Lu Chen had already used all his strength to block the first wave of attacks. Lu Chen’s fist kept shrinking back, and his arm kept trembling. The huge fist in the sky kept pushing down, almost touching his nose. Lu Chen was unwilling, but in the end, he let out a long sigh. Was he really going to admit defeat just like that? At this moment, something appeared in Lu Chen’s mind. [Fist God: Your understanding of fist techniques has reached an unfathomable level. When you use your fists, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow along with your level!] [Fist Intent: When you use your fist, your Fist Intent will burst forth. Your attack power will be increased to 300%!) [Bull Fighter: Your attacks contain inner strength. You can attack enemies from a distance without hurting things nearby. Opponents damaged by the Fist God title will receive continuous internal damage.] [Wind Fist: The speed of your punches has reached an unfathomable level. Your attack interval will be greatly shortened. Your attack speed will be increased by 600%. You can also use your maximum attack speed for an unlimited number of times. You will be immune to side effects. lasts for 10 seconds. Side effect — the speed of your punches is too fast, the attack speed will be increased by 500% per second, ignoring the physical burden. After using it continuously for 10 seconds, you will fall into a three-hour period of weakness. During the period of weakness, the body’s condition will drop to 10%.] [Six-armed Asura: When you use this skill, four arms will instantly grow out from your back, attacking the enemy. During the attack, the arms may not be able to withstand the force of the attack and break. When the last arm is broken, you can randomly strike out 10% to 1000% of the total attack of the first ten seconds! The six arms are all illusory arms. After all the arms are broken, they will return to the state of two arms and have no effect on your body.] This Fist God title was awesome! Although this attack power was not as powerful as the Sword God’s 700% incrase, it was still more powerful than the Sword God’s attack power. Most importantly, the 500% attack speed boost, coupled with ten seconds of continuous damage output, was really awesome! One had to know that although the Sword God’s attack speed boost was already very exaggerated, Lu Chen’s current body attribute could not withstand such a powerful speed. To be exact, although he could withstand a bit of the Sword God’s maximum attack speed, after that, he would no longer have the ability to fight. However, the Fist God was different! The Fist God could continuously attack within ten seconds! According to Lu Chen’s current attack speed, his attack speed was 29 attacks per second. Under the Fist God’s state, a full 135 attacks could be launched in a second! Lu Chen’s current attack was 78,860 points. With this, he could unleash 10 million critical hits per second! If it was 10 seconds in a row, it would be 100 million critical hits in a go! This kind of attack power was impressive! ‘The last Six-armed Asura skill could be used in conjunction with the Fist God title, making him unstoppable! In other words, if he were to use his Fist God skill in the first ten seconds, together with the Six-armed Asura skill, he could unleash a maximum of 1,100,000,000 attacks! An attack of this level, if it was used against the Guardian General back then, it would be able to take out more than half of the opponent’s HP! Instantly, Lu Chen burst out with incomparable confidence! At the same time, Lu Chen was very surprised. After all, this was in the main world, not the Second World. He was shocked to uncover another title in the main world. Did this mean that the fusion speed between the Second World and the main world had increased again? When the Fist God title appeared, Lu Chen immediately felt the increase in his body’s strength. He did not have time to think too much and immediately used his skill. “Six-armed Asura!” The clothes on his body instantly exploded, and four fists appeared on his back! In an instant, six arms spread out at the same time, facing the huge fist in the sky! He faced the huge fist in the sky, and suddenly exploded with the power of six fists. Six arms crazily stretched out toward the huge fist in the sky. With a speed that was almost invisible to the naked eye, the six fists smashed toward the huge fist in the sky. In one second, more than 100 punches were thrown out! One second! Two seconds! Three Seconds! Lu Chen’s six fists were thrown towards the sky with all his might. However, the giant fist was really much too powerful. Even if he attacked like this, the fist was still getting closer and closer to his face! However, in the end, the speed of the punches finally slowed down, but the large fist did not budge any further. Hm?” A voice seemed to appear out of nowhere. The voice of an old man came from the fist intent. He was the ancestor of the Tang family! Lu Chen actually withstood the power left behind by the ancestor of the Tang family. However, after the ancestor’s voice appeared, the originally stagnant fist intent increased by a few more layers of strength! Lu Chen’s attack did not stop at all. However, under immense pressure, he looked like he was about to buckle. Finally, one of Lu Chen’s six arms broke from the backlash. It completely exploded, turning into specks of starlight and disappearing. ‘The power of the ancestor was too powerful. Just the fist intent left on the plaque back then was enough to overwhelm Lu Chen. In just a moment, the punches continued to slow down more, and the mountain-like pressure slowly pressed down on Lu Chen. Although Lu Chen’s arms kept exploding, he did not have time to think too much. The other five arms were still crazily bombarding the sky! At this time, even the huge fist in the sky was burning hot due to Lu Chen’s rapid impact, turning into scarlet red. The huge fist in the sky gradually pressed down on Lu Chen. Although it moved a little bit every second, it brought great pressure to Lu Chen, Even Lu Chen’s legs were slightly trembling, but he still refused to give up… the remaining five fists burst out with a higher speed and suddenly smashed into the sky. If other players saw Lu Chen’s performance, they would definitely be shocked, because no other person could achieve such a powerful punch speed and strength. The strength of the Fist God was terrifying! If it were not for the huge difference in strength between the two sides, Lu Chen might have been able to beat this huge fist into a pulp in a single move. However, the Tang family’s patriarch was such a powerful figure when he was alive. Even after he died, the two words that he casually wrote were not something that Lu Chen could withstand. The terrifying pressure continued on! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation<strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Even though Lu Chen had used all his strength, the huge fist was still approaching. Lu Chen could only continue to use all his strength under the blessing of the Fist God to attack the huge fist in the sky. Lu Chen did not believe that his proficiency in using fists had already reached the maximum level. Especially since his Six-armed Asura skill was the last hidden ultimate move! Lu Chen’s five fists were under tremendous pressure during the intense confrontation. Two of them instantly turned into dust and shattered beside Lu Chen. At this moment, the pressure on Lu Chen felt even greater. There were only three fists left. The speed of the sky’s fist descent did not slow down at all. It still pressed Lu Chen down with an unstoppable force. Under this kind of attack speed, Lu Chen was able to unleash an attack power of ten million points every second. However, at the top of the mountain, in a magnificent palace, a group of people were gathered in the hall. They were watching Lu Chen with eager eyes. ‘When everyone saw that Lu Chen was actually able to activate the fist intent, their eyelids immediately twitched slightly. Although their attention on Lu Chen had already reached a very high level… They still did not expect that he would be able to affect the Tang family’s plaque. One had to know that there were very few people who were able to trigger the Tang family’s plaque. Especially in the past 1,000 years, there were only two people who were able to trigger the fist’s intent. The last time was also several 100 years ago. Moreover, none of these people were from the Tang family. Hence, everyone from the Tang family thought that their own were unable to trigger the appearance of the fist intent. This also became something that everyone tacitly agreed on. However, only the current ruler of the Tang family understood that the reason why they were unable to trigger fist intent was because their comprehension of the laws was not high enough. The power of the laws, the lower-level was blade intent, sword intent, and fist intent, which were inclined towards physical attacks. These were all branches of the metal-type laws. The middle-level was light, darkness, water, fire, earth, metal, and wood. The higher-level ones were the space and time laws. These were things that had never been seen before. The most common ones were the elementary level. Once one could comprehend the middle-level laws, they would be able to establish a sector for themselves. In this world, they would become existences that would not be easily provoked. The five people sitting here, although they were not that powerful, had their own comprehension of the elementary-level laws. They could feel the fist intent in front of the Tang family’s plaque, but they could not activate it. They had to sit quietly in front of the plaque for a long time before they could feel even the slightest bit of it. In just a few breaths of time, they would always withdraw from that state of comprehension. This was not much use to their own improvement. Therefore, naturally, no one would do such a laborious and unrewarding thing. Originally, these people were in the Tang family’s palace to observe Lu Chen’s condition from a distance just to check on his strength. However, they never expected that Lu Chen would be able to sense the fist intent before he even entered the door. Ordinary members of the Tang family did not understand the secret of the fist intent. However, those elders who were able to sit here understood how terrifying the fist intent was. Moreover, they were people who could be chosen by the fist intent, they were definitely martial arts geniuses that were one in ten thousand. The family head, Tang Zhantian, did not say anything. The elder on his right was called Tang Zhanfeng. He was Tang Xiaoging’s second uncle. He held a bottle of wine in his hand. His face was unkempt and his beard was disheveled. When he saw that Lu Chen could actually feel the fist intent, his eyes were wide open. However, his mouth was slightly agape as he said, “I did not expect this kid to possess such skills. If we want to take White Fog City, it would be best to directly kill him here! Otherwise, if his cultivation level rises in the future, I’m sure that it will be disadvantageous to our Tang family.” He understood in his heart that if he robbed such a genius of a treasure and allowed him to grow up later, he would definitely be an overpowering existence. At that time, the Tang family would probably be in a lot of trouble. In the future, even if they were able to eliminate this person, the Tang family would definitely not be able to maintain their position as the second most powerful ancient martial arts aristocratic family. It was very likely that if they were careless, they would not even be able to compare to the Wu family. This result was something that the Tang family simply could not accept. However, on the other side of Tang Zhantian, the family head, there was an elder who wore a gray long robe. His face was yellowish and his face was sallow. His peach blossom eyes were filled with wisdom. He used his hand to stroke his goatee, he cut straight to the chase. “Why don’t you use your brain and think about what’s happening? Look at how Tang Xiaoqing is looking at Lu Chen. Are you sure you want to do this? “Aren’t you afraid that your first niece will pull every strand of your beard off again?” Hearing this, Tang Zhanfeng’s body suddenly quivered. As if he had recalled some bad memories, he hurriedly protected his beard. He chuckled and continued, “Although White Fog City is good, it’s not like our Tang family doesn’t have a castle in the Second World. A mere White Fog City is nothing compared to that, no? “Compared to having that city, I feel that this kid has a lot of talent. Isn’t it more interesting to have him join our Tang family than to have this city?” He expressed his opinion casually. Obviously, he did not take White Fog City seriously. Lu Chen is a kid with decent strength, why not take him in and cultivate his skills? After all, he was only in the spiritual stage. He could be pushed further. Even the youngest member of the younger generation, Tang Xiaoging, was in the golden stage. There were five people in this room. They were the five Tang brothers. The moment the third brother opened his mouth, he immediately received the support of a person who was dressed in a brown long robe. He had a muscular body, a simple, honest, and kind face. This person was the fourth brother. “He’s right. This guy is talented. I think if he is accepted into our Tang family, our Tang family will earn a lot of money! “In this way, he belongs to our Tang family, and White Fog City will indirectly belong to us as well. “Not only would we gain a city, but we will also gain a terrifying potential. It’s definitely worth it.” The second brother’s face was flushed red from being opposed by the third brother. In addition, the fourth brother obviously supported the third brother’s idea. Tang Zhanfeng’s face was obviously embarrassed Tang Zhanfeng was a straightforward person. Although he liked to meddle in other people’s affairs, he was not good with words. However, he still stuck his neck out and stubbornly said, “I guess it’s pretty amazing that this kid can sense the fist intent, but what can he do? “Thinking back to how powerful that person was a few hundred years ago, didn’t he still fall into the Mass Grave and die there?” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation<strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation At this moment, a man dressed in white by the side let out a long breath. This person carried a sword on his back, and strands of white hair neatly combed into the rest of his hair in front of everyone. His face was expressionless, and the middle-aged man with starry brows and sword-like eyes slowly opened his eyes. His eyes flickered with determination. Although he was the youngest among them, his martial art skills were the highest. Even when compared to the family head, Tang Zhanguo, he was still a little stronger. This person was Tang Xiaoging’s fifth uncle, Tang Feng. He slowly said, “What you said made sense. “Even Han Tianyi who died hundreds of years ago in the Mass Grave was still killed by the other ancient martial arts aristocratic families in the end. “One must know that he was really the number one person in the last few hundred years. Didn’t he still end up getting defeated? “If a genius dies young, then he can’t be considered an expert. He’s just a dead man.” Then, he changed the topic. His eyes were filled with yearning and fighting spirit. “If only Han Tianyi didn’t die. I really wanted to fight with him to see who was the stronger one.” That’s right. In the public of the ancient martial arts aristocratic families, Tang Feng was the number one expert! It was because of his rise that the Tang family was able to secure the position of number two. If it was not for the fact that the number one ancient martial arts aristocratic family had a deep foundation, it would have been possible for the Tang family to become number one. “Han Tianyi? Don’t even think about it. When he died, he was at least at the peak of the soul stage. If he could live until now, you won’t be able to reach him. “You’re only at the peak of the aurous stage for a few years. There’s still a whole realm difference between you and him!” Hearing Tang Zhanfeng’s sarcasm, the fifth brother, Tang Feng’s face instantly turned cold. He said coldly, “Dear brother, I heard that your martial arts have improved recently, and you’ve already reached the middle stages of the aurous stage?” Hearing Tang Feng’s words, Tang Zhanfeng’s face was instantly filled with pride. He opened his gourd and suddenly gulped down a mouthful, “That’s right!” Tang Feng said indifferently, “Oh? You’re really an expert. Should we have a match?” Upon hearing these words, the second brother, Tang Zhanfeng, who was originally laughing foolishly at the side, suddenly stopped laughing. ‘The wine in his hand — which had not been closed — dropped and the wine spilled all over his body. He did not notice that his upper and lower lips were constantly opening and closing as his face flushed red. Tang Zhanfeng finally said, “We’re too old to be picking fights anymore. There’s no need to talk about fighting and killing, I’ve already cultivated my character to its potential.” Hearing Han Zhanfeng’s words, the others chocked. It was especially more so for the third brother, who was drinking tea. He spat out a mouthful of water. Tang Zhanfeng could cultivate his character? Only a ghost would believe it. With his bad temper, he would not even need to be provoked to start a fight. Seeing that Han Zhanfeng admitted defeat, the other snorted coldly and stopped teasing him. Tang Feng was a martial arts fanatic. What he liked the most was to challenge people everywhere and anywhere. He really did not care about the matters of his family. To him, fighting and getting stronger was the most important to him. He would never miss an opportunity to compete with an expert. The family head, Tang Zhantian, did not want to listen to Tang Zhanfeng’s nonsense anymore. Therefore, he quickly cut their conversation short and spoke. “Alright, let’s see Lu Chen’s performance. “A few hundred years ago, Han Tianyi stood at the entrance of our Tang family for half an hour. “However, at that time, Han Tiany/’s cultivation was much higher than Lu Chen’s. “Treckon that Lu Chen would withdraw from the spiritual world in five minutes.” Hearing Han Zhantian’s words, everyone fell silent and stopped arguing. The second brother, Han Zhanfeng, still had a red face. He glared at Tang Feng with some annoyance. He wanted to say more, but when he thought that his strength was not enough, he could only give up. The third brother stroked his goatee and looked at Lu Chen carefully, trying to determine his future potential and whether he was worthy of his niece, Tang Xiaoging. ‘The fourth brother’s face was simple and honest. He looked at Lu Chen with admiration in his eyes. It was obvious that he had already regarded Lu Chen as his niece’s son-in-law. At the same time, he even looked at Tang Xiaoging with a doting expression. Tang Feng’s gaze was scrutinizing Tang Xiaoging and Lu Chen. The first was to see if Tang Xiaoqing’s cultivation had regressed. After going out for so long, was she only interested in having fun and had lost her cultivation? The other was to see how strong Lu Chen was and whether he was qualified to be the son-in-law of the Tang family. Of course, he would not admit that he had a third goal. That was, if he was really a genius, he would have to compete with him in the future. However, with Tang Feng’s arrogance, he thought that Lu Chen would never have the chance to be on par with him in his lifetime. This was because Han Tianyi was not the only one who could feel the fist intent for hundreds of years. Tang Feng had never told anyone that he had once triggered the fist intent when he was young. However, it had not lasted as long as Han Tianyi, so he naturally kept his mouth shut. Therefore, what he wanted the most now was to defeat Han Tianyi and prove his strength. Unfortunately, Han Tianyi had died over a hundred years before he was born. Tang Feng believed that he had cultivated over a hundred years ahead of Lu Chen, and his cultivation was much higher than his. Even if Lu Chen was lucky enough to rise from an ordinary person to a spiritual realm expert, the difference between him and Tang Feng was like the difference would be too much. So what if he could trigger the fist intent? In this life, Lu Chen will never be able to reach Tang Feng’s level. Soon, five minutes had passed. Lu Chen’s clothes were still fluttering in the wind, but he did not move at all. He was still immersed in his spiritual world. The scene of him confronting the fist intent made everyone in the palace look at each other in dismay. The fourth brother was the first to nod in satisfaction, “It seems that this kid is quite talented.” The second brother nodded and said, “Yes, this kid can do it. However, I feel that he is still not qualified to be a match for our Tang Xiaoging.” The third brother also echoed in a rare manner, “That’s right. Our Tang Xiaoging is a dragon among men. She is the pride of the heavens. Not just anyone can enter her sight. “I’s not impossible for him, Lu Chen, to marry into our family. However, he must bring out sufficient aptitude. Otherwise, if he wants to join our Tang family and become a disciple, there will be problems. “However, if he wants to marry Tang Xiaoging, he still lacks in many qualifications.” Tang Feng sat straight on the side and did not say a word. He just stared at Lu Chen quietly. This kid’s talent was beyond his expectations, but it was not to the extent that he would acknowledge this kid. Especially since Tang Xiaoging was destined to become a top-notch expert in their family! <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation<strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation Everyone remembered how Tang Xiaoging looked the day she was born. She was a heaven-sent phenomenon brimming with energy! The energy that was originally stored in her body could not be controlled, causing a catastrophe. The previous family head even sealed this energy, but it also damaged his own vitality. Tang Xiaoging was very likely to be the reincarnation of some mighty figure. For those who were reincarnated, their future achievements would be immensely high! Although all of them understood that very few men were worthy of his niece, since Lu Chen was able to hold on for so long, he became more serious towards Lu Chen. 15 minutes later, Lu Chen was still standing at the entrance of the mountain. He did not move, not even a little. It was impossible to tell if he could hold on any longer. At this moment, everyone’s eyes revealed a look of disbelief. Tang Zhanfeng was in disbelief as he muttered, “Do you think that the fist intent left behind by our ancestor will be reduced every time he uses it? Otherwise, this kid is only at the spiritual stage, how can he withstand this for fifteen minutes?” Tang Zhantian frowned slightly, he wondered if what his brother said made sense. However, he thought for a moment again and shook his head, “It shouldn’t be. Every few years, I can feel the fist intent left behind by the ancestors of the Tang family. It’s no different from a few hundred years ago. This kid is really not ordinary.” The second brother, Tang Zhanfeng, was still in a daze as he asked, “Uh… but this… does this mean that we can’t have his White Fog City?” Tang Zhantian saw the second brother’s unruly expression and his gaze darkened. He directly ignored his opinion. However, the third brother instantly reminded the others, “What are you thinking about? If it wasn’t for this kid taking care of our little girl back then, who knows how many bullies would have destroyed her. “As for if this kid is powerful, we should just let him protect White Fog City by himself. We’ll just take it as us helping him. If his strength is too weak, then let him join the Tang family. The city does not matter to us.” ‘When the second brother heard this, he felt that his entire worldview had been slightly impacted. It was not that he felt that what the other party said was wrong, It was that he had been thinking about the same thing from the beginning to the end — taking down White Fog City. Now, being told that the city did not matter left him dumbfounded. He found it hard to believe. He repeatedly stared at everyone’s faces to see if they were joking. However, no one seemed to show any signs of discomfort or surprise. Tang Zhanfeng’s voice trembled as he blurted out, “Why wasn’t | informed on this matter? Why didn’t anyone tell me? When did you guys agree on this?!” At this time, Tang Wu, who had been silent all this while, finally could not help but sneer coldly, “Do you think that everyone has to adhere to only what you have to say?” Tang Zhanfeng did not say a word after being ridiculed by Tang Wu. Everyone continued to look at Lu Chen’s performance. It had already been 15 minutes. Even Tang Feng, who had seen Lu Chen’s performance, could not help but nod slightly. One had to know that he had only lasted 26 minutes back then. At that time, his strength was at the peak of the aurous stage. Although it was not as long as Han Tianyi’s half-hour, Tang Feng did not care at all. This was because when Han Tianyi received the fist intent, he was already at the soul stage. There was no point in comparing back then. Therefore, according to the analogy of strength, this Lu Chen should not last longer than him. In his opinion, if he could last for 20 minutes, it meant that Lu Chen’s talent was already top-notch. ‘The faces of the Tang family members also became solemn. This kid actually lasted for 15 minutes. This kind of ability to resist pressure was definitely extraordinary. If this kid could stand someone like Tang Xiaoging, then it was not impossible for them to take him in as a disciple, or even a personal disciple. Perhaps this kid would be the next Tang Feng? No one would want to let go of such a top-notch seedling. At this moment, the Tang family’s upper echelons were all in a great mood. They had not thought that they would be able to bring back such a good seedling after sending Tang Xiaoging to the main world to study. This time, even if he was not worthy of Tang Xiaoging, he was definitely worthy of being nurtured here. This was truly a joyous occasion for the Tang family. As time passed, everyone’s expressions became more and more solemn. This was because Lu Chen had already persisted for 20 minutes. Even Tang Feng’s heart could not help but thump. Could it be that this kid could reach a similar state and persist for the same amount of time as him? Impossible! That was absolutely impossible! Lu Chen was clearly so much weaker than Tang Feng! Tang Feng found it hard to accept such a thought. He was even a little worried. If Lu Chen persisted for a longer time than him, would that mean that his talent was not higher than that kid, or even much higher? One had to know that Lu Chen had just entered the cultivation stages not long ago. He had only been in cultivation for a few months, yet he was able to reach such a level. Moreover, Lu Chen’s current condition seemed at ease. He looked like he was having a light jog. suddenly, Lu Chen’s condition changed! Upon closer inspection, his legs and back were slightly bent. It was obvious that he was under a lot of pressure. Although Lu Chen’s ability to resist pressure was very strong, everyone also discovered that ever since Lu Chen had persisted for more than 20 minutes. His condition seemed to be rapidly declining. Now, his two legs were already bent by nearly a third. Meanwhile, the sweat on Lu Chen’s face kept rolling down. ‘There was even a faint trace of pain on his face, which was completely absent in Lu Chen’s previous condition. The family head, Tang Zhantian, said in a deep voice, “It seems that this kid is enduring great pain, he’s enduring pressure that ordinary people can not handle.” ‘The third brother nodded slowly. His hand that was stroking his goatee also stopped. “That’s right. This kid’s ability is powerful. However, I don’t think that he will be able to endure it any longer.” The fourth brother looked at Lu Chen with even more satisfaction in his eyes. “Yeah, I think this kid is overstraining himself. Looking at the pain that he is currently enduring, my heart aches a little. Why don’t we just leave it as it is? I’m worried that this young man might suffer a backlash from this challenge.” <strong>Translator: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation<strong>Editor: </strong>EndlessFantasy Translation The head of the family, Tang Zhantian, shook his head slightly. “This is a good opportunity for Lu Chen. The fist intent will only bring him benefits and no harm. The longer he immerses himself in the fist intent, the more benefits he will receive. “Han Tianyi once told me this. “The fist intent will not really kill those who take the test here. “The stronger Lu Chen’s resistance is, the stronger the fist intent would be.” At this time, the second brother, Tang Zhanfeng, once again filled his drink. After he took a big gulp of wine, he mumbled, “Why does this kid look so uncomfortable? Could it be that…” At this point, Tang Zhanfeng’s eyes suddenly widened, as if he had thought of something. Seeing Tang Zhanfeng’s sudden change in behavior, the others quickly directed their attention to Lu Chen. Could it be that the second brother knew something they did not? After all, Tang Zhanfeng often stayed in the library, and his main job was to guard the library. There was a vast sea of martial arts books there, as well as the secrets of the Tang family that had existed for more than 1,000 years. So it would make sense that he knew something they did not. At this moment, everyone was looking at him, waiting for him to tell them the big news. At this moment, Tang Zhanfeng’s expression became more exaggerated. He kept muttering, “C-could it be that… this kid can’t hold in his poop anymore?!” ‘The others were petrified by this suggestion, Suddenly the whole area turned so silent a pin could drop and everyone would be able to hear it. “Are you a f*cking id*ot?!.” The third brother could not help but curse to break the silence. “Lremember a few years ago, we brothers often studied the fist intent of the Tang family at the mountain gate. You always ran the fastest when it was over. Was it to take a sh*t?” The fourth brother muttered to himself. It was obvious that he had a deep grudge against the second brother who had no form. ‘Tang Zhantian had no choice but to interject, “Our family’s wine is so good, can’t it shut your mouth?” However, Tang Zhanfeng did not notice his problem at all, he still said seriously, “I’m serious. Every time we sit in the mountains and study the fist intent, I always feel the need to go to the toilet… Otherwise, why did I only comprehend it once in all these years?” At this time, Tang Feng cut in, “Alright, alright, stop talking. If you’re free, let’s sp: While the brothers bantered with each other, 27 minutes passed since Lu Chen started the battle. D#*mn, this kid actually surpassed Tang Feng! Immediately, Tang Feng’s heart was filled with a myriad of emotions. Shock, doubt, envy, jealousy, and disappointment filled his heart. However, as an existence that could become an acquired realm stage powerhouse, how could his heart be filled with feelings of failure because of a momentary setback? In just a few moments, he recovered his state of mind. So what if Lu Chen was talented? Life’s achievements were never decided in a moment. Even if that young man was ahead of him now, it did not mean that he was stronger than the older man. Even if Lu Chen could reach his level of strength one day, he could still defeat Lu Chen. Thinking of this, Tang Feng swept away the unhappiness in his heart and once again regained his momentum. He looked at Lu Chen’s performance. At this moment, Lu Chen’s endurance had reached 31 minutes! Everyone was stunned by this result. Even the second brother was impressed. A moment later, he turned his head to Tang Zhantian, “Do you remember? Han Tianyi only lasted for half an hour a few hundred years ago, right?” ‘Tang Zhantian gulped. He had to recollect himself before he replied, “Yes, he only lasted for half an hour, and his cultivation was already at the soul stage…” Hearing this, the third and fourth brothers were also shocked. Although they knew that Han Tianyi had once endured for half an hour in the state of fist intent, they never knew that he was at the soul stage at that time. In that case, would that mean Lu Chen is a more hardcore person compared to Han Tianyi? The entire hall instantly became deathly silent. After a full half a minute, the third brother finally spoke, “This kid ain’t that bad. He is suitable for our Qing.” Hearing the third brother’s words, the fourth brother hurriedly added his opinion, “That’s right, this kid has a firm mind and is also very talented. “From his life experience, he is also a person with a lot of luck. “If Xiaoqng likes him, it would be best if he could become our son-in-law!” At this time, even Tang Zhantian nodded mechanically, “Yes, Xiaoqing has really good taste in men!” Then, he fiercely glared at the second brother, Tang Zhanfeng, “You better stop your plans on stealing White Fog City. That city belongs to my son-in-law… Ah, no, it belongs to Lu Chen. “No one is allowed to have any thoughts about defeating him. Do you understand?!” Tang Zhanfeng saw that Tang Zhantian was looking at him with a serious expression. He first looked left and right. After making sure that he was the only target, he hurriedly nodded. “Don’t worry, I won’t do such a thing.” However, just as everyone was discussing whether Lu Chen was qualified to enter the Tang family, Lu Chen’s aura suddenly changed. He suddenly erupted with a super-powerful force. At this moment, it was time for Lu Chen to awaken the Fist God! Everyone did not understand what was going on. This was because this was not the Second World, and there was no such thing as the Fist God. They could only feel the terrifying aura emanating from Lu Chen’s body, and at the same time, his combat power had also increased by a lot. ‘The fifth brother, Tang Feng, frowned slightly but did not say anything. At that time, the fourth brother was a little anxious. “Is something bad happening to him?” The third brother was also shocked. In his panic, a few drops of his win spilled on the floor, but he paid no care to it. After a moment of silence, someone finally spoke, “What do we do now?” ‘Tang Zhanguo frowned. “The fist intent on the plaque has already fused with Lu Chen’s spiritual world. Now, we can only see what happens to them through the world on the plaque.” Ahint of worry flashed across a brother’s eyes. “Is it very dangerous?” One had to know that every time they could enter, they could only last for a few seconds, at most a minute. Furthermore, everyone took turns to enter. Now, they were in uncharted territories! The fist intent world was in an unstable state. If Lu Chen was not careful, he might get hurt. Tang Zhantian thought about it and said, “No, I can’t let this kid get hurt. I have to go in and take a look!” However, Tang Feng immediately stopped him and said, “It’s too dangerous inside now. If anything happens, we can’t help you at all. “Why don’t you let me go? I’m a little stronger than you. “Moreover, you’re the head of a family. We can’t let anything happen to you.” Tang Zhantian slowly shook his head and said firmly, “There’s no need. Although you’re stronger than me, it won’t be that much of a difference. “Moreover, this Lu Chen is the person that Tang Xiaoqing likes. Logically, we can’t allow anything risky from happening.” Hearing this, a trace of displeasure flashed across Tang Feng’s originally calm face. He immediately rejected, “What do you mean? “Tang Xiaoqing is your daughter, wouldn’t that mean she’s my niece? “Moreover, this Lu Chen might be a member of the Tang family in the future. I saved a member of the Tang family before, so what reason do you have to stop me?” Although Tang Feng’s words were very firm, the concern he had for Tang Zhantian and Tang Xiaoqing was clearly being shown. Seeing that Lu Chen’s side was getting more serious, none of them had reached an argument level yet, but they had yet to come to a conclusion. The fourth brother anxiously advised the two, “How about this, the five of us enter the world together and see what is happening to the kid.” Hearing this, Tang Zhanfeng, who had been drinking all this time, also hurriedly advised, “That’s right, that’s right. This kid is very lucky. I don’t think he’s really in any danger. “However, it’s good that we go in together. If something really happens, we’ll have more strength in numbers. “Should anything happen, not only will we be able to protect ourselves, but we’ll also be able to save him if there’s really something wrong with this kid.” Hearing this, Tang Zhantian thought for a moment and finally agreed, “Alright, then we’ll go in together.” The five brothers came to an agreement and immediately stood up to leave the palace. The moment they left the palace, each and every one of them soared into the air. At this moment, their powerful auras shook the sky, and their robes fluttered even though there was no wind. It was as if a storm had appeared in the surroundings. With the five of them at the center of the storm, their auras spread out in all directions. Even the birds in the vicinity were afraid and quickly left. The Tang family’s disciples were also extremely shocked when they saw the scene before them. Although the Tang family was an ancient martial arts aristocratic family and was not as strict as the rest, usually, only one high-ranking official would appear. It was to instruct everyone in their cultivation, or even if there were people with malicious intentions who came to the Tang family, it was enough for one person to show themselves. They had never seen such a grand scene before. Now, five of them had actually come out together. Could it be that the other aristocratic clans had come to pay a visit? That’s not right. Even if it was only the clan heads who came, only Tang Zhantian or Tang Feng were needed to welcome them in. When they thought of this, everyone immediately felt bewildered and uncertain. Only Tang Hu and Tang Bao could vaguely understand what was happening. These two people were Tang Xiaoqing’s elder brother and elder cousin, who was also the son of Tang Zhantian and Tang Zhanfeng respectively. Tang Hu’s expression was calm, and his appearance and bearing were somewhat similar to Tang Zhantian’s. His eyes looked into the distance, and then he frowned slightly, he said, “Tang Bao, as far as I know, that kid Lu Chen should be here today. If there are no accidents, father and the rest should have gone to visit him.” Tang Bao had a face full of cynicism. He was quite similar to his father, who was always holding a wine bottle. Hearing Tang Hu’s words, his face was full of disbelief. He questioned, “It can’t be, I remember that kid. When he was bullied in school, he was thinking of fighting back. “But even though he couldn’t win, he still wanted to fight back. “Based on what I know, Lu Chen was bullied quite a lot back then. If it wasn’t for me coming down the mountain to pick up Xiaoqing and teaching those few bullies a lesson, Lu Chen might have been in a miserable state. I think that this brat really has to thank me properly!” Tang Hu glanced at Tang Bao’s impudent expression and sighed in his heart. “Right now, Lu Chen’s cultivation had advanced by leaps and bounds. In just a few months, he had already become a spiritual stage expert. His combat strength is pretty good now.” When Tang Bao heard Tang Hu’s words, he raised his brows slightly, and the curiosity on his face became even more intense. “No way, this kid has already reached the spiritual stage in just a few months?! Stop lying to me!” Tang Hu slowly shook his head and said, “Tang Bao, remember when the Second World game first appeared, didn’t you hear of Lu Chen’s name?” When Lu Chen heard Tang Hu’s words, Tang Bao’s face was filled with disbelief. “Of course, I know Lu Chen, the City Lord of White Fog City!” Thinking of this, Tang Bao suddenly came to a realization. His face was full of shock, and his look of making a fuss was exactly the same as his father’s. “D*mn, it can’t be. The Lu Chen back then is now the City Lord of White Fog City? Are you serious right now? Stop lying!” Tang Hu rolled his eyes at him helplessly and said snappily, “Who has the time to lie to you? Let’s quickly go to the mountain gate and see what is happening.” It After saying that, the two of them ran down the mountain without stopping. They were both in the aurous stage, so they could only run down the mountain, not fly. As for the five Tang brothers, they had already stepped into the soul stage. Whether a cultivator could fly or not depend on the soul stage. Once they stepped into the soul stage, they would be reborn. Walking in the air was proof of that. To be exact, only those who became masters of the soul stage could be considered true cultivators. Those below the soul stage were insignificant. Once one reached the soul stage, it was like a natural chasm, there was no possibility of being surpassed by those of low levels. No matter how many people from the aurous stage try, they would not be a match for an expert of the soul stage. This was the absolute suppression of having a whole realm of difference. However, the two of them were already experts in the aurous stage. Their running speed was no slower than that of a car, especially on the rugged mountain roads. With a flash, they made their way down the path smoothly. Tang Hu and Tang Bao ran with all their might. However, by the time they arrived, Tang Zhantian and the others had already arrived and were currently comprehending the fist intent. When Tang Hu and Tang Bao arrived at the mountain gate, they were instantly stunned by the situation before them. They hurriedly ran over to Tang Xiaoqing to ask about the situation. Although they had some guesses in their hearts, they still dared not to make a definite conclusion. This was especially so for Tang Bao, who could not suppress the curiosity in his heart. He directly asked, “Is this Lu Chen comprehending our Tang family’s fist intent?” Tang Hu’s state of mind was more stable. He did not say anything, but in his heart, he too wanted to know the answer. However, when Tang Xiaoqing anxiously nodded her head, Tang Hu and Tang Bao’s hearts trembled. They never expected that Lu Chen — who was originally looked down upon by so many primary school students — could actually have such strong cultivation potential. Many people had tried to contend the fist intent plaque. Many had tried to be disciples of this family. However, there were still too few heaven-gifted talents that passed. For many years, there had not been a single person who had been able to comprehend the fist intent. Therefore, their clan had changed the method The current disciples had long forgotten that the Tang family contained the fist intent. They had already treated it as an ordinary plaque. Now, Lu Chen was not only deeply immersed in the test of the fist intent, but he had also caused quite a strange phenomenon. Immediately, many nearby disciples came to spectate what was going on. Especially when Tang Zhantian and the others appeared, the number of spectating disciples increased. By the time Tang Hu and Tang Bao arrived, this place had already been surrounded by many people. If not for Tang Zhantian and the others telling these people to retreat, Tang Hu would not have been able to squeeze in. Tang Hu and Tang Bao could not see what was happening, but they could feel the almost solid pressure in the air. Although there was no killing intent in this pressure… Just the pressure alone was unbearable for the disciples who were originally surrounding the area. Some of them had even vomited blood and were currently being supported by others as they had no choice but to be forced to leave. If it were not for Tang Hu and Tang Bao’s powerful strength, they might not have been able to withstand this pressure as well. As for Lu Chen’s pets, because they were incomparably strong compared to humans, so they did not suffer a great backlash. Out of curiosity, Tang Bao tried to focus his attention on Tang family’s plaque, but he still did not feel anything. The five Tang brothers had already entered the fist intent and Lu Chen’s spiritual world. They were instantly shocked by the scene before them. When Tang Zhantian and the others had just appeared in the Second World, Lu Chen had just transformed into his six-armed Asura. This was also the first time Tang Zhantian and the others had seen such a powerful fist intent. Although they had comprehended it before, they had never observed it in such detail. At this moment, they realized that this fist intent was even more powerful than the one they had comprehended before. It was more than ten times stronger than what they expected. The state that Lu Chen had displayed shocked them even more. What kind of person could grow six extra arms on his body? Had this person’s understanding of fist intent reached the utmost limit? When Lu Chen and the fist intent in the sky collided, the first arm suddenly broke. In an instant, regardless of whether it was the third or fourth brother, they immediately wanted to use their own spiritual power to help Lu Chen lift the giant fist in the sky. After all, if Lu Chen was injured, the situation he would face would be even more difficult. However, they were stopped by Tang Zhantian. “It doesn’t matter. The six arms that Lu Chen has conjured are the power of laws. Even if they were to shatter, it wouldn’t affect his physical condition. “On the contrary, if we were to rashly endure the attack the fist intent in the sky, I’m afraid that our spiritual power would be severely injured.” Even though the second brother, Tang Zhanfeng, had entered the spiritual world, he still had a wine bottle with him. His face turned red as he asked, “It can’t be. This kid is only at the spiritual stage. If he can withstand the fist intent’s attack, why can’t we?” The fifth brother, Tang Feng, looked at Lu Chen with a serious expression. He explained with a solemn expression, “Enduring the fist intent’s attack doesn’t depend on one’s own strength, but on one’s understanding of the laws. “The deeper one’s understanding of the laws, the more powerful the fist intent’s attack would be. “This has nothing to do with one’s strength. Previously, the reason why you were unable to meditate every time you comprehended fist intent and wanted to go to the toilet was because your understanding of fist intent was too weak. You have a low purity level.” Tang Zhantian was momentarily at a loss for words. He could only continue to watch Lu Chen’s condition with everyone else. However, although he knew that his understanding of fist intent was relatively weak, he still thought in his heart that once Lu Chen encountered danger, he could immediately rescue him. his heart. He was usually fine, but oddly enough, he kept getting criticized a lot today. Everyone realized that even though Lu Chen was in such a tyrannical state and the aura on his body was getting more and more terrifying, he was still unable to resist the giant fist in the sky. At this moment, Lu Chen’s originally slightly bent legs had sunk even deeper. His legs had even faintly turned into a forced sitting stance. While the Tang family’s people were sighing by the side, Lu Chen did not have the mood to care about the five people who had suddenly appeared here. His heart was filled with thoughts of how to defeat this giant fist in the sky. He felt that he was under great pressure and could not be distracted at all. If such an attack landed on a gold boss, it would probably be able to kill the opponent with a single punch. Even if the fist faced the hundreds of members of the Dragon Team, even if it could not annihilate them all… It would probably be able to defeat the warriors of the Dragon Team. Lu Chen’s fists looked so pale and powerless in front of the huge fist in the sky. Under Lu Chen’s powerful explosive force, his five arms fiercely struck the huge fist above his head. Each strike produced a powerful attack. Finally, his body could no longer withstand such a blow. The backlash immediately caused the second arm to explode, turning into specks of starlight and dissipating. Before everyone could react, his third arm had also completely exploded, leaving him with three extra arms left! Seeing that everyone was shocked by Lu Chen’s performance, the fourth brother subconsciously asked, “How long did Lu Chen last?” The third brother used his hand to support his goatee. “Around thirty-five minutes.” Tang Zhanfeng, who was at the side, used his hand to shake the wine bottle in his spiritual world. He was delighted to find that there was still wine in it. He opened the cork and gulped down a mouthful. Then, he used his arm to wipe his mouth, he did not care about his image at all. He mumbled, “I’m pretty sure it’s been forty minutes. When we arrived here, he had already endured for 43 minutes. “is attack power seemed to be more than ten times stronger than before. In particular, he could throw more than a hundred punches every second. This kind of attack power is really terrifying “Now that he has lost three arms, I’m sure the rest will break soon.” Tang Zhantian nodded slowly. “That’s right. Lu Chen has already reached the final stage, but his performance has already far exceeded our expectations. “This is another person as terrifying as Han Tianyi. Remember to not tell anyone about this! “Everyone, forget about this matter. I don’t wish for Tianyi’s encounter to ever happen again.” The other four nodded. Han Tianyi was feared by the ancient martial families because his cultivation was too powerful and his aptitude was too heaven-defying. As a result, five of the seven ancient martial families joined forces to force him into a desperate situation. At that time, even though the Tang family strongly opposed it, they were ultimately too weak and could not change the overall situation. Especially when Tang Zhantian was only at the soul stage, he could not change the situation at all. Han Tianyi was like a brother to him, but he could only watch Han Tianyi die. This was because he could not bring the entire Tang family down with him, especially when the family head, his father, did not allow it. Moreover, Tang Zhantian understood that even if he were to get involved with the Tang family’s politics, it would probably not be of much use. However, although this matter had brought him a huge blow in the past, it had also allowed him to break through the bottleneck of the soul ascension stage and become an expert of his generation. In the end, he held great power in his family and became the new family head. Although he had the intention to help Han Tianyi take revenge, the other five ancient martial arts aristocratic families were simply too powerful. Even if he had the intention, he was powerless. At this moment, he recovered from his past memories and looked at Lu Chen again. Back then, he was not strong enough to protect his best friend. Now, things were different. The Tang family had risen with the appearance of his five brothers. This time, he had to protect Lu Chen well. Although his five brothers were very talented, they were far from being able to rely on the strength of one family to kill the other five ancient martial arts aristocratic families. However, he saw hope in Lu Chen. Lu Chen was basically the second Han Tianyi. To be exact, he was even more terrifying than the Han Tianyi back then, and his aptitude was even more heaven-defying. He looked at Lu Chen’s crazed and exhausted appearance and expected this brat to be defeated soon. In a short five seconds, Lu Chen had already lost three of his arms. The remaining three arms probably would not be able to hold on for long. It had only been less than ten seconds since they entered this world. They had already witnessed Lu Chen’s powerful strength and powerful perception. This kid’s potential was truly too terrifying. In this short period of time, Tang Zhantian’s thoughts had wandered many places. However, Lu Chen had placed all his attention on resisting the fist intent. At this moment, two more arms exploded at the same time and disappeared into the air! At this moment, Lu Chen’s eyes had already turned red, and his face was filled with determination as he stared at the fist that covered the sky. Could it be that this was it? Could it be that he could only stop here? Could it be that he had to admit defeat? Without backing down, Lu Chen finally unleashed his most powerful strength, using the most powerful strike of his entire body. Tang Zhantian and the others saw that Lu Chen was already at the end of his line. Even his last remaining arm was covered with dense cracks and was about to collapse. However, just when everyone thought that Lu Chen’s fate was over and that it was about to end, Lu Chen suddenly shouted. The entire space suddenly turned red, as if there was an endless amount of hellfire burning, filled with violence. Lu Chen’s last remaining hand was fiercely pulled into his embrace as he suddenly squatted down. At this moment, he was like a spring that was ready to be unleashed, desperately compressing into a ball. The fist intent in the sky still carried a monstrous power, pressing down on Lu Chen from top to bottom, as if it was crushing an ant. However, just as it was about to touch Lu Chen, the tightly compressing spring-like Lu Chen suddenly exploded! All that was left of Lu Chen was his own two arms as he fiercely struck out! The fist intent that had endured this fierce strike felt a tremendous pressure, so much so that the huge fist suddenly stopped in the air. It was could not continue pressing down under Lu Chen’s Six-armed Asura state. Seeing such an earth-shattering scene, Tang Zhanfeng took a deep breath. How did this kid’s last punch erupt with such a powerful force?! The third brother’s eyes also narrowed tightly, his eyes bursting with disbelief. “This attack is several times stronger than the previous one!” The fifth brother corrected each word with a hint of admiration. “The power of this punch has already reached nine hundred percent of the total attack power of the previous one every second! “How did he release such an attack? Can the Tang family plaque really withstand such a powerful attack?” At this moment, whether it was Tang Zhantian or the other brothers, they simply could not believe that such a huge power could actually be unleashed by Lu Chen. They could even clearly feel that if Lu Chen was able to unleash such a powerful attack in the real world, then his battle prowess could be on par with a gold stage expert. He could even fight against the advanced stage of the aurous stage experts. This astonishing punch completely exhausted all of Lu Chen’s strength. His only remaining arm could no longer withstand such great pressure and he collapsed with a loud bang. Lu Chen, who was in a rage fit, fell. At this moment, his body’s condition rapidly declined. His body collapsed and he knelt heavily on one knee on the ground. Tang Feng let out a deep sigh. “This child is definitely a good seedling. If he is willing, I want to take him in as my personal disciple.” No one realized that they had been calling Lu Chen this kid all along, and now they were calling him this child. This change in address represented their recognition of Lu Chen. Hearing Tang Feng’s words, the others were also shocked. Tang Feng was a martial arts fanatic of the Tang family, and he also had the highest combat strength in the conventional world. All of his thoughts were on practicing martial arts, and he had never thought of taking in a disciple. Even Tang Zhantian’s eldest son, Tang Long, who had a high-grade spirit root to cultivate himself, had a talent that advanced by leaps and bounds. The father and son duo wanted Tang Feng to take Tang Long in as a disciple, but Tang Feng mercilessly refused. The reason was that he wanted to put all his energy into cultivation and surpass the ancestors of the Tang family in the future. Now, he actually took the initiative to take Lu Chen as his disciple! From this, one could see just how monstrous Lu Chen’s talent was. Even though Lu Chen still lost six arms in the end and was unable to stop the giant fist in the sky from pressing down, he was able to hold on for more than 40 minutes. This kind of battle record was definitely far superior to Han Tianyi’s. Back then, Han Tianyi was known as a genius. Before he was even ten years old, he had already become a heaven-grade master. At the age of twelve, he was already in the acquired stage, at the age of fifteen, and at the age of seventeen, he had already reached the golden stage. When Tang Zhantian and Han Tianyi first met, Han Tianyi was only 100 years old. At that time, his cultivation was already in the ascension stage. It was precisely because of such a genius that the ancient martial arts aristocratic families were extremely fearful of him. In the end, they decided to kill him. Thinking of this, everyone looked at Lu Chen with fiery eyes. All the brothers immediately crowded around him. They wanted to help him up and bring him out of this spiritual world. At this moment, Tang Zhantian suddenly erupted with a violent aura and stopped everyone in their tracks. Then, he raised his thick eyebrows, “Don’t go over. That giant fist seems to have not dispersed yet.” The others quickly looked up. Logically speaking, that giant fist had its own rules. When the person being tested was exhausted, it should have slowly dissipated. However, at this moment, it was still half an inch above Lu Chen’s head. It did not fall, nor did it disperse. Instead, it continued to shake in mid-air, and its aura seemed very chaotic. This situation was far beyond their expectations because even when they had tried to comprehend the fist intent many times, they had never encountered such a situation. Even Tang Feng and Han Tianyi from a few 100 years ago had never encountered such a situation, and the huge fist that was originally calm and steady inside had now become even more chaotic. Seeing this, the fourth brother had a bad premonition. He anxiously said, “We need to go and save him.” Tang Zhantian’s brows furrowed even more tightly, and a faint sense of suspicion appeared in his eyes. At this moment, he did not hesitate any longer and spoke, “Let’s go and save him together.” Right now, Tang Feng, who had been silent all this while, raised the sword in his hand and stopped everyone from going over. The others did not understand why Tang Feng would stop everyone from saving Lu Chen. The fourth brother, in particular, said anxiously, “We need to save him. It would be a pity if something really happened to him.” However, before he could finish his sentence, a burst of laughter came from afar. Everyone immediately looked over and saw that Lu Chen, who had already tried his best to get down on one knee, had already raised his head and stared at the huge fist in the sky with a cold smile. Finally, he muttered to himself, “I won…” Then, his vision went black and he fainted on the ground. Everyone was extremely puzzled by this scene. It was not only because of Lu Chen’s words, but also because according to tradition, when the others could not withstand the fist intent, the fist intent would send the other party out of their world. Although Lu Chen had collapsed on the ground and lost consciousness, he was still in here. No one knew what had happened. All kinds of strange phenomena revealed that there were many unusual things in this place. At this moment, the entire space seemed to have begun to shake. In just a few seconds, the shaking became more and more intense. Before everyone could understand what was happening, another scene that left them dumbfounded appeared. A crack actually appeared on the giant fist in the sky. This crack actually went straight up the dome and split open. After that, it continued to spread in all directions. One could see more and more densely packed cracks in the sky. Before everyone could react, an unbelievable scene appeared. The giant fist in the sky suddenly collapsed, turned into ashes, and dissipated. Everyone’s eyes widened. The scene in front of them was beyond their understanding. The fist intent left by the Tang family’s ancestor had disappeared! “This isn’t a good sign!” Tang Zhantian shouted, “This space is about to disappear. Let’s get out of here immediately!” As he said that, the first reaction of the others was to quickly take Lu Chen away! Otherwise, his spiritual consciousness would be destroyed along with the disappearance of this space. Tang Feng was as swift as the wind, directly leaving behind an afterimage. Before everyone ran a few steps, he directly picked up Lu Chen in the distance. With a thought, he directly arrived in the real world! Just as the few of them had just come out of the spiritual world and returned to their own bodies, everyone heard a shattering sound that they had never heard before. Everyone raised their heads and looked over. The plaque was almost broken into two. Seeing this, even Tang Zhantian and the other three, who had just returned to their bodies, did not bother to regulate their breathing. They stood up and subconsciously ran towards the mountain gate. The other Tang disciples were also shocked. In their minds, this plaque was supposed to be indestructible, and it was difficult for anything to penetrate. It was not as if no one had comprehended the fist intent within for thousands of years. No matter how talented Lu Chen was, how did the plaque shatter? What was happening? For a moment, everyone was in a state of panic. They all turned their gazes towards the culprit, Lu Chen. However, the culprit had already fallen into a deep coma in his spiritual world and had yet to wake up. The five Tang brothers looked at the broken plaque on the mountain gate and felt mixed emotions. However, they also knew that the Tang family had profited greatly this time. They had lost a plaque left behind by their ancestors in exchange for a disciple that would allow the Tang family to rest comfortably for many more years to come. Even if their ancestors had appeared, they would probably feel that they had profited greatly this time. The brothers immediately helped Lu Chen up from the ground and called Tang Hu, Tang Bao, and Tang Xiaoqing back to the Tang family’s main hall. Tang Hu and Tang Bao carried Lu Chen and ran without rest. After all, they were in the aurous stage, so it was not a problem for them to carry a teenager. When everyone else returned to the mountain gate, only Tang Zhantian and Tang Feng remained in front of the mountain gate. Tang Zhantian approached Tang Feng and asked in a low voice, “Are you alright?”. Only when everyone had left did Tang Feng’s body start to tremble slightly. After calming down for more than ten seconds, he waved his hand and said, “I’m fine. It’s just that in order to save Lu Chen, I retreated from the spiritual space a little later. I suffered from it, but it’s not too big of a problem. “Right now, our top priority is to repair this plaque. At the same time, we must stop the news from spreading out. Don’t let anyone know what happened to Lu Chen today.” Tang Zhantian nodded. “I agree. I’ll immediately arrange for the disciples of the Tang family to block the mountain gate. No one is allowed to go out.” At this moment, Lu Chen and the others had already been brought to the mountain gate by the others. They came to a guest room to rest. The guest room was surrounded by quite a number of people. Tang Zhanfeng and the other two brothers were here. Tang Hu, Tang Bao, Tang Xiaoqing, and Lu Chen’s pets were also here. All of them had anxious expressions on their faces. The third brother quickly went forward to feel Lu Chen’s pulse. Among them, Tang Xiaoqing and Lan Weiwei had the most anxious expressions. It was more so for Lan Weiwei as there were tears welling in her eyes. Although she had lived for more than 1,000 years, her heart was still kind and pure. When she saw that Lu Chen was injured, her heart was filled with grief. At the same time, she had always been vigilant when it came to Lu Chen. If anyone here wanted to harm Lu Chen, she was prepared to take Lu Chen and run away. Little Golden Dragon at the side tapped Lan Weiwei with his tail, hinting that she should not be too nervous. He could feel that everyone had no ill intentions toward Lu Chen. Tang Xiaoqing was so anxious that she was about to cry. She could not help but ask, “How is Lu Chen? Will he be alright?” ‘I thought they said that there would be no problems with comprehending this plaque… How did Lu Chen become like this?’ Tang Xiaoqing was also very anxious about all of this. The second brother, Tang Zhanfeng, said, “The plaque of our Tang family’s mountain gate has been shattered, yet you didn’t even show a single bit of concern. Why did you talk to him like this after Lu Chen had been unconscious for a while?!” Tang Xiaoqing was both anxious and angry about this matter. She retorted, “How can it be the same? It’s just a plaque. If it’s broken, we can just fix it. Lu Chen, Lu Chen is my favorite…” At this point, Tang Xiaoqing’s face suddenly turned red. She changed her tone and said, “Lu Chen is my favorite… classmate. How can I let him get hurt?” Tang Zhanfeng harbored evil intentions. He looked at Tang Xiaoqing with a mocking expression and dragged his words out, “Is that so? Just a classmate? Really?” Tang Xiaoqing’s face instantly turned as red as a peach after being ridiculed by Tang Zhanfeng. From her forehead to her neck, her entire body flushed pink. On the other hand, the fourth brother helped her out of her predicament and fiercely bumped into Tang Zhanfeng, he said, “Don’t talk nonsense.” After that, he comforted Tang Xiaoqing. “Don’t be afraid, Xiaoqing. Lu Chen will most likely be fine. All of us saved him. Don’t you know how strong we are?” Hearing this, Tang Xiaoqing was relieved. At this time, the third brother also finished taking his pulse. He let out a sigh of relief and said, “Alright, everyone, disperse. This child is fine. He just overworked his body. He’ll be fine after two days.” Hearing this, Tang Xiaoqing calmed down, and the others also let out a sigh of relief. Only Tang Bao looked at Tang Xiaoqing in disbelief. “Hey isn’t this Lu Chen the City Lord of White Fog City in the Second World? Are these two really the same person?! This kid was so cowardly when he was in primary school. Why is he so powerful now?” Seeing Tang Bao chattering away, Lan Weiwei’s face immediately revealed her displeasure, revealing two side fangs. Little Golden Dragon even hissed with hostility. Even Rollie stopped eating his bamboo shoots. He looked at Lu Chen anxiously and then glared at Tang Bao. Tang Xiaoqing was also unhappy and directly reached out her hand to Tang Bao. Tang Bao was stunned and asked, “What? What do you mean?” Tang Xiaoqing said, “You were the one who took the Disguise Mask of the first elder of the Dragon Country. Shouldn’t you return it now?” Tang Bao hurriedly took two steps back with a surprised look on his face. “Yes, I took it. So what? Is it to help you and Lu Chen? “If the first elder really has the nerve to ask me for it, then let him come. As long as he wants it, I’ll give it to him.” Tang Bao puffed his chest and looked at the sky with slanted eyes. He could not help but shake his legs, looking as if he had his eyes set on the first elder’s demise. He did not believe that the first elder, a martial arts senior who had lived for hundreds of years, would stoop so low as to ask for equipment from a junior like him. When Tang Xiaoqing saw his scoundrel expression, she sneered and said, “The Disguise Mask has already been given to Lu Chen by the first elder, so now it’s Lu Chen who is looking for you to ask for the disguise mask! “What? You still want to bully the weak and not give it to Lu Chen?!” As soon as these words were said, Tang Bao was instantly stunned. The reason why he dared to bring the Disguise Mask back then was because he was certain that the first elder had high seniority, so he relied on his low seniority and knew that the first elder would be embarrassed to ask for it. Now, Tang Xiaoqing was also using this reason to shut Tang Bao’s mouth. This way, Tang Bao was really embarrassed to say anything to retort back. Tang Bao rolled his eyes and then said, “Alright, alright, I’ll give it to him when he wakes up!” After saying that, he took two steps back and was ready to sneak away. What a joke! How could he give such a funny thing away so easily! He had been mischievous and playful because he had heavily relied on the Disguise Mask. He would not want to give it to anyone who wanted it! Lu Chen though? He might reconsider… might… As long as Lu Chen does not find him for it, then he could still keep it, right? Hehe! Tang Bao felt that he was really smart when he concluded this. He hurriedly said, “I’m going down the mountain to do something. Isn’t he still unconscious? When I come back, I’ll give the thin to Lu Chen!” At this time, the third brother saw through Tang Bao’s thoughts. He said with a faint smile, “Not so fast. From now on, all members of the Tang family must stay at their mountain gate. No one is allowed to leave.” Hearing this, Tang Bao’s eyes widened. He turned around and said, “Alright, I won’t go. I’ll just stroll around the mountain gate!” With that in mind, he turned and ran. Tang Bao had already made up his mind. How was he going to pass the gates now? The Tang family’s influence was so large that even if he were to randomly find a place in the mountains, these people would be able to find him. Lu Chen would not be able to stay in the Tang family for the rest of his life, right? As long as he left, he could still keep the mask, right? However, at this time, a crisp voice sounded from behind him again, “‘It’s not Lu Chen who wants it now, it’s me who wants it! “I want to play with it now. Are you going to give it to me or not?!” Hearing this, Tang Bao could not help but complain in his heart. This was Tang Xiaoqing, their family’s most favored little princess. In the entire Tang family, everyone would side with her. Moreover, even if others did not help her, they would dote on her the most. Otherwise, why did Tang Bao try his best to seek revenge on Tang Xiaoqing when they left the mountain? Why did he even help Lu Chen to vent his anger? If it was just Lu Chen who wanted the mask, he would really be able to quibble a little. If it really did not work, he would be able to run away. However, if Tang Xiaoqing wanted it, then there was nothing he could do. Not to mention, even if Tang Bao could quibble, it would be useless because everyone would side with Tang Xiaoqing. As expected, before he could finish his thoughts, his father, Tang Zhanfeng, used the wine bottle to give him a hard knock on the head. “You little brat, why are you bullying Tang Xiaoqing? Quickly give her the mask!” Tang Bao felt the pain from the hard knock. “Ouch!”He cried out and finally rubbed his head. He looked at his father with an aggrieved expression. “Dad, I’m not bullying her. Who would dare do thau I just want to play with the mask for another two days…” However, before he could finish his words, he realized that everyone was looking at him with disdain. Seeing this scene, he quickly admitted defeat. “Alright, alright, everyone, don’t look at me like that. I’ll give this mask to Lu Chen…” After saying that, he took out a small and exquisite mask from his back. This mask was as big as the palm of his hand. Lan Weiwei looked at this exquisite mask and was a little curious. How could such a small thing be used? However, now was not the time to ask questions, so she suppressed her curiosity. Tang Xiaoqing snorted and put the mask on herself. She looked proud. “I’ll keep this mask for Chenchen first. When he wakes up, I’ll give it to him! I’m telling you, no one is allowed to have any ideas about this mask!” After saying that, she looked at the mask like a prized treasure. Seeing Tang Xiaoqing like this, Tang Zhanfeng and the other two let out a deep sigh in their hearts. As expected, when a girl is fixated on something, no one can get her sight off it. The two of them had not even made the first move when she already had her heart set on Lu Chen. If the two of them really got together in the future, would the Tang family become the Lu family? Seeing this scene, the Tang brothers did not want to say anything more. They helplessly shook their heads and left the guest room. Tang Hu looked at Tang Xiaoqing and said, “I’ll leave this kid in your care. If there’s anything you need, feel free to call me.” Facing Tang Hu, Tang Xiaoqing nodded her head obediently. Tang Bao, on the other hand, put on an act. He imitated the expressions of Tang Zhanfeng and the others sighed deeply. Then, he shook his head and walked out with a look of deep hatred. Seeing Tang Xiaoqing’s face turn red from being ridiculed by him made him feel a little bit comforted. Ever since he was young, he had always been bullied by his little sister. Who would be happy about such a thing? When he thought of this, he did not care so much about the matter of his mask being taken away just now. He had also forgotten about it. This time, Lu Chen had been unconscious for a whole day. When he woke up, it was already the next morning. He shook his somewhat unconscious head, feeling that he was still in a daze. It was likely that his mind had been under great pressure, so he could not fully recover yet. However, other than feeling a little tired, Lu Chen did not feel any discomfort. Instead, he felt that his mental strength was much stronger than before. He subconsciously raised his arm. At this moment, he could feel that the strength of his arm was much stronger than before. It seemed that this fist intent had improved him in all aspects. Not only had it allowed him to comprehend the laws of fist intent more thoroughly, but it had also strengthened his physical strength. This was the first time that Lu Chen had seen such a method of using spiritual growth to increase the growth of his physical body. The power of the laws was really powerful. Thinking of this, Lu Chen was a little surprised. The strength of his body had always been a weakness. Therefore, when he used the Sword God’s moves, he could not use them at full strength. He could not fully unleash his combat power. With the help of the fist intent, and now that his physical fitness had improved, his combat power would definitely be greatly enhanced. At this moment, Lu Chen had just woken up not long ago. Just as he was about to get up, he suddenly felt something pressing down on his chest. He slowly lowered his head to take a look. It was actually Tang Xiaoqing with her head lowered. She was lying in front of his chest and sleeping. In the distance, Lan Weiwei was lying on her stomach. Little Golden Dragon and Rollie followed suit. One was on his highs while the other was on his ankles. Lu Chen could not help but shake his head helplessly. It seemed that these people had been standing by his side since the beginning. They were also very tired and had accidentally fallen asleep. He felt a little helpless from all this. It was fine for Little Golden Dragon. After all, he was small and dainty now, so there was not much pressure on him. For Rollie, however? The huge weight made his feet go numb, and he could not feel anything. Even the bed was almost falling apart from the pressure. The bed was under a lot of pressure. The break creaked whenever Rollie breathed. However, Lu Chen felt warm in his heart. There were still so many people by his side when he was in danger, and they would not leave him. He reached out and touched Tang Xiaoqing’s head. It was just like when he was in primary school, stroking Tang Xiaoqing’s head while she slept in class. Tang Xiaoqing woke up from her sleep after feeling the touch. When he saw that Lu Chen had recovered, his face was filled with joy. She was so excited that she almost jumped up and shouted for everyone. However, when she saw that Lan Weiwei was still sleeping soundly on Lu Chen’s body, she forcefully suppressed the excitement in her heart and quickly looked at Lu Chen to ask about his physical condition.. A comforting look appeared in Lu Chen’s eyes. Tang Xiaoqing felt relieved after he expressed that there was nothing wrong with his body. Although Tang Xiaoqing had deliberately controlled her movements, Lan Weiwei still woke up from all the commotion. Lan Weiwei woke up from Lu Chen’s stomach in a daze. At this time, her mouth still had drool. When she saw that her saliva had already soaked his clothes, she immediately looked at a loss. She tried to use her sleeve to quickly wipe the water off, that adorable look made both Lu Chen and Tang Xiaoqing laugh out loud. Lan Weiwei could not care less about her embarrassment. She hurriedly asked Lu Chen, “How do you feel?” Lu Chen nodded slightly. “Don’t worry, I’m fine. I’m just a little tired.” Little Golden Dragon was also awakened by their voices. Little Golden Dragon slowly slithered to Lu Chen’s chest. After confirming that he was fine, it yawned and curled up again before falling asleep. Lu Chen carefully placed him on the bed and tried to get up. However, he could not get up because Rollie was deep asleep. He could not even move his feet. In his sleep, Rollie seemed to be eating as well. It kept chewing and a happy smile appeared on his face. Lu Chen was not only touched. No matter what, these three spiritual pets had always been by his side and never left his side. Tang Xiaoqing had been separated for several years, yet she was still as close to him as she was when she was young. However, Lu Chen also lamented that the world was unpredictable. A little girl that he had taken care of back then had actually taken care of him in return. Tang Xiaoqing and the others, who were comforting Lu Chen’s heart, saw that Lu Chen was fine, they narrowed their crescent-shaped eyes and said, “Chenchen, you should rest for a few more days. When you’re almost recovered, my father and the others said that they want to see you.” Hearing Tang Xiaoqing’s words, Lu Chen understood what she meant by that. He was finally going to meet them. He said, “‘Okay, then let’s go now. I should take back what belongs to me.” Hearing this, Tang Xiaoqing’s eyes were stunned. “Chenchen, are you talking about this?” While speaking, Tang Xiaoqing took out a palm-sized mask from her bosom. This mask looked like human skin, and it felt no different from human skin. It had a nose and eyes… like a small babyface. However, Lu Chen was a little confused and asked, “Xiaoqing, this mask is so small. How do you use it?” Tang Xiaoqing smiled and said, “Just put it on your face and think about who you want to look like. This mask will transform into that person based on the size of your face and your thoughts.” In the next second, Tang Xiaoqing, who had just put on the mask, turned into Lu Chen. Her body shape began to change as well. She had turned into a man. The originally tall bulge on her chest gradually became flat at this moment. She even grew firm pectoral muscle. On the whole, even Tang Xiaoqing’s clothes seemed to be a few sizes smaller, not fitting at all. Seeing this scene, Lu Chen was really shocked. He never thought that this mask could be so powerful, it could even change the appearance of the entire person. However, he was somewhat curious as to whether the chest would be soft or hard after it became pectoral muscles. However, this kind of thing could only be thought about in his heart. Lu Chen did not dare to open his mouth and say it. While was clicking his tongue in wonder, the other pets were also dumbstruck. Tang Xiaoqing smiled and said, “This Disguise Mask is really amazing. It’s just a pity that it can’t imitate skills.” Hearing Tang Xiaoqing’s words… Lu Chen instantly felt bad. “Your requirements are too high. This is just a mask. It’s already amazing that it can reshape your entire body. You actually want to copy the skills of others?!” Hearing this, Tang Xiaoqing playfully stuck out her tongue. She knew that her request was a bit too much, so she prepared to take off the mask. However, the moment she really wanted to take off the mask, her hand paused. Then, with Lu Chen’s appearance, she fiercely kissed Lan Weiwei! Then, he took off the mask and threw it into Lu Chen’s arms. She ran out in a flash, changing back to her original appearance and figure while running. Lan Weiwei never expected that Tang Xiaoqing would make such a joke. Her face instantly turned red, but she was secretly happy. Although Tang Xiaoqing was fake, it was true that she had a secret crush on Lu Chen. At this moment, she looked at Lu Chen’s stunned expression and her face instantly turned red. She wanted to find a place to hide. She suddenly stood up and stomped her feet in shame and anger. She shouted, ‘Tang Xiaoqing, stop right there!” As she spoke, in order to hide her embarrassment, she hurriedly ran out to chase after Tang Xiaoqing. Lu Chen looked at the two little girls who were playing around and smiled helplessly. However , Little Golden Dragon that was on his chest winked at him, causing Lu Chen to feel both angry and amused. He stretched out his hand and directly pushed him to the side. After that, he began to put on his clothes, wash up, and rush to the Tang family’s main hall. Not long after, Lu Chen and the others arrived at the Tang family’s main hall. At this time, the five Tang brothers had already taken their seats while Tang Hu and Tang Bao sat at the ends of the left and right sides respectively. When Lu Chen and the others arrived, the servants hurriedly added a few more chairs and let them sit in the guest seats. Lu Chen really did not understand the rules of the ancient martial arts aristocratic families. After all, he was only a high school student. However, he still imitated the people in the ancient costume dramas, he cupped his hands and said, “Many thanks to everyone here coming to my rescue.” Following that, sat on a chair at the side. Tang Zhantian, who was sitting at the highest position, did not say much nonsense and directly said, “Lu Chen, you should know that the White Fog City in your hands is a hot topic amongst families. The ancient martial arts aristocratic families are all watching.” Lu Chen nodded slightly, “Thank you for your concern. A while ago, Wu Tian from the Wu family even came to my house to try to get Little Golden Dragon, but I rejected him.” Then, Lu Chen changed the topic and said again, “Thank you, for helping me stop those ancient martial families this time.” Hearing Lu Chen’s words, the five people on the stage immediately revealed satisfied expressions on their faces. This kid was smart, and he even knew that they were helping him. The five Tang familys higher-ups all nodded their heads. Looking at how Lu Chen behaved, they liked him even more. Not only was he powerful and talented, but he was also more proficient in the ways of the world. He was quick-witted and naturally intelligent__ such a young man was definitely a good seedling.. Translator: EndlessFantasy Translation Editor: EndlessFantasy Translation The Tang family members looked at Lu Chen, growing more fond of him. After that, Lu Chen continued, “White Fog City is currently in a weakened state. Although other players can enter normally and change their job classes, they can’t accompany me in battle. I haven’t thought of how to activate that yet. “As for those who want to steal my White Fog City, it won’t be that easy. If they’re not strong enough, they’ll just be sending themselves to their deaths if they come to me.” Tang Zhanfeng held the wine in his hand, and vaguely asked a question, “Then what if there’s someone stronger than you? How will you deal with them?” The third brother also opened his mouth and asked, “I know that you’re a member of the Dragon Team, and a person favored by the first elder of the Dragon Country. Ordinary people won’t compete against you. “However, just because they do not look for trouble with you on the surface does not mean that they will not give you trouble in the dark. If an expert really wants to set you up, I am afraid that you will not be able to defend yourself. “I know that your combat ability is very strong. Even if an aurous stage cultivator comes, they may not be your match. “However, you must know that the aurous stage and the soul stage are two completely different levels. Many aurous stage cultivators are no match for a soul stage cultivator.” Hearing the brother’s words, Lu Chen’s brows furrowed slightly. In his opinion, the level of one’s cultivation did not represent the level of one’s strength. In front of a genius, no matter how high the level of an ordinary player was, they could still be insta-killed. However , after hearing the words of the Tang family, he finally understood that there was actually such a thing as the soul stage. Hearing this, Lu Chen’s brows furrowed tightly. Although the first elder’s strength was above average, he was still only at the spiritual stage. If he wanted to overpower the other ancient martial arts aristocratic families, he would probably have to rely on the technology of the country to intimidate them. In today’s state of advanced technology, even high-level cultivators would find it difficult to withstand modern firepower. However, if a single person’s combat strength was so strong that even the guidance system was unable to lock onto it… then it would be a different story. For example, for the current Lu Chen, once he has the support of the Swift Boots, it would be difficult for the modern aiming system to lock onto him. Similarly, it would be the same for the golden stage, so there was no need to mention the soul stage… He might even be able to take on an ordinary machine Facing such an opponent, Lu Chen really had no way out. However, he still would not hide. After all, he had seen the Tang family’s sincerity towards him. If the Tang family wanted to harm him, he would have died countless times. He said honestly, “‘Thank you for your concern. I still have the ultra long distance teleportation scroll here. If it really comes to a critical moment, I will teleport myself to a safe place.” Hearing Lu Chen’s words, Tang Zhantian and the rest of the Tang family felt a little more at ease. Finally, Tang Zhantian nodded slowly and said, “‘Okay. In that case, ifyou encounter any danger, you might as well teleport to the Tang family.” When he said this, the fourth brother’s face was full of smiles as he said, “That’s right. Child, you can teleport to the Tang family. This place will always be your home. In any case, we might be a family after a while.” As soon as these words came out, Tang Xiaoqing, who had just entered the house, suddenly blushed and said shyly, “What nonsense are you talking about?” The smile on the fourth uncle’s face did not diminish and he said, “Don’t think too much. I’m talking about your cousin, who is not young anymore. I think Lu Chen is a good match. Marrying her is a good choice.” Seeing the few of them bickering, Lu Chen did not interrupt. Tang Zhanfeng said, “Your daughter is already more than a hundred years old. Isn’t she old enough to marry Lu Chen?” At this time, the third brother inadvertently glanced at Tang Xiaoqing and deliberately said, “‘You’re wrong. She’s not old at all. For cultivators, their lifespan is a few hundred years. What’s the difference between just a few decades? “Moreover, I’ve seen his daughter before. She’s as beautiful as a flower and jade. It’s not a loss for Lu Chen to marry her.” At this time, Tang Xiaoqing, who was still shy, suddenly stood up. Her eyes were full of anger. “No, I won’t allow Lu Chen to marry her!” Tang Zhanfeng laughed and teased, “‘Oh, why not? Why won’t you let Lu Chen marry her?” Tang Xiaoqing stammered as she lowered her head. Her eyes fluttered in all directions. She looked as if she was trying to find an excuse for herself. However, she could not find a suitable excuse for a long time. In the end, she gritted her teeth, puffed up her little face, and shouted loudly, “There’s no reason, just no way!” For a moment, the entire hall was filled with a cheerful atmosphere. In the end, Tang Zhantian waved his hand and stopped the farce. With a kind expression, he looked at Lu Chen and said, “Back when Lu Chen and Tang Xiaoqing went to school together, you took care of my Xiaoqing quite a lot. “Now, if you’re in trouble, I should return the favor. You can join our Tang family and become a member of our Tang family. However, our Tang family doesn’t need you to do anything. However, if you’re in trouble… “You can use the teleportation scroll to teleport back here. “If you become a disciple of our Tang family, then even if you’re really in danger, it’s only right for us to help you.” Tang Zhantian’s words shocked Lu Chen. Originally, he thought that the Tang daily wanted to discuss the ownership of White Fog City with him. He was even thinking of how to protect his city without making things too difficult for Tang Xiaoqing to be the middle person. He did not expect that now it seemed that he had underestimated the Tang’s magnanimity. Not only did they not demand White Fog City, but they had also even pointed out a bright path for him, and were willing to use the Tang’s strength to protect him. One had to know that the enemy who could force Lu Chen to flee in a sorry state must be very powerful. The Tang family was helping him without considering the reward. This kind of behavior was completely inviting trouble onto himself. However , the Tang family’s head was still directly decided and directly agreed. Even the other four brothers did not have any qualms. Lu Chen subconsciously opened his mouth to reject, “This… This is not appropriate. I should solve my own problems by myself. I am very grateful that you were able to save my life before this. After this, I would be extremely embarrassed to trouble you all again.” The moment these words were said, everyone looked at Lu Chen with even more kindness. Tang Zhantian said, “Lu Chen, don’t be in a hurry to reject. We also have our own selfish motives. For a heaven gifted genius like you, it’s not just us. Any aristocratic family would take you in as a disciple.”When that time comes, they all have the responsibility and obligation to protect you. On the contrary, if our Tang family takes you in, we’ll be borrowing Tang Xiaoqing’s interest and taking advantage of a genius like you.” Tang Zhantian’s words were truly wonderful. Not only did Lu Chen not be able to refuse, but he also gave him a way out.. Hearing these words, Lu Chen no longer find any reason to reject. As the second-largest ancient martial arts aristocratic family, the Tang family’s status was already very high. Even though he was powerful, in front of them, he was nothing. The other party was willing to let him join the Tang family mostly because of Tang Xiaoqing. Moreover, he was already on good terms with Tang Xiaoqing, so it would not be inappropriate for him to join the Tang family. He immediately stood up and cupped his hands slightly. “Thank you, thank you so much. I am willing to become a member of the Tang family.” When the others saw Lu Chen agree, they were instantly gratified. At least they saved this kid for something. Although the Tang family’s mountain gate plaque was damaged, it was not taken advantage of by outsiders. Finally, Tang Feng, who had not spoken all this while, said loudly, “From today onwards, Lu Chen, you are my personal disciple.” Following that, Tang Feng fished out a token from his body and threw it to Lu Chen. “With this token, you can freely enter and exit the Tang family without any obstruction. “If you meet someone from another aristocratic family outside and report my name, generally, no one will make things difficult for you. “If there’s really something wrong and you have to make things difficult for me, bring them back if you have the ability. I would want to spar with that kind of person.” When he said this, Tang Feng’s expression was calm, but at the same time, there was a faint trace of arrogance. Lu Chen had long felt that among the five people seated at the top, although this person in front of him was the youngest, the aura on his body was indeed the most terrifying. With every movement, there was a law energy lingering around his body, which was incomparably mysterious. If he remembered correctly, in the world on the plaque, when he was unconscious, he had a vague impression that this person had saved him. Immediately, Lu Chen’s favorable impression of him increased greatly. He no longer tried to avoid saymg, “Thank you, master!” Tang Feng looked at Lu Chen with satisfaction, and his heart grew fonder of him. This disciple’s potential was definitely greater than his own. This made Tang Feng, who had never thought of taking in a disciple, develop a love for talent. Then, he took out a small box from his body. He handed it over to Lu Chen again. “This is your welcome gift.” Lu Chen took the small box and opened it to take a look. Inside was a high-grade medicinal pill that was surrounded by an alluring fragrance and strong aura. Although Lu had never seen a medicinal pill from the main world, he had seen some monsters drop them from their bodies in the Second World. The quality of those medicinal pills could not be compared to the one in front of him. The medicinal pill in front of him had a pill fragrance lingering in the air. Just smelling it made him feel refreshed and relaxed. He felt as if all his muscles were relaxing comfortably. “This pill was given to me by an alchemy expert a few years ago. Its name is the Thunder Pill. I can see that your cultivation level has already reached the peak of the spiritual stage. After eating this pill, you will be able to reach the golden stage.” Hearing these words, Lu Chen was overjoyed. His strength had long reached the peak of the spiritual stage. Even though in the Second World, he was able to continuously raise his strength, he could not do the same in the main world. Who would have thought that he would actually be able to obtain a pill here to improve himself? “Many thanks!” After that, the two exchanged a few more simple matters, and everyone dispersed. Lu Chen waited until he reached his room, then immediately closed the door. After carefully examining the Thunder Pill, the pets and Tang Xiaoqing also joined in the fun and took a look. The pets were all extremely curious, and Little Golden Dragon even went up to take a sniff. Rollie was even more tempted by the pill’s fragrance as compared to his bamboo shoots and almost wanted to eat it. Lu swallowed it in one gulp, and instantly, there seemed to be a force in his body that was emitted from the pill and transmitted to all his limbs and bones. Wherever it passed, all the meridians in his body seemed to have been opened up. The aura in his body was circulating freely and smoothly. Tang Xiaoqing had experienced this feeling before. It was like a river flowing freely with no restraints. Following that, the spiritual energy in Lu Chen’s body revolved rapidly. The speed was extremely fast, and it faintly gathered in his abdomen. The spiritual energy in his body continued to be purified and compressed, finally forming the shape of a pill! The golden core was formed! Lu Chen became a true golden stage expert. He felt that his every move was more powerful than before, and even his jumping became incomparably light. At this moment, his strength, speed, and physical fitness had all received a huge improvement. It had to be said that the Tang family was really Lu Chen’s treasure. He had only been here for two or three days, and his body had received a huge improvement in all aspects. At this moment, his movement speed and jumping ability were no longer any slower than when he had put on the Swift Boots. It had to be said that Lu Chen’s heart was filled with joy. At this moment, Lu Chen suddenly remembered something. Then, he took out five pills from his virtual backpack. “We killed so many monsters in the Second World’s Mass Grave. Do you remember that I asked you to collect all the bones? Tang Xiaoqing nodded in confusion. However, the eyes of Little Golden Dragon and the other two spiritual pets were shining! Back then, Lu not only asked them to collect the bones but also asked a lot of soldiers to help collect all the remains. The soldiers were happy to do it. They did not even spare the fingernail-sized ones. Lu Chen explained to Tang Xiaoqing, “This is the bloodline power extracted from the remains of the ancient beasts. “Little Golden Dragon and the others have seen it before. This time, I discovered that the bloodline power can be extracted and compressed into a pill. “Moreover, the bloodline power that a pill can withstand is limited. Out of the tens of thousands of corpses, a total of five bloodline power pills have been extracted. ‘ “Woah… This was the first time Tang Xiaoqing had seen this thing. She was a little curious. She took out one and looked at it carefully for a long time. There was no smell, but the surging bloodline power in the pill made her shocked Most importantly, she could not even tell what the attributes were inside. It was as if this bloodline power did not have any attributes. Before she could ask, Lan Weiwei and the others could not wait to take one each. They took it from Lu Chen and swallowed it. This scared Tang Xiaoqing. “Hey, hey! Pay attention! If the bloodline power’s attributes are wrong, there will be problems. Your body might explode!” However, what she was worried about did not happen! Lan Weiwei and the others all looked very comfortable, and there was not the slightest bit of abnormality. This was not right, they were not careful when they ate it! Tang Xiaoqing stared at the pill in her hand as her eyes blinked non-stop. Then, for some reason, she licked it! This time, everyone here was shocked by her gesture. This was extracted from a corpse! It was fine if it was eaten by a spirit beast, but Tang Xiaoqing was a human. How could she eat it? Lu Chen felt that something was wrong. It was not meant for humans to eat! This was used to extract the bloodline of a spirit beast to increase its bloodline power. This was a skill that came with his Taming God. At this moment, a mechanical voice suddenly sounded. [The Taming God can only extract the bloodline power to be used on spirit pets! It can not be used on other people’s spirit pets, or else it will be wiped out!] Hearing this, Lu Chen’s head buzzed, and his expression turned even more strange. Holy sh*t, was the Second World’s attempting to wipe out Tang Xiaoqing? As expected, the mechanical voice appeared again! [The non-host spirit beast that was fed will e exterminated!] Lu Chen panicked! “F*ck, stop!” When Lan Weiwei heard this, she instantly broke out in a cold sweat! Little Golden Dragon nervously spun around on the spot, and Rollie was so shocked that he took a big bite of the bamboo shoot! Although Tang Xiaoqing did not understand what was going on, she understood the severity of the situation. She was done for! Lu Chen was really shocked. Tang Xiaoqing was his childhood friend. If she was wiped out by the Taming God’s rules, he would have to blame himself for the rest of his life! [A malfunction has occurred. The spirit beast that was fed is not a spirit beast. Extermination has been canceled!] [A mistake has occurred with the Taming God. Extermination failed! Crashing!] [Ding! The Taming God has made a mistake. Failure to kill! In a deadlock!] [Ding! The Taming God has made a mistake. Failure to kill! In a deadlock!] [Ding! The Taming God has made a mistake. Failure to kill! In a deadlock!] Seeing this scene, Lu Chen was stunned! There was a bug in the Second World! If that was the case, would still be able to use his other titles? [Ding! The Taming God has encountered a mistake. Host, please propose a solution!] [Ding! If there is no solution, both the host and the person being fed will be forcefully wiped out!] [Countdown begins in 10… 9… 8…] Hearing this, everyone panicked. They are both going to be forcefully wiped out! This punishment was too severe! What should they do? They were still in the main world, and would really be dead meat right now once it happens. Lu Chen said quickly, “We have to return to the Second World now, or we will really die! In the Second World, the most we can do is become newbies and survive until we get better! Xiaoqing, is there a game pod in this room?!” Tang Xiao Qing was a little stunned. “No!” Lu Chen’s heart skipped a beat. Tang Xiaoqing suddenly said, “If I was your spiritual pet, would I not have to be killed?” Lu Chen and the others looked at her in confusion. Why would she ask such a question? Tang Xiaoqing was a human! However, there was no time to hesitate. There was only one solution, and it was a last resort! “The title of Taming God, maybe I can try to make Tang Xiaoqing my spiritual pet!” The countdown continued. When Lu Chen gave out this solution, the countdown suddenly stopped. Then, there was a long silence. Obviously, the Second World system also found it hard to accept such a request. Could humans… also become spiritual pets?! Seeing that there was a chance, Lu Chen hurriedly said, “As the Taming God title said, there is no rule that only beasts can be tamed!” Then, he quickly began to repeat the terms of the Taming God. [Taming God: Your understanding of taming and calling has reached an unfathomable level. When you try to capture and tame a target, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with the level of the target!] [Top-tier Capture: You can capture a target regardless of the level. Forcefully changing the target will take up a pet limit. Current slot — 3/3] [Top-tier Domestication: When you communicate with your pet and feed it, there is a high probability of increasing intimacy and favorability.] [Dominator: Your pet will not be able to resist your orders.] [Bloodline Enhancement: You can sacrifice treasures and equipment you obtain to increase your pet’s bloodline. The higher the level of the bloodline, the stronger the pet’s attributes and skills will be.] “The Taming God only stipulates that taming is the goal. It doesn’t say that the pet can’t be human. “My pet space has been fully collected. Logically speaking, my proficiency should have been increased as well. “Moreover, my level and the initial level have also increased greatly. I think my pet quota should also be increased! “I want to take Tang Xiaoqing as my spiritual pet!’ Hearing Lu Chen’s words, the Second World system was speechless. After a long silence, the mechanical voice appeared again! [Yes.] [The conditions of the Taming God have been updated!] [Taming God: Your understanding of taming and calling has reached an unfathomable level. When you try to capture and tame a target, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with the level of the target!] [Top-tier Capture: You can capture a target regardless of the level. Forcefully changing the target will take up a pet limit. Current slot — 4/10] [Top-tier Domestication: When you communicate with your pet and feed it, there is a high probability of increasing intimacy and favorability.] [Dominator: Your pet will not be able to resist your orders.] [Bloodline Enhancement: You can sacrifice treasures and equipment you obtain to increase your pet’s bloodline. The higher the level of the bloodline, the stronger the pet’s attributes and skills will be.] [Additional Note: From now on, non-human spirit pets are allowed!] This time, Lu Chen saw that apart from the increase in the number of pets he could add, there was also a note that he had to pay attention to! They had specially marked the fact that he had treated Tang Xiaoqing as a spiritual pet as a sign that it was forbidden to use a bug! This time, Lu Chen realized that this was not all bad! At least the bloodline power that he had extracted could only be used for spiritual pets, but after this bug, he could even improve the bloodline power of people! This was very impressive! One had to know that everyone’s cultivation speed was different. Talent, comprehension, and so on all determined the cultivation speed and the heights one could reach in life. However, the bloodline was definitely the most influential! Since ancient times, humans had all sorts of physiques, such as the primal chaos body, innate tyrant body, flame body, eternal divine emperor body, and so on.. <strong>Chapter 187: Worse Than Candy!</strong>  Translator: EndlessFantasy Translation Editor: EndlessFantasy Translation Anyone who possessed these physiques would cultivate at a rapid pace. Even the geniuses of the human race would not be able to cultivate as fast as them. There were even some people with extremely special physiques who were already highly ranked at birth. Especially since he had been together with Tang Xiaoqing for the past few days, she had also asked him many questions about cultivation. It turned out that there were not only humans in this world, but also demi-humans, celestials, demons, and so on. These special races’ innate levels had already far surpassed the end of many humans. Some were in the acquired stage, some were in the spiritual stage, and even the top celestials and demons had already far surpassed anyone in this world they were on. The difference in bloodline was like the difference between heaven and earth — an insurmountable chasm. Like the saying that circulated in the main world, all roads lead to Rome, but some people were born in Rome. The cultivation of the ordinary human race was tyrannical. For example, a genius like Tang Feng, who was only a few decades old, had already reached the peak of the aurous stage. However, if it was in the celestial race or the demon race, he was equivalent to a newborn baby, or at most a one-year-old child. Therefore, if he wanted to improve, or even just improve a person’s bloodline, it would have a huge impact on that person’s cultivation. Therefore, although Lu Chen did not have the chance to override the bug, the reward he got was far greater than what he sacrificed. If he could really awaken a top-notch bloodline, even if it was just an ordinary bloodline power, and have an innate sword body or overlord blade body, it would greatly improve his behavior. It would allow his sword arts or blade techniques to have a unique understanding, and his cultivation would advance by leaps and bounds, becoming the peak of this industry. In fact, everyone had their own unique bloodline tendencies. It was just that the bloodline power of ordinary people was too weak, almost imperceptible, so they could never gain a unique advantage over other races. However, once he could get the spirit medicine or treasure that could improve the bloodline power, his bloodline would be purified, improving it greatly. Thinking of this, Lu Chen could not wait to taste the effect of this bloodline power pill. He really wanted to know how much his physique would improve after he ate this pill. Thinking of this, Lu Chen’s face was full of joy. He raised his head and was ready to tell Tang Xiaoqing about his plans. However, before he could say it, he was surprised to find that the pill in Tang Xiaoqing’s hand had disappeared. Seeing this, Lu Chen stuttered and asked, “Xiaoqing, where did the pill go?” At this moment, Tang Xiaoqing was chattering. Then, she suddenly swallowed. She smiled and narrowed her crescent eyes. She said righteously, “I ate that pill!” Upon hearing this, Lu Chen’s eyes almost popped out. His plans have been eaten! This little girl was bold. Before she could figure out what was going on with this pill, she had already swallowed it! Her appetite could contend with Rollie’s! When Rollie first came to his side, he was still picky about food. He only wanted to eat bamboo shoots. This little girl was different from Rollie! However, now was not the time to blame Tang Xiaoqing for this. Lu Chen asked with concern, “Then, did you feel anything after eating it?” Tang Xiaoqing continued to squint her eyes and smile. “No, I don’t feel anything.” Hearing this, Lu Chen did not know how to take it. After all, he had never eaten it himself. He turned to Lan Weiwei and the others and asked, “Do you guys feel anything after taking this pill?” Rollie was chewing on the bamboo shoots in his mouth and gesticulating. Little Golden Dragon stuck out its tongue and hissed. Lu Chen waved his hand and said, “Alright, stop talking. Let Lan Weiwei talk.” At this moment, Lan Weiwei said, “Every time I take the pill, I feel a fever or chills in my body. At the same time, I feel that my mental state and physique have undergone a transformation. “The stronger the concentration of the bloodline power, the stronger the feeling.” Hearing this, Lu Chen nodded. Then, he looked at Tang Xiaoqing again and asked, “What about you? Do you have a similar feeling?” Tang Xiaoqing blinked her eyes and thought for a while. “No.” Lu Chen was baffled by Tang Xiaoqing’s response. He did not know what to say and was silent for a long time. Then, he asked, “Is it like eating candy?” When Tang Xiaoqing heard this, she frowned. After thinking for a few seconds, she said, “Actually, it’s a little different.” Lu Chen raised his eyebrows slightly and became energetic. “Then tell me, what’s the difference?” “Of course, candy is more delicious! Candy is sweet, and your pill has no taste at all!” Tang Xiaoqing put her hands on her waist and looked like she stated an obvious fact. Hearing Tang Xiaoqing’s words, Lu Chen rolled his eyes. He said somewhat speechlessly, “Forget it…” It seemed that Tang Xiaoqing could not read the room. Perhaps this was related to her own personal downfall. The higher the purity of the bloodline, the more difficult it was to improve, and the more bloodline power was needed. If Tang Xiaoqing did not feel anything, then the only explanation was that the purity of Tang Xiaoqing’s bloodline was far beyond that of an ordinary person. The pill had no effect on the density of his bloodline at all. Thinking of this, Lu Chen also thought of the faintly discernible powerful aura in Tang Xiaoqing’s body. Although Tang Xiaoqing’s cultivation was the lowest among the second generation of direct descendants of the Tang family, even Tang Hu and Tang Bao could not compare to Tang Xiaoqing in terms of strength. This kind of strength was very subtle, and it was difficult to express with words. Tang Xiaoqing was clearly lower in level than her two older brothers, but Lu Chen could clearly feel that if the two sides fought, Tang Xiaoqing would definitely have an overwhelming advantage. This was even under the situation where Tang Xiaoqing does not realize the full power in her body. If she released that destructive power, Lu Chen could guess that even Tang Feng was no match for Tang Xiaoqing, even the combined strength of the five brothers might not be enough for Tang Xiaoqing to fight alone. Lu Chen was also very puzzled. Why did he come to think of such a thing? However, he believed in his intuition. However, now was not the time to think about these things. To him, what he needed to do now was to take a pill to increase the strength of his bloodline and stimulate his own bloodline. Lu Chen did not hesitate and directly took another pill in his hand. The moment he took the pill, it was as if all of the energy stored in his body was about to explode. The energy rushed from his spine crazily and expanded to all of his body parts.. Chapter 188: Lu Chen’s Transformation! Translator: EndlessFantasy Translation? Editor: EndlessFantasy Translation The enormous surge of power rampaged through his body, opening up his originally tiny meridians in a violent manner. His blood was also filled with power. It was as if the bloodline power was constantly expelling the impurities in Lu Chen’s body, separating them from his blood and removing them. Not only that, but the power of the bloodline also seeped into his bones, constantly tempering and increasing the density of his bones. At this moment, Lu Chen felt as if he was a piece of iron that was being hammered by a blacksmith thousands of times. The muscle fibers in his body were also broken through by the power of the bloodline in a barbaric way. They were reassembled, broken down, and reassembled again. In just a few seconds, his muscles have reassembled more than ten thousand times. It could be seen with the naked eye that Lu Chen’s muscles had doubled in size. Lu Chen’s originally skinny body was now filled with a sense of masculinity and strength. Even his slightly pale skin, which had been filled with the demeanor of the student, had become crystal clear and lustrous, like a piece of white jade. The pain that Lu Chen had endured was enormous and unprecedented. Even in the Second World, when his skin was torn apart by a ferocious beast, it was far less than one-thousandth of the pain he had just encountered! However, the pain that Lu Chen had experienced was worth it, because he discovered that his body had undergone an earth-shaking change from the inside out. If Lu Chen’s previous stage was a quantitative change, then reshaping the power of his bloodline and raising the level of his bloodline was a fundamental step for Lu Chen. This unique bloodline power awakened from the inside gave Lu Chen a huge innate improvement, allowing the system, which was originally just the foundation of an ordinary person, to change beyond the human limit. This time, the improvement of the power of the bloodline was far from as simple as in the previous stage. Not only was it extremely painful, but the whole process of the improvement even took up to an hour. It was not until Lu Chen collapsed on the bed that the process of forming his bloodline finally stopped. At this moment, Lu Chen seemed to be completely different from before. Not only was his body incomparably robust, but even his skin had also become extremely delicate. His facial features had undergone a certain degree of remodeling, and his entire demeanor was incomparably handsome. His height had also increased by a few centimeters, reaching the standard height of two meters. Due to the crazy growth of his bones and muscles, the clothes on his body had been torn to shreds. At the moment when the bloodline upgrade ended, his muscles had actually gradually contracted. Lu Chen was no longer as astonishing as before, instead, he had become more symmetrical, and his coordination and charm were not exaggerated. However, the feeling of strength within did not decrease in the slightest. Instead, it was as if his muscles had been refined, becoming even more solid. Little Golden Dragon used its tail to poke Lu Chen’s arm tentatively. The muscles were not only extremely smooth, they were even extremely elastic. However, within the elasticity, there seemed to be an impenetrable sense of toughness. Looking at the scene in front of him, Little Golden Dragon felt that Lu Chen’s current body defense was very likely stronger than his own. Lan Weiwei saw that Lu Chen had fainted and asked anxiously in her heart, “Xiaoqing, is Lu Chen alright? Could something have happened to him?” As expected, she was worried. Xiaoqing could tell at a glance that Lu Chen was just exhausted due to the bloodline upgrade, but Lan Weiwei was still very nervous. Tang Xiaoqing quickly replied, “Don’t worry, Lu Chen is fine. It’s just that his body is exhausted. His bloodline has been upgraded, and it seems that his bloodline power is extremely powerful now. “If I’m not wrong, ordinary attacks can no longer penetrate his skin.” Hearing this, Lan Weiwei’s eyes were filled with joy. “That’s great, Lu Chen has become stronger again.” Beside her, Rollie understood what Tang Xiaoqing said and was even more curious about Lu Chen’s body. Thinking of this, he stretched out a fingernail and lightly scratched Lu Chen’s skin. Seeing this scene, Lan Weiwei was a little angry. Although Rollie looked silly and cute, his attack power was not weak. Although it was only a light scratch, if it really hurt Lu Chen, it would not be good. If this was a beginner player, it was very likely that they would be killed in one wave. However, what surprised everyone was that Rollie used his sharp claws to scratch Lu Chen’s skin. Not only was there no wound on Lu Chen’s skin, there was not even a scratch. On the contrary, Rollie’s fingernails were slightly worn away from this one gesture. Everyone who saw this scene sucked in a breath of cold air. Just what kind of physique did Lu Chen have? To be able to reach such a terrifying level, wouldn’t Lu Chen’s defense be very high? One had to know that Rollie’s level had already reached level 20 and above, and his attack power was very shocking. Although it was just a slight slip, the damage was already no less than a vicious stab from a diamond dagger. Under such circumstances, not only was Lu Chen unharmed, but Rollie was also slightly injured. This kind of defense was really too perverse. This meant that if monsters below level 20 attacked Lu Chen, even if Lu Chen lay there and did not fight back, would he lose any HP? For a moment, the others had become curious. They actually took out some simple weapons and began to experiment on Lu Chen’s body… However, this did not cause any harm to Lu Chen at all. Instead, it was as if Lu Chen was being tickled and was forcefully awakened by the itch. He looked at these guys who treated him as a guinea pig and was a little speechless seeing the weapons in their hands. Then, he entered another room to take a shower and wash off all the stains on his body. By the time he returned to the room where Tang Xiaoqing was, he had already put on a new set of clothes. At this moment, he was two meters tall and looked handsome. His temperament was even more like that of an elegant young master. Anyone who looked at him would easily fall for him. His current appearance made everyone envious. As for Tang Xiaoqing and Lan Weiwei, these two young girls who were in love with him, filled their eyes with splendor as their hearts pounded. At this moment, the sound of footsteps came from outside the door. The person who came did not even knock on the door but directly pushed the door open and entered. It was Tang Bao. His eyes were filled with curiosity as he looked around the room. In the end, his gaze was fixed on Lu Chen’s back, he said, “Uncle told me that there was something happening here. He suspected that someone has awakened their constitution. Could it be you, Lu Chen?” When Lu Chen turned around and faced the door, he looked at Tang Bao in front of him and nodded slightly! Tang Bao could clearly see the physical change in Lu Chen’s body. His mouth instantly opened wide and his shoulders slacked forward with shock. Chapter 189: Strength is Important! Tang Bao was shocked by what he saw! “D*mn, is that you, Lu Chen?! Weren’t you about one point eight meters tall when you first came here. How did you get taller than me?” Tang Bao looked around Lu Chen in disbelief. He looked around carefully and almost tore Lu Chen’s clothes off to check for himself After looking at him for a long time, Tang Bao said in surprise, “No wonder there was a shocking phenomenon happening. It turns out that it’s you awakened your bloodline.” Tang Bao’s face was full of joy as he sincerely wished him well. However, he suddenly thought of something. He suddenly paused and asked in surprise, “Wait… Isn’t the bloodline something that is predestined? How did you extract it? How did you activate it? Quick, quick, tell me, as a repayment for the favor I helped you to beat up your classmates when you were young!” In his anxiety, Tang Bao actually told the story of how he pretended to be Lu Chen and beat up elementary school students. One had to know that Tang Bao was already over fifty years old at that time. Although he looked young, that was because the lifespan of cultivators was long. However, for someone in his fifties to beat up a primary school student, he had scared the other primary school students out of their wits. This matter was indeed a little embarrassing, but for the sake of obtaining the power of the bloodline, what was so embarrassing about telling them now? Looking at the excited Tang Bao, Lu Chen finally understood that it was this Tang Bao who had pretended to be him when he was young and beat up those male students who bullied him. Thinking of this, Lu Chen felt a little grateful. Bullying in school had always been a very troublesome problem for him. If he let those bad guys bully him until he grew up, Lu Chen would probably have a harder time in life, he would not be as lively and cheerful as he was now. Lu Chen smiled and said, “Back in the Second World, I got a gold-grade medicinal pill. Unfortunately, there was only one, and I’ve already eaten it. In the future, if I get it again, I’ll give it to you.” Of course, Lu Chen did not say that all of his proficiency had reached the max level and that he had the title of the Taming God, which could increase the power of his bloodline. This was his biggest secret. Once it was found out by others, he would be in a dangerous position. Although Lu Chen knew that the reason why all of his proficiency could reach the highest level was because he had been stuck in the Second World for a thousand years with a bug. However, no one else knew about it. If everyone knew that he had such a skill with the highest level of proficiency, he would probably be captured and used as a lab rat. To take a step back, even though he had a very good relationship with the Tang family, in the face of huge benefits, no one could guarantee that people would not be swayed by his greed. Moreover, if it was really accidentally spread and other people with ulterior motives heard about it, it was likely that not only himself, but even the Tang family would be in danger. Currently, the Tang family was only ranked second among the ancient martial arts aristocratic families. It was far from being able to monopolize the other families. The reason why he was able to stand here steadily was that the benefits he had were not enough for others to shake the Tang family. However, if his biggest secret was exposed, then everyone would attack the Tang family in a frenzy. Just like the expert who was buried in the Mass Grave. People always had their own trump cards and biggest secrets. No matter how close they were, they should not easily reveal them. Otherwise, not only would they bring danger to themselves, but they might bring it to the people around them. Lan Weiwei and the other spiritual pets naturally would not expose Lu Chen. Lu Chen’s strength was far beyond their imagination. There must be a huge secret behind him not sharing it, so they kept quiet. As for Lu Chen’s new spiritual pet, Tang Xiaoqing could naturally feel that there was something special about Lu Chen. However, as Lu Chen’s best friend, she would definitely keep it a secret for Lu Chen. After hearing Lu Chen’s words, Tang Bao did not overanalyze them. On the contrary, his face was full of joy. “Good, you’re really generous, kid. I gave you a mask for a reason. You’re really smart.” Upon hearing this, the corners of Lu Chen’s mouth twitched slightly. After all, this Tang Bao had helped him when he was young. It would not be good to slap his face in front of him. However, Tang Xiaoqing bluntly snorted. “That mask was originally given to Lu Chen by the first elder. You’ve played with it for so many years, and now you want to ask Lu Chen for a favor for free? Dream on!” Tang Xiaoqing exposed him right away. Tang Bao did not feel guilty at all. Instead, he acted as if it was a matter of course. “The first elder has already lent me this thing. I’ve been using it all this time! “If I hadn’t taken out the Disguise Mask, Lu Chen wouldn’t have needed it, right?” Tang Xiaoqing did not want to care about him and only rolled her eyes. That shameless look of his was exactly the same as his father. He really was his father’s son. He looked as if what he did was not wrong. Lu Chen felt that Tang Bao was a good person. He was loyal and easy-going. He did not care about trifles. Lu Chen felt that it was very interesting to see the siblings quarreling. After all, he did not have siblings. His parents had already passed away, and he did not have any siblings. He had always been lonely. When he saw the two of them quarreling, he felt a warmth in his heart. When the two of them had calmed down, Lu Chen said, “Alright, it’s time for me to leave. I have been in the Tang family for quite some time. It’s time for me to return to the Mass Grave to raise my level.” The pressure in Lu Chen’s heart was still very great. He was facing the covetous eyes of foreign forces, and the ancient martial arts aristocratic families in the country also had some opinions about him. Being protected by the first elder all year round was ultimately not a long-term solution. Even if the Tang family stood behind him, Lu Chen still felt unaccustomed to it. It was not because he was embarrassed, but because he felt that he did not want to cause trouble for the Tang family. If one day his secret really could not be kept, then the Tang family would definitely face a catastrophe. Therefore, the best way was to strengthen himself. When that time came, no matter who came to cause trouble for him, it would not pose a problem. Tang Xiaoqing and the others nodded one after another. Lu Chen nodded slightly. “Okay, I’ll go get the car now, and then we’ll go together.” At this time, Tang Bao’s eyes suddenly lit up. “Hey, Lu Chen, are you going to the Second World to farm monsters? Bring me along! “Xiaoqing mentioned that you’re level thirty-nine, right? “Actually, I’m not much lower than you. I’ve been working hard since you joined the Tang family. Now, I’ve reached level 43! “How about it? “Do you want to consider farming monsters with me? I’ll help you fight a gold boss together!” Chapter 190: Tang Feng, City Lord of Qingfeng City! Hearing Tang Bao bragging about himself, Little Golden Dragon curled his lips slightly and did not say a word. Little Golden Dragon thought to himself, ‘Haven’t I, a gold boss, already been subdued? ‘Why would he need you?’ Tang Xiaoqing snapped, “Lu Chen doesn’t need you at all! With me and him farming gold bosses together, we won’t be held back.” Tang Bao was still not annoyed by Tang Xiaoqing’s teasing. He grinned and said, “That’s fine. With one more person, we’ll have more strength. When we encounter a powerful opponent, I can help you guys solve some problems.” Tang Xiaoqing was about to continue teasing Tang Bao when Lu Chen patted her back and said to Tang Bao with a smile, “Alright, let’s go together.” Tang Bao’s heart was slightly shaken. He could finally fight aside Lu Chen! Back then, when he did not know that Lu Chen was the person he had helped back then, he had wanted to meet this White Fog City’s City Lord countless times in his heart. If it were not for the fact that the Tang family had some matters to attend to...; Which was the issue of him being in the Dragon Team. If it were not for the fact that he was afraid that the first elder would take back the mask, he would have long wanted to go and meet him. He was secretly competing with Lu Chen in his heart. It was said that Lu Chen was very likely to be the number one player in the Second World. Today, he just had to see if this Lu Chen was stronger than him! In fact, he was still very unconvinced with Lu Chen’s skills. Back then, he was clearly such a little brat, but in the blink of an eye, he had become an aurous stage cultivator. It seemed that he was about to be on the same level as him. Therefore, these few days when Lu Chen was with the Tang family, Tang Bao had been working hard to farm monsters. Only then did he become a level 43 player. The reason why he wanted to kill monsters with Lu Chen was also that he wanted to show off his strength. To put it bluntly, he was just showing off. In the future, if word got out that even the number one big shot in the world, Lu Chen, was his underling, how awe-inspiring would that be! At this moment, Tang Bao was already starting to fantasize about how Lu Chen would be his underling. Shaking his head, he prepared to leave. After bidding farewell to Lu Chen, Tang Feng, Tang Zhantian, and the others, they immediately went down the mountain. On the peak of the mountain, Tang Feng, and Tang Hu looked at the departing vehicle thoughtfully. Tang Hu asked Tang Feng, “The Second World has released an announcement a few days ago. In five months, we will be able to open up a path from White Fog City to Qingfeng City. “White Fog City is incomparable to Qingfeng City in terms of size and strength. “With Lu Chen’s strength, even if he came to Qingfeng City, it wouldn’t be easy for him. Why didn’t you tell Lu Chen that you were the City Lord of Qingfeng City?” At this moment, if Lu Chen and the others were here, they would definitely be extremely shocked. Who would have thought that Tang Feng was actually the City Lord and that White Fog City — which had been abandoned for many years —was actually a subsidiary city of Qingfeng City? This was also something that Tang Feng had discovered by accident when he was searching through ancient books recently. If it was not for the mission issued by the Second World, no one would have noticed such an abandoned city. A light breeze brushed past Tang Feng’s face, blowing up his sideburns that had a wisp of white hair. That’s right, not only was Tang Feng an expert of the Tang family, he was also the City Lord of Qingfeng City in the Ghana Empire. The entire territory of Qingfeng City was under Tang Feng’s command. It could be said that as long as Tang Feng was willing, countless experts of Qingfeng City would listen to his arrangements, and together, they would trample over the six great silver territories. Of course, this was not the case for the incomparably strange Mass Graves, the deathly aura covered every corner of that place. If they trample over that place, Qingfeng City would probably suffer heavy losses as well. Tang Feng smiled faintly. “Lu Chen’s potential is enormous. A genius like him needs to be tempered through countless hardships in order to take one step at a time and finally walk on his own path. “A fate that goes too smoothly will only make the geniuses arrogant.” Then, he asked, “Tang Hu, why don’t you go and farm monsters with them?” Tang Hu’s expression was cold as he replied in a deep voice, “My strength has already broken through its peak. Recently, I have to use my energy to suppress my cultivation to prevent myself from breaking through too early.” Hearing this, Tang Feng nodded slightly, “Yes, in a few months, the trial of the Demon Sealing Valley will begin. Only those below the soul stage can enter. “You must suppress your strength well. If you want to break through, you must also breakthrough through the Demon Sealing Valley. That way, you won’t be rejected by the rules.” Hearing this, Tang Hu nodded heavily. Tang Feng took a deep breath as if recalling something. Sinking into his memories, he opened his mouth and said, “Back then, it was also in the Demon Sealing Valley that I obtained the inheritance of a Peerless Sword Saint in one fell swoop I was able to get to where I am today. “Otherwise, I wouldn’t have been able to hold on to my position as the City Lord of Qingfeng City with my strength at the peak of the aurous stage. “It’s a pity that I can’t help you obtain the treasures in the Demon Sealing Valley. I only hope that these little fellows in front of me can increase their strength as soon as possible. When the time comes, I will lend you a hand.” Although Tang Xiaoqing was the reincarnation of a great being and Lu Chen was a heaven-gifted genius, in Tang Feng’s eyes, they were still incomparable to Tang Hu. This was because once Tang Hu stepped into the soul stage in the Demon Sealing Valley, his strength would be able to crush an aurous cultivator. According to his guess, even in the Second World, there was definitely an insurmountable gap between the peak of the aurous stage and the soul stage. One had to reach a certain level before they could cross it. … When Lu Chen and the others arrived at the hotel, it was already eight in the evening. At this time, the moon was hanging high in the sky. The warriors of the Dragon Team were also ready and standing in the middle of the hall. However, this time, there were changes in the game pod. First, from the outer to the inner, the order was from the weaker warriors to the stronger warriors. The stronger the warriors were, the closer they were to the center. The center was where Lu Chen, Tang Xiaoqing, and the few pets were at. This arrangement was made so that Lu Chen would be the last to be hurt if the hotel was in danger. After all, as long as Lu Chen was alive, the strength of the Dragon Team would be heavily protected. However, if something happened to Lu Chen and Tang Xiaoqing, then all the members of the Dragon Team would be in trouble. Although the Dragon Country had sent a rather powerful force to guard the area and even specially transferred a reinforcement team, the first elder still felt a little worried. Lu Chen’s game pod had also undergone some changes. The original ordinary game pod of Lu Chen had undergone a series of changes here. Not only had the space become three times its original size, but it did not look crowded or dull at all. Even the bottom of the gaming pod had been specially designed by a well-known domestic designer to tailor a top-grade latex mattress according to Lu Chen’s figure. Chapter 191: At the Mass Grave Again! Lu Chen’s game pod was not only equipped with a new mattress. In addition, it was also equipped with massage facilities to keep Lu Chen’s body in the most comfortable state. When the soldiers of the Dragon Team heard that Lu Chen’s body had changed because of the changes in the bloodline power, they had the designers make changes to the mattress and massage facilities at the last minute, they had to make sure that Lu Chen was always in the most comfortable state. When they learned that Tang Bao had also come, the entire team became even more excited. They hurriedly picked the best one from the spare game pod and brought it over. One had to know that this was an expert at the golden stage, an existence even stronger than the first elder. With such an expert joining this team, the safety of the Mass Grave was greatly guaranteed. Lu Chen was simple. He introduced the two sides to make them familiar with each other and got to work. When the warriors heard that Tang Bao was from the Tang family, the image of this man in their eyes instantly became even loftier. If it was not for the fact that Tang Bao always had a piece of long grass in his mouth, they would have long regarded Tang Bao as an unworldly expert. Lu Chen once again instructed everyone to protect themselves. If they could not, they must retreat back to the main world. At this time, all the members of the Dragon Team had already understood Lu Chen’s intentions after the previous battle. Without any objections, they entered the game pod and arrived at the Second World’s Mass Grave. In the Mass Grave, a bright moon hung high in the sky. Under the moonlight, the various monsters in the mountains formed a strange reflection and scattered on the ground. The sound of crows crying in the distant forest made the atmosphere of the Mass Grave even more strange. In the distant forest, there were all kinds of monsters flashing by from time to time, making this place seem unusually terrifying. The warriors had rested and recuperated in the main world for many days, especially those who had not been in the Second World at all. At this time, facing the gloomy Mass Grave, they were slightly unfamiliar and somewhat uncomfortable. Liu Changping, Liu Yuan, the Dragon Slayer Team, the Soul Slaying Team, and the others had been through hundreds of battles and were mentally strong. They were unfazed by all of this. However, they still maintained a high degree of vigilance and were constantly on guard against the appearance of monsters in their surroundings. Lu Chen, Tang Xiaoqing, Lan Weiwei, and Little Golden Dragon were much calmer. This was because they were either the original residents of this Second World… Or who was like Lu Chen that killed monsters casually. The only one who was abnormal was Tang Bao, he was the only excited lad in this place. He almost swept past Liu Yuan several times, causing her to be displeased. At this moment, Tang Bao had already pulled out the knife in his hand, and his head was constantly looking around. At this moment, Liu Yuan saw Tang Bao’s hand slightly tremble as he held onto the knife. Liu Yuan was a little surprised. After all, Tang Bao was a golden stage. Moreover, it seemed that his level had already reached level 43. Even if he was afraid, it should not be to the point of him trembling, right? She leaned over to Lu Chen’s side and whispered, “Lu Chen, I see that the person you brought back from the Tang family seems to be very afraid. His hand has been trembling all this time. It looks like he won’t be able to hold the knife any longer.” Lu Chen looked over when he heard that. Indeed, Tang Bao’s hands were shaking. Not only that, Tang Bao’s entire body was shaking in a strange pattern. When he saw this, Lu Chen’s pupils suddenly contracted! “He’s not afraid. He’s someone who’s always on the edge of life and death in excitement. “He’s just excited to witness a massacre. This kind of excitement would stimulate the secretion of adrenaline, causing him to be in an extremely excited state for a short period of time. “Not only would it be able to reduce one’s sense of pain, but it would also be able to greatly increase one’s combat strength and reaction ability. “Tang Bao is definitely an expert. If there’s any danger, all of you can gather around him.” At this moment, the Dragon Slayer Team and Soul slayer Team had also discovered this point. In an instant, their eyes were filled with caution. This kind of extreme combat awareness was most commonly seen in the African plains, there, the top predators would mobilize every muscle in their body as soon as they were about to hunt. This fighting strength was engraved in their genes, and only natural-born killers could enhance it, this also meant that this person named Tang Bao, who looked sloppy, was an extremely powerful battle maniac. This kind of person would never be afraid of battle. His characteristic would only make him more and more excited, and the more powerful the enemy, the more excited he would be. At this moment, a faint tremor came from the ground. In the distance, it was as if thousands of troops and horses were galloping past the warriors. This feeling was too familiar to the Soul Slaying team. When they were on a mission in Africa, there was once a herd of bison that was chased by lions, resulting in a riot. At that time, they had set up an ambush in the valley in advance, preparing to ambush the enemy. However, there were almost tens of thousands of bison that were rampaging into the narrow canyon. The canyon was less than a hundred meters wide. When the bison herd rushed in crazily, they had yet to enter their field of vision. They only felt that countless hornets were lingering around their ears. At this time, they did not take it seriously. When the bison herd was only a few hundred meters away from them, they were taken off guard. The bison herd was being chased and aimlessly running away. They were densely packed. Every one of them was squeezing and colliding with each other. There was no gap at all to breathe. Even those that ran slowly would be trampled under the feet of others behind them. They would never be able to stand up again. In the end, the bison actually did not have the right to choose what to do, all they could do was run. The only ending for them to stop was death! Even the huge rocks in the valley were shaken by the huge earthquake and rolled down to the bottom of the cliff. If not for the fact that they had used all their strength to climb to the highest point, no matter how strong they were, they would not have survived. After that, this was the second time they had encountered such a grand scene. Even the last time when they faced the onslaught of over 10,000 monsters, it was not as grand as it was now. In fact, they estimated that there were at least 50,000 monsters this time! It was five times more than the last time they witnessed it! At this time, without Lu Chen’s command, hundreds of warriors instantly formed a formation with exceptional tacit understanding. At this moment, their equipment, battle experience, and courage were even greater than the last time. Facing the horde of monsters was no easy feat, but they were ready for battle. At this moment, Tang Bao, who had an evil smile on his face, walked straight to the front of the group! Chapter 192: Lu Chen’s Increased Atributes! At this moment, Tang Bao was already ahead of the group. He had the aura of a man who could take on ten thousand enemies in one go! Even though Tang Bao’s current condition seemed unusual, Lu Chen acted as if he did not see anything and did not say a word. Tang Xiaoqing inadvertently glanced at Lu Chen and was shocked to find that Lu Chen had already closed his eyes as if he was in a meditative state. She gently pushed Lu Chen, but he did not react at all. It was obvious that he had received some kind of higher message. Liu Yuan had noticed this too, which made her a little nervous. She did not know when it started, but Lu Chen seemed to have become her backbone. She had obvious reasons for being nervous. The enemies this time were more than before. Under such circumstances, if Lu Chen fell into a deep sleep, this battle would not be easily won. Liu Changping, who was beside her, seemed to have sensed her worry, and gave a rare serious smile. “Liu Yuan, you are a member of the Dragon Team before you met Lu Chen. You have to remember, if you want to become a peer with Lu Chen, then become stronger. Don’t let yourself fall behind.” Hearing this, Liu Yuan came to her senses. Yes, her combat strength was comparably well. She had always been a female warrior who could take care of herself. If she could not become stronger, how could she be Lu Chen’s teammate? If she could not defend against the first wave of attacks, does that mean she would live under Lu Chen’s wings for the rest of her life? While she contemplated, turns out, Lu Chen was not fast asleep. Instead, he was deep in shock! Because at this moment, all the data about him and his spiritual pets had changed, and it was an earth-shattering change! During this period of time, Lu Chen had comprehended the fist intent, raised his cultivation to the aurous stage, awakened the power of his bloodline, made Tang Xiaoqing his pet, and put the elf egg as his spiritual pet. This series of operations allowed him to obtain an unprecedented improvement. At this moment, the Second World was calculating the changes in the data of his body. All of Lu Chen’s attack power, defense, attack speed, and so on, were rolling up at an incredible speed! [Name: Morning Mist] [Level: 49] [Class: Sword Saint (now able to change class to War God)] [Titles: Fist God (hidden), Sword God (hidden), Shield God (hidden), Axe God (hidden), Blade God (hidden), All-rounded master (hidden)] [Vitality: 9,500] [Strength: 8,356] [Agility: 6,381] [Intelligence: 5,612] [HP: 67,030] [MP: 68,000] [Attack: 82,860] [Attack Speed: 32] [Defense: 3,850] [Magic Defense: 2,100] [Reputation: 33,096] [White Fog City Lord Set: Every attack in battle can increase a player’s attack power by 1%! In White Fog City, all damage caused will be increased by 100%, and the attributes will be doubled. You can control the movement of White Fog City. In White Fog City, you will be immune to 99% of all damage! Magic damage received in White Fog City will be reduced by 90%. The player’s magic resistance will be calculated on White Fog City. HP will be shared in White Fog City and will recover 100% HP every second! Can be teleported to any corner of White Fog City! Skills used in White Fog City will have no cooldown and will recover 100% maximum MP every second.] [Item 1, Epic-level teleportation scroll: Can be teleported to any corner within a 100,000-mile radius, regardless of barriers] [Item 2, Class change to Sword God Scroll: Find a Sword God class change master, and turn yourself into a Sword God. [Item 3, Shadow Dagger: Gold weapon. When using the Shadow Dagger, the weapon will have a hidden attribute bonus, its attack power will increase by 500%! Players can hide in the shadows. Passive skill reduces enemies’ physical attack by 99%, and reduces magic attack by 50%] [Item 4, Sky-piercing Mirror: Gold weapon. Can block an attack with 100 million attack power, or withstand 10 million magic attack power. A one-time use weapon!] [Item 5, Heaven-cleaving Sword: Silver equipment. Can deal 10,000 damage to the enemy. A certain chance to trigger a fivefold critical hit! A low chance to trigger Spatial Cleavage to cut enemies into pieces and cripple them, reducing their attack power!] [Item 6, Raging Flame Blade: Silver equipment. The attack range will automatically increase by 10 times. At the same time, an unknown flame will be generated on the enemy who is attacked. The flame will burn the enemy for three seconds. The HP loss per second will be 5% to 100% of the attack power] [Item, 7 Swift Boots: Movement speed increased twofold. Can burst out 20 times the speed during critical moments, ranges up to 100 meters.] [Item 8, Disguise Mask: Silver equipment. Reshapes face and body to whatever player desires to be.] [Item 9, Exoskeleton Wingsuit: Silver equipment: Can glide in the sky and stay in the air for a short period of time.] … [Golden Dragon ] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Little Golden Dragon] [Intimacy: 65] [Level: 45] [HP: 4,544,000] [Attack: 375,000] [Defense: 280,800] [Magic Defense: 244,584] [Skills: Water Control, Water Domain, Crazy Dragon’s Breath, Golden Gaze, Body Shrink.] [Water Control: The exclusive skill of the Golden Dragon. It will have different effects depending on the awakening of its bloodline. It creates a water domain and controls the water within the domain. It can control the blood in the body of a living creature! There is a certain chance to directly extract the enemy’s HP and replenish it on one’s own body. At most, it will be one-third of the enemy’s total HP. It can only be used once in a single battle! There is even a chance to awaken the bloodline in the body and complete the transformation!] [Water Domain: Your pet can control the water within the domain and can control the blood in the body of other creatures!] [Crazy Dragon Breath: Spits out a dense fog filled with poison, covering an area of 1 square kilometer. Any enemy who inhales the poison would lose 2,000 HP every second, this lasts until the enemy dies.] [Golden Gaze: The Three-eyed Golden Dragon is an ancient mutant. It was originally a Three-eyed Golden Python. A few hundred years ago, it received the heavenly tribulation and became a Three-eyed Golden Dragon. Its third eye was the horn of a dragon! When the giant Python uses this skill, it could freeze the opponent for one second! Within that one second, all of the opponent’s defense will be lost! Can only be used twice per day!] [Body Shrink: Can change its own size within a certain range, has no effect on combat strength and speed.] Chapter 193: Level Up by 5 Levels! [Ancient Ash Wolf King] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Lan Weiwei] [Intimacy: 230] [Level: 38] [Attack: 38,800 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff)] [HP: 413,489 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff)] [Defense: 5,219 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff)] [Magic Defense: 4,130 (increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff, totaling to 1,600)] [Skills: Demonic Flame, Frost Domain, True Form Transformation, Ash Wolf’s Fury, Moonlight’s Blessing, Ash Wolf’s Howl, Soul Tracking, Moonlight Shield.] [Demonic Flame: The Ancient Ash Wolf King spits out terrifying demonic flames, causing 18,000 physical and magic damage per second to the enemy in front of it.] [Frost Domain: Creates a frost domain, slowing down the enemy’s attack speed and casting speed by 50%.] [True Form Transformation: When transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf King, all attributes increase by 50%.] [Ash Wolf’s Fury: The Ancient Ash Wolf King awakens the sleeping bloodline in its body, greatly increasing its own attributes, and has a chance to obtain an additional skill!] [Moonlight’s Blessing: Under the moonlight, all attributes increase by 50%.] [Soul Tracking: When this skill is used, it can leave a mark deep within the target’s soul. It can track up to three people. The mark will remain for three months. This skill can be shared with the owner.] [Ash Wolf’s Howl: The exclusive skill of the Ancient Ash Wolf. It will have a different effect as the bloodline awakens. When the Ash Wolf howls at the moon, it will deal 1,000 magic damage per second to enemies under the moonlight for 50 seconds!] [Moonlight Shield: Under the moonlight, it can continuously add a personal light shield to teammates and the pet. It can reduce 50% of the damage. Lasts for several seconds, reducing HP by 5,000! With every additional light shield gained, the cost will be doubled.] … [Tang Xiaoqing] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Tang Xiaoqing] [Intimacy: 520] [Level: 59 (unknown)] [Vitality: 53,500] [Strength: 12,356] [Agility: 8,251] [Intelligence: 5,519] [HP: 90,341] [MP: 88,000] [Attack: 110,860] [Attack Speed: 35] [Defense: 4,150] [Magic Defense: 2,800] [Reputation: 45] [Skills: Unknown] … [Ancient Panda] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Rollie] [Intimacy: 155] Level: 25] [Attack: 6,350] [HP: 222,000] [Defense: 31,000] [Magic Defense: 31,000] [Skill: Luck Bonus, Invisible Golden Body] [Luck Bonus: With Heaven’s blessing, there is a high chance of avoiding disaster, turning a bad situation into a good one, and averting a disaster! Provides a Luck buff for 60 seconds. Has a certain chance to be immune to all negative effects and damage.] [Invisible Golden Body: There will be a chance to cast this skill for each battle. When casting the skill, opponents will not be able to move for 5 seconds. However, it would be immune to all damage and could teleport to any place within 10,000 meters.] … [Elf Egg (unknown] … Everyone who belonged to Lu Chen, including himself, had received a huge increase in stats. For Lu Chen, the first thing that happened was that his popularity value had skyrocketed. During this period of time, he had become the City Lord of White Fog City, and the economic development of the city was getting better and better. Especially when Lu Chen summoned White Fog City and subdued Little Golden Dragon in that battle… countless people were completely convinced by Lu Chen’s power! His popularity points skyrocketed. Plus, Lu Chen’s level had also received a huge increase, a full 10 levels were increased! This was the result of the evaluation of Lu Chen’s strengths. Most importantly, Lu Chen’s physique had undergone an earth-shattering change! Lu Chen’s physique value had directly increased several times, approaching 10,000 points! This was simply a bone-crushing trait to have! However, when he saw Tang Xiaoqing, he was even more shocked! Tang Xiaoqing’s vitality value had actually reached more than 50,000 points! Amazing! As expected, this Tang Xiaoqing was not an ordinary citizen! Moreover, next to her level-up number, there was an unknown written next to it. It likely meant that she had yet to develop her dull strength. The reincarnation of a mighty figure was so terrifying! As for the other spirit pets, although the experience points they had obtained were all credited to Lu Chen, Lu Chen’s leveling up this time had directly brought their levels up by five levels! One had to know that Lan Weiwei had also lived for over a thousand years before she became a level 20 existence. She had only been with Lu Chen for a few months, yet she had reached level 38. This kind of leveling speed was comparable to riding a rocket straight up to the moon. Little Golden Dragon was the same. Moreover, the attack power of these two spirit pets’ skills had also increased. It had to be said that Lu Chen had profited greatly this time, along with his pets. What made Lu Chen even more pleasantly surprised was that Rollie’s skill had been extended to five seconds instead of three. Most importantly, this skill also gave Rollie a teleportation skill. What a great practical skill it was! It had to be said that this was definitely a great harvest! After nearly half a minute, Lu Chen finally recovered from the joy of his sudden increase in strength. At the same time, he looked at his pets. Everyone’s eyes were filled with a pleasant surprise as well. The gains from this trip to the Tang family were really fruitful. However, at this moment, Lu Chen also noticed the changes in Tang Bao’s body. Tang Bao’s hands were trembling uncontrollably. The casual smile on his face and the aura on his body became more and more powerful. In an instant, his killing intent managed to spread throughout the entire battlefield. The hair on the backs of all the warriors of the Dragon Team who felt this killing intent instantly stood on end. Even the members of the Dragon Slayer Team and Soul Slayer Team felt a chill down their spines. At this moment, everyone felt their bodies stiffen. A feeling of being enveloped by killing intent swept through their entire bodies! They had originally imagined Tang Bao to be strong enough, but it was only at this moment that they understood that Tang Bao’s strength had far exceeded their imaginations. Especially Liu Yuan — who had previously been suspicious of Tang Bao — was in complete shock. However, the ones who were most shocked at this moment were not the warriors, but Lu Chen’s two spiritual pets, Lan Weiwei and Little Golden Dragon. This was because they could clearly sense that Tang Bao’s killing intent had already formed a domain! One had to know that this was definitely an innate skill, and it was an application of a law. Lan Weiwei and Little Golden Dragon’s domain was an innate skill, and for humans, very few people are able to acquire such an innate skill. As long as they are strong enough, it meant that their comprehension of a certain law had reached a very high level. The law was divided into strong and weak, so naturally, there were strong and weak domains. For example, Lan Weiwei’s Frost Domain. Its main function was to control, slowing down the enemy’s speed and reducing the damage it received. On the other hand, the Little Golden Dragon’s Water Domain was slightly stronger. Other than having certain control skills, it could also control the liquid to attack the enemy. It could even directly draw the enemy’s blood. That was already very impressive! However, in front of Tang Bao’s killing domain, it was weak. Chapter 194: Tang Bao’s Astonishing Combat Power! Tang Bao’s Sand Domain was born for slaughter. It did not have any control skills, and it did not need to slow down the enemy, it also did not need to reduce the damage received by the enemy. The only effect was to increase the attack power! That almost solidified killing intent would often make everyone’s heart tremble. The timid ones would not even be able to move. If it was not for the fact that the Dragon Team warriors here had been wandering between life and death all year round, they might have already collapsed at this moment. IT was worse for those who did not have much experience, they could no longer bear the killing intent and collapsed. Finally, countless monsters appeared in the distant forest. The surging aura made even the top-notch warriors of the Dragon Country feel a little nervous. However, at this moment, the killing intent that they felt suddenly decreased by a lot. To be precise, it was almost as fast as lightning and disappeared without a trace. The killing intent did not disappear. Instead, it was like a raging tide, instantly spreading a kilometer away. At almost the same time, the monster tide in the distance seemed to regard a certain distance as the dividing line. All the monsters that entered this dividing line instantly lost control of their bodies and became stiff. This was especially true for the low-level monsters. Due to the intense fear in their bodies, they could no longer move their limbs. However, due to the high-speed running earlier, their inertia was too great. Their speed did not decrease, and they could not stop their momentum as each and everyone one of them fell forward. The monsters that had not entered the domain were not prepared at all. They continued to run forward with all their strength. They were tripped by the monsters that suddenly fell up front, causing a ruckus. For a moment, all the monsters were like dominoes, falling one after another. For a moment, the entire horde of monsters turned upside down, as if a building had collapsed. The monsters that were originally full of vigor had experienced such a huge change and did not know what to do. Only a few monsters that were above level 20 could stabilize their bodies under such circumstances and readjust themselves. However, under such circumstances, it was difficult for them to avoid stepping on their own kind. In just a few seconds, Tang Bao did not even swing his sword. The monster charging formation was already in a mess. -3,060! -1,200! -938! -296! -1,431! -357! -724! -10,530! -9,680! -9,173! Tens of thousands of monsters were lying on the ground, and the monsters behind them were charging forward recklessly. In an instant, tens of thousands of red numbers appeared on the battlefield! In addition, some of the monsters were even trampled on more than once until their bodies were crushed into pieces. Tang Bao had given tens of thousands of attacks from this Sand Domain. Although this attack was not from him, all the damage was recorded on his head! The way everyone looked at Tang Bao instantly changed, because at this moment, Tang Bao, who was originally level 43, had become level 45! Seeing this scene, everyone was shocked. After all, there had not been any direct profits yet, and Tang Bao had already leveled up two levels in less than a minute! After all, leveling up was something that was more difficult the further one went, the more experience points needed. Everyone was instantly shocked. After all, even Lu Chen was only level 39 before this, and it took some time to get to that point. However, Tang Bao, who felt his strength increase exponentially, became even more sinister. The smile on his face became even more maniacal! With the rapid increase in his level, his killing domain became stronger and stronger. Under the influence of this powerful Sand Domain, even level 20 monsters were faintly affected by his Sand Domain, their figure and running speed decreased slightly. Due to the slight decrease in speed, it had already caused the already chaotic monster tide to become even more chaotic. There were even monsters over level 20 that were injured, this attack had already caused the loss of more than 5,000 monsters. Seeing this scene, everyone was shocked! “D*mn, can monsters be killed like this?” “I thought I was in the acquired stage and was already an elite in the Second World. Now, compared to Tang Bao, I’m a piece of trash!” “When I saw that the number of monsters in front of me had reached nearly 50,000, I thought that more than half of the members of the Dragon Team would die here. Now, it seems that with Tang Bao joining us, we won’t be so miserable anymore.” “I now think that Tang Bao might even be stronger than Lu Chen!” “That’s not possible, right? We’ve all seen how powerful Lu Chen is. Tang Bao is indeed powerful, but this is based on the fact that he’s using the Sand Domain. He used a trick up his sleeve.” “I’m envious. I want to be like him too.” Tang Bao’s action had indeed changed the worldview of everyone in the Dragon Team. Originally, everyone was in a serious position and dared not to say anything. However, when they saw the scene in front of them, they could not help but start to discuss it. Many people even felt that Tang Bao’s strength had surpassed Lu Chen’s. However, the scene that shocked everyone was just the beginning for Tang Bao! Tang Bao shouted and rushed out abruptly. At this moment, he was even faster than the members of the Dragon Team. Back then, Lu Chen was only at the spiritual stage. With the addition of the Swift Boots, his speed could reach the speed of running 100 meters in two to three seconds. However, at this moment, Tang Bao only needed one second to appear 100 meters away. What made it even more difficult for everyone to accept was that Tang Bao’s Sand Domain still had the effect of increasing the number of deaths caused by the horde of monsters. Therefore, while Tang Bao was charging forward, his strength was constantly increasing, the scene in front of them made everyone’s eyes turn green with envy. Not to mention the Dragon Team’s warriors, even Lu Chen was stunned when he saw this scene. He had never thought that leveling up could be done this way. However, it could not be solely based on Tang Bao’s strength, if it was not for the fact that Lu Chen was protecting the warriors of the Dragon Team who were training, he could have charged into the horde by himself and used his Blade God’s skill to suppress the tide in all aspects. Lu Chen’s Blade God title was very powerful in terms of attack power. Not only did it have the effect of a critical hit, but it could also suppress everything within a hundred meters. Chapter 195: Tang Bao is the King of Group Battles! Translator: EndlessFantasy Translation? Editor: EndlessFantasy Translation In other words, once Lu Chen used the Blade God’s skill in front of the horde, the entire horde would be in deep trouble. Wherever Lu Chen passed, not a single blade of grass would grow, and almost all of them would die! Unless it was a silver boss, normal monsters would not be able to withstand Lu Chen’s attack. Tang Bao finally arrived in front of the horde. He raised the blade in his hand and swung it down paired with a loud roar! His blade was already two meters long. However, under his attack, the blade turned into a thousand-meter-long giant blade and slashed down at the horde rather than having a short-range attack! In front of the huge horde, this thousand-meter-long blade swept away all the monsters in its path! A ditch that was several meters deep was left on the ground. A strong storm burst out from the ditch, and it was pushed to both sides! The monsters near the ditch were even blown into pieces by the huge impact. Even the monsters that were far away were still affected by the sudden burst of wind. They were sent flying and fell heavily to the ground. -13,254! -21,943! -5,232,54! -13,177! -101,426! The effect of Tang Bao’s slash was astonishing. The entire horde was instantly split into two halves, and the red dots that rose from within all numbered in the tens of thousands, or even in the hundreds of thousands! His attacks were simply too powerful. Although he did not cause as much damage as the previous horde that he had used his domain to control, under this powerful attack, the lethality of his attacks only increased! Previously, it was all low-level monsters. Now that he had killed high-level monsters, there would definitely be more items that were good! There were even quite a few good pieces of loot that dropped this time. At this moment, there were already several thousand loots that had appeared on the entire battlefield. If Tang Bao brought these items to White Fog City to set up shop, he would probably become one of the richest people in the world. Looking at the skill scrolls, rings, cloaks, boots, and all sorts of weapons on the ground, if Tang Bao was willing, he could instantly pull up a small armed force. In fact, this armed force could be an existence that would not be underestimated in the Second World. It could be even more powerful than some small families in the main world. At this moment, Lu Chen loudly shouted, “All warriors, gather up your energy and charge!” Everyone had been eyeing this for a long time. Moreover, the monsters did not have any order at this moment. Now was the best time to attack! As soon as Lu Chen gave the order, everyone immediately launched their strongest attacks! The Archers found their highest angles and shot at the monsters in the distance. The Mages used all kinds of magic skills to crazily attack the monsters in the distance. The Warriors with high damage skills, especially those with plant-type skills, took the opportunity to let countless plants grow in the monsters, firmly controlling the monsters on the ground or absorbing the energy in their bodies. They even had man-eating flowers that bit off the many monsters’ heads. Among them, the group that had the shortest end of the sticks was the melee warriors. To these people, they were not good at long-range attacks. They could only lower their heads and mustered all their strength, desperately rushing towards the horde. Looking at the current situation, if they were a step too late, they would lose out and die. Especially now that too many low-level monsters had died. If they did not hurry, it was unlikely that anything else would drop. If the last time the warriors fought tens of thousands of monsters, it was to increase their own strength and protect their teammates. Knowing they succeeded once before, they were truly crazy to increase their levels and obtain better equipment now. Under the attraction of such benefits, they put in 120% of their energy, and no one was willing to retreat. Especially under Tang Bao’s domain skill, almost all the monsters were at critical HP. Many of the monsters had pitifully low HP, and they could be killed with just one more attack. No one wanted to miss such an opportunity to steal the kill! However, no one would mind stealing kills at this time, even Tang Bao was no exception. That was because there were still more than 40,000 monsters in front of them, and they were still charging in their direction. If the reinforcements would not arrive in time, then when the monsters swarmed up and attacked Tang Bao, even an expert at the peak of the aurous stage would not be able to withstand it. It was the right time to drastically reduce the enemy’s strength by utilizing the people around. At this moment, Tang Bao’s eyes were bloodshot from killing monsters. The huge blade in his hand glowed, and each time, he reaped countless experience points. At this moment, although Tang Bao was filled with killing intent, his mind was still calm. Seeing that his level had risen to such a high level, he was ecstatic. After all, having the opportunity to fight 40,000 to 50,000 monsters in one go was rare. He had always taken the initiative to look for them. How could there be tens of thousands of monsters being this chaotic be handed to him on a silver platter just like that? This kind of opportunity was probably something that he would only encounter a few times in his life. However, there was a drawback to the warrior’s help. Tang Bao could no longer activate his domain. This domain could not differentiate between friend and foe. Other than himself, everyone else would be affected by the killing intent, and their condition would deteriorate. However, Lu Chen knew when to take the opportunity to strike. He would not miss such a good opportunity to harvest souls! He quickly shouted, “Lan Weiwei, Little Golden Dragon, activate your respective domain for battle!” In the next moment, Lan Weiwei’s Frost Domain was released. At this moment, the Frost Domain was much stronger than when she was still the Ancient Ash Wolf. Not only could it affect high-level monsters, but its coverage area was also much larger! At the same time, she directly activated another skill of her own! [Ash Wolf’s Howl: The exclusive skill of the Ancient Ash Wolf. It will have a different effect as the bloodline awakens. When the Ash Wolf howls at the moon, it will deal 12,000 magic damage per second to enemies under the moonlight for 60 seconds!] -1,000! -1,000! -1,000! -1,000! -1,000! -815! -315! -629! With just that, nearly 1,000 monsters perished! Those who lost less than 1,000 HP were only left with a thin glimmer of hope for escape. It was a one-hit wonder! Also, this ability lasts for 50 seconds, and all monsters that survived continued to lose their HP until they fell. Little Golden Dragon used an even more direct approach and used Water Control! [Water Control: The exclusive skill of the Golden Dragon. It will have different effects depending on the awakening of its bloodline. It creates a water domain and controls the water within the domain. It can control the blood in the body of a living creature! There is a certain chance to directly extract the enemy’s HP and replenish it on one’s own body. At most, it will be one-third of the enemy’s total HP. It can only be used once in a single battle! There is even a chance to awaken the bloodline in the body and complete the transformation!] <i> </i> Chapter 196: A Combination of Attacks, Enter the Battlefield! Little Golden Dragon’s Water Control skill had another powerful aspect, which was that it could also absorb HP! -9,142! -332! -15,231! … Although this skill was a one-time use skill and would not immediately kill the opponents, it was enough for Lan Weiwei to finish the job. After enduring Lan Weiwei’s first wave of attacks with great difficulty, with the aid of Little Golden Dragon, many other monsters were wiped out. Little Golden Dragon did not stay idle either. It directly dashed out as its body grew crazily, reaching thousands of meters in length. Within a second, it was among the monsters. Countless monsters were crushed to death by their size, and their skill was also unleashed! [Crazy Dragon Breath: Spits out a dense fog filled with poison, covering an area of 1 square kilometer. Any enemy who inhales the poison would lose 2,000 HP every second, this lasts until the enemy dies.] Little Golden Dragon’s skill caused a considerable amount of damage, even more than Lan Weiwei’s. After all, its own level was higher than Lan Weiwei’s, so the damage from the attack was also stronger. Even though Lan Weiwei had been affected by Lu Chen’s upgrade this time and increased the attack power of her skills, hers was only half of the attack power of Little Golden Dragon’s Crazy Dragon Breath. The most important thing was that Little Golden Dragon’s skill could last until the enemy died, which was extremely terrifying. It completely ignored time and the enemy’s HP. These monsters would end up dying even if they tried to run away. Although the monsters in the Mass Grave were different from the monsters in other places, they had some immunity to the Little Golden Dragon’s attack, but this attack still caused hundreds to thousands of damage to the monsters. In addition to the fact that Tang Bao’s domain had already left countless monsters with low HP, the combination of Little Golden Dragon and Lan Weiwei’s dual skills was a full-scale attack! This scene was even more shocking than before. Originally, under the effect of the Sand Domain, the monsters were trampling on each other in disorder. Every second, at most, there would be tens of thousands of red numbers floating up. On the other hand, the attacks of Lan Weiwei and Little Golden Dragon were completely effective on all the monsters. There was no way to dodge them. All these experience points were accumulated by the owner, Lu Chen. Seeing this scene, the Mages and Archers were all stunned! This kind of attack that had the advantage of distance was already shameless enough, but Lu Chen did not have to do anything about it to gain benefits from it?! Not only did they use moonlight to launch an instant long-range attack, but they also used the burning gas to endlessly harvest the monsters. This was simply unacceptable! This was simply incomparable! The warriors who had already run out to fight the monsters were even more desperate to steal a kill. They even stumbled and almost fell to the ground rushing to site! They had already used all their strength to rush to the battlefield, but before they could reach there, 90% of the low-hp monsters were all killed by Lu Chen. As for the high HP monsters, their health bars were also dropping bit by bit. If they ran slowly, they would not get the chance to join the battle. During the last battle of the Mass Grave, everyone thought that this battle was tough, but this time, they clearly saw that Lu Chen did not even need to make a move and still benefit from it. With just the two pets using a domain skill and an offensive move, he had gained tons. At this moment, their hearts were turning green with envy. It turned out that Lu Chen was really honing their battle awareness. In just a few seconds, thousands of monsters in the distance had died and the warriors were met with nothingness. Within a short time, many of the monsters had already been harvested. They could only silently silently curse. “It’s impossible to play anymore. We’re just here to watch the fun, right?” “Looking at the equipment that dropped all over the ground makes me want to snatch it!” “Are you crazy? Do you want to die from Lu Chen or Tang Bao?!” “Next time I change my skill points, I’ll definitely put some points on my dexterity. As expected as that speed!” “No, no, no. you just need to be faster when fighting monsters.” “I’ve already entered the horde. There are so many low HP monsters here, especially after being attacked by Lan Weiwei and Little Golden Dragon. As long as I don’t encounter a silver boss, I’ll earn a lot from this!” When Lu Chen gave the order to attack, quite a number of warriors with high agility attributes had already rushed out. Therefore, they were also the first to arrive on the monster battlefield. Although some of the low-level monsters around them had already been killed by Lan Weiwei and Little Golden Dragon, many of the monsters that were close to level 20 had survived due to their high health. Moreover, they could now be instantly killed with a single slash. They were simply overjoyed by this opportunity. One after another, they brandished their weapons and prepared to kill the horde of monsters. On Lu Chen’s side, seeing that Lan Weiwei and the Little Golden Dragon had played their part, Rollie, who had been secretly eating bamboo shoots, could not sit still anymore. At this moment, he felt that it was not appropriate for him to just sit there and do nothing. He immediately put down the bamboo shoots in his hand and yawned. A golden light flashed on his body, and instantly, a faint luck buff appeared on the top of Lu Chen’s head! Lu Chen’s luck was blessed, and even Lan Weiwei and Little Golden Dragon were affected. A luck buff appeared on their heads as well! [Luck Bonus: With Heaven’s blessing, there is a high chance of avoiding disaster, turning a bad situation into a good one, and averting a disaster! Provides a Luck buff for 60 seconds. Has a certain chance to be immune to all negative effects and damage.] Chapter 197: Critical Hit, Rollie’s Luck Bonus! At this moment, in the eyes of the other warriors, they saw a white light flashed across the sky, that almost blinded their eyes. When the white light disappeared, the whole world turned green again. Now, it was filled with poisonous gas! These two powerful attacks all came in an instant! When the warriors escaped from this state, the monsters around them began to drop their HP! -3,910! -2,138! -853! -1,026! -3,154! -1,233! Countless flurries of red numbers flashed in the sky. This time, all the warriors were appalled by the damage that was done. This was because the original damage taken by the monsters was at most 2,000 damage per attack per player. Some of the monsters even had strong defense, or some of the damage immunity would be lower than 2,000. However, this time, many of the monsters had received more than 2,000 damage. In just a split second, more than half of them died! The warriors who were originally preparing to attack immediately stopped in their tracks, because most of the monsters in front of them had already died. The only thing the warriors could do now is to slash the air! It turned out that under Rollie’s Luck Bonus buff, both Lan Weiwei and Little Golden Dragon managed to get constant critical hits. The worst part was that the succession of attacks did not stop. After all, Rollie’s Luck Bonus could last for a full 60 seconds! With an attack rate of close to 3,000 per second, their attacks would be able to take out close to 200,000 HP. If the critical hit buff from Rollie’s Luck Bonus was included, even if the monsters had 200,000 HP, it would not be enough to tank the attack! Even silver bosses with relatively low HP could not withstand such a rate of HP reduction, let alone these normal monsters. It could be predicted that in the next minute, nearly half of the monsters would be killed by Lu Chen’s two pets. When all the warriors realized what was going to happen next, they instantly went crazy! “F*ck, it can’t be. We only have sixty seconds to kill the rest of the monsters!” “I’m speechless. Lu Chen really doesn’t want to give us a chance at all. He can really do whatever he wants with his strong combat power!” “For Tang Bao and Lu Chen, killing monsters like these should be as easy as eating pie. If we want to snatch food from them, it’s like buying lottery tickets!” “F*ck, I’m going to risk my life this time. I have to use my ultimate skill!” “It’s time to show all your cards. Hurry up and use your ultimate skill. Don’t waste your time and use it directly. We don’t have to be afraid, half of the monsters are already gone!” However, the members of the Soul Slayer Team and the Dragon Slayer Team did not act rashly. Their eyes were solemn as they looked into the distance, then, they shouted loudly, “Everyone, don’t act rashly. Keep your cards hidden. The horde of monsters this time is much stronger than the last one. Those who want to live, stand down.” Liu Changping, who had always advocated the development of lewdness, also sent a signal to everyone. “Everyone, quickly go to your own stores and spend all your coins. Use them to buy potions to heal and increase your mana. Don’t waste them!” While most of the warriors still did not understand their intentions, the Dragon Slayer Team and the others had already discovered that among the monsters that were charging at them this time, there were already more than 50 silver bosses as far as their eyes could see! There were even quite a number of special silver existences hidden among the densely packed parties behind them. Under the reminders of Liu Changping and the others, many warriors finally noticed this problem as well. They all sent messages to each other, telling each other to pay attention to their safety. However, how could this little danger stop their determination to farm experience points? Right now, all they could think about was to slash as many monsters in one go and quickly max out their equipment. They would not definitely pick up the equipment dropped by the monsters that had already been killed. After all, they would never snatch other people’s spoils of war. Moreover, who would be willing to offend one of the top experts in the Second World? The only thing they had to do was to kill one enemy with all their might and increase their experience points. Every time they killed a monster, they would snatch the treasure that they had fought for. However, the warriors did not stand a chance. Once their swords were already halfway out, the Little Golden Dragon’s skills had already taken the heads of the selected target! They could only comfort themselves. It was already pretty good to survive this long. After all, Rollie’s skill had lasted for 50 seconds… However, once the Little Golden Dragon’s attack skills were buffed, its attack power would only be 2,000 points. This made them feel a little more relaxed knowing this. Otherwise, they would not be able to even reach one monster. Although the warriors charged very quickly, they still maintained their formation. After all, the monsters here were too powerful. Just one attack was enough to take half of the lives here. If they really were not careful enough, they would be killed by two consecutive attacks from the monsters. Although equipment was important… survival was non-negotiable. Therefore, even though speed was the most important thing for these warriors, they still looked for each other’s partners in the monster horde to rely on, leaving the other side to kill at ease. At this time, the Archers and Mages in the distance were also accurately catching up with each attack. They helped the warriors who were charging forward to block the enemies from other sneaky angles. Although the warriors’ charging formation was quite messy, all of them were cooperating with each other tacitly. It had to be said that compared to the players who were farming monsters by themselves, the organized farming team here was the true top existence. The Dragon Team had also established a union in this team. In the ranking, the Dragon Team had already become one of the top three existences in the country. One had to know that this guild had only existed for a few days in total. They had only grinded monsters together once! If it was not for the fact that these people had entered the Second World relatively late, they might have already become the number one guild in the Second World. There was simply no other guild that could grind monsters as crazily as the Dragon Team. The Mass Graves was a paradise for them. The number one reason was because they were powerful themselves. They were originally soldiers of the Dragon Country who had extremely strong combat power. More importantly, Lu Chen and Tang Bao were enough to provide a certain amount of support. As long as a gold boss did not appear, this place would be their paradise. Meanwhile, this paradise was a hell-like existence for ordinary players. As long as they dared to enter, they would die instantly. Even if it was just the level 10 or more monsters that stood there, the vast majority of players would die here. Not to mention, there were thousands of monster hordes here. Who knew when they would come out. This place was definitely a paradise for experts, and a hell for newbies. Chapter 198: Lu Chen’s Turn! Tang Bao rampaged through the monster horde alone. There was not a single monster that he could not kill with a single slash. If there were any exceptions, he would use two slashes. When Tang Bao saw a silver boss, he would not dodge their onslaught all. Instead, he would charge right into the monster’s body and counterattack with a slash of his own. At most, he would use two more slashes to kill the silver boss! Meanwhile, Tang Bao’s hands were moving as quick as lightning. As long as he killed a monster, he would be able to pick up the dropped treasure as well. At the same time, he would immediately focus his attention on killing other monsters. There would be no delay between the two attacks. This speed of him killing monsters was really shocking. Wherever Tang Bao passed, there was a pile of corpses that followed. Tang Bao’s speed of killing monsters was so fast that the other monsters did not even have time to fill in the gaps. After killing over a hundred monsters, Tang Bao looked like he did not even have the slightest bit of fatigue. His eyes were filled with the excitement of killing. The broken limbs of the monsters behind him flew all over the sky. However, Tang Bao’s face still had a hint of a sinister smile. That bloodthirsty smile made even the warriors of the Dragon Team shudder. Tang Bao’s killing speed was too fast. Even the warriors of the Dragon Team added together were not as efficient as him. However, on Lu Chen’s side seemed even more exaggerated. He did not even need to extend his hand as he crazily harvested the monsters on the battlefield. Little Golden Dragon was practically invincible in the monster horde. It did not even need to use any other skills. With its powerful attack and defense, just by relying on its level suppression, it was able to make all the monsters tremble in fear. It was a lean mean killing machine that harvested experience points swiftly! When everyone thought that Lu Chen would never make a move, Lu Chen would twist his neck and take out the out the Flame Blade from his backpack, he smiled at Tang Xiaoqing and said, “I’m going to warm up. There might be a big battle soon.” After saying that, he gave Tang Xiaoqing a warm smile. Then, without looking back, he shot out a silver light and rushed into the monster tide. A few seconds later, he arrived at the battlefield! Before him was a level 26 silver boss. Lu Chen raised the blade in his hand and swung it down. At the same time, a golden title appeared above Lu Chen’s head. It was the official Blade God title! [Blade God: Your understanding of the blade has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a blade-type weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with your level!] [Frenzied Blade: When you transform into the Blade God, your attack will definitely be a critical hit. You will have a critical hit immunity effect and receive a 400% critical hit damage bonus!] [Bloodbath Blade God: When your enemies exceed 100 amount, your attack will become an area-of-effect damage of 100 meters. 50% of the damage will be converted into your HP.] [Swift Blade: When you use a blade-type weapon, you can deal three damage attacks at the same time. You can also use 60% of your maximum attack speed, regardless of your body’s capabilities.] [Magic Blade: When you use a blade-type weapon, you can convert your physical damage into magic damage.] Without the support of the Blade God, Lu Chen’s attack power would originally be 82,860. After receiving the 400% boost from the Blade God, he now had over 300,000 attack power! An ordinary silver boss would not be able to withstand such a powerful attack! Moreover, the Flame Blade had an additional bonus! When the blade is used the attack range would automatically increase by tenfold. At the same time, an unknown flame would be generated on the enemy. The flame would burn the enemy for 3 seconds, the HP loss per second would be 5% to 100% of the attack power! -203,164! Originally, this silver boss had 200,000 HP. It was one of the few monsters in the entire monster horde that had an immunity to damage, so its HP was quite well-preserved. However, under Lu Chen’s powerful attack power, a streak of red appeared above its head, and it instantly died! At the same time, the monsters within 1,000 meter radius saw Lu Chen charging and swarming towards them, ready to end Lu Chen’s life. However, under the attack of Lu Chen’s Flame Blade, which had a range of 10 times, this monster was instantly reduced to ashes! -13,252! -53,526! -342,435! -14,462! -185,933! Even the monsters thousands of miles away were affected by the blade’s heat wave. They instantly lost HP. Fortunately, they did not receive Lu Chen’s attack directly. Naturally, they did not lose much HP. The smart monsters quickly crawled away with their faces covered in soot. Within a kilometer, not only were there monsters, but there were also some warriors who were fighting crazily. In an instant, it was as if the entire world had gone silent! The huge blade flashed in every corner within a kilometer, crushing the huge monsters into pieces! One of the warriors was dumbfounded as he muttered, “F*ck, my EXP has been stolen again...;” The monsters thousands of miles away, those with low intelligence, roared when they saw how powerful Lu Chen’s attack was and ran towards him. Some of the silver bosses with strong defense or high HP were in extreme pain when they were hit by over 300,000 attack points! They quickly looked around to find their targets. Within a thousand meters, there was no one else but Lu Chen… They lowered their heads and snorted. With a roar, they charged straight at Lu Chen! In the eyes of the warriors, the huge empty space with Lu Chen as the center was dead silent. However, it only lasted for a second before hundreds of monsters swarmed toward Lu Chen! Even the warriors of the Dragon Country who were on their way did not want to think about the repercussions. Their eyes were red as they charged towards Lu Chen, hoping to provide some support! The warriors nearby were a little worried. Although Lu Chen was extremely powerful, it did not mean that he could attack so many monsters in one go. These monsters were definitely ten times the number of those who had just been killed by the Blade God! In an instant, countless Mages and Archers shot towards the monsters, trying to stop them and help Lu Chen reduce the pressure. The warriors also went all out, trying to help Lu Chen attract the attention of the monsters to ease Lu Chen’s burden. However, the monsters seemed to have gone crazy. They did not care about the others and only charged at Lu Chen. Even the monsters in front of Tang Bao abandoned him and directly pounced on Lu Chen! This scene was very strange. It was as if there was someone commanding the monsters from behind. They were all moving in unison! Looking at Lu Chen in the distance, Tang Bao was deep in thought. A hint of playfulness appeared in his eyes again. He lifted his weapon and placed it casually on his shoulder, allowing the thousands of monsters to pass by him. His expression did not change! There was no need to be afraid. If any of these monsters had any ill intentions towards him, they would immediately perish. There was no need to help Lu Chen. At this moment, Lu Chen was also calm and composed. He held the blade horizontally in his hand and closed his eyes indifferently as he prepared for the oncoming slaughter! Faced with the horde of monsters that was going to sweep in from all directions, Lu Chen calmly closed his eyes. This scene caused all the warriors on the battlefield to be instantly stunned. In front of the monsters that were tens to hundreds of meters tall and were as huge as hills. Comparably… humans were like ants, and he looked extremely vulnerable. However, Lu Chen had become the focus of the entire battlefield. He slowly raised the Flame Blade in his hand, and the flames suddenly increased by three feet. At this moment, even Lu Chen’s eyes turned blazing red, and the flame inscription appeared on his face along with the Flame Blade. Lu Chen’s scattered hair and his robe were blown up by the surging airflow. His handsome and determined features were particularly dazzling under the illumination of the fire. The blade in Lu Chen’s hand became hotter and hotter. Gradually, the flame spread from the handle of the knife to the back of Lu Chen’s hand, arms, and finally his entire body. At this moment, Lu Chen looked like a Fire God that fell from the sky, illuminating the entire night sky. Even the temperature on the battlefield was rising at an extremely fast speed. The monster tide surged towards Lu Chen like a raging tsunami. To these level 20 over monsters, the distance of 1,000 meters could be closed out in just a few seconds. The first monster was only 300 meters away from Lu Chen in the blink of an eye! However, Lu Chen still did not move, allowing the flames on his body to burn wildly. When the monster closed into 200 meters, the flames in Lu Chen’s eyes burned even brighter, even his hair had turned a fiery red color, dancing in the sky wantonly. 100 meters! There were only a few seconds left for Lu Chen to defend himself! At this moment, Lu Chen finally opened his eyes which looked like two suns, shooting out piercing rays of light! Even the warriors who were staring at him subconsciously turned their heads away, unable to endure the piercing rays of the sun. However, the moment he opened his eyes, Lu Chen’s entire aura changed! He suddenly swung his Flame Blade that was already raised high up in the air! In an instant, it was as if a flaming meteor had fallen from the sky and hit the area within a thousand meters. All the monsters’ bodies began to burn with the intense flames. Tens of thousands of flurries of red suddenly soared into the sky. The entire battlefield was filled with the high damage dealt by Lu Chen! -329,056! -613,082! -13,324! -53,213! -213,695! -194,782! -603,192! The entire battlefield seemed to have turned into a living Hell. There were flames of extremely high temperatures everywhere. Even the warriors who were originally within 1,000 meters had long sensed the danger and directly dived out of Lu Chen’s attack range. Under such circumstances, even though Lu Chen’s attack would not be aimed at them, they still instinctively dodged it in fear of being attacked as well. The monstrous flames were like a gigantic beast, swallowing everything in its path. In an instant, 99% of the monsters on the battlefield were destroyed by Lu Chen’s Blade God’s critical strike. Only a few silver bosses that were above level 30 and had extremely high defense survived. At this moment, they only had a strand of HP left. Finally, the fear in their bodies awakened and they quickly ran out of Lu Chen’s attack range. However, Lu Chen’s attack was not something that could be dodged! With the additional effect of the Flame Blade, they could deal 5% to 100% of their remaining damage to the monsters every second. -192,653! -303,412! -33,214! -63,148! -102,135! The monsters tried their best to escape, but the flames on their bodies were like parasites. They were stuck to their bodies and could not be removed at all as they scattered around in panic. Painful howls filled the entire battlefield. After a while, the entire battlefield turned silent. Even the monsters that were charging at Lu Chen in a frenzy stopped in their tracks and kept quiet. The current battlefield did not look like a battlefield. Instead, it looked like a quiet classroom. Lu Chen was like a teacher, using his exquisite knife skills to show everyone and the monster his superb killing skills. One strike was all it took for the entire battlefield to change. The flames on Lu Chen’s body slowly disappeared, and even the weapon he held gradually turned into an ordinary blade, as if nothing had ever happened and had nothing to do with Lu Chen. After that, he left, hiding his achievements. Lu Chen even put his Flame Blade back into his backpack. With his hands behind his back, he calmly looked at the furthest part of the monster without saying a word. “D*mn, is this the full strength of Lu Chen?” “Compared to...; compared to Lu Chen, I’m simply a piece of trash!” “How can I ever be as strong as Lu Chen? I’m envious.” “Don’t even think about it. Lu Chen’s strength is incomparable. Even if you follow his path, you won’t be stronger than him.” “Perhaps some players have killed more monsters in their entire lives than Lu Chen. I bet they’ll never reach his level.” Many warriors sighed softly and communicated with each other. There was envy and yearning in their words. However, there were also more warriors who were taking advantage of the moment when the monsters were too stunned to reap exp. Even Tang Bao, who was as strong as Lu Chen, was stunned at this moment. He had long heard of Lu Chen’s strength. However, he was still a little shocked by this attack method that ignored the large attack range and the number of monsters in the area. In particular, the appearance of the Blade God just now made Tang Bao curse in a low voice, “F*ck, he’s even more handsome than me. He’s stealing all the limelight now!” Tang Xiaoqing, Lan Weiwei, and Liu Yuan looked at Lu Chen with stars in their eyes. It was hard to hide their admiration for the strong. Even a strong woman like Tang Xiaoqing was no exception. Her combat strength was stronger than a single entity, but she could not make all the monsters within a thousand meters disappear like Lu Chen. In addition, she already had a crush on Lu Chen. With this kind of love, Lu Chen was liked and worshipped even more. On the entire battlefield, only Lu Chen and Tang Bao were the most dazzling players. Their attacks had almost wiped out half of the monsters. As for Lu Chen’s last critical strike, it made all the monsters terrified. Knowing of Lu Chen’s presence, they dared not to push forward recklessly any longer. The situation on the battlefield became weary. No monsters dared to step within a thousand meters of Lu Chen. Even the relatively weaker warriors were a little scared at this moment. Finally, a command was issued from afar. A cry erupted from the back of the team. When the cry was heard, all the monsters stopped attacking and fighting. All of the monsters received the signal and immediately retreated. At this moment, they were falling back faster than when they had attacked. When they had attacked, it had only been 10 minutes ago. The battle had been too fast, and victory had been too easy. “F*ck! Lu Chen is awesome!” “Tang Bao is also very powerful. If he hadn’t laid down such a good foundation, we wouldn’t have won so quickly!” “So, we were just a hindrance. When can we be as awesome as Lu Chen? I also want to kill all the monsters in one swoop like him!” “You can only be as powerful as Lu Chen in your dreams. You might even be stronger than him!” “We won just like that? No way, I didn’t even kill a monster.” “Me too. I didn’t kill a monster either!” “Did we win?! Can we go back now?” “No way! I’ve been on the battlefield for less than 5 minutes, and I’m already going back? This battle is boring!” However, some of the warriors were still affected by the victory and cheered. However, most of the warriors had their eyes set on the two powerhouses, Lu Chen and Tang Bao. Meanwhile, the two of them did not move at all, their gazes were still fixed on the end of the monster tide. The monster tide was like a receding flood. It came menacingly and left in a hurry. However, within the receding monster tide, there was a monster that was flickering with golden specks of light in the middle of the team. It was faintly discernible… it was strolling leisurely towards the battlefield. No, it was not just golden light. It also flickered with various colored lights. 10 seconds later, when all the retreating monsters disappeared at the end of the forest, a Seven-colored Peacock slowly walked out. It’s head high, a calm temperament, and unhurried footsteps showed the strength of this peacock. When all the warriors saw the Seven-colored Peacock’s information panel, they were instantly shocked! [Name: Seven-colored Peacock] [Level: 55] [HP: 1,006,2000] [Attack: 594,520] [Defense: 290,800] [Magic Defense: 244,584] [Illusion Domain: An exclusive skill of the Seven-colored Peacock. It will produce different effects depending on the awakening of the bloodline. The Seven-colored Peacock is able to create an illusion domain. Within the domain, it can create all kinds of things. Everything in this domain is hard to distinguish between what is real and what is fake! It can create an existence that has a combat power to itself. At the same time, within the Illusion Domain, it would be immune to all damage. Has a chance to awaken the bloodline in its body and complete the transformation!] The warriors instantly became excited! “D*mn, no way, a gold boss! There really is a gold boss on this Mass Grave!” The warriors faintly exclaimed, “A level fifty-five! What kind of existence is this? It’s too terrifying. Even Tang Bao is only level 40!” “Yeah, even if Lu Chen leveled up so quickly, he’s only level 49. He’s not even level 50 yet. How can this Seven-colored Peacock be so powerful?!” “Oh right, Little Golden Dragon, where’s Little Golden Dragon? Oh… Little Golden Dragon is only level 45. There seems to be quite a gap between the two.” “Oh right, Tang Xiaoqing, Tang Xiaoqing is level 59. Her attack power should be very strong, right?” “I’m afraid that won’t do. An ordinary person wouldn’t be able to defeat a monster of the same level as them. Usually, they would team up to kill the monster.” “That’s right. Tang Bao killed so many monsters just now. Although they were all very strong, their levels weren’t as high as his. In addition, Tang Bao has a killing domain. He’s already very talented. How can this Tang Xiaoqing be stronger than Tang Bao and Lu Chen?” “Don’t talk nonsense. One look and you can tell that Tang Xiaoqing is not ordinary. How can anyone who can follow Lu Chen be simple?” “Not only is Tang Xiaoqing’s level very high, but her combat power is also very high. Most importantly, take a look. There’s an unknown at the bottom of her level! This is very impressive!” “That’s right. This Seven-colored Peacock is obviously not ordinary as well. We’ve never seen a boss that could unify tens of thousands of monsters in other silver territories.” “Not only is this gold boss high-ranked, but its commander-in-chief is also strong.” “I’m afraid that only Tang Xiaoqing has the strongest combat ability among all of them.” “It’s just a gold boss. I think it shouldn’t be a problem. There are so many powerful players here. If we all attack together later, won’t we be able to kill this Seven-colored Peacock seamlessly?” “That makes sense. There are hundreds of us here. It’s like fighting monsters in a team…” “No, look!!” Right at this moment, someone shouted, and all the warriors quickly looked into the distance again. Behind the Seven-colored Peacock, a few golden figures appeared from the forest once again. All the warriors were stunned. There were actually five other gold bosses behind it. Including the Seven-colored Peacock, there were a total of six gold bosses on the battlefield now. Even the weakest one was not much lower than Little Gold Dragon. All of them were above level 40. Among them, two were level 42, one was level 48, one was level 49, and one was Level 51! Everyone’s hopes of winning were shattered. Liu Changping, who had always been a wretched and well-developed man… hurriedly trotted over to Lu Chen’s side and said in a low voice, “Lu Chen, do you think we should hurry back to the main world? We might not be able to overcome this situation.” Just as Lu Chen’s eyes were filled with caution, this Seven-colored Peacock was clearly a powerful opponent that far surpassed him, especially his greatest reliance — White Fog City was still in a deep sleep, and there was no way to wake it up. This battle would probably be very difficult to fight, and the Seven-colored Peacock was so calm that it did not even need to move quickly to make its way here. It was obvious that it was certain that they would not be able to escape. Although he did not know what the other party had up their sleeves, Lu Chen could clearly feel that the other party seemed to have victory in their grasp. Tang Xiaoqing, who was originally a little fangirl, gradually regained her serious expression at this moment, but only a few more traces of seriousness appeared on her face. There was not the slightest bit of fear. A faint smile could be seen on the corner of her mouth. She pulled out a long sword from her hand and was about to walk toward Lu Chen. However, before she could take a step, her body suddenly stopped as if she had been struck by lightning! Tang Xiaoqing’s figure suddenly froze. Then, a look of disbelief appeared in her eyes, as if she had heard something secretive. She looked around but for the life of her, she could not see anything. Then, this look of surprise changed again, revealing a trace of joy. However, this surprised expression did not last more than three seconds, and she was back to being stunned. Then, a look of embarrassment appeared on her face. After her expression changed several times, Tang Xiaoqing finally bit her lip, took a step back, and stood still. Lan Weiwei and Liu Yuan were a little curious. They could not understand why Tang Xiaoqing, who was about to make a move, suddenly changed her mind in the face of such a difficult situation. However, everyone knew that there was no need to ask about such things. Tang Xiaoqing definitely had her own unspeakable reasons. Besides Tang Xiaoqing, all the other warriors did not retreat. They all started to move forward. Even the Mages and Archers who were attacking from a long distance also moved forward to close the distance that was the most suitable for them to attack. Even Rollie, who had been eating bamboo shoots all this while, shook the fur on his body at this time. He changed from his usual charmingly naive appearance to a ferocious aura as he charged forward. Meanwhile, the group of gold bosses in the distance became even more powerful. Although over 20,000 monsters had retreated far away and no longer attacked, the Seven-colored Peacock was a gold boss with other silver bosses backing it up. These monsters were always at the end of the monster tide. Therefore, they were not affected by Tang Bao’s killing domain, nor were they seriously injured by Lu Chen and his two spiritual pets’ attacks. Even Lan Weiwei’s Howling Moon was not super effective to those monsters. They only lost a small portion of their HP. After all, with hundreds of thousands or even millions of HP, this 50,000 attack was negligible. Including critical hits, it was less than 100,000 points at most. Moreover, their powerful defense could form effective resistance, but the actual HP loss was far from significant. Upon seeing this, Liu Changping’s eyes were filled with caution. It was obvious that at least one of these monsters had an AOE recovery skill. At this moment, he could only hope that the monsters with the AOE recovery skill were silver level and not gold level. Otherwise, this battle would be too difficult to overcome. Facing the enemy’s powerful lineup, the warriors were clearly at a disadvantage. Especially now that Little Gold Dragon’s Crazy Dragon Breath had completely dispersed, it would no longer deal any damage to these monsters. Under such a situation where the AOE damage was reduced, the battle between the warriors would be even more difficult. All the warriors who had their HP and mana reduced immediately took out their potions and consume them. This was definitely going to be a tough battle ahead. If they did not have enough HP and mana, they might die in this battle! The Mages on the battlefield were also trying their best to gather their energy. At this moment, they looked a little funny on the battlefield… They were shining like light bulbs. Although they looked ridiculous, they would definitely be able to display their strength in a while. This was because Mages had the advantage when dealing with these undead creatures. When these Mages dealt with undead creatures, they would cause real damage and ignore defense and immunity effects. At the same time, they would also have a strong resistance to the damage they received. It was equivalent to giving themselves a shield of light. Finally, the Seven-colored Peacock on the opposite side could not hold it in anymore. After it stopped, it let out a cry once again and suddenly opened its huge, gorgeous tail and shook it crazily! In an instant, hundreds of monsters charged out crazily toward Lu Chen and the others! The warriors did not back down at all and charged forward to meet the onslaught. Everyone roared together and pounced forward. “F*ck, let’s fight them!” “These b*stards still want to fight us. We have to let them see how powerful our country is!” “That’s right. We can’t let Lu Chen get all the limelight. That guy is just a new recruit. We have to show him how powerful our veterans are!” “You’re right. We can’t get the gold ones. Let’s get rid of all the silver ones first!” “Hehe, I’ve been learning how to kill silver bosses from the Soul Slayer Team. Our squad can kill two of them!” “What’s two of them? Look, our squad can kill five of them for you!” “Stop f*cking bragging. If you don’t have a diamond in the rough, don’t take advantage of it!” “F*ck, I’m going all out! Last time, I was protected by that brat, Lu Chen. I need to prove my worth!” “This time, I have to show him what I’m capable of. The people of our Dragon Country are not to be trifled with!” “How can Lu Chen steal all the limelight from us today, not a chance!” All the warriors had a strong feeling in their hearts. These days, they had been beaten so badly by Lu Chen that they had already felt bad. Right now, there was one chance to prove themselves. Seeing that Lu Chen could not solve the problem alone, they were extremely happy to help. Lu Chen, who had always been awesome, had never encountered such a situation before. Soldiers versus soldiers, generals versus generals. The silver bosses and the warriors of the Dragon Country quickly found their positions and began to madly fight. At the same time, they were very self-aware as they opened up the battlefield to the left and right, leaving a large empty space in the middle. After all, if a gold boss and Lu Chen fought, they might accidentally hurt their own people. Meanwhile, the Seven-colored Peacock and the other five gold bosses were on standby. Some of them were as tall as mountains. One of them was an elephant that was over 1,000 meters tall. Its huge tusk alone was over 100 meters long. It looked very intimidating. Some of them were extremely short, less than half a meter long. It was a golden ant that looked much sturdier than the scorpion’s armor. Some of them were extremely fast, even faster than Tang Bao when he was running at full speed. They were able to appear 200 meters away from Lu Chen in an instant, and they even suspected that they might have innate spatial laws. There was also an old tortoise. Not only was it not slow, but it was also even faster than the elephant. The huge armor on its back was extremely thick, and the sharp fangs in its mouth made people feel numb. On the old turtle’s back, there was even a sea cucumber that was lying on the turtle’s body. When Lu Chen and the others got closer and closer to the turtle, the sea cucumber actually went into the turtle’s shell and only revealed a pair of small eyes as it sneakily looked out. The strength of these five gold bosses was obvious. The most bizarre starfish, in particular, made everyone feel strange. At the same time, the information panels of all the monsters appeared in front of everyone. Seeing the scene before them, everyone was shocked. These gold bosses were simply too powerful. Especially more so for the starfish. Its attack power was weak, and its defense was pathetic. It was even weaker than some silver bosses. However, what made them shocked was the starfish’s HP was eight times that of Little Gold Dragon. Oddly enough, its level was not even higher than the Little Gold Dragon’s! Even though the starfish’s HP was more than ten levels lower than the Seven-colored Peacock, it still had twice the amount of HP. Its super healer’s HP recovery skill was simply terrifying. Permanently healing a teammate was a skill that was extremely rare. If it was just against the HP recovery starfish alone, it would just be like wear and tear, eventually, the starfish will give out. However, in a team battle, such a moving granary-like existence was equivalent to giving their teammate another life. It was no wonder that this starfish had disappeared into the Tortoise’s shell in a flash. With these two together, the entire team’s endurance was guaranteed. Everyone’s brows were tightly knitted together. On Lu Chen’s side, the two people walking at the front were Lu Chen and Tang Bao. Behind them were the Soul Slaying Team and the Dragon Slayer Team. The other people behind were Liu Changping, Liu Yuan, Lan Weiwei, and Little Golden Dragon. Although the Dragon Slayer Team suffered an awkward situation in the Snake Pond, they had recovered their levels from the previous battle. After all, they were powerful in real life as well… they were a battle-experienced team. Everyone would definitely do their best to support each other to return to their levels. Lu Chen turned his head to look at Tang Xiaoqing in the distance. At this moment, Tang Xiaoqing had her head lowered. Her face was filled with guilt as she clenched the corner of her clothes tightly and drew circles with her fingers. She did not dare to raise her head to look at Lu Chen. Although Lu Chen felt weary of her behavior, he did not ask too much. After all, he knew how good Tang Xiaoqing was treating him. The other party would definitely not want to intentionally harm him. However, Liu Yuan stood up for Lu Chen. She kept muttering about how this little girl looked innocent but had an ulterior motive. She did not expect that the little girl would hide behind him and not make a move at such a crucial moment. Lu Chen comforted her, saying that the little girl is not to blame. She must have had her own considerations taken into factor before coming with us. Although Lu Chen comforted Liu Yuan, he knew that this was going to be a tough battle. He had considered that there must be a powerful gold boss behind these monsters. There might even be more than one, however, he had never thought that there would be six of them. This was especially true for the peacock, which did not look very big at the time. Moreover, the peacock was very beautiful and had a very high level. However, it quickly turned into a battle scene between the teams. It was going to be Tang Bao versus the SEven-colored Peacock! Dragon Slayer Team and Soul Slaying Team versus Swift Monkey! Liu Changping, Liu Yuan vs the Golden Armored Ant! Lan Weiwei, Little Golden Dragon vs the Towering Elephant! As for Lu Chen, he was tasked to fight the Black Tortoise and Recovery Starfish alone. These two both had very generous health bars. Moreover, they had AOE healing skills and AOE defense skills. If he does not kill the two of them quickly, he would be caught in a prolonged battle. First, the Tortoise’s defense had to be broken through in order to deal with real damage. There were already more than a hundred monsters on the battlefield. If everyone was given a 100% defense, this battle would be impossible! Therefore, if he wanted to kill them, he had to let the Tortoise use all of its defensive armor on itself. Moreover, if he wanted to fight the Black Tortoise, he had to break the armor. No one but Lu Chen would be able to hit that 200 million defense points in one go! Lu Chen did not say a word and directly rushed toward the Black Tortoise. The Black Tortoise’s face was full of disapproval. After the Recovery Starfish returned, it shrunk its neck again and hid its entire body inside the tortoise’s shell. The situation was urgent. Lu Chen did not dare to hold back and directly activated the title of Sword God! [Sword God: Your comprehension of the sword has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a sword-type weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow along with your level!] [Sword Intent: When you use a sword-type weapon, it will burst forth with sword intent, and your attack power will increase to 700%!] [Sword God’s State: Your attack swiftness will cause irreversible damage. Items damaged by the Sword God’s State can not be recovered. ] [Godly Speed: The speed of your sword attack is on a godly level. The attack interval will be greatly shortened. Attack speed is now increased by 800%. Limited to one attack once it reaches the speed limit. Immune to side effects. Lasts for one second.] Lu Chen’s original attack speed was 32 times per second. Under the acceleration of the Sword God, it had reached more than 250 times per second! After the awakening of Lu Chen’s bloodline and the improvement of his level, his physique was able to withstand all the acceleration of his attack! In an instant, the attack power that Lu Chen had reached had increased to 150 million in a second! Feeling the formidable power accumulated by this sword attack, the Black Tortoise, who had not paid any attention to it, suddenly widened its eyes! The defensive armor that had been sent out to boost the strength of the teammates was now fully applied to its body! Immediately, the thick shell of the Black Tortoise emitted an annoying golden light, it looked as though it was protecting the Black Tortoise from any harm. Its defense had reached 200 million! When the defense was stacked back to back, the Black Tortoise once again revealed a human-like mocking expression. That was blatant mockery! 150 million was not enough to break through the armor! Lu Chen’s expression did not change. As long as he could trigger the power of the Heaven-cleaving Sword and unleash five times the explosive strike, this battle could be won! However, to trigger such a critical strike with an extremely low probability was no easy feat. “Scram!” Lu Chen roared. Immediately, Rollie emitted light once again, giving Lu Chen a luck buff! Instantly, Lu Chen’s Heaven-cleaving Sword was also coated with a layer of mysterious halo! With that, Lu Chen slashed down with his sword! However, it did not trigger a critical hit. Although Lu Chen had already expected this to happen, after all, the lucky buff could only increase the probability. If it could not be maxed out, there was still the possibility of failure. Still, Lu Chen felt a little regretful in his heart. This was because Lu Chen’s Sword God’s maximum attack speed could only be used once. If it was used again, it would increase the burden on the body. Furthermore, Lu Chen had also used up a large amount of his mana. He did not hesitate and consumed more Mana Potions to recover his mana! The Black Tortoise did not wait to stand idly by and get attacked. It immediately prepared itself for a counterattack. Originally, this tortoise’s speed was already very fast. When it stretched out its head, its speed was even faster. Seeing his opponent’s attack, Lu Chen did not want to be in its range of attack! [Shield God: Your understanding of the shield has reached an unfathomable level. When you use any shield, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow along with your level!] [Indestructible: When you receive damage, you will be immune to 90% of the damage.] [Shield Backlash: Return 90% of the damage you receive to the enemy.] In an instant, out of the 180,000-point attack from the Black Tortoise, only 18,000 landed on Lu Chen. The rest was returned to the Black Tortoise. However, the Shield Backlash was completely ineffective against the Black Tortoise. At this moment, the Black Tortoise’s defense was at its peak, and not a single drop of HP was lost. Lu Chen raised his Heaven-cleaving Sword again and slashed down viciously! Even without using his maximum attack speed, he could still fight! 100 times attack speed! 60 million attack points! His attacks were ineffective! 200 times attack speed! 120 million attack points! His attacks were ineffective! 150 times attack speed! 90 million attack points! His attacks were ineffective! Neither side was able to dodge the other’s attacks. Lu Chen’s attacks did not reach 200 million, so they were ineffective in breaking his opponent’s defense! Lu Chen was not in the mood to dodge the attacks either. Other than the Shield God being activated, there was also the Sword God. As long as the number of times was enough, there was a chance of a critical hit! A critical hit could allow the Black Tortoise to break through the defense directly. Otherwise, if the Black Tortoise continued to attack him, his HP might end up dwindling quicker. After all, Lu Chen’s HP was less than 60,000 or 70,000 points. If he were to take the Black Tortoise’s attacks head-on, even with the help of the Shield God, he would at most die in four hits, if it was not for the fact that he had prepared some healing potions, he would probably have to borrow Lan Weiwei’s HP now. However, even so, the healing potion’s speed was far slower than the Black Tortoise’s attack speed. If he could not deal with a critical hit, Lu Chen’s HP would be reduced to zero after taking five or six hits at most. He was going to go for a 100 times attack speed! [Ding! The critical hit effect of the Heaven-cleaving Sword has been triggered!] [Play now has 300,000,000 attack points!] With a cracking sound, an unnoticeable crack appeared on the Black Tortoise’s golden armor. The huge shield that was shimmering with golden light suddenly collapsed, and the Black Tortoise’s real body was finally revealed. As Lu Chen’s attack moved like lightning, the others only managed to react in time. In just a few seconds, Lu Chen had broken the Black Tortoise’s defense, and his critical hits were all over 60,000,000 points, and the highest one had reached 300,000,000 points! This kind of attack shocked everyone. Although Tang Bao had used his own blade technique to cause a large number of monster casualties, that was after all a group attack. To a single monster, it was only a few hundred thousand, with the help of his Sand Domain, he could barely reach a million points for damage. However, Lu Chen’s attacks could reach hundreds of millions, more than once! This was very terrifying. Not to mention the others, even Tang Bao was a little flustered. “F*ck is Lu Chen still human?!” Even Tang Xiaoqing, who had never made a move from afar, was stunned when she saw Lu Chen’s attacks. Her mouth was wide open, and she looked as if she could swallow a village whole. However, her face was full of surprise and joy. At this time, the guilt she felt for not participating in the match had finally lessened a little. However, the four or five attacks from the Sword God had almost depleted Lu Chen’s mana again. At this time, he could no longer withstand the high pressure brought about by the attack speed. Since this armor had already been broken, he could only slowly grind the HP of his opponent down. Otherwise, if Lu Chen continued to attack the Black Tortoise at a high attack speed a few more times, his condition would plummet. The combined defense of the Black Tortoise and the Recovery Starfish only amounted to less than 30,000,000 HP now. -9,012,000! -2,201,2000! In the blink of an eye, Lu Chen had killed both of the gold bosses. In the blink of an eye, two large red dots appeared above Lu Chen’s head. The long numbers shocked everyone. Meanwhile, the level above Lu Chen had also risen by two levels. He had reached level 51. The warriors were so shocked that they did not even know what to say. Originally, they had been attacking the silver bosses with all their might. However, the silver boss basically had extremely high resistance against the healing skills of the blood star. Moreover, in the beginning, the soldiers could not even cut off the blood of the silver boss. That was because the Black Tortoise had always stacked its defensive skills on all the monsters on the battlefield, making all the soldiers very passive. However, Lu Chen’s earth-shattering sword attack had directly killed the two gold bosses, completely breaking the situation. Not only were the ordinary warriors relieved, even the warriors who were facing the gold bosses felt the pressure on their hearts lighten. Originally, the gold bosses had high attack power, thick HP, and strong defense, if they were to add the two great support from the tortoise and the starfish, they basically would not be able to fight. Lu Chen’s double kill this time made everyone excited at the prospect of a possible victory. Lan Weiwei had long since transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf King. Her combat power instantly increased by 50%, and with the addition of the Moonlight, her overall attributes had also increased. Meanwhile, when facing the Towering Elephant, Lan Weiwei’s level was simply not enough. She was only level 38, not even a gold-rank Lord, which was far from the level of the Towering Elephant. At this moment, she had already used her skill — [Ash Wolf’s Fury: The Ancient Ash Wolf King awakens the sleeping bloodline in its body, greatly increasing its own attributes, and has a chance to obtain an additional skill!] Under such circumstances, Lan Weiwei’s combat strength had once again increased by another level. At this moment, her attack power was already stronger than Lu Chen’s ordinary attacks. At this moment, she directly attacked, unleashing a sky-piercing Demonic Flame. The huge flames caused damage to the Towering Elephant. Although it was not very strong, the Towering Elephant’s body was too big. In addition, its movements were relatively slow, and its movement technique was relatively clumsy. Thus, no matter how it tried to dodge… it was unable to dodge this move of the Ancient Ash Wolf King. The Little Golden Dragon at the side acted as the main force, fighting head-on against the Towering Elephant. Although Little Golden Dragon’s level was three levels lower than the Towering Elephant’s level, it had the ability to enlarge itself or shrink itself. Little Golden Dragon, which was originally only a few hundred meters tall, was now more than a thousand meters tall, it even faintly showed signs of being twice as tall as the Towering Elephant. Although this did not affect Little Golden Dragon’s combat strength, under the circumstances of its huge size, it definitely had an advantage in this fight as well! As long as he became long enough, he could completely rely on his advantage in length to entangle the Towering Elephant. At this moment, he was tightly strangling the Towering Elephant’s neck, making it difficult for the other party to breathe and causing it to continuously lose HP. The Towering Elephant had always wanted to shoot out its own skill — Ivory Strike, but Lan Weiwei did not give the Towering Elephant any chance to get close at all. She had always been fighting with the Towering Elephant in a skirmish manner, from time to time, she would use the Demonic Flame to attack. The Towering Elephant was annoyed by this passive situation. In its anger, it used its own skill — Earthquake Stomp. It raised its leg, which was more than 500 meters high, and stomped on the ground. The ground shook, and all the enemies were temporarily stunned. This caused all the warriors to fall into a passive state. Originally, they were fighting against their own monsters, but because of the temporary stun, they were stunned for almost a second. Many of them were hit by the silver boss. They lacked the defense of their teammates and their HP bars were instantly emptied. In an instant, more than 20 warriors died. They returned to the resurrection point to become rookies again. This scene shocked everyone. Ever since they arrived at the Mass Grave, not a single person had died. Although they were prepared for such a thing to happen, when this moment really came, they could not help but panic. After the Towering Elephant’s operation. Even Lan Weiwei and Little Golden Dragon instantly interrupted all of the attacks. Little Golden Dragon’s body even fell off the Towering Elephant’s neck. Seeing Little Golden Dragon fall to the ground made it suddenly raise its foot and stomp on the ground again. With the Towering Elephant’s strength and weight, as long as it stomped on the ground, it would definitely be a critical hit. It might even be able to directly kill a strong player off! -920,365! As expected, this stomp directly took away more than 900,000 HP of Little Golden Dragon. Fortunately, Little Golden Dragon’s HP was adequate enough to tank it. It had a total of 4.5 million HP. A million HP was not enough to destroy Little Golden Dragon. After recovering from the stunned state, Little Golden Dragon roared and slithered around its body again. Little Golden Dragon quickly still entangled around the Towering Elephant. Clearly, the Towering Elephant was very angry at Little Golden Dragon’s shameless manipulation, it shook its head and tried to use its tusks to attack, but it still could not touch the Little Golden Dragon. Helpless, the Towering Elephant raised its foot again and stomped down fiercely. The other warriors who were fighting the silver bosses were already prepared for such a thing to happen again. Although they were all fighting the silver bosses, they kept their eyes on the loud bang from the corner of their eyes, afraid that the same thing would happen again. Just as the Towering Elephant raised its foot, all the warriors retreated 100 meters. The silver bosses were just as smart. Seeing that the Towering Elephant was about to launch an Earthquake Stomp, they began to attack the strongest warriors one after another. They wanted to take advantage of the time when the enemy was stunned to kill the warriors. It had to be said that their strategy was very powerful. If the Towering Elephant were to repeat this a few times, it was likely that there would not be many warriors left in the Dragon Team. Seeing the silver bosses rushing towards them, many of the warriors panicked. However, they were not willing to sit still and wait for death. Even if they were about to be stunned, they still wanted to find a safe place to protect themselves. Some of the warriors even knew that they might not be able to dodge it, so they immediately launched their strongest attack. They aimed straight at the silver boss in front of them. -132,437! -210,568! -196,453! -110,086! -92,341! Under the desperate attacks of the warriors, they actually killed five silver bosses in succession and the warriors who were originally prepared to dodge also managed to dodge. What was going on? The great Earthquake Stomp skill actually failed. Everyone turned to look at the Towering Elephant. Even the silver bosses found it hard to believe. An unbelievable scene appeared in everyone’s eyes. The Towering Elephant’s leg that had been raised up high… but did not land on the ground. Instead, it was tightly wrapped around the Little Golden Dragon’s body. The way it was raised up high was very comical. It even looked a little like a horse. This skill was actually interrupted by the Little Golden Dragon! “D*mn, is this the legendary blocking spell?” “No way, such an unsolvable move was actually broken.” “Little Golden Dragon is really awesome. There are no weaklings under Lu Chen.” However, this was not the end. Little Golden Dragon’s body actually grew longer in a short second. It was three times longer than before. At this moment, it was as if it was a long rope that quickly slithered across the Towering Elephant’s skin, gradually wrapping around its four legs. The Towering Elephant immediately let out a mournful cry and fell to the ground. At this moment, it had completely fallen into the situation of being beaten up because Little Golden Dragon’s strength was too great. Although the Towering Elephant could move a little, it was restrained by Little Golden Dragon and could not stand up at all. On the contrary, Little Golden Dragon shook its head from time to time and stabbed its fangs into the Towering Elephant’s body. Lan Weiwei also launched the Demonic Flame at the Towering Elephant. In dozens of seconds, the Towering Elephant was killed! The scene in front of them was beyond everyone’s imagination. Initially, everyone thought that the biggest threat was the Black Tortoise and the Recovery Starfish. However, in just a few seconds, Lu Chen had unleashed an astonishing amount of combat power and killed the two gold bosses. The Towering Elephant, which was widely regarded as the most difficult to deal with and the easiest to deal damage to everyone, had also been killed by Lu Chen’s two pets. In just a few minutes, Lu Chen and his pets had already killed three gold bosses. The efficiency of killing monsters was simply astounding. The warriors also felt their faces turn red. Initially, they had said that Lu Chen had stolen too much of the limelight. Now they knew why he could so easily gain the spotlight. Seeing this scene, all the warriors went even crazier. Normally, when they fought monsters with all their might, all the silver bosses felt as if they were filled with malice. At the same time, Liu Changping and Liu Yuan entered a state of intense battle. Both sides fought back and forth. The battle had reached its climax. Not only was the Golden Armored Ant extremely powerful, but its defense was also heaven-defying. Besides the Seven-colored peacock, the Golden Armored Ant was the most powerful and highest-level existence. Moreover, the special characteristics of its body allowed it to possess over 800,000 defense points! The Golden Armored Ant’s defense was simply too strong. Among the six gold bosses, the Seven-colored peacock was the strongest. The Black Tortoise had the strongest defense. Aside from that, the Golden Armored Ant had a strong defense as well. With its tough shell, its defense had already exceeded 800,000 points. Ordinary attacks with this kind of defense could not hurt it at all. Not to mention Liu Changping and Liu Yuan, even Lu Chen’s attack power was only around 70,000 to 80,000 points. They were too far away from penetrating the defense of the Golden Armored Ant. If these two people were to face the Golden Armored Ant head-on, not to mention dealing damage to it, they would not even be able to break through its defense. However, they also had a way which was to increase penetration and armor-piercing on their equipment, so then they could make their attacks deal real damage. However, not everyone was like Lu Chen, who could deal real damage with the effect of normal attacks or even critical hits. For Liu Changping and Liu Yuan, their real damage could only reach around 10% more than what they could do. Therefore, their combined attacks could only deal around 10,000 damage to the ant. At the same time, they had to constantly defend against the Golden Armored Ant’s attacks. The Golden Armored Ant was small and had a high attack power. It had already exceeded 400,000 damage. Its extremely flexible body coupled with its powerful attacks left the two of them somewhat overwhelmed. [Name: Golden Armored Ant] [Level: 51] [HP: 6,012,000] [Attack: 404,520] [Defense: 809,800] [Magic Defense: 404,599] [Ant’s Horizontal Push: An exclusive skill of the Golden Armored Ant. It will have different effects depending on the awakening of the bloodline. During the battle, the Golden Armored Ant can use their powerful strength to push and push the enemies on the battlefield. Unless the enemies are over level 10, they will not be able to block the attacks, each second, the Golden Armored Ant deal 5% to 100% attack damage to the enemies.] [Ant’s Bite: An exclusive skill of the Golden Armored Ant. The ants can use their pincers to attack all enemies within 10 meters of them. The combined attack power is threefold their own attack power! 5 minutes cooldown time.] [Additional: There is a chance to awaken the bloodline in their body and complete the transformation!] The Golden Armored Ant was of a high level, only second to the Seven-colored Peacock. The ant’s mouth — which was like a huge pincer — constantly opened and closed, trying to attack the two of them. If it was not for Liu Changping and Liu Yuan’s quick reflexes… they would have died in the ant’s mouth. After all, the Ant’s Bite skill was more than three times its attack power. Although it had a five-minute cooldown rate, it wasn’t a problem for its powerful HP and defense. With over 6,000,000 HP, even if the Golden Armored Ant stood still and allowed Liu Yuan and Liu Changping to attack, it would still need at least 10 minutes of their time to be fully defeated. If the two of them continued to dodge and look for an attack angle, the time they would have to spend to defeat it would be even longer. It had only been five minutes, yet the ant’s HP had only decreased by less than a third. Meanwhile, Liu Yuan and Liu Changping were already drenched in sweat. Not only that, but they had also endured three attacks from the ant. Liu Yuan had endured two of them. If not for Liu Changping’s despicable way of killing monsters, which had cost him several hundred HP, Liu Yuan would have died in less than a minute. Moreover, they had only managed to survive after using up three one-time-use defensive tools. Otherwise, they would have died from a single attack. However, they could not be blamed for this. Ordinary players should kill monsters that are lower in level than them. Once they reach a higher level, they should gather a large number of their companions to kill hundreds, or even thousands, of monsters to kill a boss, such a situation was not uncommon. Normally, these two players’ strengths should only be used to fight a silver boss. However, fighting a silver boss was no longer enough to satisfy their ambitions. If they wanted to catch up to Lu Chen, they would have to constantly challenge themselves and surpass their previous self. The Golden Armored Ant before them was the best form of training for them. This was especially true for these people. Each of them had their own rules when they chose a gold boss to fight. In other words, the ones they chose were the easiest to defeat for them. If Liu Changping and the others were to fight against the Towering Elephant, they would probably be trampled to death within minutes. If they were to fight against the Seven-colored Peacock, the Seven-colored Peacock might not even need to try its skills. Just its normal attacks would be enough to kill the two of them. As for fighting against the Black Tortoise, there was no chance. No matter how much real damage their attacks dealt, it would not be as fast as the HP recovery skills of the Recovery Starfish. If Liu Changping and Liu Yuan were to fight against the Swift Monkey, an assassin-type existence like that would easily wipe both of them out. After all, there were only two people watching over each other, so there would be blind spots in their vision. Once that happened, it would be over for them. The six legs of the Golden Armored Ant kept moving back and forth. From time to time, it would swing its two antennae back and forth like a whip, trying to hit Liu Changping and Liu Yuan. Liu Changping and Liu Yuan were also very cautious. Several parts of their bodies were injured. Liu Yuan’s graceful figure was also revealed at this moment, which attracted many warriors to turn their heads. The two of them were fighting in a sorry state. Although they saw that Lu Chen had already won the battle in the distance, they did not plan to ask Lu Chen for help because Lu Chen was currently recovering, he wanted to increase his mana regeneration speed. In addition, they did not want to become a burden to Lu Chen. Finally, after they attacked for another ten minutes, the Golden Armored Ant only had one-fifth of its HP left. The Golden Armored Ant finally used its skill, Ant Horizontal Push. When this skill was used, the Golden Armored Ant grew ten times its original size. Even two pairs of legs had appeared beneath its body, and its belly had also become incomparably huge. At this moment, it was as if it had become a gigantic queen ant. It was extremely terrifying. After it grew bigger, its speed did not decrease. Instead, it increased and it directly crashed towards Liu Changping and Liu Yuan. The two of them could not dodge in time and were directly knocked away. Most importantly, after being knocked away, they did not fly out. Instead, they were pushed far away by the Golden Armored Ant. The direction that the Golden Armored Ant was running towards was exactly where the Swift Monkey was. This was bad! At this moment, both of their eyes were wide open. The most important thing was that every second that they took the ant’s attack, they would receive 5% to 100% of the damage from the other party. Even if it was only 5%, it was still 20,000 points. If not for the fact that they had defensive equipment on them, this attack would have killed them instantly. This Golden Armored Ant’s intelligence was obviously subpar. It actually wanted to use the Swift Monkey’s help to get rid of its two opponents. Meanwhile, the Swift Monkey had been prepared for such a thing to happen and got into an offensive stance. When the Swift Monkey saw the Golden Armored Ant approaching from afar, his body swayed! In an instant, he abandoned the two Dragon Teams in front of him and dashed towards Liu Changping and the other two. The two battle teams, however, did not want to let the Swift Monkey get what he wanted. They used their strongest attacks and control methods to block the monkey. The monkey’s movement technique was not only fast, but his reaction speed was also extremely agile. All of the attacks from the group actually missed after the Swift Monkey increased his speed. They were unable to stop him. Seeing Liu Yuan and Liu Changping’s HP continuously dropping, the two of them became anxious. Liu Yuan directly took out a scroll. It was an ordinary low-level teleportation scroll. In a second, she directly teleported a few hundred meters away. Fortunately, she managed to escape the Golden Armored Ant’s oncoming attack. Liu Changping, on the other hand, did not have a teleportation scroll. For a moment, he was extremely anxious. Seeing that his HP was decreasing, he could not stand it anymore. He took out a weapon with explosive power and placed it in front of his chest. He quickly lit it up! -12,514! This attack directly blew away more than 10,000 of Liu Changping’s HP. Seeing this operation, everyone was stunned. What was going on? Liu Changping was really a ruthless person. Why did he hit himself knowing he was already low on HP? However, everyone immediately understood his intention. After Liu Changping suffered the explosion and lost his HP, he was also blasted far away by the impact of the explosion. At the same time, he directly left the position of the ant’s oncoming attack. In the next second, he did not think about anything else. He directly took out dozens of small health bottles from his hands and consumed them. +1,384! +3,152! +1,323! +1,454! +3,126! Everyone was stunned by Liu Changping’s speed. In just ten seconds, he had drunk more than 50 bottles of potions. “D*mn, is this speed of a man who has been single for thirty years?” “How many potions do you think our team leader prepared this time? In the past ten minutes, I saw that he had taken out more than three hundred bottles.” “I think three hundred bottles should be the limit. After all, there is a limited space in the backpack.” “I think our leader must still have a lot more potions hands. I guess he has a total of five hundred bottles. Otherwise, how could he drink it without feeling any heartache?” “I bet he has at least a thousand bottles. How could he only have only five hundred? Even I have six hundred!” “...; D*mn, are you even human? Why do you need that many? Do you really get beaten up that badly all the time?” “What do you know? This is called being prepared. Once you’re really beaten to death, you’ll understand how wise my decision was.” In all honesty, Liu Changping’s heart was aching badly as he drank the potions. What he consumed was all money. He had spent a lot of effort to buy these potions and even sold his own apartment, all of this was to improve his equipment. However, Liu Changping could not care about that anymore. After the explosion, he only had a few thousand HP left. If he did not work hard to replenish his HP, any silver boss right now would be able to kill him. At this moment, Liu Changping was glad that he was smart. Otherwise, even if he had to wait for a second longer, he would have been killed by the Golden Armored Ant. He even deliberately adjusted the angle of the explosion so that he could fly away from the monkey as well. However, not everyone was as careless as Liu Changping. To be able to consider every detail on the battlefield, clearly, Liu Yuan did not think so much, the next place she appeared was actually 700 meters away from the Swift Monkey. However, she was careful because the monkey’s Shadow Kill skill had a range of 500 meters. It was far from that range. However, even though she had calculated it well, the Swift Monkey’s speed was immense. He immediately activated his Shadow Kill skill and used his feet to jump 200 meters away. Then, he teleported again! At this moment, the monkey just happened to come to Liu Yuan’s side. Moreover, his attack had already reached 300,000 damage. Liu Yuan’s face instantly turned pale knowing what was about to come! One had to know that she was not Liu Changping. She did not have that many single-use defensive equipments. In addition, she had already received quite a lot of damage from the ant. At this moment, she was only left with herself, she could only watch helplessly as the Swift Monkey came out towards her. The monkey’s claw directly swept past Liu Yuan’s chest, leaving behind three claw marks. Her outer clothes were immediately torn apart, revealing a silver-colored armor. Seeing this armor, some of the other warriors immediately cried out in surprise, “D*mn, isn’t that the epic-tier equipment, Eternal Armor?” “F*ck! It seems like it really is. Liu Yuan actually has this thing. How awesome!” “How powerful is this armor?” “Let me put it this way. You should have seen Lu Chen’s Shield God before, right? Other than not being able to rebound, Liu Yuan’s eternal armor can also reduce 90% of attack power. It’s said that as long as a monster’s level doesn’t exceed gold, it will never be able to completely destroy this armor.” Hearing the warrior’s explanation, everyone’s eyes lit up. They did not expect Liu Yuan to have a piece of epic-tier equipment. The monkey’s attack could reach 300,000 attack power. Under the defense of the Eternal Armor, it could directly reduce 90% of the attack power, leaving more than 30,000 attack power. However, the Swift Monkey’s Shadow Kill skill also had an armor-piercing effect, so this attack could actually deal 100,000 damage! Not to mention Liu Yuan’s current condition, even if she was at her peak condition, she would not be able to defend against it at all. Under the monkey’s powerful attack, Liu Yuan’s HP was immediately reduced to zero! The monkey’s speed was simply too fast. No one had expected that he would be able to abandon his 10 opponents and launch a fatal attack on Liu Yuan. From the Golden Armored Ant’s attack to the Swift Monkey’s Shadow Kill, this short process only lasted for a few seconds. At first, Lu Chen did not pay too much attention to it, but by the time he wanted to make a move, it was too late! “Liu Yuan!” “Liu Yuan!” Everyone cried out in surprise, especially Tang Xiaoqing who was far away. Her eyes were wide open. At this moment, Liu Yuan had already reached level 40. Although the other warriors had also lost their equipment and lost zero experience points, Liu Yuan was the one who had the best relationship with Lu Chen and the others. From the moment he had become a powerhouse, Liu Yuan had already come to his side. Although it was in the name of surveillance, she had helped him many times. Later on, the two of them became best friends. Their relationship grew deeper than the roots of a tree. Lu Chen immediately burst out with his strongest speed and prepared to charge at Liu Yuan. However, before he could get close, a terrifying aura had formed in Liu Yuan’s body. The powerful aura and the terrifying state of the situation spread towards the entire battlefield! A powerful force burst forth from Liu Yuan’s body, causing the world to change colors! In an instant, the sky and earth changed color along with wind and clouds that surged upward. With Liu Yuan at the center, a powerful tornado formed. Seeing that the situation wasn’t looking good, the monkey immediately stomped on the ground, preparing to escape. However, the powerful suction force of the tornado was incomparably powerful, pulling the monkey closer. Following this, the tornado managed to crush the monkey into pieces! Everyone was shocked. After all, this monkey had a total of 5,000,000 HP. Even though they had battled for a while, the monkey still had 4,000,000 remaining HP. Yet, the monkey was insta-killed in this tornado. The most shocking thing was that Liu Yuan — who was at the center of the tornado — had long since fallen into a coma. The tornado had erupted from her body, and it was incomparably powerful. Lu Chen saw the scene in front of him and was extremely anxious. He immediately prepared to rush towards her, but in the next second, a large purple hand suddenly materialized from the sky and suddenly descended! It directly broke through the dark clouds in the sky, crushed the tornado, grabbed Liu Yuan in its hand, and then rose into the air and disappeared. The entire process did not even take a second, but it caused the sky to return to normal as if nothing had happened. Everyone panicked when they saw this scene. Lu Chen was even more shocked. Only Tang Xiaoqing had a strange expression on her face. No one noticed that the Seven-colored Peacock had a serious look on his face. He lowered his head slightly as if he was bowing to the big hand in the sky. Lu Chen pulled out his Heaven-cleaving Sword in anger when he saw the scene in front of him. He swung his sword at the Golden-armored Ant in the distance and struck a critical strike! This critical hit triggered the additional functions of the Heaven-cleaving Sword. [Heaven-cleaving Sword: Silver equipment. Can deal 10,000 damage to the enemy. A certain chance to trigger a fivefold critical hit! A low chance to trigger Spatial Cleavage to cut enemies into pieces and cripple them, reducing their attack power. Spatial Slash, absolute true damage that ignores defense!] -120,035! With just one slash, the Golden-armored Ant had died at Lu Chen’s hands. At this moment, only the Seven-colored Peacock was left. However, Lu Chen did not want to bother him at all. The most important thing right now was to find Liu Yuan. However, he had no idea what was going on in this vast Mass Grave. In addition to that huge hand in the sky, how did it come about was even more confusing! For a moment, he did not know what to do, but his eyes turned red from anger. Tang Xiaoqing saw Lu Chen’s current state and felt a little anxious, she shouted loudly, “Chenchen, don’t be anxious. I know where Liu Yuan is. Liu Yuan is fine.” Hearing Tang Xiaoqing’s words, Lu Chen gave her a deep look. After remaining silent for three whole seconds, he finally nodded slightly. Tang Xiaoqing felt that Lu Chen was a little unfamiliar and distant to her. Her face was filled with an unknown grievance, and tears welled up in her eyes. At this moment, the Seven-colored Peacock that was originally fighting with Tang Bao suddenly let out a cry. Following this, it flapped its wings and waved its arms. Instantly, the entire world changed once again! The surroundings were covered in a dense fog, making it impossible to even see one’s fingers. The warriors who had been fighting with the silver bosses also started to panic. They all maintained their vigilance and moved carefully, they were afraid that they would accidentally fall into an ambush. Meanwhile, the silver bosses were also completely covered by the white fog and disappeared. The Seven-colored Peacock also disappeared from Tang Bao’s vision. This caused Tang Bao to panic slightly. Originally, when Tang Bao was fighting the Seven-colored Peacock, he could only rely on his killing domain to barely tie with the opponent. After all, the opponent’s level was much higher than his. He had fought for so long… However, he had only lost one-fourth of the opponent’s HP. If they were to encounter the enemy in the dark in such a situation, and they were to experience it in the open, everyone would be in danger. The reason why the warriors were able to defeat the powerful gold and silver bosses with their weak attack and defense was precisely that they could use their movement speed and their various skills to dodge the enemies. However, in the situation where they could not even see their own fingers, they were about to become live bait. “Ah!” As expected, a scream was heard. In an instant, a warrior had died at the hands of a silver boss. This was not the last scream. Soon after, one after another, the warriors were dropping like flies. In less than five minutes, more than ten of them had died. The situation of being beaten passively made all the warriors of the Dragon Team panic. However, at this moment, bright rays of light rose up from the white fog. These were the light mages of the Dragon Team. Although this white fog was an illusion created by the Seven-colored Peacock, the Seven-colored Peacock was, after all, an undead creature. It could be restrained by the light mages. Therefore, although everyone was still in the white fog… the white fog was no longer as dense as before. One could see a few meters in front of them. At the same time, everyone gathered towards the light mages closest to them. This was because once these light mages die, everyone would once again fall into the demise of the white fog. The monsters also noticed this, so they changed their targets to the light mages. Even though the warriors were very fast, there was still one mage who almost died from the attack. The warriors who rushed over immediately handed him a large amount of health potion to heal him. Lu Chen also brought Liu Changping, who was not far away, to the side of a light mage. He was surprised to find that Lan Weiwei and Little Golden Dragon were also there. They were gathered together, any monsters that dared to come over would be killed by Lu Chen and Little Golden Dragon. Lu Chen quickly adjusted his emotions, allowing himself to recover from Liu Yuan’s disappearance. he shouted, “Everyone, gather towards me!” As soon as he finished speaking, the other warriors rushed over. The light mages were also gathering towards him at a speed visible to the naked eye. However, something strange happened. The other magicians were walking towards him, but then they suddenly changed directions and walked in other directions. Everyone split up again. Seeing this, Liu Changping was also a little anxious. he shouted, “What are you doing? Why aren’t you coming over?!” At this time, the other warriors also responded. “Leader, I’m moving towards you!” “That’s right, leader. I think we’re already very close.” Hearing this, Lu Chen and Liu Changping’s expressions didn’t look too good. They knew that the Seven-colored Peacock had the ability to create illusions, so this fog must have been set to make them think that they were coming closer to Lu Chen. Lu Chen suddenly thought of something. He frowned slightly and said, “Oh no! This Seven-colored Peacock has done something.” Liu Changping also came to a sudden realization. He widened his eyes and muttered to himself, “I understand now. The Seven-colored Peacock adjusted the density of the fog in the white fog to make the white fog in the air uneven, creating the effect of a mirage. “Although everyone saw our light source, in their eyes, it was shining in a different direction. “And they’re being lured into the Seven-colored Peacock’s trap!” As soon as he finished speaking, they suddenly heard a joyful voice from afar. “Team leader, we’ve found you!” Lu Chen’s eyelids suddenly twitched. It was most likely that they had encountered a trap and met the fake Lu Chen in the illusion. The next moment, they heard a scream. A few streaks of red appeared in the white fog. -41,263! -13,562! -39,407! -17,286! -55,623! Those warriors instantly fell into the enemy’s trap. They were attacked by countless silver bosses. At this moment, the Seven-colored Peacock did not even have to show up to fight. Lu Chen looked at the warriors beside him and spoke quickly, “Everyone, be careful. This is the Seven-colored Peacock. His intelligence is much higher than we thought “Since his ability is to create illusions, it’s impossible for him to only create white fog. Since he chose to do so, it means that he can create a scene based on what we are most afraid of.” Hearing this, the soldiers were slightly shocked. They suddenly remembered why they were so flustered. Back when White Fog City was not open to the public, countless people had tried to find out where it was. However, when they walked into the White Fog City, they either came back in circles or disappeared… The white fog had left a deep psychological scar on them. At this moment, their fear was once again revealed by the Seven-colored Peacock. Liu Changping also hurriedly said, “Lu Chen is right. Therefore, everyone must remain calm and restrain the panic in their hearts.” As soon as he said this, the voices of the Dragon Slayer Team and the Soul Slaying Team immediately came from the group that had been attacked. After a round of fighting, the other squad seemed to have returned to their original state. These two squads were warriors who had entered the Second World after White Fog City had opened. Therefore, they were not afraid of white fog at all. As such, they maintained their best state. However, the other squads were different. They were already panicking in the face of white fog. In addition to a large number of silver bosses attacking them, many squads had suffered casualties. Liu Changping shouted again, “Everyone, be careful. Everyone is very separated from one another right now. Listen to my voice and gather towards my side. “Everyone, don’t rely on the light to determine our position. Right now, there’s a visible illusion. You all must be careful. Follow my voice. Lu Chen is with me. “...;” Liu Changping’s voice gradually calmed everyone down, lowering their previous panic. When they heard Lu Chen’s voice, everyone once again gathered their strength and formed a formation. They carefully defended themselves, continuously moving toward Liu Changping’s voice. However, under the constant assault of silver bosses, the closer the team got to Lu Chen, the more difficult it became. Lu Chen could only let out a loud laugh. “Tang Bao, you don’t have to come to my side anymore. Quickly find the team closest to you and join them.” Tang Bao, who was far away, responded with a loud shout, “You can leave it to me!” Lu Chen then said to Little Golden Dragon beside him, “You and Lan Weiwei form a team and rush towards the distance. Find any soldiers who are close to you. With the two of you around, they shouldn’t have any problems. Protect them well.” At this moment, Little Golden Dragon stuck out its long tongue and nodded. Then they both quickly swam to the distance. Soon after, Lu Chen turned his gaze to Liu Changping beside him, Liu Changping was obviously stunned when he saw this scene and said, “No way. Lu Chen, you want me to go out and find them too? I’m not strong, I’m going to die.” Lu Chen was a little speechless as he said, “What are you hiding for. Your strength is not as simple as an ordinary spiritual stage cultivator. Now is not the time to train. If you don’t wait for another second, one more member of the Dragon Team will die.” Hearing Lu Chen’s words, the fear on Liu Changping’s face instantly disappeared and was replaced by a calm smile. The corners of his mouth curled up slightly, completely different from his previous cowardly appearance. Originally, when they heard Lu Chen’s words, the other warriors were still a little confused. After all, the impression that Liu Changping gave them was that he was not strong, but he was especially good at fighting. No matter how they fought, they could not kill him. Once they encountered a slight disadvantage in the battle momentum, they had to retreat. Could it be that Liu Changping still had a trick up his sleeve? In the next second, Liu Changping directly took out a golden shield from his backpack. This shield was completely different from ordinary defensive equipment because it was covered with frightening barbs. If this shield was used to defend against an enemy’s attack, then it wouldn’t be as simple as it was, but would directly deal critical damage. “Took you long enough!” “No way, Liu Changping, how can you still have this skill?” “Where did you get the shield? How come I’ve never seen you use it before?” Seeing that all the members of the Dragon Team had cast doubtful gazes at him, the corner of Liu Changping’s mouth twitched slightly. He returned to his previous wretched expression and scratched his hair, he smiled and said, “I borrowed it! I borrowed it from the First Elder. I’ll have to return it later.” A warrior beside him mercilessly said, “I won’t believe your nonsense!” However, Liu Changping was very thick-skinned. He did not care about the other’s ridicule at all. Pretending not to hear anything, he grabbed his shield and charged out. The silver bosses in the white fog had been surrounding them the entire time, waiting to launch an attack on them. Seeing Liu Changping charge at them, a silver boss with the appearance of a giant rhinoceros charged at him. It raised its horn and charged at Liu Changping. If it had been Liu Changping’s usual fighting style, he would not have said a word. He would not have cared about his reputation at all. He would immediately dodge to the side and run away. After all, his reputation was not worth much. Survival was the most important thing. However, this time, not only did Liu Changping not dodge, he held onto his shield tightly. He turned his body and stomped on the ground. He increased his speed and charged toward the rhinoceros-type monster in front of him for a head-on collision! “Bang!” Seeing this scene, everyone sucked in a breath of cold air. The man and the rhinoceros crashed into each other with a loud sound as the ground shook slightly. All the warriors were stunned by his move! They had never seen Liu Changping act this tough before. At the same time, they were also very worried. After all, the rhinoceros in front of them was a level 35 monster. Not only was its defense powerful, but most importantly, it had already activated its skill… Rhinoceros Rampage. This skill could double one’s attack power. Such an attack could instantly wipe out hundreds of thousands of human HP. The warriors could not help but call out to Liu Changping worriedly. “You’re being too reckless!” “F*ck! He won’t die before he gets the chance, right?!” Everyone seemed to have foreseen Liu Changping’s next tragedy. As expected, a string of red dots quickly floated out from the sky. Liu Changping had always been the reckless type. However, everyone felt very sad because Liu Changping had indeed died to help the other members. Suddenly, someone shouted, “Liu Changping is fine. Look, he’s still alive!” This was the person who had lowered his head and was prepared to mourn Liu Changping’s death. He suddenly raised his head. When they saw the string of numbers that were originally floating red, they were instantly dumbfounded! -603,128! A scene that shocked everyone appeared. Not only did Liu Changping not have a single floating red, but he had also directly dealt 600,000 damage to the rhinoceros! It was impossible for a human to have such high HP, which meant that the Changping was unharmed! “F*ck, is this still the Liu Changping that I know?” “No way, when did our leader become so powerful? Hasn’t he always been a stoic person?!” “As far as I know, he has bought quite a few houses since he came to the Dragon Team. However, in the few months since the start of the Second World game, he has sold almost four to five properties, all of which were used to buy equipment!” “D*mn, so that’s how it works? The leader is really going all out, isn’t he?” “Where on Earth did he get that shield from? Why are there bard wires on it?” “It’s not just that. Look at that equipment of his, it can even deal with such a high critical hit. Clearly, it’s not a piece of ordinary gold equipment. At the very least, it’s one of the rarer ones.” “F*ck, he’s so awesome!” Following that, Liu Changping rammed his way from side to side for a while. In less than 30 seconds, he arrived beside another group of light mages. The moment he appeared, the light mages that were originally being besieged immediately felt a lot less pressure. At this moment, Liu Changping did not even need to use his sword and knife. All he had to do was to use his shield to ram around. In an instant, all the enemies around him were sent flying. Seeing this scene, the lightbulb team, who had been saved, was also a little dumbfounded. They could not believe that the person in front of them was Liu Changping. “Team leader, your shield is awesome. If you put it on your back, you would be like a hedgehog.” “We use our swords and knives to increase our attack power, while you use your swords and knives to hide your strength.” “When carried out missions in the past, you were used to holding back. In the Second World, you were still like this. I say, team leader, don’t tell me that one day you will reveal your true strength and be even stronger than Lu Chen?!” Although this caused Liu Changping to not be able to fight as lethally as Lu Chen, or was even far inferior to Lu Chen, this sudden change had indeed shattered many people’s worldviews. Liu Changping had long returned to his previous silly and easy-to-bully expression, he scratched his head and said, “I don’t have any strength. I borrowed this shield from the First Elder. I only have a broken iron sword. Don’t you know that? “Look, in just a short while, I’ve lost so much of my mana. Ah, yes, which one of you has Mana and Health potions? Quick, quick, quick, give it to me! “In order to save all of you, I’ve suffered too much damage!” Saying so, he reached his hand out to the warriors in front of him, a helpless expression on his face. If this had happened in the past, many warriors would have their faces filled with gratitude. They would have taken out all of their Mana and Health Potions, and Liu Changping would have accepted them as well. However, at this moment, when everyone saw Liu Changping appear in front of everyone with incomparable courage and easily repel those silver bosses, they immediately stared at Liu Changping as if they were looking at a fool. Liu Changping pretended to be in pain as he extended his hand in front of everyone for a few seconds. Seeing that everyone was unmoved, Liu Changping immediately felt a little awkward, he quickly coughed dryly and said, “Alright, alright. Let’s hurry to other places and gather everyone together. That way, we’ll be safer.” However, at this moment, the Seven-colored Peacock also noticed that they were constantly looking for each other’s companions. Once again, a loud cry could be heard from within the fog. In this illusion, the effect of the fog became even stronger. The light emitted by the light mages had now become much weaker. There was no way for the people in the distance to see them. They could only let their own group see the position in front of them. Fortunately, Lu Chen had already found Tang Bao. The people in Lu Chen’s team were even happier. The two strongest people on the battlefield were here. This meant that they were safe. They did not have to worry anymore, even if they encountered the Seven-colored Peacock, they would not have any problems. However, looking at Tang Bao, Lu Chen was puzzled. “Why are you alone? You’ve been in the fog for so long, but you still haven’t found any light mage team?” Tang Bao’s expression was a little unsightly. “D*mn that, a group of silver bosses suddenly rushed out and scattered me and the warriors. After that, I couldn’t find them even if I wanted to. It wasn’t easy for me to meet you. “This peacock is really too difficult to deal with. We have to be careful.” Then, he looked at Lu Chen and all the warriors and asked, “Take out all the Health bottles you have. I’ll distribute them to everyone. Whoever lacks HP will get it. “Oh right, where’s your defensive equipment? Lend me some of your defensive shields. When a silver boss comes, be careful. Lu Chen and I will fight the monsters.” Hearing Tang Bao’s words, the others hurriedly took out potions from their backpacks and handed them to Tang Bao. Tang Bao was about to reach out and take them, however, Lu Chen directly took out a large bottle of Health Potion from his backpack and blocked it in front of the other warriors. Lu Chen directly handed the potion to Tang Bao, which was originally reaching out to the other warriors, pausing for a moment. Then, he glanced at Lu Chen and grabbed the potion in Lu Chen’s hand. Just when he grabbed Lu Chen’s hand, he was instantly grabbed by Lu Chen. Tang Bao’s face was a little surprised and said seriously, “Lu Chen, what are you doing! You’re causing a scene!” However, Lu Chen ignored him. He waved the Heaven-cleaving Sword in his hand and slashed at Tang Bao’s neck! Seeing this scene, all the warriors were stunned. Some of them even wanted to stop Lu Chen. “It’s not necessary. Tang Bao just wants a few potions, right? Just give it to him. It’s not worth much.” “Is Lu Chen under an illusion? Why did he just attack Tang Bao?” “F*ck, if the two of them have an internal conflict, what should we do?” Everyone felt that Tang Bao would definitely run away quickly. After all, Lu Chen’s combat strength was too strong. However, what shocked everyone was that the expression on Tang Bao’s face instantly became incomparably ferocious! Everyone’s hearts thumped. There was something wrong with this Tang Bao! It wasn’t because Tang Bao’s expression wasn’t right in the face of Lu Chen’s attack. Rather, it was because Tang Bao’s response was extremely strange. Regardless of whether Tang Bao chose to dodge or take out his weapon to defend, no one felt that there was anything wrong with it. However, Tang Bao’s choice was to bite back! Tang Bao opened his big mouth and instead of retreating, he charged forward and directly bit Lu Chen’s neck. Everyone could clearly see that Tang Bao’s teeth were already covered with sharp barbs! The person in front of them was definitely not Tang Bao! However, although this fake Tang Bao’s attack method made people shudder, it was extremely effective. Even Lu Chen, who had an explosive attack power, had no choice but to dodge at this moment. Otherwise, judging from the distance between him and his opponent… he would definitely be bitten to death first. At such a close distance, Lu Chen barely managed to dodge the other party’s attack. However, the other party did not manage to hit him in the first attack. Immediately after, the other party opened its mouth and ran toward Lu Chen once more, each time, the other party’s attack was only 20 to 30 centimeters away from him. Judging from the other party’s powerful speed, its attack power was definitely on par with Lu Chen! Meanwhile, the other warriors in Lu Chen’s group dispersed into the distance. They knew that if they continued to stay by Lu Chen’s side, they would only add to the other party’s burden and would not be of any help. Judging from the fake Tang Bao’s reaction speed, the monster in front of him was not a silver boss at all. In that case, the opponent’s identity was obvious. It was the Seven-colored Peacock! Under the opponent’s continuous attacks, Lu Chen could not even attack at all. He just kept dodging. Finally, after dodging the fake Tang Bao’s attacks once again, Lu Chen instantly activated his own skill, Dark Shura! [Dark Shura: Your understanding of darkness has reached an unfathomable level. When you use a hidden weapon, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with your level!] [Shadow State: When you transform into a shadow, your body will be hidden in the void.Ordinary attacks can not deal any damage to you. When you encounter special damage, you will be immune to it.] [Shadow Kill: When you use a long-range hidden weapon, your attack can surpass the opponent’s armor. This attack will not deactivate the Shadow State!] [One Hit Kill: When you use a close-range hidden weapon, Shadow State will be deactivated. Attacks will surpass the opponent’s armor. Critical strikes, dodges, and shield blocks from opponents will be ignored. Deals 300% true damage!] [Secret Whisper: You can curse an enemy in the dark. This enemy will be cursed with the curse of darkness. When you deal damage to the enemy, there is a 50% chance of killing the enemy in one hit. This skill ignores all immunity effects. Cooldown time is 30 days!] In an instant, just as the fake Tang Bao was about to bite Lu Chen’s neck, Lu Chen immediately flew into the air. At this moment, the fake Tang Bao’s expression became even more terrifying. His eyes were like those of a ferocious beast as he searched around, occasionally letting out bird cries from his throat. At this moment, Lu Chen suddenly appeared behind the fake Tang Bao and instantly used his One Hit Kill! With Lu Chen’s attack power of over 80,000, coupled with his original attack speed of 32 times per second and the 600% attack bonus under the Dark Shura title, just one second of attack was enough to deal over 15,000,000 damage! With the Seven-colored Peacock’s 10,000,000 HP, such a powerful attack was definitely enough to instantly kill Lu Chen. However, the fake Tang Bao’s reaction was extremely fast. In less than half a second, they quickly turned around and opened their mouth, once again heading toward Lu Chen. Lu Chen quickly disappeared into the void once more. Although he did not manage to attack for more than a second, he had already consumed nearly half of the fake Tang Bao’s HP this time. Immediately, a red number of nearly 6,000,000 appeared in the sky! This time, everyone was even more certain that other than the Seven-colored Peacock — who was a gold boss — no one else on the entire battlefield had such high HP. However, Lu Chen’s failure to kill the fake Tang Bao this time had made the fake Tang Bao even more vigilant, constantly changing its position. Even if Lu Chen used the Dark Shura technique again, he would not even need a tenth of a second to do so, he would have to hide again. However, this was already enough for Lu Chen. After grinding the fake Tang Bao twice in a row, he was only left with over a million HP. Lu Chen only needed one last attack to finish it off completely. Just as Lu Chen was about to appear in the void for the last time, he prepared to kill the fake Tang Bao! “Show yourself! Attack!” The fake Tang Bao wanted to turn around and defend, but it was too late! Just as the dagger was about to pierce through his throat, Lu Chen’s eyes suddenly blurred. The fake Tang Bao had disappeared, turning into Liu Yuan with a huge wound on her chest! Lu Chen’s hand suddenly trembled. In just an instant, Lu Chen understood that this was the Seven-colored Peacock’s illusion. He had fallen into its trap! Then, he straightened his wrist again, ready to send the dagger directly into the fake Liu Yuan’s body! However, for the fake Liu Yuan, a momentary pause was enough. She stretched out her neck and bit Lu Chen’s body. -594,502! This attack took nearly 600,000 of Lu Chen’s HP. Not only did it instantly reduce Lu Chen’s HP to zero, but even Lan Weiwei’s HP was reduced to zero. Even Little Golden Dragon’s HP was reduced by a little! This attack almost took Lu Chen’s life! Lu Chen hurriedly hid in the void once again. As soon as he entered the void, he frantically replenished his HP potions. Following that, Lu Chen immediately put some distance between him and the fake Liu Yuan. When he reappeared in the void again, the weapon in his hand had already changed into the Heaven-cleaving Sword. He raised the Heaven-cleaving Sword high up in his hand, ready to chop down! Liu Yuan’s face was filled with sadness. Tears flowed down her cheeks as she muttered, “Lu Chen, don’t tell me you want to hurt me too?” Lu Chen hands stopped yet again! Liu Yuan’s eyes were filled with sadness as she pleaded to Lu Chen with tears in her eyes, “Do you know how much pain I’ve suffered in order to catch up to you? “Do you know why I fought so desperately with the Golden Armored ant just now? “Because I like you, and I hope to be able to fight together with you in this Second World. “I thought that I would die, but I never thought that I would die in your hands. “How could you have the heart to kill me-” However, before Liu Yuan could finish her words, Lu Chen’s Heaven-cleaving Sword was chopped down! -142,2845! A huge red number rose into the sky. There were more than a million of them! The Liu Yuan in front of them quickly disappeared. She turned into ashes and disappeared into the white fog. The soldiers in the distance looked at the disappearing Liu Yuan in silence. They recalled the appearance of Liu Yuan when she died. Although they knew that Liu Yuan was not really dead, the words of the Seven-colored Peacock disguised as Liu Yuan deeply touched them. Lu Chen coldly stared at the ashes in front of him and said in a low voice, “You shouldn’t have disguised yourself as her.” Although everyone wasn’t feeling very good after seeing the Seven-colored Peacock disguised as Liu Yuan being killed, they couldn’t help but feel sad about the current situation. However, at this moment, Tang Bao’s voice suddenly came from the distance. Lu Chen quickly came over. “The Seven-colored Peacock is here with me. Hurry up and help me kill him.” Hearing Tang Bao’s voice, everyone was shocked. After all, they had just been attacked by the fake Tang Bao for such a long time. They felt somewhat uncomfortable and were somewhat on guard. However, they soon realized that Tang Bao was the real Tang Bao. At the same time, they suddenly thought, if the opponent Tang Bao was fighting was the Seven-colored Peacock, then who was the one that Lu Chen had killed just now? Lu Chen had just realized that something was wrong, because after he killed the Seven-colored Peacock, there was no hint of an experience bonus. Clearly, the Seven-colored Peacock was not the one he had killed. At this moment, he suddenly remembered that the Seven-colored Peacock had another skill. [Name: Seven-colored Peacock] [Level: 55] [HP: 1,006,2000] [Attack: 594,520] [Defense: 290,800] [Magic Defense: 244,584] [Illusion Domain: The exclusive skill of the Seven-colored Peacock. It will produce different effects depending on the awakening of the bloodline. The seven-colored peacock can create an illusion domain. It can create all kinds of things within the domain. Everything within this domain is hard to distinguish between the real and the fake! It can create an existence that is similar to its own combat strength. At the same time, within the illusion domain, it will be immune to all damage received. There is a chance to awaken the bloodline in its body and complete the transformation!] This also meant that the Seven-colored Peacock could not only transform into a different version of itself, but also a person or a monster that was as strong as itself! At this moment, everyone finally understood how powerful the Seven-colored Peacock’s ability was. If it was not for Lu Chen’s existence, everyone here would have been wiped out by the Seven-colored Peacock. Tang Bao would have barely been able to tie with it, if there were two Seven-colored peacocks, Tang Bao would have been lucky to escape. At the same time, everyone realized that the white fog here was now not as thick as before. Not only did the light mage’s brightness increase, but even the silver bosses lords in the distance could faintly be seen. It was obvious that because Lu Chen had killed one of the Seven-colored Peacock’s clones, the seven-colored Peacock’s ability to control the entire illusion wasn’t as strong. All of the warriors instantly mustered up their strength and charged directly at the silver bosses. In just a few seconds, the two sides were once again engaged in a chaotic battle. However, immediately after, everyone saw a scene that left each other dumbfounded. They did not know if they were seeing things, but everyone here had become exactly the same as them! Those silver bosses had also disappeared, becoming people who looked the same as them. Everyone was stunned when they saw this scene. Now that the silver bosses had turned into people who looked just like themselves, what should they do? At this moment, it was already difficult to tell who was a teammate and who was a monster. It had to be said that the Seven-colored Peacock was the most difficult monster Lu Chen had encountered since he entered the Second World. It was not because the peacock was strong, but because he had too many tricks up his sleeve. If he was not careful, he would fall into his trap. Not only could he disrupt the enemy’s line of sight and create an existence that was as strong as himself, but at this moment, the Seven-colored Peacock had turned everyone into his own knife, wanting them to kill each other. At the very least, these warriors were already afraid of taking action. Therefore, not only could the warriors not take the initiative to attack, but most importantly, they had to strengthen their defenses. After all, if a silver boss pretended to be a teammate and attacked them, it would be fatal. In an instant, the entire battlefield was in an uproar. Clearly, this was not the only place where such a situation had occurred. All of the warriors had become such existences. For a time, everyone on the battlefield was constantly dodging and avoiding attacks, afraid that they might end up attacking their real comrades. Just when everyone was at a loss and did not know what to do, Liu Changping suddenly shouted from afar, “Everyone, be careful! All those who take the initiative to attack are silver bosses. Be careful!” Liu Changping’s words suddenly woke up the warriors. Everyone on the battlefield was afraid of getting hurt, so when the warriors fought monsters, they mainly dodged. Only when they dodged the attacks would they attack the monsters. In this situation where they could not differentiate between friend and foe, the warriors’ first reaction was to dodge the damage. Only those silver bosses could clearly see who was the monster and who was the enemy under the Seven-colored Peacock’s settings, then, they launched an attack. Hearing Liu Changping’s words, everyone immediately put in 120% effort to observe who would attack and who would dodge. Gradually, everyone understood which fake comrades were the monsters. Then, when they attacked again, they would directly kill! -84,243! -93,562! -143,954! -142,351! Sure enough, when the warriors slashed down, blood gushed out everywhere! Humans definitely did not have that much health. This move worked! Meanwhile, Lu Chen ignored these silver bosses and directly rushed over to Tang Bao’s side with his Heaven-cleaving Sword. Through the increasingly thin white fog, Lu Chen could vaguely see two Tang Bao fighting each other. The two Tang Bao here were not like the ones he had met before, who only knew how to use their teeth to bite. Instead, each of them was holding a weapon in their hands, and the two sides were exchanging blows. Lu Chen was directly speechless, cursing, “What the f*ck is going on?!” It was obvious that the two on the battlefield had a tacit understanding as they shook their heads at the same time. It was as if they were trying to tell each other to not just stand there and watch. Regardless of the tone of their conversation, the time they spoke was the same. There was not the slightest bit of separation. For a moment, Lu Chen was in a bit of a dilemma. Lu Chen subconsciously looked at the HP bars on their heads. Both of them only had tens of thousands of HP and did not have tens of millions of HP like the peacock previously. This made Lu Chen completely confused. He looked at the two people fighting in the distance and could not tell which was real and which was fake. The Seven-colored Peacock’s ability was too strong. It completely achieved the effect of confusing the real with the fake. Lu Chen could not tell at all. At the same time, the two kept shouting for Lu Chen to help them beat up the other party. At this moment, Lu Chen suddenly said, “Tang Bao, when I was in primary school, those little friends of mine were all beaten up. It was you who pretended to be me and beat them up, wasn’t it? At that time, you were already several decades older. How could you have the cheek to beat up those primary school students yourself?” Hearing Lu Chen’s question, the two opened their mouths at the same time. One of them said, “Of course, it was to help you! Do we even need to talk about our relationship? If you were in trouble, I would definitely rush forward no matter the age!” While the other Tang Bao opened his mouth to defend himself, “Don’t say sh*t like that about me. I can’t do this. I’m not like that. Don’t talk nonsense!” Hearing the two’s words, Lu Chen didn’t say anything else. He directly picked up his Heaven-cleaving Sword and slashed at the first Tang Bao who spoke. Tang Bao, who was attacked, dodged the attack in a flash, revealing his Seven-colored Peacock appearance. The real Tang Bao widened his eyes, his face full of disbelief, “I say, Lu Chen, how did you tell which one was me?!” Lu Chen’s expression did not change as he said indifferently, “The real Tang Bao would do shameless things in the dark, but he would try his best to hide it in front of everyone. “No matter what, the real Tang Bao will never admit such a thing. “How could he admit that he didn’t even care about age and hit a child in front of so many people?” When he heard Lu Chen’s words, Tang Bao’s face instantly darkened. His entire face turned ashen, and the corners of his mouth kept twitching. He did not speak for a long time. When the true Seven-colored Peacock saw the two of them appear before him, it immediately ran off into the distance without saying a word! Seeing the Seven-colored Peacock retreat without even saying a word, Lu Chen and Tang Bao felt a little numb on the spot. At the same time, the bodies of the other silver bosses also trembled slightly. They were clearly confused by the Seven-colored Peacock’s manipulation, and they immediately ran away from the battlefield. Seeing this, all the warriors who had been fighting were shocked. This was the first time they had seen a gold boss run away without even fighting. At this time, Tang Xiaoqing, who had not made a move, suddenly rushed up and said, “Let’s Go! Let’s chase after him. If we follow him, we’ll find Liu Yuan!” Hearing this, all the warriors immediately ran toward the place where the monsters had escaped. After hearing Tang Xiaoqing’s shout, everyone started to give chase even harder. They continued to kill and run. After running for more than 1,000 meters, the scene in front of them almost made them laugh out loud. They saw that the remaining 20,000 or so monsters that were originally waiting for them during the previous charge were stunned when they saw the Seven-colored Peacock running away with a bunch of silver bosses. They had never imagined that the six gold bosses and 100 high-level silver bosses would lose so miserably. The current situation was difficult for them to accept. However, when they saw the Seven-colored Peacock running for his life, they tactfully ran back. For a time, a strange situation occurred as hundreds of warriors madly chased after 10,000 or so monsters. It was not strange for hundreds of players to chase after monsters all over the mountains and plains. However, the problem was that high-level monsters were everywhere. There were even quite a number of silver bosses. Even the leader of the group, a gold boss, was so high that his level was almost over the horizon! This was especially true for ordinary monsters that did not know how to run without a leader leading them. No matter how many players came, they would not be able to escape. However, in this place, running had actually become a trend. If it were any other player that encountered a gold boss, they would run away immediately. If they were not careful, they might even be instantly killed. Meanwhile, the situation here was completely different. Even the warriors felt that this was a dream. As they ran, they were beaming with joy. Their faces were filled with smiles as they repeatedly sighed with their teammates. “Following Lu Chen really has its benefits. If it weren’t for him leading us, we wouldn’t have been able to level up so quickly.” “Yeah, look at that kid. Originally, he was only a little over level ten, but he came to the Mass Grave twice. He’s already almost level 20. He’s really going all out.” “I earned a lot of riches from this place. My backpack is almost full now.” “What are you talking about? I sold a lot of snow in my backpack just to get some equipment.” “I heard from Tang Xiaoqing that we can find Liu Yuan if we follow these monsters. Is it true?” “Who knows? She’s so high-level, and it’s Lu Chen we’re talking about. A spiritual pet shouldn’t be able to deceive Lu Chen, right?” “Tsk, who knows? I think that he’s being tricked. Who knows what kind of evil thoughts she has.” “Exactly. We were fighting so fiercely just now, and she didn’t do anything to help.” These soldiers spoke very quietly, but experts like Tang Xiaoqing had sharp ears and eyes. She had long heard these words clearly, but she had no way to refute them. She felt extremely wronged as tears welled up in her eyes. Lu Chen reached out and grasped Tang Xiaoqing’s hand, then gave her a comforting look. In order to get experience points and save Liu Yuan, the people inside had gathered all their strength and charged forward. In the blink of an eye, two hours had passed, and the monsters that were originally more than 20,000 were now less than 5,000. All of them had been slaughtered by the warriors of the Dragon Team. Even the remaining 5,000 were severely injured. They had barely found any other monsters along the way. From the looks of it, the whole mess of monsters was probably here as well. The monsters in the Mass Grave were all here, and there were fewer and fewer of them as time went on. Beyond their disbelief, the warrior’s faces were actually filled with pride. However, Lu Chen and Tang Bao were clearly not so optimistic. How could there be only that many gold bosses in the Mass Grave? Although there was a difference in strength between these gold bosses, they were far from being ruled by a level 55 Seven-colored Peacock. It was just like how there was only one silver boss in each silver territory. The rest were all ordinary monsters. If the monsters in the Mass Grave, especially the six gold bosses, were so obedient, it meant that there must be a higher-level existence here. Tang Bao knew that he was no match for the Seven-colored Peacock. Just fighting the Seven-colored Peacock had been too tiring for him. If there was another higher-level existence, even Lu Chen would be killed instantly. Along the way, Lu Chen was preparing for the next intense battle. He took out a lot of Health Potions from his backpack. At the same time, he also took them from the other warriors. Many of the Health Potions were used to restore Lan Weiwei and Little Golden Dragon’s strength. After that, they ran for another half an hour. When they saw the Seven-colored Peacock’s eyes light up, they suddenly increased their speed and ran forward. Lu Chen immediately understood that they were about to reach the core area of the Mass Grave. Knowing this, Lu Chen suddenly stood still. All the warriors also stood there and did not go forward. There were originally 50,000 monsters, but now there were only a few hundred left. At most, they would be killed in half an hour. However, everyone would still listen to Lu Chen’s words. Since he stood there, he must have his reasons. Everyone stood there and waited for Lu Chen to give the order. Lu Chen looked at the many soldiers in front of him and said with a serious expression, “I’m sorry that I wasn’t able to protect all of you and caused dozens of your people to die. “You can’t go to the following places because, in the core area, I can’t even guarantee my own safety. All of you can go back and rest in the real world.” Hearing Lu Chen’s words… Liu Changping was the first to speak. “Lu Chen, don’t think too much. Since the soldiers came out, they were prepared to die. If you weren’t here, I’m afraid we would have been wiped out in the battle easily.” Hearing Liu Changping’s words, Lu Chen nodded slightly. “That’s right. Our team leader is right. If it weren’t for you, Lu Chen, we wouldn’t have been able to increase our levels by so much.” “It’s a few hundred against fifty thousand of us. It’s a blessing that only a few dozen members died. We were able to kill through the entire Mass Grave thanks to Lu Chen.” “Lu Chen, let us follow you. We also want to save Liu Yuan as well.” “Yeah, let us go too. We’re not afraid of death, even though there might be more powerful monsters ahead. Even if we use our lives to pile up, we can still grind down his HP.” Everyone understood that under normal circumstances, after Liu Yuan was killed, she should have disappeared back to the Novice Village. However, due to the existence of the large purple hand in the sky, everything was a mess. Moreover, this Mass Grave was not an ordinary place. If the large hand was allowed to do whatever it wanted, Liu Yuan might not be able to live at all. In that case, her consciousness would forever remain in the Second World. The soldiers also understood that since the big hand was able to keep Liu Yuan, naturally it could also keep them from leaving. However, as members of the Dragon Team, they could allow themselves to die in battle, or even allow themselves to be wiped out. However, they would not allow themselves to leave her in the lurch. This kind of comradeship where they had fought together made it impossible for them to leave Liu Yuan alone. Finally, Tang Bao, who was still fooling around, said nonchalantly, “What’s the point of you guys coming? You’re just adding to the chaos. “You guys have been fighting so hard against these silver bosses. Some of you can’t even break through their defenses, much less a gold boss. If there were any more powerful existences, you guys wouldn’t even know how you died.” At this moment, the members of the Dragon Slayer Team spoke up, “So what? Even if Lu Chen is fighting, we can still charge forward and take the damage when he encounters it. What right do you have to look down on us?” Tang Bao had never been one of them. Although Tang Bao had previously displayed his astonishing combat strength, under such circumstances, seeing Tang Bao taunt the members of the Dragon Slayer Team, they were a little angry. Tang Bao curled his lips and said with a smile, “You guys are from the Dragon Slayer Team, right? I heard that when you guys were at the Snake Pond back then, you were instantly killed without even seeing Little Golden Dragon. Is that true?” Tang Bao did not have any malicious intentions. Otherwise, he would not have risked his life to save Liu Yuan together. The reason why he said that now was because he wanted to quickly send these members of the Dragon Team out of this world. That way, he could quickly chase after the peacock. Otherwise, once the other party disappeared from his sight, he would probably lose track of them. Hearing that their secret was exposed, the faces of the five-member Dragon Slayer Team instantly turned red. Li Xiaotian’s flushed face stuttered for a long time without saying anything. Seeing Tang Bao’s careless manner, Lu Chen hurriedly stopped him, he said, “All of you go back. It’s really too dangerous. I don’t want the combat strength of the Dragon Country to be damaged. I, Tang Bao, and Tang Xiaoqing are enough here.” Hearing this, Liu Changping wanted to go up and say something, but Lu Chen shook his head and stopped him. “You go back too.” Hearing this, Liu Changping frowned. He lowered his head and thought for a while. Then he waved his hand at the soldiers of the Dragon Team. “Alright, let’s go. We cant help them here. “Tang Bao was right. If you want to help Lu Chen in the future, then all of you should f*cking train hard. Whoever dares to be lazy in the future… will be kicked!” Hearing Liu Changping’s words, the soldiers of the Dragon Team lowered their heads one after another. They were not dissatisfied with Liu Changping at all. In fact, they were unhappy with Tang Bao because of their own incompetence. Tang Bao was right. If it were not for the fact that they were too weak, how could they have no choice but to return to the real world when Lu Chen needed help the most? They blamed themselves. They had never hated their own incompetence like this. Everyone was silent for a moment. They looked at the monsters that were getting further and further away from them, finally, someone gritted his teeth and shouted, “Lu Chen, hurry up and chase after them. Don’t let them get away. I’m going back now!” Then, he clicked the button to return to the main world. Three seconds later, he disappeared from the Mass Grave. With the lead of one person, the others returned to the main world one after another. In the end, Liu Changping, the Dragon Slayer Team, and the Soul Slayer Team all looked at Lu Chen deeply. Everyone’s eyes were filled with deep self-blame. Their gazes were solemn as they said, “You must protect yourselves well. We’ll wait for your return to the real world.” Following this, they left the place, leaving behind Tang Xiaoqing, Tang Bao, Lu Chen, and his spiritual pets. Tang Bao and Lu Chen had a tacit understanding. They did not look at Tang Xiaoqing. Although they did not know what reason Tang Xiaoqing had, they had no intention of getting her to tell them the reason. Instead, they continued to chase after the distant monsters. The monsters here were already high-level silver bosses. To them, killing them was a piece of cake. This method of gaining experience points allowed Lu Chen and Tang Bao’s levels to keep increasing as they sought after their target. They were not killing the monsters here because they were greedy for experience points. They were not in a hurry to save Liu Yuan as well. Instead, every time they increased their strength, the probability of Liu Yuan becoming stronger would increase. Lu Chen even wondered if the leader of the Mass Graves was as strong as the guardian general of White Fog City back then! If that was the case, there was no way they could fight this battle. The Guardian General had stood still and allowed Lu Chen to kill him. Even though Lu Chen had used a powerful skill, he had only managed to cut down 30% of the Guardian General’s HP. However, the leader here would never allow himself to be slaughtered. However, they were already close to level 50. To players of this level, the EXP they needed to level up was astronomical. Even though he had already killed all of the silver bosses before him, this was far from enough to break through to level 50. At this moment, the Seven-colored Peacock was the only monster left. Lu Chen had never even made a move against this gold boss. After all, if he really killed the Seven-colored Peacock… there would be no way to find Liu Yuan. However, just because Lu Chen did not make a move did not mean that others would not make a move. From time to time, Lan Weiwei would launch long-range attacks on the Seven-colored Peacock. Meanwhile, Tang Bao’s killing domain had covered the Seven-colored Peacock from the beginning to the end. He continued to use his normal attacks to weaken the Seven-colored Peacock’s HP until it had less than 10,000 HP left. At this moment, the Seven-colored Peacock was already in a sorry state. Its originally gorgeous feathers had long since fallen off. Its plump wings were covered with exposed bones and broken flesh. At this moment… Only then did its true nature as an undead creature reveal itself. At this moment, the Seven-colored Peacock was absolutely terrified. It no longer looked like a gold boss. It was like a frightened hen, being chased everywhere. Back when it had promised Han Tianyi to attack Lu Chen, it had been full of confidence, especially when Han Tianyi had asked it to bring five gold bosses under it. It had thought that if it attacked alone… all the soldiers of the Dragon Team would be killed. After all, when he had faced those foreigners, he had easily killed them. He had not even made a move. He had only used the illusion to let them escape. When Lu Chen had been in the Mass Grave, he had seen him a few times. At that time, Lu Chen was not even at the aurous core stage. He was far from being as powerful as the strongest foreigner. Lu Chen had only killed a few silver bosses. His combat power was only so-so. The peacock knew that he was only about level 20 away from Lu Chen’s level. However, after a few days, when Lu Chen appeared again, his strength had already soared by more than ten levels. What shocked him the most was that Lu Chen’s combat power could not be measured by his level. This Asura skill had killed the turtle with a defense of 200 million and the Recovery Starfish with a heaven-defying HP recovery ability so quickly. This leveling speed was even faster than a rocket shooting upward, and the lethality was even more terrifying. Lu Chen’s level had already increased by more than ten levels, and he was already over level 50. was this really the leveling speed that a human could reach? Could This person be a pervert? At this moment, he suddenly thought of Han Tianyi and his heart jumped. Would this youth become someone like Han Tianyi in the future? However, the moment this thought appeared, he immediately rejected it. After all, Han Tianyi was a heaven-defying existence. How could Lu Chen compare to him? Thinking back, when Han Tianyi was on the verge of death, he fell into the Mass Grave. In this place that was filled with the aura of death, he actually managed to survive. With the remaining life force and aura of death, he became the overlord of this place, he became an immortal existence in the Mass Grave. No matter how strong this youth was, he was definitely not his match. Finally, when he was running madly until he was exhausted and was about to collapse, the Seven-colored Peacock finally saw the person whose entire body was shining with golden light with newfound vigor. It was Han Tianyi! At this moment, his body was emitting an endless aura as he suppressed Lu Chen and the others. Immediately, other than the Seven-colored Peacock, everyone else stopped in their tracks and was almost suppressed by the pressure. However, Lu Chen’s heart was already filled with anger. He raised his Heaven-cleaving Sword and immediately unleashed his strongest attack speed as he slashed down! At this moment, Lu Chen’s attack power was even stronger than before. When he was facing the tortoise, his highest attack speed was able to unleash a critical strike of 150 million. However, at this moment, his critical strike had already reached close to 200 million. Looking at that magnificent sword strike that could split mountains and split seas, the Seven-colored Peacock felt like its head was about to explode. It’s two broken wings that had almost no feathers flapped wildly. However, there was no way for it to escape from Lu Chen’s attack range. The Seven-colored Peacock’s face was filled with despair. At this moment, Han Tianyi, who was far away, suddenly raised a finger and pointed at Lu Chen’s sword in the air. In an instant, a huge purple-gold hand appeared. The tip of the finger was right on top of the powerful sword intent that Lu Chen had created! Just a single finger was enough to shatter Lu Chen’s powerful attack! Han Tianyi’s attack was too ordinary. It could be said that it was an understatement. It shocked everyone on the spot. Both Lu Chen and Tang Bao knew that this person was definitely not someone they could fight against. However, Tang Bao vaguely felt that this person seemed familiar as if he had seen him somewhere before. Tang Bao brushed off that feeling and prepared an offensive stance. After all, how could there be someone he was familiar with in the Second World? Even Tang Feng was still very far away from the Mass Grave. At this moment, Lu Chen’s face was as calm as water. He watched as the Seven-colored Peacock ran towards Han Tianyi, but Lu Chen did not make a move. He was only thinking about how to resolve the current situation. The man in front of him was too powerful. He had blocked nearly 200 million of his attacks. This kind of combat power was not something he could match. At this moment, he found a woman lying on the ground not far away from Han Tianyi. Her well-being was unknown. That very woman on the ground was Liu Yuan who had disappeared not long ago! Combined with the huge purple-gold finger just now, the identity of the other party was obvious. It was the person who had captured Liu Yuan previously! Just when Lu Chen did not know what to do next, Han Tianyi spoke first. He opened his mouth slightly and uttered a clearly visible word. “Come!” In the next moment, without waiting for Lu Chen and the others to be on guard, he instantly appeared in front of Han Tianyi. Lu Chen and the others were immediately shocked. Tang bao blurted out, “What the f*ck is happening!” Tang Bao had already thought that the person who could make the Seven-colored Peacock take the initiative to seek protection must be at least at the peak of the gold stage, which was a level 59 existence. However, everyone knew that the existence behind the Seven-colored Peacock was probably at the soul stage. The monsters below the soul stage were silver and gold stage. They corresponded to the golden core stage of the spiritual stage and the human stage. However, once they surpassed the gold level, the monsters would be classified into the same level as the humans, which was the soul stage, the acquired stage, and higher levels. On the way here, Tang Bao had already told Lu Chen about this. At the same time, both of them knew that there was a huge gap between the soul stage and the gold stage. No matter how many gold bosses there were, they would not be able to defeat a soul stage master, this was very similar to humans. However, due to the fact that Lu Chen’s attack power had a huge boost and doubled attack power, Tang Bao felt that he might still have the strength to fight. However, at this moment, he was completely stunned. This was because shrinking the ground into an inch was a method used by an ascension stage expert. This also meant that this ordinary-looking person in front of him was an ascension stage expert! The highest level that was known to mankind! Most importantly, Tang Bao knew very well that even his fifth uncle, Tang Feng, wouldn’t be able to easily neutralize Lu Chen’s 200 million attack power. This was very terrifying. Their greatest backer was the ancient martial arts aristocratic family, the Tang family. However, there was no need to fear the Tang family’s influence in this area. Most importantly, the current situation was now under the control of this man in front of them. Even if they wanted to return to the real world, it was impossible. Back then, the Seven-colored Peacock’s white fog technique was able to make everyone unable to leave the Second World, let alone this seemingly omnipotent man in front of them. He had even seen Han Tianyi’s method of capturing Liu Yuan. Liu Yuan was clearly dead, but not only did Liu Yuan not return to the Novice Village, but she was trapped here. This also meant that if she wanted to die, returning to the Novice Village was an extravagant hope. Thinking of this, Tang Bao’s heart was somewhat numb. Just as Tang Bao thought about all of this, Lu Chen suddenly disappeared from beside him! At this moment, Lu Chen was using his dark shura ability to hide in the void. A faint smile appeared on the corner of Han Tianyi’s mouth. Then, he raised his right foot and paused slightly on the ground. With his right foot as the center, the entire space shattered inch by inch as if it had been burned into ashes. Lu Chen’s figure immediately appeared and fell to the ground. This method once again shocked Tang Bao. As far as he knew, not to mention his fifth uncle, Tang Feng, even his uncles and uncles combined did not have this kind of ability! Who was this person in front of him? Why was his cultivation so terrifying? In his panic, he slowly turned his head and looked at Tang Xiaoqing. He saw that Tang Xiaoqing looked at the man with curiosity, but there was no fear in her eyes. Tang Bao guessed in his heart, could it be that Tang Xiaoqing knew this man in front of her? How though? Why did he have this familiar feeling as well? Tang Xiaoqing saw Lu Chen being forced to appear from the void, and her face was a little anxious. She was afraid that Han Tianyi would hurt Lu Chen, so she hurriedly took a step forward and said, “Uncle Han...;” Before she finished speaking, Han Tianyi smiled and nodded at Tang Xiaoqing. Then, she said to Lu Chen, “Among young people, you’re not bad. Even I, at your age, was not as strong as you.” Although Han Tianyi’s words were full of kindness, he did not hide the trace of arrogance. Lu Chen did not say anything. Although the other party did not attack him, it was still difficult to tell whether he was an enemy or a friend. Just as he was thinking about how to solve the problem in front of him, he suddenly heard a voice. Lu Chen and the others turned around and saw that it was Liu Yuan who was lying on the ground. She opened her eyes and slowly got up from the ground, trying to sit up. Seeing this, Lu Chen and Lan Weiwei quickly ran over to help Liu Yuan up. Liu Yuan was obviously injured. She coughed twice and explained, “Lu Chen, this person doesn’t have any bad intentions. He saved me. Don’t argue with him...;” Hearing Liu Yuan’s words, Lu Chen nodded slightly, and the serious expression on his face eased a little. Although Lu Chen didn’t understand what Han Tianyi was trying to do, he still nodded slightly and said, “Thank you.” Although this sentence was sincere, the wariness in his tone was unmistakable. However, Han Tianyi wasn’t there. Instead, he slowly shook his head, turned his body to the side, and said, “Right now, this girl only managed to save her life. I didn’t kill her, but if you bring her back like this, her cultivation will start from level one. “You should know how difficult it is for her to cultivate to her current level. Moreover, I won’t let you bring back the equipment that she dropped here. So, you have to think carefully now. “Should you bring her back or leave her here. “If you want to bring her back, I won’t stop you. However, if you want her to retain her current strength, I can help you.” Hearing Han Tianyi’s words, Liu Yuan’s face was full of excitement, and her face was a little red. She knew that her current strength was not easy to come by, especially her equipment, which was even harder to come by. If she started from scratch, it would mean that she would have to kill the enemy with difficulty and spend a few more months grinding, only then would she be able to train to her current level. Or she would have her teammates take her to farming areas. In other words, it would be a bit of a drag. Moreover, even if her teammates took her to farm monsters, she would not be able to surpass her teammates, let alone stand shoulder to shoulder with Lu Chen. Lu Chen’s eyes were filled with caution as he carefully looked at Han Tianyi for quite a while. “Why are you looking for me.” Han Tianyi’s eyes lit up with interest as he asked, “How did you know that I was looking for you?” Lu Chen replied in a deep voice, “If you were looking for someone else, I’m sure you wouldn’t even need to call the Seven-colored Peacock over. Because with the Seven-colored Peacock’s strength, no one else would be able to defeat it. “Moreover, the moment I arrived at your place, you managed to neutralize my attacks one by one without harming me. I think you want me to do something. “Therefore, you don’t have any ill intentions.” Han Tianyi smiled faintly and didn’t answer directly. Instead, he continued to ask, “Oh? Then how do you know that I’m not looking for Tang Xiaoqing instead? Tang Xiaoqing’s strength is much higher than yours.” Lu Chen glanced at Tang Xiaoqing and said, “If you wanted to look for Tang Xiaoqing, you wouldn’t have stopped Tang Xiaoqing from making a move just now. “The other Seven-colored Peacock is only a level fifty-five gold boss. It can deal with us, but it will be extremely difficult to become Tang Xiaoqing’s opponent. “If ait were between them, the Seven-colored Peacock might not be able to escape.” Lu Chen glanced at the Seven-colored Peacock that was taking care of its broken feathers. The Seven-colored Peacock was so frightened by Lu Chen’s glance that it trembled violently. It then moved closer to Han Tianyi with an aggrieved expression. Han Tianyi looked at the Seven-colored Peacock, which was in a mess, and sighed slightly. “I thought that this little three would be able to trap you in the mist, but I didn’t expect you to kill it instead. I really miscalculated. “The reason why I sent the other Gold bosses was to test whether you’re qualified to see me. “The second reason is to better control the silver bosses so that they won’t kill the rest too ruthlessly. “If all the members of your team die in battle, I’m afraid your first elder will come looking for me.” Hearing Han Tianyi’s words, everyones’ eyelids twitched. As far as they knew, this man had been in the Mass Grave for hundreds of years. How did he know the first elder? Wasn’t the first elder an ordinary spiritual stage expert? One had to know that a spiritual stage expert couldn’t live for so long. Could it be that the first elder was hiding his strength?! That was impossible. A while ago, even though Xiao Bai had encountered such a big problem, the first elder didn’t make a move. This meant that the first elder’s strength definitely couldn’t have surpassed the golden stage. At this moment, Han Tianyi smiled and said, “I forgot to introduce myself. My name is Han Tianyi.” When he heard the other party say his name, Tang Bao’s body trembled violently and his eyes widened. “What?! Are you the Han Tianyi that comprehended our Tang Clan’s fist intent a few hundred years ago?!” Hearing Han Tianyi’s words, Tang Bao’s body trembled violently. No wonder he felt that this person’s face was familiar. His uncle, Tang Zhantian, once had a portrait of Han Tianyi in his room. Back then, Han Tianyi and Tang Zhantian were good brothers, and the two of them were very close. Unfortunately, Tang Zhantian was not that strong back then, so he could not help but feel inferior. Regarding this matter, Tang Zhantian had always been very concerned. He often lamented that he could not save his good brother, so he blamed himself. Thinking of this, Tang Bao’s pupils continuously flickered and suddenly contracted. Shouldn’t this Han Tianyi be dead? Back then, when the five great ancient martial families had attacked together, didn’t they say that they had already killed him? Why would he appear here again? Could it be that the place where he had fallen was the Mass Grave? In an instant, countless pieces of information flooded into Tang Bao’s mind, causing him to be somewhat confused. It was already shocking enough that a silver territory’s strength far surpassed the strength of countless silver bosses. Especially when the boss guarding the pass was a human, it was even more unbelievable. Most importantly, this human was Han Tianyi, who had a good relationship with the Tang family. This repeated turn of events caused Tang Bao to feel as if his brain had overloaded. At the same time, he felt some lingering fear in his heart. If his Tang family didn’t have a good relationship with Han Tianyi now, would he have died long ago? After hearing Tang Bao’s exclamation, Lu Chenxin also jumped. He never thought that this person in front of him actually had such a close relationship with the Tang family. Then, he glanced at Tang Xiaoqing. No wonder Tang Xiaoqing was so calm and didn’t panic at all. It seemed that she had received news of Han Tianyi long ago. When he was in the Tang family, Tang Bao’s carefree personality had naturally told Lu Chen about the person who had comprehended fist intent a few hundred years ago. Lu Chen knew that he was no match for such a rare genius. The reason why he was able to become an expert at his current level was that when he had entered the system… he had encountered a bug in the game system of the Second World. He had been massacred in the game for a thousand years. This was equivalent to him being a person who had cultivated for a thousand years. At that time, Han Tianyi was not very old. From this, it could be seen that Han Tianyi’s talent was very high. Moreover, even if an aristocratic family like the Tang family had five ascension stage experts, they still could not compare to the other five great families. The Tang family was only ranked second among the ancient martial arts aristocratic families. If one were to think about how Han Tianyi was able to take on the five great families by himself back then, how terrifying could his cultivation level be now...; Most importantly, Han Tianyi was actually not dead. No wonder this Mass Grave had become the most terrifying place among the six great silver territories. Now that the misunderstanding had been resolved, Tang Xiaoqing felt much more at ease. She walked in front of Han Tianyi and asked, “Uncle Han, so you’re not dead. Then you can come out with us later.” Han Tianyi did not answer. Instead, he turned his head and glanced at the pitiful and helpless Seven-colored Peacock that was hiding behind him. He sighed and placed his hand on the Seven-colored Peacock’s head. In the next second, the endless black death aura around them seemed to appear out of thin air like a stream in the sky, gathering toward the Seven-colored Peacock’s body. The Seven-colored Peacock’s broken body was also there, and gradually, the death aura began to condense, it reassembled its normal body and gradually recovered. The feathers on its body grew out at a speed visible to the naked eye. Not long after, the peacock’s tail on its back returned to its original gorgeous appearance. The Seven-colored Peacock’s health bar also continued to grow, and in less than five seconds… the Seven-colored Peacock’s condition quickly returned to full. Following that, Han Tianyi slowly extended his hand into the void in front of him. In the distance, the corpses of countless monsters that had been killed by Lu Chen and the others were scattered all over the wilderness within a radius of a thousand miles. When Han Tianyi stretched out his hand, the deathly aura of the entire Mass Grave emerged from the ground once more, gathering into the wreckage that covered the entire mountain. The wreckage seemed to have regained its vitality, it continued to gather together, combining and growing back to its original state of full health. Everyone was stupefied when they saw this scene. How could a lord be capable of such a feat? This was the complete ruler of the Mass Grave. Not to mention Han Tianyi’s earth-shattering skill, which had shattered Lu Chen’s attack of 200,000,000,000 points. Just this move of his had allowed him to recover all of the boss’s strength. He was invincible in this Mass Grave. No matter how many players came, they would not be able to withstand this endless army of monsters. Moreover, these monsters that had recovered were not just normal monsters and silver monsters. Even the five gold bosses that had died earlier had all come back to life. Looking at Han Tianyi’s condition, he did not seem to have fallen at all. He did not even feel weak or tired. He was invincible. After doing all of this, Han Tianyi looked at Tang Xiaoqing with a smile on his face. He said, “You should be Tang Zhantian’s daughter, right? Not bad, you’ve grown into a fine young lady. “I didn’t expect Tang Zhantian to be so strong in his old age. He’s already so old, and he still has such a young daughter like you.” Tang Xiaoqing’s pretty face turned red when she heard this. This was not what she expected him to say at all. Han Tianyi continued, “I have no way to leave this place now. “Because I haven’t really come back to life. My life force from that battle was almost completely destroyed. “There was only a little bit of life force left. With the help of the powerful aura of death here, I was barely able to maintain this half-human half-ghost form. “As you can see, the abilities I used were all undead-type abilities.” Then, Han Tianyi turned to Lu Chen and said, “If you can help me find the Yang Recovery Pill, I can help you restore your little girlfriend’s strength. I’m also willing to compensate you with three gold pieces of equipment.” Then, three treasure chests appeared in Han Tianyi’s hands. However, Liu Yuan, who was far away, was not paying attention to the treasure chests at all. Instead, she was so embarrassed by the words girlfriend that her face turned red. Han Tianyi said with a smile, “If you can do it, I’ll give you these three gold-tier treasures as compensation for not killing the Seven-colored Peacock.” Looking at the three treasure chests, everyone’s eyes widened. After all, not every monster killed could drop equipment. Moreover, even if you killed a high-level monster, it might not necessarily drop good equipment. Although the Seven-colored Peacock’s level was very high, killing it might only be a futile effort. One’s strength might not necessarily increase much. However, these three gold treasure chests were different. Although he did not know what they were inside, they were definitely gold-grade items. However, Lu Chen did not directly agree. He opened his mouth and asked, “May I ask, what exactly is this Yang Recovery Pill?” At this time, Tang Bao, who had not spoken all this time, had a complicated look in his eyes. He revealed a rarely seen serious expression, he said, “The Yang Recovery Pill is a divine pill. With this pill, one can bring back the dead.” Hearing this, Lu Chen nodded slightly and looked again, he said to Han Tianyi, “Although I have never heard of this thing… Since it is a divine pill, I’m sure it’ll be a challenge to retrieve it. “If you want revenge, you’ll need this Yang Recovery Pill. “Do you want revenge? Or do you want to become a human again?” Hearing Lu Chen’s question, Han Tianyi slightly raised his eyebrows and said, “It’s not important to me whether I am a human or a ghost. There is no difference. “But with the Yang Recovery Pill, as long as I can become a human, I can leave this Mass Grave and take revenge on the people of the five families.” Hearing this, everyone understood that Han Tianyi did not die because of the nourishment of the death aura in the Mass Grave. Once he left, there was probably no other way for him to come back. Han Tianyi would never forget the irreconcilable enmity from back then. Hearing Han Tianyi’s words, Lu Chen came up with an idea, “Since you have no worries about your identity, and I am not confident enough to find this divine pill, then I have an idea. It’s to help you take revenge, and also help you leave this place freely. Are you willing to give it a try?” Hearing this, Han Tianyi was also slightly interested. Because he knew very well that a divine pill was something that could only be found by chance. For someone with his high strength, he had only heard of the Yang Recovery Pill and had never seen it before. He never even heard of someone who could refine a divine pill. The current Lu Chen’s level was not high, and his fighting strength was also very low in his eyes. The chance of finding the Yang Recovery Pill was too slim, he knew that too himself. He asked, “What do you have in mind? Tell me.” Hearing that the other party relented, Lu Chen immediately said, “As you can see, apart from being a warrior, I also have taming skills. These are all my spiritual pets.” Han Tianyi was not surprised to hear this. He had observed Lu Chen before and understood that these pets followed him. Every spiritual pet had a hint that belonged to Lu Chen. Han Tianyi continued to ask, “They are spiritual pets, and I’m not a spiritual pet. What ability do you have to take me in as a spiritual pet?” Hearing this, without waiting for Lu Chen to answer, Tang Xiaoqing, who was standing at the side, walked over and said with some embarrassment, “Uncle Han, actually, I’m also Lu Chen’s spiritual beast...;” Hearing this, Han Tianyi, who had been calm the whole time, suddenly froze, and even his hand movements stopped abruptly. He had never heard of anyone who could take a human as a spiritual pet for their own use! He hurriedly looked at the information panel on Tang Xiaoqing’s body, and sure enough, Tang Xiaoqing was really Lu Chen’s spiritual pet! Seeing this, Han Tianyi didn’t know what to say for a moment, and he even stuttered, “This… are you sure you can take me as a spiritual pet?” Lu Chen smiled and said, “I think there should be no problem. I just don’t know if you are willing to give it a try. “If you become my spiritual pet, I will have the ability to take you out of the Mass Grave. “Also, don’t worry. The contract between you and me will just be out of cooperation. It won’t be a pet and owner relationship.” D*mn Lu Chen, he actually wanted to get stuck again! Last time, he had already said that humans could no longer be used as spirit pets, and now he actually wanted to take in a ghost-like existence. Wasn’t such an unlimited bug too much? However, Lu Chen was clear that what he did was completely in accordance with the rules of the Taming God. Han Tianyi was no longer a human, so there was no problem for him to doing so. After hearing Lu Chen’s words, Han Tianyi did not speak for a long time. He had been trapped here for too long. Although his strength was constantly increasing, he was simply unable to leave this place that was filled with the aura of death. Moreover, he knew clearly in his heart that the people who had attacked him back then would not have their strength stagnate. Now, they were probably hiding in the various ancient martial arts aristocratic families, becoming existences like supreme elders. If his strength stagnated after he left the Mass Grave, it was very likely that he would not be able to take revenge. Although he clearly discovered that Lan Weiwei, Little Golden Dragon, and the others had been affected by Lu Chen and their levels had increased, this was because Lu Chen’s level would bring about an increase in his spiritual pet’s level. The reason why Tang Xiaoqing did not get an increase was because she already was a level 59 existence. An increase in Lu Chen’s level would only give her a small increase in her combat strength, the actual level wouldn’t have any increase. After all, the gap between the two was too big. Even if he could become like Little Golden Dragon in the future, as Lu Chen’s strength increased, his strength would increase. However, this didn’t mean much to him, because it was too slow to increase his combat power and level like this. Moreover, the level of a spiritual pet wouldn’t increase faster than its owner. He had cultivated for so many years before he had reached this stage. If he still had to wait for Lu Chen to slowly increase his strength, then it would be very difficult for him to take revenge. Although he was very optimistic about Lu Chen… He knew that Lu Chen’s luck was very good, but he wasn’t sure if he should take that gamble. He said lightly. Your idea is very interesting. However, if this is the case, I’m afraid that it will be very difficult for my strength to surpass yours. Only when you are stronger than me will my combat strength increase by a large margin, however, this method will take too long.” Upon hearing these words, not only did Lu Chen not become discouraged, but his eyes suddenly lit up. This was because Han Tianyi’s words meant that this matter had a chance! What kind of existence was Han Tianyi? A few hundred years ago, he was already able to sweep through the ancient martial arts aristocratic families, forcing the five ancient martial arts aristocratic families to join forces in order to defeat him. Now, after recuperating in the Mass Grave for such a long time, his strength had long reached an immeasurable level. If he was able to obtain a spiritual pet of this level, wouldn’t he be able to do whatever he wanted at the next moment?! This Han Tianyi wasn’t using Liu Yuan to make things difficult for him, he was simply giving him a simple choice! This Mass Grave was really his blessed land. Thinking of this, his mood brightened up. Lu Chen hurriedly said, “If you’re worried about this, then there’s no need. “Because although my strength and status aren’t high, I can think of ways to increase your strength.” Hearing this, although Han Tianyi’s face didn’t change, his heart was shocked. He asked suspiciously, “Then tell me, what method do you have to improve my strength?” Lu Chen directly showed his information panel. The god of taming was listed on it. [Taming God: Your understanding of taming and calling has reached an unfathomable level. When you try to capture and tame a target, you will receive a special effect bonus. This effect will grow with the level of the target!] [Top-tier Capture: You can capture a target regardless of the level. Forcefully changing the target will take up a pet limit. Current slot — 4/10.] [Top-tier Domestication: When you communicate with your pet and feed it, there is a high probability of increasing intimacy and favorability.] [Dominator: Your pet will not be able to resist your orders.] [Bloodline Enhancement: You can sacrifice treasures and equipment you obtain to increase your pet’s bloodline. The higher the level of the bloodline, the stronger the pet’s attributes and skills will be. It can also be used to upgrade the host’s own bloodline and the bloodlines of others. From now on, only non-human spirit pets are allowed to be added!] After reading the last sentence, Han Tianyi silently glanced at Tang Xiaoqing. Lu Chen’s face was also a bit awkward, but he still forced himself to say, “You saw that my Taming God title can improve the bloodline power of my spirit pet. “And bloodline power is also the foundation of everything. The stronger the bloodline power, the more effective the cultivation will be in the future.” Seeing this, Han Tianyi was really moved. It was not that he had not heard of things that could improve the power of the bloodline, but those were all treasures that gathered the essence of heaven and earth. Even with his talent in the past, he had only eaten them once, from then on, his cultivation advanced by leaps and bounds. If his physique could be improved again, then his cultivation speed would be a few times faster than it was now. In a few decades, he would have the absolute strength to eliminate the five ancient martial arts aristocratic families. Thinking of this, he suddenly looked at the monsters that had just been resurrected in the distance. He looked at Lu Chen with a complicated look all over his face. “So the reason those monsters didn’t resurrect last time was because you took away their bloodline power, right?” Hearing Han Tianyi’s words, Lu Chen could not answer directly. He could only cough dryly to cover it up. At that time, Han Tianyi did not pay much attention to it. After all, those monsters were too ordinary to him. Han Tianyi only had a few gold bosses that he truly cared for, then, he said, “Okay, I can sign a contract with you. However, I have one more request.” Hearing Han Tianyi’s words, Lu Chen was overjoyed. It was already amazing enough to take Little Golden Dragon as a spiritual pet back then, but this Han Tianyi in front of him was simply the boss of all the bosses. As for Han Tianyi being unwilling to say the word pet, it was a small matter. Who would care about so many details? Lu Chen quickly agreed, “Okay, please speak.” Han Tianyi said, “I can sign a contract, but I’m afraid that I’ll have to stay here to cultivate most of the time. If you need me, you can summon me. I’ll rush to your side in time. “But don’t disturb me easily. Because my strength can quickly increase here. If I want to take revenge, I’m afraid that my current strength isn’t enough right now.” Lu Chen nodded, “Alright, I can guarantee this. However, as far as I know, the Tang family’s Tang Zhantian and the other five people combined might not be as powerful as you. Why haven’t you been able to go out and take revenge?” Han Tianyi only smiled faintly, “Your strength is still too weak now, you’re too young to understand all these things. When you’re almost as strong as Tang Feng, come and find me.” Then, he thought for a few seconds and said, “Cockroach, you come out too.” Hearing this name, Lu Chen felt his scalp go numb. Looking at the mountains and the wild, with all kinds of monsters, it was hard to imagine that there was actually a cockroach in this Mass Grave! Thinking of this, Lu Chen felt a little disgusted. In the next moment, a horrifying thing happened. The entire ground began to shake and the mountain scenery began to twist at a slow speed, gradually leaving the ground. The ground continued to crack, revealing something silver inside. The silver thing shook its body gently. Instantly, Lu Chen’s people felt the ground and the mountains shake. Tang Bao and Tang Xiaoqing were so scared that their faces turned pale. Tang Xiaoqing’s eyes couldn’t help but be secretly excited. She muttered to herself, “What? Cockroach isn’t dead either?” Hearing this, Lu Chen couldn’t help but ask, “Does he have the habit of raising cockroaches?!” Although Lu Chen was a little annoyed, he could not help but pull through. Hearing Lu Chen’s words, Tang Bao was a little puzzled. He didn’t understand what Lu Chen was talking about. After all, Tang Bao rarely watched TV in the cultivation world. However, Tang Xiaoqing was someone who had lived in the real world for a long time. He poked Lu Chen with his hand and hurriedly explained, “Cockroach is Han Tianyi’s spiritual pet. It’s not a cockroach but a True Dragon.” Hearing this, not only Lu Chen was a little surprised, even Lan Weiwei and Little Golden Dragon were shocked. They had also heard that in the Mass Grave, a True Dragon had descended from the sky a few hundred years ago. However, this matter was too mysterious. After all, the six territories around White Fog City were all silver bosses. How could a dead True Dragon appear out of nowhere? However, when Tang Xiaoqing said this, they believed it. Especially when the color of the ground gradually revealed itself. Upon closer inspection, one could see that the ground was covered with brown hair on its back. Instantly, everyone’s hearts were filled with malice, it turned out that they were actually on the back of the True Dragon. This True Dragon had been buried under their feet the entire time. The line-up continued to twist their bodies as it revealed itself more. Everyone was even more shocked. It turned out that the entire 10,000-meter-long mountain range that stretched across the Mass Grave was actually the corpse of this True Dragon! As the True Dragon’s body emerged from the ground, more and more areas were revealed. As its body was revealed, everyone saw the broken parts of its body, it was obvious that the True Dragon had turned into an undead creature. This scene shocked everyone. For this True Dragon to have such a huge body, it was most likely not an ordinary True Dragon! It was definitely very powerful when it was alive! Especially Little Golden Dragon who saw this scene, his heart was filled with excitement. He was actually able to see a True Dragon. If he could also become a True Dragon, would he also be so powerful? Suddenly, Little Golden Dragon thought that if he could absorb the bloodline power of this True Dragon, would he… However, Little Golden Dragon understood that it was all wishful thinking. Not to mention Han Tianyi, even this True Dragon’s strength was already extremely powerful. Even if it was Lu Chen against this True Dragon, there was absolutely no chance of them winning! Just this aura alone was enough to make everyone feel overwhelming pressure. At this moment, the information panel of the True Dragon was completely revealed. [True Dragon] [Owner: Han Tianyi] [Name: Cockroach] [Intimacy: 723] [Level: 79] [HP: 3,000,4000] [Attack: 2,625,000] [Defense: 1,200,800] [Magic Defense: 1,004,584] [Skill: Tornado, Raging Dragon’s Fury.] [Tornado: An exclusive skill of a True Dragon. It will have different effects with the awakening of the bloodline. Create a wind domain and control all the air within the domain. It can control all the air in the vicinity! Create a huge tornado and damage the enemy. At the same time, the tornado’s range can be adjusted through one’s own consciousness. The largest range is a thousand miles! There was a certain chance to create a huge storm, and the attack power would increase by three times! It could only be used once in a single battle! There was a chance to awaken the bloodline in one’s body and complete the transformation! [Raging Dragon’s Fury: Shoots out intense flames. Any enemy that is burned by the flames would lose 50,000 HP for one minute.] When the information panel of Cockroach appeared in front of everyone, everyone was stunned. What kind of existence was this? It had reached level 79, and the intimacy was even more shocking, it had already reached more than 700 points. Even Tang Xiaoqing’s intimacy level with Lu Chen was only around 500. Seeing this, Tang Bao couldn’t help but complain in a low voice, “How did they get so intimate?” However, no matter how low his voice was, Han Tianyi could still hear it. Han Tianyi stretched out his finger and lightly tapped on the air. The next moment, a huge bump appeared on Tang Bao’s head. At the same time, a huge red dot appeared on the top of his head! -83,561! At this moment, Tang Bao only had one drop of blood left! Seeing this scene of his health bar dropping rapidly, he was only left with a shocked face! Tang Bao was completely stunned. He hurriedly stretched out a hand to cover his mouth, indicating that he would not speak again. Han Tianyi said snappily, “You can’t be Tang Zhanfeng’s son, right? Your sloppy manner is even more excessive than your father’s back then. “If you dare to talk nonsense again, I’ll go directly to your father.” “...;” Hearing this, Tang Bao shook his head crazily! It was a small matter for him to lose tens of thousands of HP here. After all, the other party would not kill him. However, if his father, Tang Zhanfeng, was implicated by him, then he would probably be beaten up every day. Most importantly, if Tang Zhanfeng were to fight him in the name of testing his strength, Tang Bao would not be able to refuse. He wanted to cry but had no tears! After that, he hurriedly took a few steps back and hid in a corner to frantically replenish his HP. At this time, not to mention the other party making a move, even if he accidentally bumped into a silver boss, he would still die here. Although he was on the body of the True Dragon, the body was constantly shaking. Especially after he said that sentence, his body trembled even more violently. Fortunately, Tang Bao was quick-witted. Although he had angered the True Dragon beneath him, with his nimble movements, he managed to dodge the huge pieces of rubble on the True Dragon’s body. After desperately replenishing his HP, his HP gradually recovered. However, just the cost of the blood replenishing medicine alone was enough to make his heart ache a little. It was time for him to change this bad-mouth habit of his. The huge True Dragon had two towering horns on its forehead and brown hair all over its face. Its huge breath could shoot out hundreds of meters at a time. Just looking at it made people feel a little scared. Its two eyes looked at everyone as if the sun and moon were reflecting each other. It was awe-inspiring. This True Dragon...; No, it should be called Cockroach… Although Cockroach looked terrifying, he was extremely obedient in front of Han Tianyi. He moved his huge head which was full of injuries and moved closer to Han Tianyi. Han Tianyi was full of smiles as he stroked Cockroach’s head. His eyes couldn’t hide the sadness in them. He never thought that he would attract the jealousy and attacks of the five great families because of his strength. He also never thought that even this True Dragon that he used to travel with would be in trouble because of this. For the past few hundred years, Han Tianyi had not slept through countless nights. He had always thought that if it wasn’t for him, his old friend would not have suffered such a blow and died here. Han Tianyi stroked the head of Cockroach while carefully sizing it up. His face was full of reluctance. Without turning his head, he said, “Lu Chen, take Cockroach too.” Upon hearing Han Tianyi’s words, not only Lu Chen, Tang Bao, and the others, even the body of Cockroach in front of them trembled violently. In an instant, everyone on the dragon’s back trembled violently, and even the entire ground shook violently. The countless monsters on the ground were so scared that they hurriedly knelt on the ground, their bodies trembling. The anger of a True Dragon was so terrifying. Cockroach hummed as he spoke, his tone clearly flustered, “Master, I just want to be your...;” Before he could finish speaking, Han Tianyi still had a reluctant smile on his face. He slowly shook his head and stopped him from speaking, “Don’t stay here anymore. One day, I’ll leave too. “I don’t want you to stay here forever because you’re an undead creature on the day I leave. I’m giving you to Lu Chen for my own selfish reasons. I hope that you can always bring me along like an old friend. “After all, how can I bear to leave you alone in the Mass Grave alone?” Upon hearing Han Tianyi’s words, Cockroach’s originally dignified eyes instantly became gentle. A few tears even formed in his eyes. When the tears fell onto the ground, a crater-like hole instantly appeared. That’s right. If one day, as Lu Chen’s spiritual pet, Han Tianyi left the Mass Grave… Cockroach wouldn’t be able to leave because he was an undead creature. Then, the two of them would basically say goodbye forever. Han Tianyi could not stay in this Mass Grave forever. With Han Tianyi’s outstanding talent, his future would definitely shine in this world. After thinking this through, Cockroach nodded slightly and said, “Master, I’ll listen to your arrangements.” Seeing that the master and servant were reluctant to part, Lu Chen was very taciturn and did not say anything. He knew that even if he subdued Cockroach, he would always treat Han Tianyi as his master. Cockroach was more like a bodyguard to Lu Chen… a super fighter. How could he forget a friendship that had lasted for hundreds of years? After seeing the master and servant say their goodbyes, Lu Chen said, “Let me sign a contract with the True Dragon now.” Han Tianyi then turned to look at Lu Chen and said, “There’s no need. Aren’t you able to raise the power of the bloodline? I’ll give Cockroach’s body to Little Golden Dragon.” Hearing this, Little Golden Dragon’s eyes suddenly widened with excitement. However, as soon as he stuck out his tongue, he quickly retracted it. After all, in this situation where the master and servant gets separated, he seemed to be too happy and inappropriate. However, the joy in his eyes could not be hidden. Lu Chen looked troubled and said, “If you give the power of Cockroach’s bloodline to Little Golden Dragon, I’m afraid that Cockroach’s consciousness will be completely destroyed, right?” Han Tianyi smiled and looked at Little Golden Dragon, “Then it depends on Little Golden Dragon’s intention.” Little Golden Dragon was stunned when it felt Han Tianyi’s gaze. It tilted its neck and its face was full of question marks, looking a little cute. However, he had a vague feeling that this was probably not a good thing! Lu Chen also didn’t quite understand and asked, “You mean...;” Han Tianyi put his hands behind his back and said, “If Little Golden Dragon is willing, then let Cockroach and Little Golden Dragon live in the same body, which is Little Golden Dragon’s body.” Hearing this, Lu Chen became a little vigilant. Little Golden Dragon was so scared that it circled around and took two steps back. This sounded like a possession. When he thought that he was about to be possessed, didn’t that mean that the one who died wasn’t Cockroach, but himself? This wasn’t worth it! Han Tianyi looked at the expressions of the two and explained patiently, “Letting Cockroach live in the body of Little Golden Dragon is only one body and two souls. It doesn’t mean that it’s a possession. “Moreover, Little Golden Dragon isn’t at a loss. After all, after obtaining the power of the True Dragon’s bloodline, his body will definitely increase greatly and his strength will also increase explosively. It won’t be long before he can advance to the rank of a True Dragon. “And transforming from a Flood Dragon into a True Dragon isn’t just a simple increase in rank. There are many cultivation insights and battle experiences that Cockroach will continuously impart to Little Golden Dragon. “In other words, Cockroach will be Little Golden Dragon’s teacher. “As long as Little Golden Dragon is unwilling, Cockroach, as an external soul, will not be able to seize control of the body.” Hearing this, Lu Chen finally relaxed and Little Golden Dragon fell into deep thought. Although it sounded a little inconvenient, he looked at the huge body of the True Dragon in the distance and his heart was filled with greed. Under the control of the huge bloodline power, Little Golden Dragon slowly nodded. Han Tianyi continued to smile and said, “Compared to two souls living in the same body, I hope that one day, you can find a suitable True Dragon corpse for Cockroach, or even a stronger existence to let him live in it and become an independent entity. “When that time comes, it will be even better if Cockroach continues to follow me.” When Cockroach heard these words, his gaze became even gentler. After hearing these words, Lu Chen felt even more assured. As long as the True Dragon’s consciousness existed, he could also have a free teacher. Why not take this deal? Little Golden Dragon would get to absorb the bloodline power and gain experience as well as strength and experience. This was not a loss! Thinking of this, Lu Chen no longer hesitated and said, “Alright, I’ll agree to it.” Han Tianyi nodded and placed his hand on Cockroach’s head again. At this moment, Cockroach slowly closed his eyes and a crystal clear silver light appeared on his forehead. Although it was only the size of a pearl, the light within it was extremely bright. When the silver ball of light left Cockroach’s body, the body that spanned tens of thousands of miles instantly lost control and fell to the ground. A deep pit was created on the ground, and the ground within a hundred meters was filled with cracks. With Han Tianyi’s help, everyone steadied themselves and no one got injured. “Little Golden Dragon, come here.” Han Tianyi slowly opened his mouth, and then displayed his ability to shrink the ground into an inch again. Little Golden Dragon immediately appeared in Han Tianyi’s hand right after. Han Tianyi directly sent the silver light into Little Golden Dragon’s head. All of this happened too quickly. At this time, Little Golden Dragon was not ready to subconsciously dodge, moreover, Han Tianyi’s speed was not something that he could dodge either. When the silver light entered Little Golden Dragon’s head, Little Golden Dragon was still a little scared. Its 30-centimeter-long body kept shaking, and its panicked look looked a little cute. Little Golden Dragon jumped off Han Tianyi’s body and jumped into Lu Chen’s arms again, looking frightened. Lu Chen also watched Little Golden Dragon nervously for a long time. After making sure that Little Golden Dragon was okay, he said to Han Tianyi as he pointed at the dragon corpse, “May I?” After saying this, he placed his hand on the True Dragon’s body. In the next moment, countless silver lines flowed from the True Dragon’s body and gradually gathered in Lu Chen’s hand. Countless silver streams that carried a huge amount of bloodline power flowed toward Lu Chen’s hand. The rich bloodline power was something that only the others could feel. Little Golden Dragon forgot about his previous panic and looked at Cockroach’s body happily. At this moment, a buzzing voice suddenly appeared in his head, “Hey! Little guy, can you stop looking at my body so lecherously?!” Little Golden Dragon was shocked and bounced away from Lu Chen’s body. Then, he looked around but found nothing. The voice in his head appeared again, “Little guy, what are you looking at? I’m in your head.” Initially, when Little Golden Dragon agreed to Han Tianyi’s words, he did not think much of it except for getting more powerful. However, at this moment, Little Golden Dragon was a little flustered. At this moment, he was thinking that if the other party could see his consciousness and thoughts, did that mean that the other party could know whatever he was thinking? If that was the case, wouldn’t he be letting this old thing take advantage of him if he wanted to have a deep conversation with a love interest one day? When he thought about this, the True Dragon felt uncomfortable… Suddenly, Little Golden Dragon felt his scalp go numb. He suddenly thought of how this old fellow now shares the same body with him. What if Little Golden Dragon wanted to do other things privately? Will this old fellow be there too?! Thinking of this, Little Golden Dragon became even more panicked. He absolutely would not allow such a thing to happen! He would rather give up the power of his True Dragon bloodline than let such a situation happen! Thinking of this, Little Golden Dragon hurriedly crawled towards Lu Chen, wanting to interrupt Lu Chen’s extraction. At this time, the buzzing voice in his head spoke again, “Little guy, you’re thinking too much. I’m not as abnormal as you think. If there’s any special situation, you can use your consciousness to isolate me. That way, I won’t be able to sense anything from the outside world.” Hearing Cockroach’s words, Little Golden Dragon calmed down slightly. However, he still made up his mind to ask Lu Chen to help this old fellow find a good body as soon as possible. After all, it was too inconvenient for him to have another soul in his body. This time, Lu Chen used a full ten minutes to extract the bloodline, which was far more time-consuming than before. That was because Cockroach’s corpse contained rich bloodline power. Finally, he took out about twenty pills. Moreover, Lu Chen did not convert the bloodline power this time and distributed it to other people. After all, every time the bloodline power’s attributes were converted, there would be a loss. At this time, it would be too much of a loss to divide the bloodline power evenly, especially since the bloodline power came from Cockroach. Cockroach and Little Golden Dragon shared the same body and so he gave all the bloodline power to Little Golden Dragon to eat, it could also be considered as a tribute to Cockroach. Han Tianyi would also be very satisfied with this outcome. As expected, when he saw Lu Chen give all 20 bloodline power pills to Little Golden Dragon, Han Tianyi’s eyes revealed some satisfaction. Little Golden Dragon was only 30 centimeters long. When he saw the 20 bloodline power pills, he almost drooled! He swallowed all the pills in one gulp! It could be seen with the naked eye that the pills went from Little Golden Dragon’s neck all the way to Little Golden Dragon’s tail. Little Golden Dragon felt a little stuffed, but the feeling did not last for a minute before it became hot. It was as if a raging fire was burning in his body, and he even turned fiery red. Little Golden Dragon stuck out its tongue and kept hissing. The expression on its face was a little painful. This bloodline power was too much to consume in one go, far beyond his imagination. Back when Lu Chen had consumed the bloodline power, even one pill had caused him unbearable pain. Although Little Golden Dragon was a beast and had a much stronger endurance than a human, it was still 20 pills… Little Golden Dragon was burned by the energy. It rolled on the ground, at this moment, the old fellow’s voice spoke again, “Don’t panic. You can make your body bigger, right? Use all your strength to make your body as long as mine.” Hearing this, Little Golden Dragon quickly divided his consciousness to make his body bigger until it was at least 10,000 meters long. In this way, the bloodline power pills in his body were separated from each other and the pain was reduced by a little. However, this was just the beginning of absorbing the bloodline power, as time passed, the bloodline power continued to flow through Little Golden Dragon’s body. The enormous bloodline power rampaged through Little Golden Dragon’s body, making him feel every inch of the fibers in his muscle tear. Even with his enormous body, he couldn’t roll around at will. After all, there were countless monsters here. Once he moves around, those monsters would suffer the consequences. Cockroach continuously helped Little Golden Dragon in his mind. “Let your aura and blood circulate. Don’t stop. Drive the digestion of the bloodline power, and let it continuously become a part of you. Once it stops, the power of the bloodline will accumulate in your body. This is not good for your body at all. There is a high possibility that your body will explode from the power of the bloodline!” Hearing Cockroach’s words, Little Golden Dragon was shocked. He quickly began to circulate the spiritual aura in his body. However, the speed of his circulation was far slower than the speed of consuming the power of the bloodline. Seeing that Little Golden Dragon was getting more and more unbearable and its body was about to explode, Lu Chen was a little nervous. He looked at Han Tianyi and said, “Is there anything we can do?” At this moment, Han Tianyi also frowned. “The difference in strength between Cockroach and Little Golden Dragon is too big. Moreover, there is a fundamental difference in the attributes of the two. “Although dragons and Flood Dragons are the same kinds of creatures when they evolve into True Dragons, they will be reborn. Their bodies and bloodlines are like clouds and mud. “Meanwhile, we are humans, while Cockroach and Little Golden Dragon are beasts. Our experience is not of much help to them. They can only rely on themselves to solve this problem.” At this moment, the medicinal efficacy was being absorbed even faster. Little Golden Dragon was rampaging around due to the efficiency of it all, and its body was constantly expanding. It had even become somewhat transparent from overstretching. At this moment, it was as if it had become an expanding balloon, and could explode at any time. Cockroach couldn’t hold it in any longer and kept using his own experience to guide Little Golden Dragon. However, Little Golden Dragon was only a giant python after all, so it couldn’t do anything that Cockroach asked. If he still couldn’t digest the bloodline power, Cockroach and Little Golden Dragon would probably die here… Forever. The best outcome would be to become the king of the Mass Grave. Cockroach would take hundreds or thousands of years to recover his current strength. Cockroach might never be able to reach his peak, however. Thinking of this, Cockroach became anxious. “Little guy, give me control of your body immediately. I’ll help you digest the bloodline power!” Hearing this, Little Golden Dragon was somewhat hesitant. After all, if Cockroach directly seized control of his body and didn’t return it to him, wouldn’t he suffer a great loss? However, under the impact of the bloodline power, Little Golden Dragon’s own consciousness was becoming weaker and weaker. If he still didn’t hand over control of his body, he was afraid that he would really die here. Since he was going to die anyway, he might as well take a gamble. Little Golden Dragon directly gave up the control of his body. After Cockroach obtained control of the body, he couldn’t help but say with disdain, “This body is too weak, right? How can you still be considered an ancient mutant with your current condition? How embarrassing!” To Little Golden Dragon, every word hit like a truck… After losing control of his body, Little Golden Dragon didn’t have to endure so much pain anymore. He immediately relaxed his mind. However, when he heard Cockroach’s disdain, he could not help but protest. Cockroach did not care about what he thought. He immediately took over his body and controlled the circulation of his bloodline. It had to be said that Cockroach was indeed very powerful. He was also very experienced. He opened his mouth and said, “Watch carefully how a True Dragon circulates the spiritual energy in his body!” In the next moment, the spiritual energy in Little Golden Dragon’s body began to circulate crazily like a storm. However, the circulation this time was completely different from the bloodline power that was rampaging around earlier. Instead, it had a certain pattern, it allowed all the bloodline power to quickly fuse into the shared body. Little Golden Dragon was surprised to find that the spiritual energy was no longer as wild and violent as before. It was faintly obedient under Cockroach’s command. Not only did the pain reduce, but Little Golden Dragon was amazed at how well it was being tampered down. Under the control of Cockroach, the power of his bloodline was not lost at all, it was now fully integrated into his body. Cockroach let out a long sigh and continued to say with disdain, “If I knew you were this weak, I would have directly taken control of my body. Just now, I lost so much of my bloodline power into the air, and I felt a little heartbroken.” Hearing Cockroach’s disdain, Little Golden Dragon could only mutter in his heart. After all, there was too much difference between the two. In the outside world, Lu Chen saw Cockroach take over Little Golden Dragon’s body and was a little worried. However, compared to the problems in Little Golden Dragon’s body, there was nothing he could do. Ever since Cockroach took over the control of the body, Little Golden Dragon’s body had mutated. The speed that could be seen with the naked eye had improved. It was no longer like the inflated balloon from before. Its body was also becoming more and more solid. This made everyone feel at ease. The bloodline power of a True Dragon was too much for Little Golden Dragon. Even a True Dragon would take a long time to absorb it, let alone Little Golden Dragon which was only a giant Flood Dragon. To control the spread of the bloodline power and to allow oneself to absorb it quickly, the time and energy required to do so would be even longer. The entire process lasted for a day and a night. Little Golden Dragon’s body also became smaller and smaller, from ten thousand meters to a thousand meters. Finally, it became one meter long. During this time, the light on Little Golden Dragon’s body became brighter and brighter, and the level on its head continued to increase. There were even two small bumps on his forehead, and he looked like he was about to grow horns. Lan Weiwei and Rollie were extremely envious. However, this bit of envy was useless, because this was Little Golden Dragon’s own opportunity. If they could also encounter their own bloodline creatures, it would definitely be a profit for them. At the same time, they subconsciously looked at the tens of thousands of monsters in the distance, their eyes revealing their desire. Among the monsters, many bear and wolf-type creatures carefully lowered their bodies again, afraid that they would be chosen. Although some monsters belonged to the same race, they might not be willing to give up their bodies. After all, they were living well in the Mass Grave, why would they go out and cause trouble? However, Lan Weiwei and Rollie were only staring at them longingly. They did not say anything to Lu Chen and Han Tianyi. After all, it was not appropriate for them to use other people’s nutrients to support themselves. Unless Han Tianyi opened his mouth, or the undead creatures below took the initiative to request for it to happen, they dared not say anything. Han Tianyi, who had lived for hundreds of years, had seen too many things to not understand what they desired. Deep down, he knew what they were thinking of as well. Han Tianyi smiled knowingly as he randomly picked out a few of the tens of thousands of monsters below and brought them out. He said, “The few of you should give up your bloodline power and live in their bodies.” Seeing this scene, Lu Chen quickly declined, “We appreciate your kindness, but we will never do such a thing.” Han Tianyi, however, smiled. “What’s there to force? I was the one who asked Little Golden Dragon to absorb Cockroach’s bodies. It’s a win-win situation. I have my own selfish motives. “Actually, Lan Weiwei and Rollie won’t suffer any losses when they absorbed the bodies of these monsters. Moreover, I’ve observed them just now. It’s obvious that the few monsters I’ve chosen are willing to coexist with your pets.” Hearing this, Lu Chen looked at the monsters Han Tianyi had chosen. As expected, all of them were silver bosses. Meanwhile, these silver-tier lords looked at Lan Weiwei and Rollie with kindness and love in their eyes. On the other hand, Lan Weiwei and Rollie’s eyes reddened. They couldn’t help but walk toward the silver bosses. Lu Chen suddenly recalled that Lan Weiwei had once said that all of her elders had come to the Mass Grave before they died. This meant that the ones who had been chosen were likely to be Lan Weiwei’s elders. These elders would definitely be filled with reluctance and pride to see Lan Weiwei again, especially after she had become so powerful. To them, being able to sacrifice their own bodies to make Lan Weiwei stronger, and to be together with Lan Weiwei, and to be together with her, was considered a respectable feat. The same was obviously true for the Ancient Panda. Although many of the elders weren’t pandas but ordinary bears, their deep feelings for the Ancient Panda were obvious. However, Lu Chen didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. Many silver bosses reached their hands into Rollie’s arms, pulling out bamboo shoots and giving their share to Rollie… It was obvious that the Ancient Panda’s relatives were foodies. Lu Chen didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. He hurriedly took out more bamboo shoots from his backpack and handed them to the Ancient Panda’s seniors. This group of foodies was obviously eating happily. They didn’t care if they knew Lu Chen or if they were killed by him. They took the bamboos and started eating. The fire in their eyes was getting brighter and brighter. They were obviously eating happily. Rollie was eating while Lan Weiwei howled from time to time. It seemed like they were saying how much they missed each other. After a while, Lan Weiwei and Rollie walked up to Lu Chen and told him that their elders were also willing to extract their own bloodline power and coexist with them. Hearing these words, Lu Chen was overjoyed, because right now, what he was most worried about was how to increase the combat power and level of these spiritual pets. Right now, Little Golden Dragon was covered, but Lan Weiwei and Rollie did not receive much improvement. Since they had the remains of these elders, it was not a problem to increase their combat power. In this short while, more and more elders who had watched Lan Weiwei and Rollie stood out and walked toward Lu Chen. They were all elders who wanted to improve Lan Weiwei’s bloodline power. They paid a lot of attention to the inheritance. If they could be as outstanding as Lan Weiwei, she would definitely be able to lead the Ash Wolf Clan to glory in the future. Therefore, it was worth it even if they had to give up their own bodies. Seeing that more and more undead were coming out, Lu Chen’s mood brightened. The more monsters that could offer their bloodline power, the greater the improvement for Lan Weiwei and Rollie. However, at this moment, Han Tianyi furrowed his brows. Although Cockroach was powerful and had a sufficiently powerful True Dragon bloodline, the improvement of Little Golden Dragon was more like a subtle increase in his potential, laying a foundation for his future path. Moreover, two souls working together in one body would not cause too much of a burden to the body. On the other hand, Lan Weiwei and Rollie’s side had gathered over a hundred wolves and bear creatures. The purity of these creatures’ bloodlines was far less than that of Cockroach. However, because there were so many of them, they could increase Lan Weiwei’s level to almost the same amount as Little Golden Dragon. In other words, Little Golden Dragon’s bloodline power increased in quality, while Lan Weiwei and Rollie’s increased in quantity. Therefore, just by looking at the level, the two could almost be at the same level as Little Golden Dragon. Hearing Han Tianyi’s words, not only Lu Chen, but also Lan Weiwei and Rollie were very happy. Because as Lu Chen’s strength continued to increase and improve faster and faster, the two of them had already become very weak, so their help to Lu Chen was extremely limited. Even Little Golden Dragon felt that he could not keep up with Lu Chen’s leveling pace. Seeing that his role was getting weaker and weaker, Lan Weiwei was very anxious as well. Rollie was also the same, so recently, she had been constantly eating bamboo, he wanted to mature as soon as possible and grow bigger. However, the effect was obviously not good. Now that they heard that Lan Weiwei’s level could reach the same level as Little Golden Dragon, and Rollie could also increase his strength by a large margin, they were very happy. However, Han Tianyi changed the topic, he continued, “However, there is a drawback. A person’s body can only hold three souls at most. If they absorb the bloodline power of these people at the same time, some of the consciousness of the Ash Wolf and the Ancient Panda will disappear.” Hearing this, Lan Weiwei and Rollie’s expressions froze. They turned around and looked at the family members that they had just met. For a moment, they did not know what to say. They longed for their strength to increase, but they were definitely not willing to exchange the lives of their family members for their strength. Even though their lovers had died, their consciousness still existed here. If their bloodline power was extracted, then these hundreds of undead creatures would be completely annihilated. However, what happened next was unbelievable. The Ancient Ash Wolves knelt on the ground one after another like humans. They lowered their heads and placed them on the ground as if they were paying their respect to Lu Chen. The Ancient Pandas placed the bamboo in their hands in Rollie’s arms. They fiddled with Rollie’s arms and asked him to hold his bamboo shoots. Then, just like Lan Weiwei’s family members, they sat on the ground and looked at Lu Chen. Lan Weiwei, who had transformed into a wolf, kept rejecting her elders’ wishes with her head, trying to get them to get up. Tears kept falling from the corners of her eyes. Although Lan Weiwei wanted her undead elders to stand up, those elders that offered themselves up merely raised their heads and looked kindly at her. The firmness in their expression did not diminish one bit. They were determined to give everything they could for the sole chance of letting Lan Weiwei become stronger and have their lineage survive longer. When Rollie was younger, he found it difficult to understand what being parted forever felt like. He did not understand why his elders put down the bamboo shoots all of a sudden. The only thing he wondered was if the bamboo shoots tasted bad. With this thought, he gave it a test. He tasted the bamboo shoots in his hand and discovered that they still tasted amazing. He tried to hold the bamboo in his hand and put it in his elder’s mouth, but only a brown bear stretched out his hand. Instead of taking the bamboo shoots, however, the bear used the back of its paw to push the bamboo shoots gently back into Rollie’s grip again. Rollie did not understand what was going on. The bamboo shoots were delicious, but he did not know why they did not eat them and that made him feel at a loss. At the same time, he suddenly felt that the bamboo shoots in his mouth did not taste sweet anymore and his heart was filled with a tinge of sadness. Rollie was still much too young, hence his inability to understand what he was about to face. He merely stood there in confoundment and blinked his big innocent eyes. He looked at his elder blankly for some time, then turned to Lu Chen with the same innocent look. The entire Mass Grave was pin-drop silent. The only sound available was the whistling wind, which resembled a sad melody chanting praises for those departed spirits who were adamant about meeting their demise. After some time passed, Han Tianyi took a deep breath and gently spoke, “It’s their choice, so let’s just fulfill their wishes. But I’m afraid I can’t guarantee the three complete consciousnesses if I extract the power of blood from so many of you at one time. You might all be turned into memory fragments. Are you sure you won’t regret it?” At that moment, all the undead creatures that had emerged looked at him with a determined look in their eyes. They looked at Lan Weiwei and Rollie with fondness. They were monsters who had gone through countless trials and it was no mean feat for them to have lived that long. This dedication would pay off — by using their half-living, half-dead state — to help Lan Weiwei and Rollie improve their strength, with the view that the true Ancient Ash Wolf and Ancient Iron-Eating Beast clan could survive. The elders who willingly came forth breathed a sigh of relief when they looked at Lan Weiwei and Rollie’s expressions. At the same time, more and more of their masters were willing to stand up and let them absorb the power of their blood. However, Lan Weiwei shook her head frantically as tears began to drip down. She was even more bewildered as she clenched her fists tightly and wondered what she should do. More and more individuals stood up and the numbers reached the hundreds. Han Tianyi could not even begin to describe the feeling he had in his heart when he looked at the undead creatures’ sheer determination. He raised his hand and aimed it at the vast number of undead in the distance. It barely took a couple of seconds for countless balls of light to appear and fly out from their heads. Whenever a small light ball flew out of an undead creature, it collapsed to the ground seconds later. Lan Weiwei’s first instinct was to try and support them, but those light balls surrounded her tightly and prevented her from moving forward. The light balls looked so warm and gentle. Lan Weiwei was afraid that she would break them if she bumped into them. This one tiny light ended all possibility that they would be able to revive once more. As a result, she did not dare to move forward for some time. Light balls of various colors flew out from the undead creature’s heads, followed by the collapse of undead creatures in the hundreds. Tears streamed down Lan Weiwei’s cheeks and she had difficulty controlling herself from crying. At that moment, Lan Weiwei transformed back into her human form. Her position gradually changed from sobbing in a low voice to squatting on the ground with her face covered in tears, whimpering silently. She could not accept that everyone she held dear would be gone for good. Even though she had fought on the battlefield before, she always strayed her attacks on canine creatures. Even if the other fighters killed her elders, she would always turn away and try her best to avoid any issues. Whenever she saw them killing her Ash Wolf elder, she would remind herself silently that they were long dead. With no memories of their lives and none of the feelings they once had when alive, they could no longer be considered living anymore. However, her near-crumbling emotions became utterly destroyed the moment she perceived her undead compatriots’ memories and emotions. Some distance away, Rollie lacked the mature emotional outlook that Lan Weiwei had. He felt somewhat saddened when he saw all those bears collapsing to the ground one after another, and his efforts to help those bears up were all futile. He then tried to stuff some bamboo shoots into their mouths, but they were not even able to open their mouths anymore. As more and more light balls flew out from the heads of Rollie’s bear elders, they turned into little fluorescent glows that wrapped tightly around him. Rollie looked at them curiously and stretched out his finger carefully to touch one of them. As soon as he came into contact with it, the light ball instantly turned into a stream of light that flowed into his body. It was then that a picture suddenly appeared in his head. He saw himself lying in his mother’s arms when he was still a weak little infant. She held onto him carefully and had a loving smile on her face. Her affection for him was obvious, and she looked down dotingly at Rollie while rocking him in her arms. Rollie was a little stunned to see that. He did not understand why such a scene would appear in his head, but before he could put more thought into it, another light ball bumped into his finger and flowered into his body. Another image appeared simultaneously in his mind. It depicted Rollie’s mother holding him with Rollie’s father present not too far away too. He was a strong Ancient Panda, and he opened his mouth wide to roar at the enemy. A pack of maned dogs had surrounded the family of three in an attempt to launch a sneak attack. Rollie’s father was covered in scars and blood but he still guarded his wife and child valiantly. Despite their serious injuries, Rollie’s parents never backed off — not even by a half-step — when faced with that group of maned dogs. It was not until the entire group of maned dogs was finally slaughtered that they lost all their strength and collapsed. The mother tightly held Rollie in her arms even though she profusely bled. On the other hand, Rollie, who was hiding in her arms, had a smile on his face and was still munching on a tiny bamboo shoot. That was the moment Rollie finally had the chance to see his parents. He never had the chance to meet them. Knowing this, a sad look gradually appeared in his eyes. An endless stream of light balls continued to flow into Rollie’s mind while he wandered. As the light balls came into contact with Rollie’s fingers, a slew of memories continued to unfurl in his mind. A group of brown bears who never ate bamboo shoots took Rollie in and raised him like they were his own. They even took the effort to look for bamboo and bamboo shoots for him every day. On those several occasions where monsters of other races tried to prey on Rollie, the brown bears chased them off right away. The adult brown bears also frequently disciplined their children and gave them a good spanking whenever Rollie played with them as a kid and got bullied by them. Rollie’s childhood was a happy one because he knew nothing about hardship and about what happened to his parents. On the other hand, Lan Weiwei received countless memory fragments too. During her grandfather’s reign as the Ancient Wolf King, he frequently caught all sorts of prey for her. Her parents protested, saying that such food was unhealthy for the body and therefore unsuitable for children, but her grandfather continued to indulge her tantrums and let her have whatever she desired. Lan Weiwei’s uncle, meanwhile, loved teasing her on a whim. Even though she yanked his beard until his chin was devoid of any facial hair, her uncle could not bring himself to scold her and merely bared his teeth at her playfully. In her mind, she then saw her own father reaching the end of his years. Before his death, he entrusted her the duty of leading the Ash Wolf clan to glory before walking toward the Mass Grave without ever looking back. When her father was about to leave the ash wolves’ territory, he could not help but turn around to glance dotingly at her one last time. Countless memories flashed in her mind like a series of movie clips. Her elders sacrificed their bodies and risked losing their independent consciousness, but they turned into memory fragments that would remain forever in her heart. When the last memory fragment entered Lan Weiwei’s mind, her eyes were swollen from the tears that kept running out. On the other hand, Rollie’s eyes had lost the innocence he once had. A particularly human-like emotion flowed in his eyes. The two needed a long time before being able to recover from the agonizing pain of parting ways with their kin. Lan Weiwei looked at her elder’s corpse and bowed deeply. She then looked at Lu Chen firmly, “Lu Chen, please lend your assistance to me so I improve my bloodline power. I want to carry on my elder’s will and become stronger.” Lu Chen nodded with a very serious expression when he heard Lan Weiwei’s request. He then put his hands on the hundreds of corpses and used the Taming God’s skills. Two different bloodline power pills appeared in his hands not long later. He handed one each to Rollie and Lan Weiwei — who took the pills and swallowed them without saying a word. They did not make any sort of small talk because words were unnecessary at such a point in time. They did their level best to hold back their emotions and stop themselves from shedding any more tears. The two of them suffered unbearable pain when the bloodline power pills were fully digested and absorbed. However, they clenched their teeth tightly and did not complain about it at all. With that, their level increased exponentially. As Han Tianyi said, the bloodline power they obtained was not as pure as that obtained by Little Golden Dragon, but the amount was sufficient enough to boost their current ability. They were upgrading several points faster than Little Golden Dragon. In the end, it took nearly half a day for all of them to absorb their bloodline power. At that moment, their information panels had undergone tremendous change. Aside from the considerable increase in their level, the key was that they had also acquired new skills along with their bloodline’s improvement! [Ancient Ash Wolf King] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Lan Weiwei] [Intimacy: 251] [Level: 55] [Attack: 803,489 (Increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff).] [HP: 18,008,800 (Increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff).] [Defense: 353,219 (Increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff).] [Magic Defense: 254,130 (Increases by 50% when transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf, increases by 50% with moonlight buff).] [Skills: Demonic Flame, Frost Domain, True Form Transformation, Ash Wolf’s Fury, Moonlight’s Blessing, Ash Wolf’s Howl, Soul Tracking, Moonlight Shield, Ash Wold Claws.] [Demonic Flame: The Ancient Ash Wolf King spits out terrifying demonic flames, causing 80,000 physical and magic damage per second to the enemy in front of it.] [Frost Domain: Creates a frost domain, slowing down the enemy’s attack speed and spell casting speed by 50%.] [True Form Transformation: When transformed into the Ancient Ash Wolf King, all attributes increase by 50%.] [Ash Wolf’s Fury: The Ancient Ash Wolf King awakens the sleeping bloodline in its body, greatly increasing its own attributes, and has a chance to obtain an additional skill!] [Moonlight’s Blessing: Under the moonlight, all attributes increase by 50%.] [Soul Tracking: When this skill is used, it can leave a mark deep within the target’s soul. It can track up to three people. The mark will remain for three months. This skill can be shared with the owner.] [Ash Wolf’s Howl: The exclusive skill of the Ancient Ash Wolf. It will have a different effect as the bloodline awakens. When the Ash Wolf howls at the moon, it will deal 15,000 magic damage per second to enemies under the moonlight for 50 seconds!] [Moonlight Shield: Under the moonlight, it can continuously add a personal light shield to teammates and the pet. Damage will be reduced by 50%. 5000 HP will be used up for every second the shield in is force. The amount doubles with each additional light shield.] [Ash Wolf Claws: Conjures a huge wolf claw that delivers continuously-doubled-up attacks on the enemy. Damage suffered by the enemy will double every second. It will be a single-fold attack in the first second, two-fold attack in the next second, four-fold in the third second, eight-fold in the fourth, and sixteen-fold in the fifth second. Lasts up to five seconds.] … [Ancient Panda] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Rollie] [Intimacy: 205] [Level: 41] [Attack: 303,350] [HP: 20,322,000] [Defense: 310,00,00] [Magic Defense: 310,00,00] [Skill: Luck Bonus, Invisible Golden Body, Panda Bomb.] [Luck Bonus: With Heaven’s blessing, there is a high chance of avoiding disaster, turning a bad situation into a good one, and averting a disaster! Provides a Luck buff for 60 seconds. Has a certain chance to be immune to all negative effects and damage. At the same time, the attack of both owner and pet will also increase!] [Invisible Golden Body: There will be a chance to cast this skill for each battle. When casting the skill, opponents will not be able to move for five seconds. However, it would be immune to all damage and could teleport to any place within 10,000 meters.] [Panda Bomb: Creates a bomb to attack the enemy. The bomb’s power is 100 times one’s own attack strength! The speed of this bomb attack is the same regardless of distance, and it takes only three seconds to launch the bomb toward the enemy.] Little Golden Dragon’s information panel appeared after Lan Weiwei’s and Rollie’s were displayed. Little Golden Dragon’s information panel shocked everyone as well! [Golden Dragon — Deep sleep] [Owner: Morning Mist] [Name: Little Golden Dragon] [Intimacy: 201] [Level: 59] [HP: 2,054,400] [Attack: 1,505,000] [Defense: 960,800] [Magic Defense: 884,584] [Skills: Water Control, Water Domain, Crazy Dragon’s Breath, Golden Gaze, Body Shrink, Tornado Storm, Raging Dragon’s Fury.] [Water Control: The exclusive skill of the Golden Dragon. It will have different effects depending on the awakening of its bloodline. It creates a water domain and controls the water within the domain. It can control the blood in the body of a living creature! There is a certain chance to directly extract the enemy’s HP and replenish it on one’s own body. At most, it will be one-third of the enemy’s total HP. It can only be used once in a single battle! There is even a chance to awaken the bloodline in the body and complete the transformation!] [Water Domain: Your pet can control the water within the domain and can control the blood in the body of other creatures!] [Crazy Dragon Breath: Spits out a dense fog filled with poison, covering an area of 1o square kilometer. Any enemy who inhales the poison would lose 20,000 HP every second, this lasts until the enemy dies.] [Golden Gaze: The Three-eyed Golden Dragon is an ancient mutant. It was originally a Three-eyed Golden Python. A few hundred years ago, it received the heavenly tribulation and became a Three-eyed Golden Dragon. Its third eye was the horn of a dragon! When the giant Python uses this skill, it could freeze the opponent for one second! Within that one second, all of the opponent’s defense will be lost! Can only be used twice per day!] [Body Shrink: Can change its own size within a certain range, has no effect on combat strength and speed.] [Tornado Storm: Exclusive skill of a True Dragon. It will have different effects depending on the awakening of the bloodline. Creates a wind domain and controls all the air within the domain. It can also control all the air in the vicinity! This skill is able to create a huge tornado to harm the enemy. At the same time, the tornado’s range can be adjusted through one’s own consciousness. The largest range is a thousand miles! There is a certain chance to create a huge storm, and its attack power would increase threefold (only able to be used once in a single battle). There is a chance to awaken the bloodline in one’s body and complete the transformation!] [Raging Dragon’s Fury: Releases intense flames. Any enemy that is burned by the flames would lose 50,000 HP for one minute.] When Lu Chen saw that his three spiritual pets had their strength increased to this extent, he was shocked. After the improvement of their bloodline power, their levels were now gold tier. Their strength had also undergone an earth-shattering change. The sudden increase in their strength has now far exceeded everyones expectations. Each of them increased by at least 10 levels, and some even gained 20 to 30 levels. Lan Weiwei’s attack power had more than doubled, reaching over 800,000 points. Her HP had also increased rapidly, reaching 18,000,000 points. Meanwhile, her attack power had also increased, reaching 80,000 points per second. Moreover, she even gained a new skill — Wolf Claw. By utilizing Wolf Claw she can now double her attack power to 16 times its original attack power, thereby her opponents will receive around 10,000,000 damage. Such an attack power was definitely enough to kill a gold boss. If one counted the first four seconds of the attack, the total attack power would reach 25,000,000. No one would be able to withstand such an enormous attack power. The Rollie’s stats had also increased. Originally, he had low HP. Now, he had over 20,000,000 HP, which was even higher than the HP of the Recovery Starfish. As expected, an existence with the Luck Bonus was built different. He even gained a new skill! It was a Panda Bomb with an attack that was 100 times stronger than his own attack. That meant that the attack power would be aroudn 30 million! If such a bomb could be thrown to a gold boss, it would definitely not survive. However, this Panda Bomb had a flaw. If the bomb was thrown, it would take three seconds for it to explode. It was certain that a few higher skilled monsters would be able to dodge the attack. Most importantly, since this bomb needed three seconds, there was no way to use it as an ambush attack. However, Lu Chen did not mind. After all, it was already good enough to have such a powerful weapon at hand. If one were to talk about the strongest increase in strength, it would definitely be aimed at Little Golden Dragon. At this moment, Little Golden Dragon had reached level 59, which was the peak of a gold boss. If it advanced one step further, it would reach the soul stage. His HP was also a terrifying 20,000,000. His attack power had also reached 1,500,000, and the defense was close to 1,000,000. Such a being was incomparably powerful. If Little Golden Dragon had such a powerful attack power when he fought the Seven-colored Peacock’s white mist, he would have only needed to make himself longer and sweep through the mist. He would have been able to wipe out all the monsters in one sweep. With the increase in his bloodline power, the coverage area and damage of Little Golden Dragon’s Crazy Dragon Breath had increased tenfold. The original 2,000 points had now reached 20,000 points. Most importantly, he directly inherited two important skills from Cockroach. These were the skills of a True Dragon! One of them was Tornado Storm, and the other was Raging Dragon’s Fury. These two skills were very powerful, especially Raging Dragon’s Fury. However, Little Golden Dragon’s body was stuck in its place. One could see that on the information panel, that he was in deep sleep. Lu Chen frowned, Han Tianyi saw his expression and spoke, “Little Golden Dragon absorbed too much bloodline in one go. He needs to rest here for a long time before he can completely digest the bloodline power. You might not be able to summon him anytime soon.” Hearing Han Tianyi’s advice, Lu Chen nodded. Today’s harvest was worth it, Lu Chen managed to extract a lot of bloodline powers from the 10,000 or so monsters here. At this time, Han Tianyi opened his mouth and said, “They’ve all been upgraded. Then, it’s time for you to return the favor.” Lu Chen’s eyes were full of caution. Han Tianyi’s level was so high that it was difficult for Lu Chen to tell how strong he was in his current state. However, such a powerful existence like him definitely surpassed Tang Feng. When he thought about how he could have such a powerful helper, Lu Chen became exceptionally excited. He directly activated his Taming God’s skill, and a ray of light shot out from his hand! Facing Han Tianyi in front of him, Lu Chen emitted the light of the Taming God, enveloping Han Tianyi’s entire body. After a few seconds, the light slowly seeped into Han Tianyi’s body. At this time, both of them could feel that magical connection in their hearts. Han Tianyi officially became Lu Chen’s fifth pet! In just a few seconds, Lu Chen had signed a contract with Han Tianyi. At this moment, when he looked at Han Tianyi’s information panel, he was a little shocked. [Specter] [Owner: Lu Chen] [Name: Han Tianyi] [Intimacy: 54] [Level: Unknown] [HP: Unknown] [Attack: 1,000,000,000] [Defense: Unknown] [Magic Defense: Unknown] Although many of Han Tianyi’s items displayed unknown question marks, the hundreds of millions of attack points still shocked them. One had to know that even a gold boss could only have a few hundred thousand attack power points, while someone at a soul stage would have a million attack power. Yet, Han Tianyi’s casual attack could easily reach hundreds of millions of attack power. Most importantly, Lu Chen knew that Han Tianyi’s strength was far beyond that considering that he could stop Lu Chen with a simple finger flick. Moreover, when Lu Chen faced Han Tianyi, he felt that he was like a wild beast. He could clearly sense that even if he used all of his strength, he was still no match for Han Tianyi, he even felt that Han Tianyi’s strength was comparable to that of the Guardian General back then. An expert of such a level as his trump card was definitely a huge win. At the same time, he made up his mind that he must keep such a powerful trump card as a secret and not let anyone know about it. If necessary, calling Han Tianyi out would be the ultimate killer weapon. No one would be able to withstand such power. Now, it seemed that the biggest gain from coming to the Mass Grave was not that the warriors of the Dragon Team had improved their levels, nor that the spiritual pets like Little Golden Dragon and Lan Weiwei had received the bonus of bloodline power. Instead, it was that Lu Chen gained an unstoppable pet! Lu Chen’s combat strength was admirable. The only thing he lacked was an ultimate weapon. Now, Han Tianyi was his confidence booster in winning fights should there be a last resort. Although he had previously taken Tang Feng as his master, everyone had their own things to do, it was impossible to summon Tang Feng at any time and place. However, Han Tianyi was different. As his contracted pet, as long as Lu Chen wanted to, he could immediately summon Han Tianyi from the Mass Grave, no matter where he was. Most importantly, Han Tianyi’s combat strength was probably much stronger than Tang Feng’s. Lu Chen looked at Little Golden Dragon in his backpack and suddenly remembered that Wu Tian had wanted to use the True Dragon’s corpse to trick Little Golden Dragon into becoming the Wu Family’s guardian Divine Beast. Now that he thought about it, Little Golden Dragon had made a wise choice in not following that man. Just the Seven-colored Peacock and these few gold bosses were enough to make Wu Tian cower in fear. If the ancient martial arts aristocratic family sent someone of a higher rank to challenge them, then no matter how many people came, they would probably die in a second. Cockroach’s strength alone had already reached level 79, on the other hand, Han Tianyi was able to mobilize the entire power of the Mass Grave for his own use. That was terrifying. Now, it made sense as to why there had been rumors that the Mass Grave rejected people from the ancient martial arts aristocratic family. It was because of Han Tianyi. After settling everything, Han Tianyi said to Lu Chen, “The few of you can leave this place. Liu Yuan stays with me.” Hearing this, everyone was dumbfounded. Han Tianyi was already a few hundred years old. Why would he be interested in a young girl like Liu Yuan? At this moment, Liu Yuan’s expression was a little strange. She stuttered and said, “I’m not saying that you’re not handsome. It’s just that the age gap between us is a little big. I...;” Hearing this, Han Tianyi’s face darkened. “What are you thinking? I acknowledge your potential, so I want to take you in as a disciple. Stop thinking nonsense. I’m not that old!” Hearing Han Tianyi’s words, Liu Yuan’s face instantly turned red. In fact, she really wanted to go with Lu Chen. After all, she was already used to being Lu Chen’s follower. However, she saw that her level was barely above level 30. On the other hand, Lu Chen had already reached level 51. The difference between the two was too big. Han Tianyi’s combat strength was high. If she could cultivate her powers with him, it would probably be a better idea. That way, she can catch up to Lu Chen with confidence. Seeing that Liu Yuan was a little hesitant, Han Tianyi said indifferently, “If it wasn’t for your old man Liu’s sake, I wouldn’t have taken you in as my disciple.” Hearing this, Liu Yuan was slightly stunned. She didn’t expect Han Tianyi to know her grandfather? Hearing this, Liu Yuan didn’t doubt him and immediately agreed, “Thank you! In that case, I will take care of your daily necessities from now on.” Seeing that the little girl was very understanding, Han Tianyi was in a good mood. After all, once Lu Chen and the others leave with Cockroach, he would be alone in the Mass Grave. Although the Seven-colored Peacock and the others had accompanied him for hundreds of years, they were not as close to him as he was to Cockroach. Especially with so many beasts in the Mass Grave, they all had a deep fear and respect for Han Tianyi, they did not have the kind of intimate relationship that could be casually playful. Now that he had such an obedient female disciple, Han Tianyi was in a great mood. Seeing that Liu Yuan had a better way out, Lu Chen did not have any objections. However, he felt that it was a little strange. They had gone through so much trouble to come all the way here just to leave Liu Yuan behind. Even if they gained a lot of benefits, their main objective of coming here was not cleared. He kept feeling that something was not right. However, the result could be said to be a happy ending for everyone. Lu Chen directly greeted Liu Yuan with a few simple words. Meanwhile, because Liu Yuan and Weiwei had a close relationship, the two were reluctant to say goodbye. Liu Yuan looked at Lu Chen from afar. At this moment, she was still wearing a tight suit. Under the tight suit, her graceful figure was undoubtedly revealed. Liu Yuan said, “Lu Chen, wait for me. I’ll see you soon...;” Lu Chen looked at Liu Yuan and said with a smile, “Okay, I’ll wait for you.” Hearing this, Liu Yuan’s pretty face turned red, then she rolled her eyes and snorted arrogantly. After a short farewell, Lu Chen left. On the way back, Tang Bao suddenly thought of something. “That’s not right. All of you have gained something. I’m the only one that didn’t get anything. Instead, my HP was instantly depleted by that old man, and I spent a lot of Health Potions…” At this moment, Lu Chen was in a great mood. He stuffed all of his Health Potions into Tang Bao’s hands. At the same time, he took out another bloodline power pill from his backpack, he said, “This pill is the bloodline power of a few monsters that I extracted during the process of killing monsters. Although the medicinal power isn’t strong, I’ll give it to you as compensation.” Tang Bao’s eyes lit up when he saw the pill! He had clearly seen the rapid improvement of Little Golden Dragon and the others after they ate the bloodline power pill. He had been coveting it for a long time. When he was in the Tang family, Tang Bao had seen the power of this bloodline power. It could transform him! He was very clear that this thing could be eaten by humans! Back then, Lu Chen had said that if he could obtain the bloodline pill in the future, he would give it to him. However, Lu Chen had lied to him back then and said that it was obtained by fighting monsters. After today, the method that Lu Chen used to extract the bloodline power had already been discovered by Tang Bao. It was obvious that Tang Bao played a role in saving Liu Yuan, so Lu Chen generously gave him what he wanted. Looking at the pill in his hand, Tang Bao’s face was so happy that it brightened. He carefully held the pill and carefully observed it. Then, he took a deep breath. The intoxicated expression on his face was a little exaggerated from a third persons perspective. Then, he directly put it in his backpack. Lu Chen was a little surprised and asked, “Why didn’t you eat it?” “Because there are still a few months before the demon seal opens. Oh, right, Lu Chen, did you know that there will be a trial?” Lu Chen was obviously stunned. He had never heard of any trial. At this time, Tang Xiaoqing interjected, “He’s only stayed in our Tang family for a few days. How would he know about things like these? Let me tell you instead. “The Demon Sealing Valley is a place that our ancient martial arts aristocratic family discovered in the Second World ruins. “That place has a special feature. It only allows people below the soul stage or monsters to enter. It’s like a ruin of the ancient battlefield. There are all kinds of treasures there. “Before we discovered it, that place had been sealed for tens of thousands of years. “After we discovered it, it was only because all the members of the ancient martial arts aristocratic families made a move at the same time that we managed to open this ruin. “This Demon Sealing Valley will only open once every ten years. “That’s a place where danger exists in every corner.” “Oh, so that’s how it is.” Lu Chen was deep in thought after learning about this place. “Then if you eat this pill of bloodline power now, won’t it be able to raise your level as soon as possible? As long as you don’t exceed level sixty, the stronger you’ll become, isn’t that right?” Hearing this, Tang Bao’s interest was piqued. He shook his head and explained, “What you said was right. After entering level sixty, I’ll definitely get stronger. “Of course, only the direct descendants of the various ancient martial arts aristocratic families are qualified to do this. After all, it is not easy to nurture a peak golden stage expert. “However, there was one thing that was rather strange. People below the soul stage are only allowed to go in. However, once they enter the Demon Sealing Valley, they can choose to break through. This way, when compared to others...; they will have a huge advantage.” Hearing this, Lu Chen raised his eyebrows slightly. The power of the bloodline was a high-grade treasure. If he ate it after entering the Demon Sealing Valley, then it would be more advantageous for him to break through to the soul stage. If he ate it now, then when he reaches the Demon Sealing Valley, Tang Bao would only be a level 59 aurous stage cultivator. He would not have an absolute advantage. In the Demon Sealing Valley, it sounded like a trial for those aurous stage cultivators. However, everyone knew that the aurous stage cultivators only played the role of thugs and followers. The ones who could truly play a decisive role were the ancient martial arts aristocratic families of the soul stage. As long as there were those at the soul stage, they would be able to get a share of the spoils from their families. If there were more people at the soul stage, they would have more authority. On the contrary, if there were no soul stage cultivators, their lives would be in vain. Although the seven ancient martial arts aristocratic families looked like they were united, they had been fighting openly and secretly for hundreds of years. It was just that they had not openly shed all pretenses of cordiality and could weaken the power of the other family in the Demon Sealing Valley, this was already a tacit agreement. It was precisely because the Wu family had not been able to produce any soul stage disciples in the Demon Sealing Valley on several occasions that their strength had plummeted. The Wu family even did not dare to send anyone to participate in the recent Demon Sealing Valley trial. After all, if they lost a few more generations of elites, the Wu family would be completely kicked out of the ranks of the ancient martial arts aristocratic families if they pushed any further. Moreover, participating in the trial of the Demon Sealing Valley was equivalent to throwing themselves into a circle of monsters. If the family was not strong enough, they would not receive many benefits after entering the place. If they did not receive benefits, their strength would not increase. If their strength did not increase, they would lack top-notch combat strength as a family. If the family’s power became weaker, they would be unable to nurture young talents. It was a perpetual cycle that the Wu family did not want to participate in. Therefore, it was said that the Wu clan had also found some external aid to help the Wu family seize the treasures in the Demon Sealing Valley. Of course, the price for the external aid was a lot. Presumably, the price the Wu family had to pay was probably enough to make their hearts ache for several years. Looking at the thoughtful Lu Chen, Tang Bao continued, “Oh right, you can also be considered a disciple of the Tang family...;” Before he could finish his sentence, Tang Xiaoqing slapped Tang Bao. “How can you say that? What do you mean by he can be considered to be? He is a member of our family!” Tang Bao’s shoulder was in so much pain from Tang Xiaoqing’s slap that he teared a little from the sting. He quickly corrected himself and said, “Yes, yes, yes. This is our family’s future son-in-law...;” Hearing this, Tang Xiaoqing’s face instantly turned red. She quickly raised her hand and pretended to hit him again, Tang Bao immediately corrected himself, “Lu Chen, you’re uncle’s disciple, so you’re a member of our Tang family. So logically speaking, you should be able to enter the Demon Sealing Valley as well.” Hearing this, Lu Chen’s interest was immediately piqued. After all, he used to be a fan of novels. In fantasy novels, such places that had treasure everywhere often had great opportunities, so Lu Chen was naturally very interested. However, he did not expect that one day, such a good thing would actually happen to him. He looked at his level and saw that he was still nine levels away from reaching the soul stage. Moreover, even though there was only one level between level 59 and level 60, it was probably not that easy to surpass such a stage. With such a good opportunity, Lu Chen would definitely not want to miss it! After leaving the Mass Grave, Lu Chen and the others didn’t go back to the main world. Instead, they made a trip to White Fog City. If the trial of the Demon Sealing Valley begins in a few months, he would have to prepare all his equipment, and checking up on White Fog City was no exception. Being able to move a city for him to use was already a huge force and pressure. If they really ran into a huge monster horde, these people in the city could help. Those who wanted to farm monsters could do so to their heart’s content, while those who did not could hide in the city’s safe zone. This was a win-win situation for everyone. Low-level players could observe how high-level players farm monsters to accumulate experience. This was definitely a blessing for White Fog City. In the entire Second World, there were different teleportation arrays. These teleportation arrays could only be used within a certain area and could not be used for long-distance travel. This was very suitable for Lu Chen and the others. After all, the Mass Grave was not very far from White Fog City. Very quickly, they arrived near White Fog City. When they approached White Fog City, Tang Xiaoqing and Tang Bao were immediately shocked by the scene before them. The originally sparse White Fog City was now described as a bustling city. Countless soldiers were entering and leaving, and the entrance was filled with players. One had to know that this was no longer the time when White Fog City had just opened. At that time, everyone had to queue up to enter White Fog City. It had been a long time since then, but he had not expected that White Fog City’s popularity would gain traction this quickly! Tang Bao looked at some of the people in front of him and was extremely envious! However, this was also inevitable in Lu Chen’s eyes. After all, White Fog City was the only city in the entire Second World of the Dragon Kingdom. Whether it was to have a class change or the production of all kinds of equipment, these could only be done here. When the others saw Lu Chen, they instantly made way. The line that was originally queueing suddenly stopped. There were even quite a number of female players who were fangirls that stared at Lu Chen with starry eyes. “Is that Lu Chen? He’s so handsome.” “Exactly, exactly. He’s gotten more handsome compared to the last video. Moreover, he’s much more burly.” “I’m in love, I’m in love. He’s much better looking than anyone I’ll everk know.” ” Lu Chen is the apple of my eye. My eternal god.” Just as the women were in a daze, the men also let out waves of exclamations, but their focus was different from the others. “Wasn’t heabout level thirty the last time we saw him? How did he level fifty now?” “What kind of speed is this? Is he a cheater?” “Stop bullsh*tting. Lu Chen is the only person in the Second World who doesn’t need to cheat.” “Not only is Lu Chen’s level high, look at Lan Weiwei. She’s already over level fifty!” “Yeah, not to mention Lan Weiwei. Look at that Rollie. Even Rollie is already over level fourty. He’s even higher than me. This is ridiculous!” “What is this? Look at that woman beside Lu Chen. She’s already at level fifty nine. How terrifying.” “We really can’t be compared to others. We’re only level twenty or thirty. We’re already considered outstanding. However, compared to him, we’re trash.” “Where did Lu Chen’s Little Golden Dragon go? It’s the one with three eyes, right?” “Yeah, yeah. I remember that Little Golden Dragon was the most powerful one out of all of them. Where did he go? Maybe he’s stronger than the rest!” “You’re right! He might even turn into a True Dragon.” Everyone was whispering to each other, because what was happening in front of them was far beyond their imagination. Everyone looked at Lu Chen’s equipment, pets, and friends. They were all extremely envious. At this moment, they didn’t even have the courage to rush up and talk to Lu Chen. They knew very well that they didn’t even have the right to talk to someone of such a high level. Lu Chen and the others came to the main gate of White Fog City and walked straight to the Super VIP passage. Before they reached the gate, the soldiers guarding the city came up to him from afar with smiles on their faces. “City Lord, you’re back. Please come this way!” Following that, the soldiers bowed and smilingly sent Lu Chen and the others to the Super VIP passage. Although Lu Chen was the City Lord of White Fog City, he had only been focused on killing monsters and leveling up. He had never received such good treatment before. After thinking for a moment, he directly took out a few gold coins and handed them to the soldiers who welcomed him. Not to mention the other soldiers, even the soldiers guarding the other passageways were envious of this operation. These were gold coins. One gold coin was equivalent to 10,000 dollars… and Lu Chen casually handed them over. The few soldiers who received the gold coins were obviously filled with fanaticism. Their salaries were not high, only a few gold coins a year. Their daily expenses were all copper coins, they did not expect the City Lord to be so generous. The leading soldier immediately said, “I think our city is a little shabby now. How about I gather people to help you repair White Fog City?” [Ding! Congratulations on triggering the mission to repair White Fog City. Will you accept it?] If he repaired White Fog City, he would have to spend five million gold coins to bring it back to the active state. If he did not repair White Fog City, it would cause a psychological blow to the active city-guarding soldiers and reduce their loyalty. Seeing this, Lu Chen’s heart jumped. He did not know how to re-activate White Fog City, but he did not know that it would be this easy! Thinking of this, he looked at the soldiers in front of him and became more and more satisfied. He casually gave them a few more gold coins. [Ding! Detected that the loyalty of the soldiers has increased! The time needed to repair White Fog City will be greatly reduced!] Seeing this, Lu Chen was overjoyed. He did not expect that his simple visit to White Fog City would really trigger the method to awaken White Fog City. He waved his hand and said to the soldiers, “Now, go find someone to repair White Fog City, and then withdraw five million gold coins from the Treasury to repair the city!” The soldiers were overjoyed and quickly ran to?tell the others. In White Fog City, no matter where Lu Chen went, he would receive everyone’s attention because he was the only City Lord in White Fog City, and also the strongest player in the Second World in the Dragon Country. Most importantly, Lu Chen’s leveling speed was insanely fast. No matter how many ordinary players in the city banded together, they would not be able to defeat Lu Chen. At this moment, the soldiers that were originally at the city gate ran over one after another. They were constantly transporting gold coins, preparing to repair White Fog City. Originally, the players that came and went knew that this was a gold coin warehouse. However, no one knew exactly how much money was inside. This time, it just so happened that Lu Chen had opened the warehouse’s door. Everyone stopped in their tracks, looking into the warehouse, when they saw that the entire warehouse was shining with gold, everyone’s eyes widened. “D*mn, there’s too much money inside. I reckon there’s at least a few hundred thousand gold inside.” “A few hundred thousand? You’re underestimating White Fog City too much. There’s at least a million gold coinds inside.” “D*mn! A million? Isn’t that tens of billions? If I had that much money, I would immediately return to the main world and never come out again.” “Look at how promising you are. That’s why the White Fog City Lord is Lu Chen, not you. Your situation is only worthy of being a little loser.” “So what? I just want to have a wife and children to warm up my bed. I’m not Lu Chen, I know how powerful I am. To me, coming to the Second World is to earn money through games. To put it bluntly, this is just a game, so what if I’m strong?” “That’s right. This is just a game. I look down on those who spend money playing games the most. It’s useless to lose one’s will while playing games. People still have to live in the real world. Do they really think of the virtual world as their home?” Although everyone said anything, when they faced the tens of billions of gold coins, everyone still felt sour. At this time, the warehouse manager ran over with a face full of joy and said, “City Lord, there are 10.35 million gold coins here. We just spent 5 million to build the city wall. Now, there is 5.35 million left.” Hearing this, everyone was shocked. They originally thought that Lu Chen’s warehouse was filled to the brim. However, the wealth of the rich was beyond their imagination. There was actually more than 100 billion gold coins here. Someone in the crowd estimated that even if he worked the moment he was born and for the next three generations, he would not be able to earn so much money. However, Lu Chen’s expression was not optimistic because the demand for gold coins was too great. When he only had 1,000 gold coins at the beginning, he was very shocked when he looked at this warehouse. However, White Fog City was originally an empty city. Therefore, investing in the city right now might lead to a better outcome in the future. White Fog City did earn quite a bit of money by collecting entrance tickets and doing all sorts of transactions. However, the workers also needed to constantly spend money to build economy. Fortunately, things like cultivation methods and medicine could be produced by the craftsmen of White Fog City and sold in the mall to maintain the balance. However, at the moment, repairing White Fog City would consume a large amount of gold coins. At the same time, the level of White Fog City was still pretty low, so it was necessary to upgrade. The cost of leveling up was far higher than activating White Fog City. Thinking of this, Lu Chen immediately opened his backpack and threw all the gold coins into it. At this moment, gold coins poured into the warehouse like a river. The soldiers who were originally moving the gold coins out were now stunned. “The City Lord is really a god. He has an unlimited amount of gold coins!” “We really have a good City Lord. The people of White Fog City will have a good life.” “Thank you, City Lord!” While the soldiers were thanking Lu Chen, the players were already in an uproar. Within a short period of time, hundreds of players had gathered. When they saw the gold coins in front of them, their eyes turned green with envy, they were even taking photos and posting them online. “Everyone, come and take a look. Lu Chen’s little treasury can be said to be enough to be ranked on the top ten riches men list, right?” “Recently, we haven’t been able to find Lu Chen when we were fighting monsters. How did he earn the gold coins?” “Lu Chen is really awesome. We fought and resurrected here several times, but we never earned much money. At most, we earned a few silver coins. However, after Lu Chen disappeared for a few days, when he came back, he is now worth a hundred billion gold coins. Not only did he not spend it all, he even used it to subsidize White Fog City.” “What’s the use of that? Spending money in the Second World is nothing if it won’t improve oneself.” Not everyone knew that the Second World was about to fuse with the main world. Moreover, even if they knew, it would be of no use to ordinary people because their goal was to seek food and clothing. Just like Lu Chen who entered the Second World in the beginning, it was just to improve the quality of his life, or even just to make a living. Lu Chen was also listening to these gossips, but he didn’t say anything, because he knew that the merging of the Second World and the main world might come at any time. The most important thing now was to improve his own strength, once he consolidated his power, once the real explosion came, the money would be fake. It would mean absolutely nothing. Thinking of this, he recalled what Tang Bao had said before. It was said that there were all kinds of monsters in the Demon Sealing Valley, and there were many high-level monsters. There were also countless small monsters. Once a monster riot happens, other than those at the soul stage, it would be difficult for others to survive. At that time, the battle for the treasure would become a survival challenge. However, the probability of such a thing happening was very small. It had been over a hundred years since it happened. However, Lu Chen still felt that although he was strong enough, he was still a simple person no matter how powerful he became. If he really encountered a large-scale battle, it would be impossible for him to always appear alone, he had to have his own team. Lu Chen was not afraid of battles. This courage came from his own strength. He never feared going solo. Small-scale battles could be resolved with his pets. Medium-scale battles could be fought with members of the Dragon Team. However, if they really encountered a large-scale horde of monsters, they would need tens of thousands or even more players to fight together. Although White Fog City was prospering, it was still merely a city. It did not have its own sustainable power. There were soldiers in the city, but those soldiers could only maintain law and order in the city. If they wanted White Fog City to become powerful, they would have to become unstoppable warriors. They would have to mobilize the enthusiasm of all the residents of White Fog City. The only way was to use benefits to attract them to fight for their city. The simplest method right now is to take out a fixed amount of money every month and hire thousands of White Fog City players to become soldiers or mercenaries. However, there was a drawback to this method. Everyone would be here for money, so they would not be loyal to White Fog City. Moreover, the cost of raising a large number of soldiers is extremely high. Even if each person spends half a gold a month, it would still cost 10,000 gold to nurture 20,000 players. Moreover, 10,000 players are not enough to do anything. The cost of raising high-level players might even cost more. To Lu Chen, his gold coins could provide for the hard work of the class change masters and workers. Right now, if he were to attract more players to join his White Fog City, he was afraid that he would not be able to make ends meet. Instead of using his own money to support his soldiers, he might as well find a suitable place and lead his team to fight. Anyone who was willing to submit would receive benefits, that was what he planned to say. If they were unwilling, they should not be complaining about not receiving anything. It was not enough to just fight a war and reap benefits from it. After all, there were some players who wanted to live a mundane or become a king on their own. If the benefits aren’t enticing enough, most might not be interested at all. In addition, recently, some players had obtained special scrolls and become class change masters. They even started to compete with the class change masters in White Fog City. In the beginning, these wild class change masters had set a lower price than the price of the class change masters in the city in order to snatch customers. Moreover, an entrance fee to enter the city was not needed. However, this problem was quickly solved. Even without Lu Chen’s help, the wild class change masters got greedy and increased the price tenfold when the money started coming in. This caused many players to be dissatisfied with the service as they were not as competent as the class change masters in White Fog City. Soon enough, the wild class change masters had their status drop. After that, these badly beaten wild class change masters expressed that they would no longer engage in vicious competition. They set the price to be the same as that in the city. After Lu Chen’s new instruction, anyone who entered the city through the proper channels would be given a 10% discount on all items sold by the City Lord, regardless of whether it was scrolls, cultivation techniques, medicines, and so forth. All of them would be given a 10% discount. Once this announcement was made, wild class change masters began to lose the advantage. After all, the City Lord of White Fog City, Lu Chen, had endorsed the class change masters in the city. Their credibility was higher, and the quality of individual class change masters was incomparable to those of wild ones. There were even many who pretended to be class change masters and killed people to steal their treasures. After a series of underhanded incidents, the reputation of the class change masters in White Fog City — in comparison to those wild ones — significantly improved. At this moment, a notification suddenly appeared above everyone’s heads in the Second World! [System Announcement: Dear players, as there are players in all the sectors who have their own castles, the spatial barriers in the different sectors have been removed. All cities can now be entered freely.] Everyone was stunned when they saw the news. The news came too suddenly. Ever since White Fog City was taken over, there had been no such system news. Everyone kept killing monsters and doing quests to increase their combat power. At this moment, they never expected that the cities could communicate with each other and open spatial barriers. One had to know that in the past, the Second World — under the territories of various countries — could not communicate with each other. Under such circumstances, it was impossible to achieve a strategic invasion. If the people from the Western Castle found out about this, they would probably regret their plans and active invasion methods. They had spent tens of billions to come to the Dragon Country, and almost all of them had died. Even the few elders that got attacked were still in hiding. They were afraid that they would be killed by the players if they were resurrected in the Dragon Country! However, a few days later, the territories merged. It was really a double loss on their end. When the players of Dragon Country heard the news, they were shocked! “D*mn, can we finally go to other countries?” “Great, I want to go to Beauty Country and meet all the women there.” “Look at you, I want to go to Island Country!” “Why go to the Island Country? Let’s go kill those warriors in Cherry Country!” “That’s right, we’re going to flirt with the girls and then kill the warriors!” “Hundreds of years ago, the Island Country have been bullying our country, and now we’re going to fight back.” “Right, right, right. There are so many people in our Dragon Country, and there’s also Lu Chen. I’m sure we’ll wreck them.” For a moment, the crowd was busting with excitement. Everyone was thinking of going to other places to attack their territories. Everyone was slowly getting bored here in the Second World. After all, there were no official missions anymore. However, when the world map was integrated into one, new possibilities arose, and they were ready to conquer other places. When the system notification happened, Lu Chen listened carefully to the players’ conversation. Although Tang Bao was from an ancient martial arts aristocratic family and did not care about the country’s affairs, he was still in the Dragon Country after all. He could also be considered a member of the Dragon Country. Therefore, his hatred for the Island Country was not weak. He said to Lu Chen, “I think these players are right. We should go to the Cherry Country now and let their group of warriors respawn at the Resurrection Point!” “Kill the warriors of the Island Country, flirt with the girls of the Beauty Country, steal the treasures of the Island Country, and kill the monsters everywhere!” The more Tang Bao spoke, the more excited he became. He even expressed himself with a little dance. Aside from Tang Xiaoqing who was not interested in flirting with the girls of the Beauty Country, the rest of them agreed with him with just as much excitement. Lu Chen, on the other hand, pondered for a moment and said, “I think we should focus on developing our city now.” Tang Bao was slightly stunned by his suggestion, “There’s no hurry to develop White Fog City. Let’s take down the Island Country first and then slowly develop it after. “When that time comes, the players from the Island Country and the Dragon Country will be ours!” Lu Chen’s eyes gradually turned hollow. It was obvious that his brain was rapidly calculating the best outcome. “Compared to the strength of our Dragon Country and the Island Country, just the number of people can crush this Island Country.” Lu Chen continued, “But if we fight head-on, the players of the Dragon Country will end up becoming a hindrance. There isn’t enough time for them to practice formations and we will end up becoming a loose pile of sand. “Once we get the concerted resistance of the players of the Island Country, or the official organization of the Island Country forming an army to resist collectively, we might fail. “Although our players are on steroids now, it’s only temporary. If we encounter a strong opponent, we will fall. “After all, everyone is afraid of death, especially since many people had already bet all their assets on the Second World game. Once they face danger, they would probably retreat immediately. “In a war, if someone around them chose to retreat, it would cause a chain reaction, leading to a large-scale defeat. “This is absolutely not allowed in a war. “Therefore, we must gather a powerful force, a force that is unyielding. No matter how fierce the battle is, we can not retreat. “Except for you Tang Bao, you’re a person with extremely strong killing intent. To you, no matter how powerful the enemy is, you will kill them all so that you can nurture a powerful killing domain. It might not be the same for ordinary players.” After hearing Lu Chen’s words, Tang Bao instantly understood the crux of the matter. He scratched his head and asked, “What do you think we should do now?” Lu Chen’s gaze was erratic. He stared at the countless players in the distance and said, “What we should do now is to unite everyone as one. “We must build the most determined force. Even if it’s not strong enough, we must let everyone see that we will not back down!” Tang Xiaoqing was a little puzzled. “But why should these people listen to us? Although you’re powerful, fighting a war is a matter of risking one’s life. I’m afraid that everyone will choose to protect themselves instead of fighting back.” Lu Chen smiled faintly and said, “We can use resources to exchange for their labor.” Then, he took out his phone and called Liu Changping. “Hey, do you have something on your side? Can you come to White Fog City now? Also, can you call Gu Yiming and Xu Ziyuan over? I’d like to talk about something.” After receiving Lu Chen’s call, Liu Changping, Gu Yiming, and Xu Ziyuan quickly came to the main hall of White Fog City. Liu Changping was actually asleep when the call came through. After the call, he immediately entered the Second World Xu Ziyuan was hunting wild monsters in the wilderness. After hearing Liu Changping’s request from Lu Chen, she directly used a teleportation scroll to arrive at White Fog City. However, Gu Yiming was the quickest to arrive because he was already in White Fog City. When he realized that a hint of world fusion appeared in the system notification, he knew that Lu Chen was very likely to find him. Thus, he immediately rushed to the main hall of White Fog City without a second thought. Liu Changping and Xu Ziyuan quickly made their way as well. After arriving, they quickly gathered in the main hall. The few of them sat down in the main hall of the White Fog City Lord’s mansion. Lu Chen was the first to speak, “This fusion is of great importance. This is a good opportunity for us to develop as a country.” Liu Changping nodded. “That’s right. When I came in, I discovered that all the players in the Second World were discussing this matter. The one with the most clamor was that they had to hurry to Cherry Country to fight. Oh right, Liu Yuan...;” Liu Changping did not continue speaking because he realized that Liu Yuan was not there. He had an ominous thought in his heart. Lu Chen smiled and said, “Don’t worry, Liu Yuan is fine. She found a place that is very suitable for cultivation. From now on, her growth rate will increase exponentially. You have to work hard to cultivate yourself too. Otherwise, the next time you see her, she will be stronger than you.” Lu Chen did not directly tell Liu Yuan about what happened. After all, the implications of this matter were too big. If it was leaked, it might not be a good thing. Especially since the five great ancient martial families had always thought that Han Tianyi was dead. They did not come to a place like the Mass Grave to look for him. However, if the five great families knew that not only was Han Tianyi alive but that he had become even more powerful than before, then even if they had to take a great risk, they would still come to the Mass Grave to annihilate Han Tianyi. After that, Lu Chen continued, “I called everyone here today because I want to create a force, the most powerful force in the Second World.” Lu Chen’s words were firm and curt. None of the people present showed a surprised expression, especially Gu Yiming and Xu Ziyuan. They looked at each other and said in their hearts that this moment had finally arrived. Gu Yiming and Xu Ziyuan were only level 30 at the moment, and this was because the family behind them had invested a lot of manpower and money to build them up. They knew that they were not as talented as Lu Chen, Liu Changping, and others who were in the room. However, with the power of the whole family, their level was at least higher than Liu Changping’s. However, when Xu Ziyuan saw Liu Changping, she was shocked. When Gu Yiming saw Lu Chen, he was dumbstruck! He did not expect Lu Chen to be so much stronger than him by feats. At this moment, their cultivation was far from comparable. He could not help but smile bitterly. However, he immediately understood the difference between him and Lu Chen. As a smart person, he would not be hung up on such a matter. As the descendants of the ancient martial arts aristocratic families, especially the direct descendants, political intelligence was far more important than their individual martial arts strength. After all, leading a family and developing their own power was the most important thing, they believed that Lu Chen would need them one day and that this moment had finally arrived. Lu Chen continued, “If we want to develop our power, then we must recruit experts wantonly and recruit all kinds of geniuses. “Whether it’s those with high IQ or those with high combat power, we must recruit them. At the same time, the people we recruit must not only be limited to the Dragon Country, but also foreign powers.” Hearing this, everyone nodded. Gu Yiming did not expect Lu Chen — a high school student — to have such a wide perspective on everything. It should be known that even the Gu family, which ranked first among the ten great families, only wanted to compete for hegemony in the Dragon Country. At this moment, Lu Chen had already set his eyes on the whole world. However, Gu Yiming instantly understood his place. That was because the Gu family was only the number one force in the Dragon Country. Whereas Lu Chen was the leader of the entire Second World. Whether in terms of personal combat strength or reputation, he was much stronger than anyone else. Even the Xiao family, which was ranked above the Gu family, was far less influential than Lu Chen. When Lu Chen proposed to build a force that belonged to White Fog City, Gu Yiming and Xu Ziyuan immediately knew that their time had come. Although Lu Chen had his own ideas, he didn’t know much about politics. After all, he was only a high school student. Thus, he had to ask everyone what method was more suitable for dealing with these matters. Gu Yiming was the first to speak. “To attract talents, it’s actually the same method as to how different cities in the main world attract talents. The first problem to be solved is the issue of food, clothing, and accommodation. “Of course, based on the current situation of the Second World, there is still no phenomenon of merging with the main world. Thus, in terms of accommodation, we can understand it as providing a virtual residence in White Fog City. They can use it to store items as White Fog City’s exclusive personnel. “However, there is currently a problem. Currently, our White Fog City’s land isn’t as big as we hoped, and there are probably not many people who had the opportunity to settle down. “Therefore, we must use those empty houses in White Fog City to attract high-end talents.” When Lu Chen heard Gu Yiming’s words, his interest was immediately piqued. “Go on!” After receiving Lu Chen’s affirmation… Gu Yiming felt a little smug in his heart. “Based on the current situation, many players are generally above level ten. Those who have reached level twenty are considered experts, and those who have reached level thirty are even rarer. “In my opinion, we can formulate such a policy. Any player who has reached level thirty can directly settle down in White Fog City. “By relying on their own strength, they can obtain houses of different locations, settings, and sizes in White Fog City. “However, they only have the right of residence. When they serve White Fog City for three years, they can obtain the ownership of the houses.” Lu Chen nodded slightly. Gu Yiming continued, “The most important thing is that if you want to have a say in a city, you have to have the right of economic sanctions! “Therefore, I suggest that we implement the points system. “White Fog City can issue different missions, and different missions can get different points. The more difficult the mission, the more points you will get. “Experts above level thirty can perform only a few high-difficulty missions every year. “Moreover, for those below level 30, we also need to have a certain incentive policy. The simplest thing is to improve our points system and issue different missions, such as killing a monster to get a certain amount of points. “Perhaps in the short term, it won’t be of any benefit to us. “However, once we can attract enough people, we can stipulate that the scrolls and cultivation methods in the city will be prohibited from being sold in the future. All of them will be exchanged in the form of points. “Those who obtained points prior to this news will be able to exchange for cultivation methods and scrolls. “At the same time, we can also exchange points with the prey we hunt. According to the quality of the prey’s equipment, we can exchange for different points.” Hearing this, Lu Chen’s eyes lit up slightly! Gu Yiming’s idea was amazing. This was equivalent to unifying the currency. He was using their dominant position to form the national currency into the world’s unified settlement currency. This way, they could expand their dominant position in the entire field. Once the points system gets popularized, the credibility of White Fog City would greatly increase. “And as more and more people use points and use various materials to exchange for points, the number of equipment in White Fog City will also increase. With all sorts of cultivation methods and scrolls… “Lu Chen will be able to have the craftsmen continuously copy those cultivation methods and scrolls, making the resources in the entire White Fog City top-notch.” Hearing Gu Yiming spout so much, not to mention Lu Chen, even Liu Changping felt a sense of admiration. Tang Bao, however, who had been immersed in cultivation since young had eyes that were glazed. In the eyes of a cultivator, there were not so many twists and turns. However, he still felt a little disdainful in his heart. After all, to him, improving his combat ability was the most important thing in life. Gu Yiming had said enough about the first point and was about to continue when he was interrupted. Xu Ziyuan hurriedly stood up after the short pause. After all, Gu Yiming must not be allowed to be the only one that can impress Lu Chen. Xu Ziyuan immediately interjected, “As for food, I think there is one thing we can do. That is to provide enough pills and medicine. “Pills can improve a person’s physique or detoxify the poison. Health and Mana Potions can prolong a person’s battle time and save their life if necessary. “The key is that these items can be duplicated by the city’s craftsmen. When we trade these items with points in the future, our points will be an absolutely needed currency, and we could create unlimited points! “As long as we stick to this aspect, except for the small number of potions that get dropped from monsters, all the potions must be traded with points. This way, we can guarantee the status of points. “After all, equipment, weapons, and class advancement are not things that can be rushed. However, if a person doesn’t have health and mana, then they won’t be able to do anything. “And once they die, all the equipment on them will be gone. Restarting with nothing is a result that no one can bear.” Hearing Xu Ziyuan’s words, Lu Chen’s eyes were full of admiration. “You’re right. Everyone can try to save their money, but once they die, nothing would matter to them.” Xu Ziyuan was about to continue when Tang Xiaoqing jumped out with a smile. “Oh right, I found a huge flaw in this White Fog City.” Hearing this, Lu Chen slightly raised his eyebrows. “What flaw?” Tang Xiaoqing’s eyes were full of stars as she spoke, “I think in this Second World, everyone’s clothes are too uniform. They only have clothes that the system dropped at the very beginning. Other than a few people having special equipment, their clothes, equipment, and looks are the same. “Moreover, even the armor, defense bracelets, defense necklaces, and so on that dropped, the styles are all uniform. “Why didn’t White Fog City find some craftsmen and some tailors to customize some creative sets? “Just like in the main world, we will get all kinds of good-looking clothes to wear and good-looking shoes to change into.” Hearing this, all the men present were silent for a long time. They were people who focused on getting stronger in games, they were not here to change outfits and play house! “Based on the character of these players, as long as we design a few good-looking outfits, once they get shared around, they would probably sell like hotcakes. No matter how expensive they become, there would still be some players who will be willing to pay the price. “We could say that these weapons were made to have a special appearance like the Hero class. Just the sound of it would make people yearn for it. If the craftsmen added a little more special attributes and sold them, wouldn’t the money be easily earned? “No matter how high the price becomes, people would buy it!” Thinking of this, everyone looked at Tang Xiaoqing differently. Indeed, women were the main consumers in the world. Hearing this, Tang Bao became excited. He jumped up and said loudly, “I think what Tang Xiaoqing said makes sense. I have an idea too!” Lu Chen was ecstatic, based on what everyone shared, he was sure that Tang Bao had something equally as exciting. He looked at Tang Bao and said, “What is it about? Tell me.” Tang Bao said excitedly, “I think what Tang Xiaoqing said is right. Where there are people, there are people to compare with! “Therefore, we should not only focus on the appearance of the clothes and equipment. “What’s something else that might be important? “It’s the players’ appearances! “To buy all kinds of characters, wouldn’t we make a fortune?” Hearing this, Gu Yiming’s eyes lit up. “What you said makes sense. The Second World is where the consciousness of the real person enters. With the appearance of the person as the template, there is no way to change the appearance. What do you think can we do about it?” Tang Bao’s face was full of excitement and he was beaming with joy. “Then we’ll open up some plastic surgery hospitals! “Those who are ugly, we can bring them to our White Fog City’s plastic surgery hospitals to be operated on and help them become even more beautiful. Don’t you think we’ll make a lot of money from that?!” The moment Tang Bao opened his mouth, the entire scene instantly turned cold. Lu Chen was silent for a long time before he said to Tang Bao, “You stay by the side and listen. The others can continue talking.” It was not that the hospital was not allowed to exist, but that it was too difficult to change one’s appearance. Even if it was possible, Lu Chen did not want to delve into it. There was no other reason. It was just for the convenience of management. If everyone could change their appearance at will, then the Second World would be in complete chaos. Most importantly, no one had ever been able to change their appearance. Other than having a disguise and using the power of the bloodline to change one’s physique, these two methods could already cause changes to one’s appearance. Of course, it was not impossible. If they chose to change their appearance in the main world, their appearance in the Second World would also change a little. Liu Changping then said, “I think we should build more fixed teleportation arrays in White Fog City. “White Fog City is too big to walk on foot. People would have to walk a long way if they wanted to go to different regions to farm monsters. “In this way, if they entered the Second World for a day, they would spend at least half a day on the road, especially when people returned to the Novice Village after they died. If they wanted to go out to farm monsters, they could only do so near the Novice Village. “Because of the lack of teleportation arrays, they won’t be able to go to the places they wanted to go. “As long as we bind the teleportation arrays to the points system, we won’t have to worry about these people not using our points. “When the time comes, our teleportation arrays will be charged according to the mileage, so that everyone can afford to use them.” Lu Chen thought for a moment then nodded. “What you said makes sense. Points can only be obtained by entering White Fog City, and to enter White Fog City, we have to pay gold coins...; No! We have to use gold coins to exchange for points!” Hearing this, the others revealed a fox-like expression and nodded with sinister smiles. Lu Chen was very satisfied and continued, “In this way, we can recover the cost of building the teleportation array as soon as possible. “Therefore, in the future, when we enter White Fog City, we don’t need to collect gold coins, but have them exchange them for points! “The people of White Fog City would distribute points, and every player of White Fog City could receive a certain amount of points. “The previous rule of giving a 10% discount card will be removed and points will be given instead! “With the starting points, everyone will be able to enjoy certain benefits. Moreover, this way, the fee for entering White Fog City will be converted into points in equal proportion. This will also reduce everyone’s resistance. “By strengthening everyone’s sense of belonging, we can kill two birds with one stone. “This way, it’ll be equivalent to collecting a large number of funds.” Gu Yiming stood up in excitement, “That’s right! In other words, this is equivalent to opening a bank in White Fog City and collecting all the players’ funds. With this money, we can upgrade our city and enrich our resources!” Hearing this, everyone could not help but get excited! Thinking of this, Lu Chen’s mood lifted. He never thought that the problem of not having enough money, which he had been worried about all this time, would be solved just like that. Looking at these people in front of him, he felt satisfied! They were all his trusted aides, and their ranks must not fall behind! He had to promote them! The plan was finalized, and everyone quickly split up to look for resources. The Gu family, the Xu family, and Liu Changping’s Dragon Team were in charge of their own areas, developing their own directions. Tang Xiaoqing’s mission was to find beautiful clothes from the main world and provide them to the tailor shops in White Fog City. Lu Chen had also given her the authority to recruit NPCs. Under the temptation of the powerful gold coins, countless NPCs from all walks of life poured in and became employees of White Fog City. The 15 million gold coins that Lu Chen had just filled up were also being used up at an extremely fast rate. However, everyone was in high spirits because they knew that the money that they had spent today would be expanded at an extremely fast speed in the next few days. Gu Yiming mobilized all the upper echelons of the Gu family and fully utilized the power of his family to find all kinds of top scholars in economics and finance. He then brought them to the Second World to become an important analytical team in White Fog City. To these people, they didn’t lack money or status. What they lacked was powerful strength. As the top financial experts, money was just a number to them. They were clear that the main world and the Second World would soon fuse together. At that time, the cash in their hands would result in nothingness. No matter how much money they have, once the worlds merge, their words would mean nothing without power! The chance to interact with Lu Chen was something they couldn’t wait for. In fact, quite a few people would rather join Lu Chen’s team than receive a single cent! These people all understood one truth; in this world, whoever had the power would be the one to set the truth. The Dragon Country had a strong-armed force and financial power, so it had the right to set the rules and make the laws. Lu Chen’s appearance had made the country’s strength more powerful than before. Now, Lu Chen had no one to contest him. Of course, the ancient martial arts aristocratic families and the hidden families were not included. On the surface of the Dragon Country, Lu Chen was the strongest existence the general population could think of. Even if the ancient martial arts aristocratic families interfered, they might not be a match for Lu Chen. After all, Lu Chen had a powerful secret spiritual pet — Han Tianyi! It could be said that unless one used nuclear power, nothing could defeat Lu Chen. Especially with the defense of White Fog City and the help of the ultra-long-distance teleportation scroll, even a nuclear weapon would find it difficult to kill Lu Chen. Lu Chen was the undefeatable existence in this world and everyone acknowledged that. An 18-year-old youth with his heaven-defying strength was enough to trample the entire world under his feet. If these people did not follow him, they would definitely regret it for the rest of their lives. As long as they followed Lu Chen, they would be able to increase their levels by leaps and bounds. Although they were not big shots who were famous for fighting, even in the Second World, many of these people still had their uses. After all, in terms of combat power, they weren’t the greatest. However, they were very accurate in their strategies and their research played a powerful role in growing an economy. Where there were people, there would be society. It was impossible for top-notch talents like them to lack opportunities! However, this did not mean that they did not desire to level up! They were very clear that the combat power of the members of the Dragon Team had undergone an earth-shaking change. They were quite envious from that! In the past, Liu Changping was an expert when it came to the combat strength of the Dragon Team. However, no one in the Dragon Team could compare to the great elder. However, now, the hundreds of warriors of the Dragon Team were almost on par with the Frist Elder. It had only been a few days since the Mass Grave attacks and they were recuperating now. Looking at Liu Changping in front of them, it seemed that he was about to reach the gold stage. It was impossible for them not to be envious of such a rocket-like leveling speed. Especially with Gu Yiming as a comparison, it was even more obvious of their inferiority. On the Gu family’s side, even Gu Yiming was only at level 30, which was a huge expenditure of financial resources. On Xu Ziyuan’s side, as a woman, especially as a direct descendant of the Xu family, her understanding of luxury goods and clothing was admirable. She used all her channels to recruit many top talents from the top luxury brands and the fast-fashion clothing industry. Many people from abroad were invited to participate. Even the artists from the major game companies were not spared. These designers were men and women, and they were not short of money either. They came to Lu Chen to gain a sense of status. Many people even put on their clothes carefully. Before they came, they even planned for many types of designs before pitching their ideas. When these people came to White Fog City, they all started to clamor at Lu Chen’s feet, causing him to feel a little embarrassed. Most importantly, many of the top designers were men. When they winked at Lu Chen, Lu Chen felt goosebumps all over his body. For the sake of his own White Fog City’s construction, Lu Chen endured it, but Tang Xiaoqing could not. She stood in front of Lu Chen in a flash and asked all of them to go away. Although these designers had their own little tricks, their professional abilities were extremely outstanding! They didn’t need to cut the clothes themselves. They were only responsible for designing all kinds of exquisite clothing styles, especially since many of them were art designers who had been poached from major game companies, they were even more proficient in Second World clothing designs. It was a game — for now — after all! With so many designers banded together, intense sparks were quickly created. Countless styles of clothing and jewelry were sketched. Of course, Lu Chen didn’t mistreat them. These top talents all had their own houses in White Fog City, and Lu Chen distributed them according to their points. However, these talents all knew that now was far from the time to reap the rewards. Lu Chen was at the beginning stage of growing his city. In order to show their loyalty to Lu Chen and show their value, they worked hard. One by one, they exchanged most of their family assets for points. At the same time, many people had prepared their own clothes before they came and produced many of them one after another. As a result, Lu Chen’s impression of them greatly increased. These people exchanged their merits for points. It was obvious that they would not spend them for now. This was clearly to provide them with a flow of funds that could be used for the various expenses of White Fog City in the future, this much they knew. Lu Chen did not take advantage of them for anything. He directly helped them exchange their assets for an additional 20% of the points! One had to know that these people’s wealth was calculated in terms of hundreds of millions of dollars. 20% might not sound like much, but it was actually quite valuable. For these people, even a financial scientist would find it difficult to earn so much money in a short period of time. Lu Chen’s magnanimity made everyone fall for him even more! White Fog City slowly grew in terms of architecture. It had ancient buildings and bungalows as the main building. It could not accommodate a large population. Liu Changping had already considered this point. In order to show his ability, he specially mobilized the talents of the top construction companies in the country to move into White Fog City, a new round of structure planning was carried out for the entire White Fog City. At the same time, a large amount of money was funded into the city. At first, Lu Chen refused, but when the First Elder personally called him and explained that this money was for Lu Chen’s training fees to the members of the Dragon Team, Lu Chen directly accepted it. In the face of the First Elder’s good intentions, Lu Chen did not reject him. Instead of refusing, it was better to form a good relationship with him. It had to be said that Lu Chen’s ability to attract money was really strong. In just a few days, the total amount of gold coins in White Fog City had reached tens of millions. At this time, Lu Chen made an even more important decision for White Fog City, which was to upgrade White Fog City. Soon, he released the news that he was going to level up White Fog City. When the soldiers who received the money heard the news from Lu Chen, they immediately sent the good news to all the NPCs who were repairing the city walls. The entire city cheered in excitement knowing that their city was booming! A month later, without realizing it, White Fog City had undergone earth-shaking changes! The most notable of course was the buildings of the entire White Fog City. The talents of the top construction companies in the country that Liu Changping had previously mobilized had indeed played a great role. After their meticulous design and planning, they had also dispatched a large number of top construction teams from the country. The Dragon Country was now worthy of being called an infrastructure fanatic. With the joint efforts of many top-notch design talents and architectural elites, the White Fog City — which originally had an architectural style — now had become a super metropolis. Its coverage area was ten times larger than before. Moreover, there were plans for the further expansion of White Fog City. Now, the problem of population and residence was no longer a problem in White Fog City now that there were many high-rise buildings on different levels of the city! Even if there were five times the current population flow, White Fog City would be able to accommodate them all! Even the city’s infrastructure and city defense had made a qualitative leap. Listening to Liu Changping’s report, Lu Chen was also delighted. He did not expect that White Fog City would have such a big change in a month’s time. He could not help but praise his people. “Liu Changping, you’ve laid a solid foundation for the future development of White Fog City! That’s great!” Hearing Liu Changping’s report, Xu Ziyuan quickly stood up. After all, she had been busy in the past month and had played a very important role in the logistics of the city’s construction. Hearing Liu Changping being praised by Lu Chen, she naturally had to share her works too. She couldn’t let Liu Changping be the only one that gets the spotlight Xu Ziyuan found an opportunity to interject, she immediately spoke, “In the past month, we have ensured the supply of Health and Mana Potions, as well as other elixirs and medicines. “So far, there hasn’t been a single case where the lack of potions has affected the expansion and renovation of White Fog City. “At the same time, through the continuous replication of the craftsmen in the city, we have produced a large number of elixirs and medicines, and we have used them all to trade for points. At present, we are able to guarantee the stable status of our point system!” Hearing Xu Ziyuan’s words, Lu Chen’s eyes were full of admiration. “Well done! We’ve achieved a lot. I think everyone can notice the progress as well. “In addition, your clothing and luxury goods are also doing well! “With the continuous emergence of the high-end elites in White Fog City, the demand for high-end clothes has appeared. You were able to convert it into an opportunity. You did a good job!” Hearing Lu Chen’s words, Xu Ziyuan felt a little embarrassed. Just as she was about to say something, Tang Xiaoqing said with a proud look in her eyes. “This month, I haven’t been idle either. I’ve organized a large group of craftsmen and tailors. “According to the needs of men and women, each of them has a hundred and eight custom-made suits. They have also made clothes, shoes, hats, and more than five hundred individual items. “Judging from the current rate of the gold economy, it’s definitely on par with Xu Ziyuan’s!” Hearing the words of the two ladies, the men present could not help but raise their thumbs up! At this time, Liu Changping added his own progress. “City Lord, currently, we’ve built sixty-four fixed teleportation arrays in new White Fog City, and have reserved hundred and twenty-eight teleportation arrays for the later expansion of the city. “Currently, players can easily reach the places they want to go. Due to the rapid increase of these teleportation sites, the players are practically bound to our points. “Moreover, through the trial run of this half a month, we’ve already recovered one-third of the cost of constructing the teleportation arrays! “As the flow of players continues to pour into White Fog City, in less than a month, we’ll recover all the costs of constructing the teleportation arrays.” “Good!” Lu Chen praised excitedly, and his heart could not help but surge with admiration for these people. In fact, Liu Changping and the others only talked about the one-step changes in White Fog City. With the joint efforts of the Gu family, the Xu family, Liu Changping’s Dragon Team, as well as various top scholars in economics and finance, White Fog City’s industries, transportation, commerce, administration, culture, education, science, and other enterprises were all being improved day by day. Among them, the armed forces and financial forces had changed the most. As for financial forces, within a short month of the operation of the points system, they had completely monopolized the area. Now, they currently have 2,585,000,000 gold coins for White Fog City! In terms of armed forces and hard power, Lu Chen already had the strength to surpass the country. Even if he included the ancient martial arts aristocratic families, Lu Chen was still undefeatable. Tang Bao seemed to have noticed something, and excitedly said to Lu Chen. “Now that White Fog City has finished leveling up, shouldn’t we also take action?! “The first thing we should do is destroy Cherry Country, then Pepper Country, then Curry Country. Recently, they’ve been acting very arrogantly, so we should teach them a lesson! “Dominate them, then dominate the world!” The more Tang Bao talked, the more excited he became, so excited that he couldn’t help but dance. Tang Xiaoqing, who was standing at the side, was also full of excitement. She raised her arm and muttered, “I agree, I agree!” At this moment, the others present also nodded and looked at Lu Chen with expectant eyes. Seeing that everyone was surprisingly unanimous, Lu Chen’s heart fluttered. He paused for a moment and said, “I think the time is right! But since we’re going to fight, we must fight confidence! “And once we start fighting, we have to consider the reactions of other countries. Will they join forces and attack us together? “So, in the early stages, I suggest that we adopt a blitz attack. We should first eliminate countries that might come out to cause trouble!” After hearing this, everyone could not suppress the excitement in their hearts! “First, we should destroy Cherry Country, Pickle country, and Curry Country! Let’s humble them down!” “Right, let’s wipe them out first!” “Wipe them out!” “...;” Hearing everyone’s attitude, Lu Chen waved his hand and said in a high-pitched voice, “Good! Everyone, let’s split up and prepare for war. After the Demon Sealing Valley trial is over, it’ll be time for us to attack the others! “It’s time for the seven great ancient martial arts aristocratic families to be unified!” As he said this, he looked at Tang Bao and Tang Xiaoqing confidently! Lu Chen’s confidence was of course placed on his pet — Han Tianyi! A few months later, the Demon Sealing Valley trial ended. This time, the duration was unexpectedly short. When the seven great ancient martial arts aristocratic families came out of the Demon Sealing Valley, they were unexpectedly amiable. If one were to see that they were now as close as a family, everyone who knew the history of their previous open and secret struggles would probably drop their jaws in shock. The person who made the seven great ancient martial arts aristocratic families become harmonious was Lu Chen. To be more precise, it was Lu Chen’s spiritual pet, Han Tianyi, that made everything possible! His unexpected appearance immediately calmed the dispute! In a world where strength reigned supreme, it was that simple when it came to overpowering these families. As long as you had the strength, you could control everything. The dispute that had been going on for hundreds of years in the Demon Sealing Valley finally settled down. As for Lu Chen, a weight was lifted from his shoulders. Now, he could finally relax and go all out! … A week later, all the players in the Second World received a piece of news, three countries have been destroyed overnight! At this moment, the assailant, White Fog City, shook the entire Second World. When the players of the Dragon Country heard this delightful news, they were all excited! “D*mn, it was Lu Chen that wiped out three countries in one night, right?” “It’s really satisfying to hear news like this! I’m so excited!” “Why didn’t Lu Chen ask us? I could’ve scored some girls!” “Look at how useless you are!” “What’s wrong? I’m helping Lu Chen! The girls who get left behind might get lonely!” “As long as Lu Chen is around, it’s only a matter of time before we dominate the world.” “...;” For a moment, the crowd was in an uproar. Everyone felt as if they had been injected with adrenaline. They wanted to go to White Fog City as soon as possible and join Lu Chen’s side to realize the great cause of global unification! When the leaders of the Dragon Country heard this news, they were all shocked! “Lu Chen’s actions were fast! Three countries in one go...; Amazing!” “Well done!” “Young and promising, daring and bold! What a win!” “From now on, we’ll definitely be able to thrive!” “Send someone to find Lu Chen, if he needs any resources, just let me know!” For a moment, the crowd was excited, and everyone in the room had boundless hope for the future! … The destruction of the three powerful countries in one night caused a huge uproar in the entire world! “Charlotte, how can this White Fog City be so powerful? Is the world really going to change?!” “Impossible, how can someone destroy three countries in one night? Although those countries were still a distance away from us, they were all quite powerful characters!” “That’s right. I have reason to suspect that White Fog City deliberately fabricated this news! Their intention is to make us panic and stumble!” “No, no, no, this is absolutely true! I’ve already consulted many friends in that area. Those three countries were indeed destroyed in one night. What’s more, they actually didn’t even have time to react!” “It’s too scary. If we let him continue, wouldn’t we be…” In the Western Castle, all the leaders’ expressions were gloomy. The head looked at the news and the information that they had just received, and their faces were ashen! “It hasn’t even been three months since the fusion of the world, and the three strongest countries have been destroyed in the Second World. Are they planning to go for world domination?” A solemn voice sounded from the head’s office. The other leaders of the various countries lowered their heads and did not say anything. They had also felt that things had happened too suddenly. They had not expected the tiny White Fog City to take the initiative to fight. Moreover, they had not expected their execution to be so thorough. At this moment, they also felt that everyone was in danger. Especially after knowing how powerful they could be, they did not dare to attack rashly. “Now, everyone must unite as one!” “And from today onwards, taking down WHite Fog City is the most important matter! “Right now, the main world has almost turned its attention towards the Second World. This is no longer a game, but a game that affects the fate of all the countries in the world, as well as the structure of the entire world! “Right now, it’s a matter of life and death, do you understand?! “Everyone must maintain a high degree of unity and face the outside world in unison!” “...;” The leaders all smashed their fists onto their desks in frustration. Everyone was shocked, and they immediately replied, “Yes, sir!” “Victory is assured!” … Year by year, many other countries fell into the hands of White Fog City. The Dragon Country slowly gained more power and they had the upper hand in terms of making the shots around the world! At this point, the entire world had embarked on the path of unified development, and the players who joined Dragon Country were able to live a peaceful life. … 20 years later. White Fog City — which was in Dragon Country — had become the largest city and county in the Second World, and it was without a doubt one of the strongest countries. It could really be said to be a city and a world! White Fog City had already developed to a point where it was larger than the total area of more than half of the countries in the main world. Today was the final match of the Second World competition, with White Fog City’s Tianchen Academy against Luo City’s Qingfeng Academy. Using the best of 5 system, Tianchen Academy would win two out of the first three matches. As long as they won one more match, they would be able to obtain the final victory. In the arena, the fourth match was being held in full swing. The two youths representing White Fog City’s Tianchen Academy were dressed in pure white battle clothes. They were handsome and had golden titles. It was the Blade God title! He was currently using the Blade God’s skill to attack his opponent. The representative of Luo City’s Qingfeng Academy was a black-clothed girl. A golden title of Shield God appeared above her head. Her expression was cold and grave. The cold aura emanating from her body seemed like an ice beauty, attracting the attention of many spectators! With a bang, the figures separated. The boy and girl flew from the impact. A white figure flashed past, and he was instantly caught by someone. The person who caught him was an exceptionally beautiful young woman. The white-clothed youth who had lost the match wiped away the blood at the corner of his mouth and said with a bitter smile, “That’s unfair…” The young woman whom he addressed comforted him, “It’s alright. Rest well. I’ll help you take care of her.” As she said that, she tapped her feet on the ground and lightly floated onto the arena, smiling as she looked at the other party. “Lu Ling, you can’t defeat me. It’s better to admit defeat now than to suffer later.” “Min, don’t try to be brave in front of everyone. We’ll only know who comes out victorious after this battle. The title of the first academy will definitely belong to our Qingfeng Academy.” “Alright, then let’s fight. Take my moves! Sword Intent! Nirvana!” “Lame. Accurate Arrow!” A white and a black light suddenly collided in the air, producing a huge explosion! A brand new era began just like that.